3023833
Code_of_Virginia
thumb|200px|Title page to the Code of 1819, formally titled The Revised Code of the Laws of VirginiaThe Code of Virginia is the law of the state of Virginia, and consists of the codified legislation of the General Assembly.  The 1950 Code of Virginia is the revision currently in force.  The previous official versions were the Codes of 1819, 1849, 1887, and 1919, though other compilations had been printed privately as early as 1733, and other editions have been issued that were not designated full revisions of the code.  Publishing and accessThe official version of the Code of Virginia is published by the Company(Michies, or the Michie Company, is a national publisher of state codes.  It was originally an independent company and is now a wholly owned subsidiary of Elsevier, the parent company of LexisNexis.) under contract with the Virginia Code Commission, the governmental body responsible for printing and maintaining the code.  Wests Annotated Code of Virginia is an unofficial, competing version issued by Publishing, which includes more cross-references and West keynumbers.  The Virginia government also makes the code available without annotations for free on the internet., the printed Code of Virginia consists of twenty-nine hardcover volumes, with a two-volume subject matter index that is replaced annually.  The statutes are fully annotated by Virginia attorneys, and include cites to and summaries of Virginia state and federal court decisions as well as reviews.  The first volume of the Code of Virginia also prints the Constitution and the of the United States.The government of Virginia claims copyright over the Code, including the text of statutes.(Va. Code  30-147 provides, in part, that All parts of any code published or authorized to be published by the Commission, including statute text, regulation text, catchlines, historical citations, numbers of sections, articles, chapters and titles, frontal analyses and revisors notes, shall become and remain the exclusive property of the Commonwealth to be used only as the Commission may direct.  process considerations nevertheless require some extent of free public copying and distribution of the statutes themselves, though not necessarily the accompanying annotations and other material.)   Individual preparers, however, may obtain rights over case annotations, indices, and various notes concerning sections and reference tables they have written.The Virginia Code CommissionOriginally created in 1946 as the Commission on Code Recodification to prepare what became the Code of 1950, the Virginia Code Commission was made a permanent part of the states legislative branch and given the responsibility for publishing and maintaining the code.(Va. Code  30-146.  Publication of Code of Virginia, Administrative Code, and Register of Regulations; authority regarding type and form.)  It also has responsibility for publishing the Virginia Administrative Code and Rules of Evidence, as well as Virginia State Bar advisory opinions and Virginia compacts, which it may incorporate into the code.  Though the Commission may arrange for the code to be published directly by and at the expense of the Commonwealth of Virginia, since 1950 it has contracted the task of printing the code out to the Company.The Commission is composed of ten members, chosen by statute(Va. Code  30-145.  Virginia Code Commission; membership, terms; compensation; staff; quorum.) from the following: *Two present members of the Senate, by the appointment of the Senate Committee on Rules for the length of their elected term*Two present members of the House of Delegates appointed by the Speaker of the House for the length of their elected term*Two former or present Circuit Court judges, appointed by the governor for four year terms*One former member of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules to a four year term*One former member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker to a four year term*The Virginia Attorney General (or an assistant Attorney General by his designation)*The Virginia Director of the Division of Legislative ServicesThe Commission has full discretion to publish the code with or without annotations, to fix the number of volumes; and to decide all questions of form, makeup and arrangement, including title pages, prefaces, annotations, indices, tables of contents and reference, appendices, paper, type, binding and lettering.(Va. Code  30-146.)It also has the independent authority to make minor changes to the code without ratification by the General Assembly.(Va. Code  30-149.  Authority for minor changes to the Code of Virginia.)  Such changes include correcting unmistakable printers errors, misspellings, and erroneous cross-references, and updating obsolete references to renamed code titles, governmental officers and agencies.  It may also omit provisions which, in the judgment of the Commission, are inappropriate in a code, such as emergency clauses, clauses providing for specific nonrecurring appropriations and general repealing clauses.Updating and revising the CodeThe Virginia Code Commission is required to update the printed Code of Virginia at the end of each regular session of the General Assembly prior to the date new statutes and amendments become effective.(Va. Code  30-148.  Codification of session laws.) Pocket part supplements&mdash; stapled paper updates literally stuck in a cover pocket of the hardcover volumes&mdash;are printed annually.  The pocket parts were originally issued biennially, and then annually once the General Assembly began meeting every year in 1970.  Volumes are also periodically recompiled and reissued, which has occurred over a hundred times; each of the original volumes of the Code of 1950 has been split at least once into separate parts.Since 1953, the General Assembly has revised the code on a title-by-title basis rather than enacting entirely new revisions of the code as it had in the past.  The Commission has the responsibility for drafting title revision and recodification bills.   More than 50 titles have been repealed and replaced by successor titles, and nine of those have been replaced a second time.  The Commission must also evaluate whether any statutory provisions relating to the revised title have failed to be implemented over the previous five years due to the General Assembly failing to appropriate funds, and to recommend that such provisions be repealed.(Va. Code  30-152.  Revision of the Code of Virginia; construction of statutes relating to titles amended.)  The Commission also makes annual recommendations to the General Assembly regarding which sections are obsolete and should be repealed.(Va. Code  30-151. Ongoing responsibility for repeal of obsolete statutes and Acts of Assembly.)Legal supremacy of code provisionsThe laws published in the Code of Virginia are supreme over local ordinances passed by the counties and independent cities of Virginia.In turn, the Codes provisions must comply and be consistent with the Constitution, as well as the of the United States and federal law generally, and so its provisions are subject to invalidation by Virginia state or U.S. federal courts upon a finding that they are unconstitutional or preempted by federal legislation.  Otherwise, Code provisions remain in effect until amended or repealed by the General Assembly.  Changes are added through regular supplements and replacement volumes, rather than the issuance of a completely new code, which has only occurred five times.The Code and the Virginia ConstitutionThe Constitution, Article IV,  12, which states that No law shall embrace more than one object, which shall be expressed in its title, has periodically been used to attack the constitutionality of particular provisions of the Virginia Code on the basis that disparate subjects were codified under too broad or vague a topic.  The Supreme Court has repeatedly rejected these arguments, ruling that  12 does not prevent the Code from being organized around general subject matter, or require the Code to be a literal and detailed index of its contents.  Instead, the purpose of this provision was to prevent the General Assembly and the public from being misled as to the nature of a law, such that vicious legislation was hidden by a deceptive title.(See Commonwealth v. Brown, 21 S.E. 357, 360 (Va. 1895), for the first interpretation of that constitutional provision by the Supreme Court.)HistoryThough compilations of Virginia legislation were published before the Code of 1819, these were organized by their date of enactment rather than by subject matter, and so lacked the integration of modern codes.  The legislation of the of Virginia was not even officially published for the first 175 years of its lawmaking history.  Aside from original manuscript copies that were commonly misplaced or left to rot in county courthouses, information on new legislation was largely spread by word of mouth.  Aside from a few collections printed in London, the first unofficial publication of Virginia laws was in 1733, when Virginia newspaper pioneer William Parks published A collection of all the acts of Assembly of Virginia.Official action was not taken until 1808, after Virginia became part of the United States, when the Virginia General Assembly tasked William Waller Hening with the publication of the states laws.  His thirteen volume Statutes at Large (1809-23) was not comprehensive due to the loss of many records, but included all the session laws Hening could find dating from 1619 to 1792, as well as royal charters.(Henings Statutes at Large&mdash;an ongoing project to post the complete work online.)  Many of these came from the personal collection of Jefferson, who had preserved manuscript copies of legislation as early as 1734, and had offered to take on the task of publishing himself decades prior to Henings work.The Code of 1819The Code of 1819 was the first codification in Virginia that organized the statutory law by subject matter.  On March 12, 1819, the General Assembly passed An Act Providing for the re-publication of the Laws of this Commonwealth, and the resulting Code of 1819 entered into force on January 1, 1820.  The Revised Code of the Laws of Virginia: Being A Collection of all such Acts of the General Assembly, of a Public and Permanent Nature as are now in Force contained 262 chapters arranged in 23 subject titles, and was published in two volumes by Ritchie, Printer to the Commonwealth.(Ritchie was also the editor of the Richmond Enquirer, and a highly prominent spokesperson for the Democratic Party.  See bio at the Library of Virginia.)Watkins Leigh, member of the Virginia House of Delegates member and later reporter for the Virginia Supreme Court of Appeals, was appointed superintendent over the publication by the March 12 Act.  The General Assembly, which provided him with an eight page list of which laws to codify and expressly told him to ignore the date of enactment and categorize them instead by subject.  Leigh was assisted by Hening.Several other states had already organized their codes by subject, but conservative jurists, such as those that composed Virginias bar, preferred the tradition of dating public acts from the year of independence.  Leigh accordingly wrote an apologetic note in his preface to the Code on this issue and retained the dates in the side margin.The Code of 1819 mistakenly included the proposed of Nobility Amendment to the Constitution, which would have been the Thirteenth Amendment had it been ratified.  Modern-day proponents of TONAs enactment incorrectly point to its inclusion as evidence that Virginia had ratified it, but it was merely an editorial error due to incorrect information.(The General Assembly actually never took action over the amendment, which the act of March 12, 1819 did not mention, nor did the act give any independent legal effect to subsequent decisions of the editors and publishers of the code.)The Code of 1849The Code of 1849 has been considered the most thorough revision ever of Virginia law.  The General Assembly approved it in 1849, and it entered into force on July 1, 1850.  The Code of 1849 contained 216 chapters in 56 titles, with individually numbered sections in each chapter.  It also included annotations, in the form of footnotes that traced the development of institutions and legal doctrines back to the 17th century.  It was nonetheless fewer than 1000 pages, something its compilers were proud of.The Code of 1849 was principally the work of former Congressman and acting of Virginia, M. Patton, and legal scholar and Supreme Court reporter Conway Robinson.  They had been asked by the General Assembly in 1846 to suggest such contradictions, omissions or imperfections, as they may perceive in the statutes and to revise the code in such as manner as in their opinion will render the said general statutes most concise, plain and intelligible.(Act of Feb. 20, 1846, ch. 33, 1845-46 Va. Acts 26, 26-27.)  Patton and Robinson submitted five reports to the General Assembly between 1847 and 1849, and their work was finally adopted and passed by the General Assembly with only minor modifications.The 1849 revision was generally accepted as a modernization of Virginia statutory law and remained in force for almost 40 years, including during the temporary secession of Virginia from the United States during the Civil War.  It also became the first statutory law of Virginia, when it broke off from Virginia in 1863 to be admitted as a separate state.The code was updated in 1860 and 1873, but neither edition was adopted by the General Assembly as a revision.  By the 1870s, the code had expanded to more than 1,500 pages and contained numerous redundancies.The Code of 1887In 1884, the General Assembly authorized a new code and appointed three revisors&mdash;two former and one future Supreme Court of Appeals judges&mdash;to correct contradictions, omissions, and other errors in the statutes without producing a radical change in the present system.  The General Assembly also required the sections of the new code to be numbered in one sequence, following the system adopted in 1873 by the Revised Statutes of the United States, which simplified citation to Virginia statutes.  The revisors submitted the manuscript of their proposed code without having made any written progress reports, which the General Assembly passed without amendment with An act to revise, arrange, and consolidate into a Code the general statutes of the Commonwealth, approved on May 16, 1887.  The Code of 1887 went into effect on May 1, 1888.The flaws of the Code of 1887 included its lack of provision for supplementation and an outdated index, and the only annotations were citations in the margins that lacked the names of the cases as well as a description of the rulings.  Garland Pollard, a private Richmond attorney who was later to serve as Virginias attorney general and governor, corrected these errors in a series of privately published editions.  His 1894 Amendments to the Code of Virginia was printed on slips of paper intended to be pasted over the amended sections.  Four years later, Pollard published the Supplement to the Code of Virginia, which only printed amended sections and new laws, with new case annotations.  In 1904, Pollard published the two volume Code of Virginia as Amended to Adjournment of General Assembly, which was the first printed Virginia code to be updated regularly, by biennials and supplements.  It was also the first to include full case annotations that included summaries of the decisions, which more than half of those of other states had already published.The Code of 1919After nearly 30 years without an official revision, the General Assembly passed an act of March 21, 1914, that empowered the governor to appoint a revision committee.  The appointed revisors&mdash;a private attorney, the dean of the & Lee University law school, and a retired judge&mdash;drafted a proposed code that contained laws enacted through 1916, which was passed by the General Assembly with few amendments in March 1918. The Code of 1919 went into effect on January 13, 1920.The code contained 63 titles, with 6,571 consecutively numbered sections, and was published in an oversized, unannotated single volume and a two volume annotated edition.  Neither version of the Code of 1919 had any provision for supplementation, and so the Code of 1919 quickly became outdated, so that as soon as 1923, the director of the State Legislative Reference Bureau published General Laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia to incorporate amendments and assign section numbers to new statutes.In 1924, the Michie Company published The Code of Virginia as Amended to Adjournment of General Assembly 1924, which was prepared by company founder and Supreme Court of Appeals reporter Thomas Johnson Michie.  The Michie Code, as it became known, was supplemented after each session of the General Assembly, and a new edition was published in 1930, 1936, and 1942, by which time the one-volume code had grown to more than 3000 pages, and preparers had an increasingly difficult time squeezing new laws into the 1919 section numbering.The Code of 1950In 1944, the General Assembly appointed the Virginia Advisory Legislative Council to update the Code of Virginia with a view to emulating the multivolume, annotated codes that more than thirty other states had published by that time.  The Council recommended a four volume code, with provision for pocket part supplementation.  The Commission on Code Recodification was created in 1946, and its proposed code was enacted by the General Assembly on April 6, 1948 with few amendments, and published in 1949 in ten volumes by the Michie Company.  The Code of 1950 became effective on February 1, 1950.In 1953, the Virginia Code Commission recommended that the General Assembly revise the law on a title-by-title basis (which was the method followed by the Congress when it revised the States Code) rather than a complete revision, and the General Assembly in turn gave the Code Commission the responsibility for drafting recodification bills.  More than 50 titles have been repealed and replaced by successor titles, and thirteen of those have been replaced a second time.  With change thus occurring step-by-step, the Code of 1950 continues to remain in force.Proposed Code of 2007In 2005, the General Assembly authorized a complete revision of the Code, to become effective in 2007.  Each section of the Code, like that of Georgia, would be designated by three numbers, separated by hyphens.There was considerable outcry from practicing attorneys that they would have to relearn the designations of Code sections.  In response, the General Assembly did not authorize any money in 2006 to pay for the recodification.  This effectively put the recodification on hold, and it did not occur.Titles of the Code of VirginiaNote: repealed titles have been omitted*Title 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS.  *Title 2.2 ADMINISTRATION OF GOVERNMENT.  *Title 3.2 AGRICULTURE, ANIMAL CARE, AND FOOD.  *Title 4.1 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL ACT.  *Title 5.1 AVIATION.  *Title 6.1 BANKING AND FINANCE.  *Title 8.01 CIVIL REMEDIES AND PROCEDURE.  *Title 8.1A UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE - GENERAL PROVISIONS.  *Title 8.2 COMMERCIAL CODE - SALES.  *Title 8.2A COMMERCIAL CODE - LEASES.  *Title 8.3A COMMERCIAL CODE - NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENTS.  *Title 8.4 COMMERCIAL CODE - BANK DEPOSITS AND COLLECTIONS.  *Title 8.4A COMMERCIAL CODE - FUNDS TRANSFERS.  *Title 8.5A COMMERCIAL CODE - LETTERS OF CREDIT.  *Title 8.6A COMMERCIAL CODE - BULK TRANSFERS.  *Title 8.7 COMMERCIAL CODE - WAREHOUSE RECEIPTS, BILLS OF LADING AND OTHER DOCUMENTS OF TITLE.  *Title 8.8A COMMERCIAL CODE - INVESTMENT SECURITIES.  *Title 8.9A COMMERCIAL CODE - SECURED TRANSACTIONS.  *Title 8.10 COMMERCIAL CODE - EFFECTIVE DATE - TRANSITIONAL PROVISIONS.  *Title 8.11 1973 AMENDATORY ACT - EFFECTIVE DATE AND TRANSITION PROVISIONS.  *Title 9.1 COMMONWEALTH PUBLIC SAFETY.  *Title 10.1 CONSERVATION.  *Title 11 CONTRACTS.  *Title 12.1 STATE CORPORATION COMMISSION.  *Title 13.1 CORPORATIONS.  *Title 15.2 COUNTIES, CITIES AND TOWNS.  *Title 16.1 COURTS NOT OF RECORD.  *Title 17.1 COURTS OF RECORD.  *Title 18.2 CRIMES AND OFFENSES GENERALLY.  *Title 19.2 CRIMINAL PROCEDURE.  *Title 20 DOMESTIC RELATIONS.  *Title 21 DRAINAGE, SOIL CONSERVATION, SANITATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES DISTRICTS.  *Title 22.1 EDUCATION.  *Title 23 EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS.  *Title 24.2 ELECTIONS.  *Title 25.1 EMINENT DOMAIN.  *Title 26 FIDUCIARIES GENERALLY.  *Title 27 FIRE PROTECTION.  *Title 28.2 FISHERIES AND HABITAT OF THE TIDAL WATERS.  *Title 29.1 GAME, INLAND FISHERIES AND BOATING.  *Title 30 GENERAL ASSEMBLY.  *Title 31 GUARDIAN AND WARD.  *Title 32.1 HEALTH.  *Title 33.1 HIGHWAYS, BRIDGES AND FERRIES.  *Title 34 HOMESTEAD AND OTHER EXEMPTIONS.  *Title 35.1 HOTELS, RESTAURANTS, SUMMER CAMPS, AND CAMPGROUNDS.  *Title 36 HOUSING.  *Title 37.2 MENTAL HEALTH, MENTAL RETARDATION, AND SUBSTANCE ABUSE SERVICES.  *Title 38.2 INSURANCE.  *Title 40.1 LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT.  *Title 41.1 LAND OFFICE.  *Title 42.1 LIBRARIES.  *Title 43 MECHANICS AND CERTAIN OTHER LIENS.  *Title 44 MILITARY AND EMERGENCY LAWS.  *Title 45.1 MINES AND MINING.  *Title 46.2 MOTOR VEHICLES.  *Title 47.1 NOTARIES AND OUT-OF-STATE COMMISSIONERS.  *Title 48 NUISANCES.  *Title 49 OATHS, AFFIRMATIONS AND BONDS.  *Title 50 PARTNERSHIPS.  *Title 51.1 PENSIONS, BENEFITS, AND RETIREMENT.  *Title 51.5 PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES.  *Title 52 POLICE (STATE).  *Title 53.1 PRISONS AND OTHER METHODS OF CORRECTION.  *Title 54.1 PROFESSIONS AND OCCUPATIONS.  *Title 55 PROPERTY AND CONVEYANCES.  *Title 56 PUBLIC SERVICE COMPANIES.  *Title 57 RELIGIOUS AND CHARITABLE MATTERS; CEMETERIES.  *Title 58.1 TAXATION.  *Title 59.1 TRADE AND COMMERCE.  *Title 60.2 UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION.  *Title 61.1 WAREHOUSES, COLD STORAGE AND REFRIGERATED LOCKER PLANTS.  *Title 62.1 WATERS OF THE STATE, PORTS AND HARBORS.  *Title 63.2 WELFARE (SOCIAL SERVICES).  *Title 64.1 WILLS AND DECEDENTS ESTATES.  *Title 65.2 WORKERS COMPENSATION.  *Title 66 JUVENILE JUSTICE.*Title 67 VIRGINIA ENERGY PLANNotesReferences*The Statutes at Large of Virginia, Emily Croon.  November, 1999.*The Path of Virginia Codification, Kent C. Olson.  Virginia Lawyer, February, 2000.External links*Full text of the Code of Virginia, Virginia General Assembly website.*http://bookstore.lexis.com/bookstore/catalog?actionproduct&prod_id7673&cat_idC&pcat_id107&pub_id The Code of Virginia for sale from the LexisNexis Bookstore
3027463
Siege_of_Troitse-Sergiyeva_Lavra
casualties2?The Siege of Troitse-Sergiyeva Lavra ( ,   in Russian) was an abortive attempt of the Polish-Lithuanian irregular army supporting Dmitri II to capture the Trinity Monastery. The siege lasted for 16 months, from 23 September 1608 until 12 January 1610.In September 1608, the Polish-Lithuanian army of some 15,000 men (led by Piotr Sapieha and Aleksander Lisowski) laid siege to the fortress of the Trinity monastery (), which had been protecting the northern approaches to Moscow. The Russian garrison (estimated at between 2,200 and 2,400 men) consisted of dvoryane, streltsy, monastic servants, monks, and peasants, led by the voyevodas Prince Dolgorukov and Golokhvastov.In the early October 1608, the attackers began shelling and mining the monastery. Numerous assaults in October and November were repelled by the Russians and resulted in heavy losses for the Polish-Lithuanian army. The besieged were undertaking frequent sallies, one of which (9 November) would end with an explosion of a mine under a monastery tower and destruction of an enemy battery on the Red Mountain, with two peasants - Shipov and Sloba - losing their lives during this sally.There had been no significant military activity from late November 1608 until May 1609, but the besieged garrison suffered many casualties due to an outbreak of scurvy. In May through July 1609, the Russians repelled a number of enemy attacks. On 19 October 1609, and 4 January 1610, auxiliary detachments under the command of David Zherebtsov (900 men) and Voluyev (500 men) managed to make their way into the fortress. Under the threat of the approaching Skopin-Shuiskys army, the Polish-Lithuanian forces raised the siege on 12 January 1610 and retreated to Dmitrov.del Monasterio de la Trinidad y de San Sergio
3033116
Victor_Glushkov
footnotes         Victor Glushkov (August 24, 1923 &ndash; January 30, 1982) was the founding father of technology in the Union (and specifically in Ukraine), and one of the founders of Cybernetics.He was born in Rostov-on-Don, SFSR, in the family of a mining engineer. He graduated from State University in 1948, and in 1952 proposed solutions to the fifth problem and defended his thesis in State University.In 1956 he began working in science and worked in Kiev as a Director of the Computational Center of the of Science of Ukraine. In 1958 He became a member of the Communist Party.He made contributions to the of automata. He and his followers (Kapitonova, Letichevskiy and other) successfully applied that theory to enhance construction of computers. His book on that topic Synthesis of Digital Automata became well known. For that work, he was awarded the Prize in 1964 and elected as a Member of the Academy of Science of USSR.He greatly influenced many other fields of theoretical computer science (including the theory of programming and artificial intelligence) as well as its applications in USSR. He published nearly 800 printed works.One of his great practical goals was the creation of a National Automatized System of Administration of Economy. That very ambitious and probably too early project started in 1962 and received great opposition from many communist leaders.  He struggled for his ideas for years but the system won and the project stopped.Glushkov founded a Kiev-based Chair of Theoretical Cybernetics and Methods of Optimal Control at the Institute of Physics and Technology in 1967(The history of the MIPT Division in Kiev) and a Chair of Theoretical Cybernetics at State University in 1969.()The Institute of Cybernetics of National Academy of Science of Ukraine, which he created, is named after him.Honors and awards* Member of the Academy of Science of Ukraine since 1961.(Victor Glushkov. Site NASU)* Member of the Academy of Sciences since 1964.(Victor Glushkov. Site RAS)* Prize, 1964* of Lenin, 1967, 1975* State Prize, 1968, 1977* of Socialist Labor, 1969* Ukrainian State Prize, 1970, 1981* of the October Revolution, 1973* Computer Pioneer Award (IEEE), For digital automation of computer architecture, 1996.(Computer Pioneer Recipients)ReferencesExternal links*Victor Glushkov - Founder of Information Technologies in Ukraine and former USSR*Pioneers of Soviet ComputingMichailowitsch GluschkowGlushkov  
3036601
Barrett_family_of_Jamaica
The Barrett family played an important role in the of Jamaica. Barrett and family members migrated from England, landing on the island of Jamaica in 1655. In the years that followed, family members acquired substantial wealth and influence. They controlled much of the islands mining and agriculture, becoming one of the most prominent plantation owners of Jamaica.See also* Barrett - musician* Barrett - musician* Barrett - poet* Barrett Moulton: PinkieReferences* R.A. Barrett, The Barretts of Jamaica: The Family of Elizabeth Barrett Browning, Continuum International Publishing Group - Athlone, 2000, ISBN 0-485-30042-7
3042131
American_Institute_of_Chemical_Engineers
The American Institute of Chemical Engineers (AIChE) is a organization for chemical engineers.(American Institute of Chemical Engineers (Official AIChE website))AIChE was established in 1908 with the purpose of establishing chemical engineers as a profession independent from chemists and engineers. As of 2010, AIChE had over 40,000 members, including members from over 90 countries worldwide.(About the AIChE, Overview (from the AIChE website)) Student chapters at various universities around the world have also been established throughout its history.  The student chapters tend to focus on providing networking opportunities in both academia and in industry as well as increasing student involvement locally and nationally.History of formation:This section consists of excerpts from a historical pamphlet written for the Silver Anniversary of the AICHE in 1932.(John C. Olsen (December 1932), Chemical Engineering As A Profession: Origin and Early Growth of the American Institute of Chemical Engineers written for the Silver Anniversary of the AIChE held in Washington, D.C.)In 1905, The Chemical Engineer rounded out its first year of publication with an editorial by its founder and prominent engineer, Richard K. Meade, that propounded the question: Why not the American Society of Chemical Engineers? He went on to say: The profession is now a recognized one and there are probably at least five hundred chemical engineers in this country.The mechanical, civil, electrical, and mining engineers in the States each had already established a national society, so Meades editorial was quite pertinent. But it took time for the idea to take root and Meade kept promoting it for the next two years. Finally, in 1907, he issued a call for a preliminary meeting to be held in City in June, 1907. Some early leaders of the profession, Charles F. McKenna, William H. Walker, William Miller Booth, Samuel P. Sadtler and Thorn Smith along with about a dozen others answered Meades call and met in Atlantic City on June 21, 1907. The meeting concluded with the formation of an organizing committee of six members: Charles F. McKenna (chairman), Richard K. Meade, William M. Booth, J.C. Olsen, William H. Walker, and Arthur D. Little.Shortly afterward, the organizing committee sent a letter in September 1908 to 600 men in the chemical profession in the United States and Canada asking for their opinions about forming a chemical engineering society. Two hundred replies were received and 70-80% were favorable. Many of the others believed the existing societies (especially the Chemical Society) were sufficient and they did not favor forming a new society. After careful consideration, the organizing committee decided to hold a larger, open meeting at the Hotel Belmont in York at which those opposed to forming the new society could present their arguments and opinions. Accordingly, they invited fifty men prominent in the chemical profession (including men that opposed the forming of a new society) to meet on January 18, 1908. Twenty-one men attended the meeting and fourteen other expressed their views in letters. After much discussion, the meeting ended without reaching a definitive decision. However, it was agreed to have a mail vote (on whether or not to form a chemical engineering society) after a complete stenographic report of the meeting was printed and sent to the fifty men that had been invited to the meeting.The mail vote resulted in 36 replies of which 22 were in the affirmative, 6 were negative, and 8 were neutral. Based on those voting results, the organizing committee of six called for a full-fledged organizational meeting to be held in Philadelphia on June 22, 1908. Meanwhile, the committee of six drafted a proposed constitution to be presented at that meeting. That meeting resulted in the official formation of the American Institute of Chemical Engineers, adoption of a constitution and the election of Samuel P. Sadtler as the first president of the Institute. There were 40 charter members:*Acheson, E.G.*Adamson, G.P.*Allen, L.E.*Alexander, J.*Barton, G.E.*Bassett, W.H.*Bement, A.*Booth, W.M.*Brown, H. F.*Camp, J.M.*Catlin, C.A.*Dannerth, F.*Dow, Allan W.*Frerich, F.W.*Grosvenor, W.M.*Gudeman, E.*Haanel, E.*Heath, G. M.*Hollick, H.*Horn, D.W.*Hunicke, H.A.*Ingalls, W.R.*Kaufman, H.M.*Langmuir, A.C.*Mason, W.P.*McKenna, C.F.*Meade, R.K.*Miller, A.L.*Olney, Lewis A.*Olsen, J.C.*Reese, C.L.*Renaud, H.S.*Reuter, Ludwig*Robertson, A.*Sadtler, S.P.*Smith, Thorn*Trautwein, A.P.*Wesson, D.*Whitfield, J.E.*Weichmann, F.G.Technical Divisions and ForumsDivisions and forums provide technical information, programming for AIChEs technical meetings, and awards and recognition to outstanding chemical engineers in their area of expertise. They also provide opportunities for affiliation with top engineers in the general disciplines as well as in emerging fields like biotechnology and sustainability.This is a list of the divisions and forums:*Catalysis and Reaction Engineering Division (CRE)  *Computational Molecular Science & Engineering Forum (CoMSEF)  *Computing & Systems Technology Division (CAST)  *Education Division (EDU)*Environmental Division (ENV)  *Food, Pharmaceutical & Bioengineering Division (FP&BE)  *Forest Products Division (FP)  *Fuels & Petrochemicals Division (F&P)  *Materials Engineering & Sciences Division (MESD)  *Nanoscale Science Engineering Forum (NSEF)   *North American Mixing Forum (NAMF)  *Nuclear Engineering Division (NE)  *Particle Technology Forum (PTF)  *Process Development Division (PD)  *Safety & Health Division (S&H)  *Separations Division (SEP)  *Sustainable Engineering Forum (SEF)  *Transport and Energy Processes Division (TEP)Membership gradesThe AIChE has four grades of membership as listed below (ranging from the highest grade to the lowest grade):* Fellow* Senior Member* Member* Student memberThe prerequisite qualifications for election to any of the membership grades are available in the AIChE Bylaws.(The AIChE Bylaws (as amended to November 10, 2006))Joint initiatives with industry, academia, and othersAs new technology is developed, there is a need for experts to collaborate to achieve common goals. The AIChE plays a major role through joint initiatives with industry, academia, and others.*Center for Chemical Process Safety (CCPS):(About CCPS) CCPS is a non-profit, corporate membership organization within AIChE that addresses process safety within the chemical, pharmaceutical, and petroleum industries. It is a technological alliance of  manufacturers, government agencies, consultants, academia and insurers dedicated to improving industrial process safety. CCPS has developed over 100 publications relevant to process safety.*Design Institute for Emergency Relief Systems (DIERS):(AIChE DIERS) DIERS was formed in 1976 by a group of 29 companies that developed methods for the design of emergency relief systems to handle runaway reactions. Currently, 232 companies participate in the DIERS Users Group to cooperatively implement, maintain and improve the DIERS methodology for the design of emergency relief systems including reactive systems.*Design Institute for Physical Properties (DIPPR):(DIPPR)(The Origin of DIPPR) DIPPR collects, correlates and critically evaluates thermophysical and environmental property data. If needed property values are not found in the literature, they may be measured in DIPPR projects and subsequently added to the DIPPR  databases. DIPPR disseminates their information in publications, computer programs and databases on diskettes and online.*Safety and Chemical Engineering Education Program (SACHE) :(Welcome to SAChE) The SAChE program, initiated in 1992, is an initiative between the CCPS and engineering universities to provide teaching materials about process safety for educating undergraduate and graduate students studying chemical and biochemical engineering. The materials can also be used for training in industrial settings. The SAChE leadership committee is composed of representatives from academia and industry as well as AIChE staff.*Institute for Sustainability (IFS):(About IFS) The mission of IFS is assist professionals, academes, industries, and governmental entities contributing to the advancement of sustainability and sustainable development. The primary goal of the IFS is to promote the societal, economic, and environmental benefits of sustainable and green engineering.Publications*Chemical Engineering Progress (CEP): Monthly magazine providing technical and professional information.*AIChE Journal: Peer-reviewed monthly journal covering groundbreaking research in chemical engineering and related fields.*Process Safety Progress: Quarterly publication covering process safety issues.*Environmental Progress: Quarterly publication covering environmental subjects and governmental regulations.*Biotechnology Progress: Peer-reviewed journal published every two months and covering peer-reviewed research reports and reviews in the bioprocessing, biomedical, and biomolecular fields.See also* engineer* engineering* of chemical engineering* of chemical engineers* of chemical engineering societies* design (chemical engineering)* Chem-E-CarReferences(Further reading*External links* Official Website of AIChE* About AIChE (from Stevens Institute of Technology)Institute of Chemical Engineers  Institute of Chemical Engineers
3047931
Augustus_Owsley_Stanley
signature_altA. O. StanleyAugustus Owsley Stanley (May 21, 1867  August 12, 1958) was a politician from the US state of Kentucky. A Democrat, he served as the 38th of Kentucky and also represented the state in both the U.S. House of Representatives and the U.S. Senate. From 1903 to 1915, Stanley represented 2nd congressional district in the House of Representatives, where he gained a reputation as a progressive reformer. Beginning in 1904, he called for an antitrust investigation of the Tobacco Company, claiming they were a monopoly that drove down prices for the tobacco farmers of his district. As a result of his investigation, the Court of the United States broke up the American Tobacco Company in 1911. Stanley also chaired a committee that conducted an antitrust investigation of U.S. Steel, which brought him national acclaim. Many of his ideas were incorporated into the Antitrust Act.During an unsuccessful senatorial bid in 1914, Stanley assumed an anti-prohibition stance. This issue would dominate his political career for more than a decade and put him at odds with C. W. Beckham, the leader of the pro-temperance faction of the states Democratic Party. In 1915, Stanley ran for governor, defeating his close friend P. Morrow by just over 400 votes. It was the closest gubernatorial race in the states history. Historian H. Harrison called Stanleys administration the apex of the Progressive Era in Kentucky. Among the reforms adopted during his tenure were a state antitrust law, a finance reform law, and a compensation law. In 1918, Stanley was chosen as the Democratic nominee to succeed the recently deceased senator M. James. Stanley was elected, but did not resign as governor to take the seat until May 1919 and accomplished little in his single term. He lost his re-election bid to M. Sackett in the 1924 Republican landslide and never again held elected office. He died in Washington, D. C. on August 12, 1958.Early lifeAugustus Owsley Stanley was born in Kentucky on May 21, 1867; he was the eldest of seven children of William and Amanda (Owsley) Stanley.(Burckel, p. 137) His father was a minister of the Disciples of Christ and served as a judge advocate on the staff of E. Johnston in the Army.(Johnson, p. 1109) His mother was the niece of former Kentucky governor Owsley.(Powell, p. 82) He attended Gordon Academy in Kentucky and the Kentucky Agricultural and Mechanical College (later the of Kentucky) before graduating with an A.B. from College in 1889.(Kentucky Governor Augustus Owsley Stanley. National Governors Association.) At both Centre and Kentucky A&M, he competed at the State Oratorical Contest, becoming the only such competitor to represent two different institutions.(For a year after graduation, Stanley served as chair of belles-lettres at Christian College in Kentucky.( The following year, he was principal of Marion Academy in Bradfordsville, then spent two years in the same position at Mackville Academy in Mackville.((Augustus O. Stanley. Biographical Directory of the United States Congress.) While he held these positions, he studied law under Gilbert Cassiday.(Appleton in Kentuckys Governors, p. 145) He was admitted to the bar in 1894, and opened his practice in Kentucky.(Political careerStanleys first venture into the political arena was in 1897 when he made an unsuccessful bid to become attorney of Fleming County.(Harrison in The Kentucky Encyclopedia, p. 847) He continued to practice law in Flemingsburg until March 1898 when he moved to Henderson because of financial hardships.( He served as a Democratic presidential elector on the ticket of Jennings Bryan in 1900.(House of RepresentativesIn 1902, Stanley was elected as a U.S. Representative from 2nd congressional district.( During his tenure in the House, he served on the Committee on Mines and Mining, the Committee on Territories, and the Committee on Agriculture.( He advocated for progressive reforms such as more extensive study of mine accident prevention, railroad regulation, a pure food and drug act, and an eight-hour work day.(By the time of Stanleys election to the House, the Tobacco Company had eliminated all its substantial competitors either by acquisition or by driving them out of business.( The company worked with British tobacco manufacturers to set tobacco prices worldwide.( Congressman Stanley came to the defense of the tobacco farmers of his district, making him virtually unbeatable as a congressional candidate.( In the first of his five consecutive terms, he authored a bill that would remove an oppressive national tobacco tax, hoping this would help raise prices for unprocessed tobacco.(Burckel, p. 138) The bill was defeated by extensive lobbying efforts by the American Tobacco Company.( In 1904, he convinced the Ways and Means Committee to hold public hearings on the American Tobacco Companys monopolistic actions, but the hearings did not convince legislators to repeal the tax nor take action against the American Tobacco Company.(Besides his legislative efforts on behalf of farmers, Stanley also directly encouraged them to organize and keep their crops off the market until prices improved.( He helped draft the charter for the Dark District Tobacco Planters Association.( Some of the more radical members of this group, known as the Night Riders, used vigilante violence to compel membership in the Association during what became known as the Patch Tobacco Wars.( Finally in 1909, Stanley attached his proposed repeal of the tobacco tax as a rider to the Tariff Act.(Burckel, p. 140) The bill passed the House, but the Senate stripped Stanleys provision.( Kentucky Senator Ollie M. James reintroduced the repeal into the Senate version of the bill, and it survived when the bill was passed into law.( The repeal resulted in higher tobacco prices, and although Stanley had not been alone in getting the repeal passed, he received much of the credit.( In 1911, Stanleys fight against the American Tobacco Company bore fruit, as the Supreme Court ruled the company to be in violation of antitrust laws and broke it into separate companies.( Both the tax repeal and the breakup of American Tobacco helped quell the violence perpetrated by the Night Riders.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 281)Stanley gained national notoriety for his actions against U.S. Steel. In 1909, he introduced a resolution calling for an investigation of the company, but it died in the House Rules Committee. A second resolution, introduced in June 1910, passed the House, but was ignored by President Howard Taft. Stanley introduced a stronger resolution later that month, but it was killed in committee. After Republicans lost control of the house in the 1910 congressional elections, Stanley reintroduced his resolution. House Speaker Clark appointed him as chairman of a nine-member committee to investigate U.S. Steel.(Burckel, pp. 141142) The committees investigation lasted from May 1911 to April 1912. At its conclusion, the committee split along party lines. Stanley authored the majority report which condemned alleged fixing by U.S. Steel and censured President Roosevelt for his role in U.S. Steels purchase of the Coal and Iron Company. The minority report, authored by Republican P. Gardner, absolved Roosevelt and downplayed the price fixing charges. Stanleys report also recommended a number of changes to strengthen the Anti-Trust Act. Though his recommendations were not enacted into law during his time in the House, many of them were eventually included in the Antitrust Act.(Burckel, pp. 142144)1915 senatorial bidDespite having no serious challengers for his House seat, Stanley declined to seek re-election in 1915, choosing instead to run for a seat in the U.S. Senate.(Burckel, p. 144) He was one of three Democrats seeking the seat, the others being Governor B. McCreary and former governor C. W. Beckham.(Klotter, p. 224) McCreary was never a serious challenger, and the primary campaign centered on Stanley and Beckham, the leaders of the two largest factions of the states Democratic party.( The two men disliked each other. Stanley had once referred to Beckham as a fungus growth on the grave of Goebel  an allusion to Beckhams former running mate, Governor Goebel, whose assassination in 1900 had elevated Beckham to the governorship.( During the campaign, Stanley criticized Beckhams use of machine politics, calling his opponent Lord Fauntleroy.(Prohibition became the major issue of the campaign. Though both Stanley and Beckham were known to drink liquor, Beckham campaigned on a pro-temperance platform.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 283) Stanley, an opponent of prohibition, criticized Beckhams position as hypocritical, saying of pro-temperance politicians in general and Beckham in particular They keep full of booze and introduce bills to punish the man who sells it to them.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 214) Beckham would sell out the world to go to the Senate, he added.(  The support of Courier-Journal editor Watterson and Representative Ben Johnson were not enough to carry Stanley to victory.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 225) Beckham secured the Democratic nomination by almost 7,000 votes and went on to win the seat in the general election.(Governor of KentuckySeveral candidates announced their intention to seek the Democratic gubernatorial nomination in 1915, but by late August, only two remained in the race.(Klotter, p. 225) Stanley was the choice of the anti-prohibition faction of the party, while state superintendent Harry V. McChesney represented the prohibition faction, backed by Beckham.(Klotter, pp. 225226) Stanley won the nomination with 107,585 votes to McChesneys 69,722.(Klotter, p. 226) The Republicans nominated Stanleys close friend P. Morrow.( The two traveled the state together, often speaking from the same stage.(Klotter, p. 227)Stanley was a powerful orator who used dramatic flourishes to emphasize his points. He would often loosen his tie before he ever started speaking, and by the end of his speech have thrown off his vest and coat.( In one instance, the candidates debated a tax on dog owners of one dollar per dog.( Stanley favored the tax, while Morrow contended that everyone should be allowed one dog tax-free.( Stanley ridiculed the idea as Free Old Dog Ring, and sometimes howled like a dog in speeches deriding the proposal.( On another occasion Stanley, who had too much to drink, vomited in front of the audience as Morrow spoke.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 285) When Stanley took the podium, he remarked, That just goes to show you what I have been saying all over Kentucky. Ed Morrow plain makes me sick to my stomach.(Democrats had been divided in the primary, but united behind Stanley in the general election. Senators Beckham and M. James endorsed him, as did Governor B. McCreary. Gompers praised Stanley for his opposition to trusts while in Congress; endorsements from local chapters of the Federation of Labor soon followed. Even Harry McChesney, Stanleys primary opponent, urged Kentuckians to vote a straight Democratic ticket.(Appleton in Register, pp. 5051)The election was too close to call on election night. Knowing that a challenged election would be decided by the heavily Democratic General Assembly, Morrow conceded a week later. Official results showed that Stanley won the election by 471 votes, the closest gubernatorial vote in the states history.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, pp. 285286)Historian H. Harrison called Stanleys administration the apex of the Progressive Era in Kentucky.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 286) The most significant legislation passed during the 1916 legislative session were a state antitrust law and a ban on railroads offering free passes to public figures.( A Corrupt Practices Act required candidates for office to file reports of their expenses, limited the amount of allowable expenses, and forbade public service corporations from contributing to any campaign.(Klotter, p. 228) Other accomplishments included initiating the states first budget program, enacting its first compensation law, and instituting a convict labor law.( The one progressive measure that did not pass, a bill granting suffrage, failed in the House by a single vote.(Klotter, p. 229)Stanley called the General Assembly into special session in February 1917.(Appleton in Kentuckys Governors, p. 147) At issue was reformation of the states tax code, which Stanley felt unjustly burdened agricultural interests.( The state was also incurring large deficits, ranging from $100,000 to $700,000 annually.(Klotter, p. 230) Though Kentucky was in better shape financially than many of its peers, Stanley still sought to balance the budget.( The session lasted sixty days, and the legislature passed of many of the bills he advocated. The most significant created a three-member state tax commission, chaired by M. Logan.( Additional taxes were passed on distilled spirits, oil production, race tracks, and corporate licenses.(Klotter, p. 231) Assessments on the value of property, which had typically been evaluated at one-third to one-half of fair market price, rose dramatically.(Klotter, pp. 230231) To balance this increase, legislators reduced the tax rates on certain types of property.( With the dramatic increase in funds yielded by the special session, the General Assembly approved funding increases in nearly every part of state government, including higher education.( The State Board of Health was given expanded powers, and county boards of health were established.(Stanleys administration was affected by the United States entry into World War I. The legislature established and funded a state Council of Defense,( but Stanley vetoed a bill that would have banned the teaching of German in public schools.( As in his run for Senate and in the gubernatorial primary, the liquor question was central to Stanleys tenure as governor. Although anti-prohibition forces declared prohibition dead following his election, a prohibition amendment was introduced during the first legislative session following it.(Appleton in Register, p. 52) The amendment failed by a vote of 2014 in the state senate.( In 1918 it was submitted to the states voters by an overwhelming 9517 joint vote of the General Assembly.( Although Stanley was against prohibition, he supported the 1918 amendment in order to settle the liquor issue and clear the legislatures order paper for other measures.(Appleton in Register, p. 53) In 1919, Kentucky was the first wet state to ratify the Eighteenth Amendment, enshrining prohibition into the national constitution.(U.S. SenatorOn August 18, 1918, incumbent senator Ollie M. James died.(Appleton in Kentuckys Governors, p. 148) Stanley appointed B. Martin to finish James term, which was to expire on March 3 of the following year.( James had already been nominated for re-election in 1918 by the Democratic primary, and the task of selecting the partys new nominee fell to the Democratic State Committee, which nominated Stanley.( Stanley enjoyed the advantage of a united Democratic party; J. C. W. Beckham supported Stanley for this seat so Stanley would not challenge him for his own seat when he faced re-election.( The Republicans chose a relative unknown, Dr. Ben L. Bruner.( Stanley was attacked for his veto of the German language bill and for his long-standing views against temperance.( Though the national mood was against the Democrats, a letter of support from President Wilson bolstered Stanleys campaign, and he defeated Bruner by more than 5,000 votes.( He resigned as governor to assume the Senate seat in May 1919.( As a Democrat in a mostly Republican Senate, he wielded little influence.(When Stanley sought re-election to his seat in 1924, he faced an uphill battle. No Kentucky senator had been re-elected to his seat in over forty years (though senators had been popularly elected only since 1914).(Klotter, p. 281) His opposition to prohibition cost him the support of pro-temperance voters and Democratic governor J. Fields.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 354) He was also opposed by the Klux Klan, then a powerful organization in the state, because of his opposition to bigotry and secret organizations.(Finch, p. 46) His Republican opponent M. Sackett secured the support of the Beckham wing of the Democratic Party.(Harrison in A New History of Kentucky, p. 355) Despite having his own private stock of liquor, Sackett took a pro-temperance position in the campaign and was endorsed by the League.( Courier-Journal editor Worth Bingham added his endorsement, calling Sackett one of the best men I know.( In the general election, Stanley lost his seat by almost 25,000 votes.( Sacketts victory meant Kentucky would have two Republican senators for the first time in its history.(Klotter, p. 282)Later life and deathFollowing his defeat in the Senate, Stanley returned to his legal practice. In the 1927 gubernatorial election, he threw his support to his old enemy, J. C. W. Beckham, hoping to improve his chances of returning to the Senate in 1930.(Finch, p. 43) Beckham lost to Republican D. Sampson, greatly diminishing Stanleys chances in the senatorial campaign.(In 1930, President Hoover appointed Stanley to the Joint Commission, a body charged with settling boundary disputes between the United States and Canada.( Stanley became its chair in 1933.( He was very proud of his service on the Commission, and once noted that nowhere on earth have two great powers lived so long as neighbors with so few disputes.( He served until 1954 when he resigned under pressure from his own party.( Stanley died in Washington, D.C., on August 12, 1958 and was buried in Cemetery in Kentucky. He was survived by his wife, Sue (Soaper) Stanley, and two of his three sons, William and Augustus, Jr.( His grandson, Augustus Owsley Stanley III (19352011), became a well-known LSD chemist and backer of the Dead during the movement.(Jackson, p. 90)ReferencesBibliography************idFurther reading* *The steel hearings included a session at New York City Hall in July, 1911. See Steel inquiry goes on here now, The New York Times, July 28, 1911.*For an op-ed by Senator Stanley relative to the constitutional implications of and seizure provisions in Prohibition legislation in early 1922, see Search and Seizure: Senator Stanley Attacks Constitutionality of new Prohibition Act, The New York Times, January 8, 1922.External links* Find-A-Grave profile for Augustus O. Stanley*Profile by the University of Kentucky Alumni AssociationOwsley StanleyStanleyO. Stanley
3052461
Jos_Mara_Avils_Province
Jos Mara Avils (or: Avilez) is a province in the western parts of the Bolivian department Tarija.  LocationAvils province is one of six provinces in the Tarija Department. It is located between 21 28 and 22 05 south and between 64 29 and 65 25 west.  The province borders Mndez Province in the north, Department in the west, Argentina in the south, Arce Province in the south-east, and Cercado Province in the north-east. The province extends over 85 km from north to south, and 115 km from east to west.PopulationMain idiom of the province is Spanish, spoken by 98.9 %, while 2.4 % of the population speak Quechua, and 0.2 speak Aymara.The population increased from 16,210 inhabitants (1992 census) to 17,504 (2001 census), an increase of 8.0 %. - 47.6 % of the population are younger than 15 years old.81.6 % of the population have no access to electricity, 82.9 % have no sanitary facilities (1992). 77.0 % of the population are employed in agriculture, 0.1 % in mining, 3.7 % in industry, 19.2 % in general services (2001).93.9 % of the population are Catholics, 4.6 % are Protestants (1992).DivisionThe province comprises two municipalities:*Municipality*Municipality Places of interest * de Sama Biological Reserve* Flora and Fauna National ReserveExternal links*General map of province*Detailed map of province towns and rivers*Population data (Spanish) Mara Avils (Provinz)Jos Mara Avilsde Jos Mara Avilsdi Jos Mara AvilsMara Avils (provincie)Jos Mara AvilsMara Avils (provncia)Mara Avils pruwinsyaMara Avils (provins)Mara Avils (probinsya)
3057902
MINExpo_International
MinExpo International is a show sponsored by the Mining Association.()  The show exhibits the latest mining and minerals processing technologies, and state-of-the-art machinery and equipment for the coal, metal and nonmetal mining processing industries.  MINExpo International 2008 is thought to have been the largest mining trade show in the world.()MINExpo International is held every four years and has been held at the Vegas Convention Center since 1996.()  The 2008 MINExpo drew over 44,000 people (an increase of over 44% from the previous show in 2004) and 1,025 exhibitors in an area of (((ReferencesExternal links*MINExpo Official websitetr:MINExpo
3065577
Malyshev_Factory
The Malyshev Factory (), formerly the Kharkiv Locomotive Factory (KhPZ), is a state-owned manufacturer of heavy equipment in Kharkiv, Ukraine. It was named after the Soviet politician Malyshev. It produces engines, machinery, mining, sugar refining, and farm equipment, but is best known for its production of Soviet tanks, including the tank series of fast tanks, the famous T-34 of the Second World War, the Cold War T-64 and T-80, and their modern Ukrainian successor, the T-84.  The factory is closely associated with the Design Bureau (KMDB), designer of military fighting vehicles. Naming The factory was renamed several times.  English-language sources variously refer to it as factory, plant, or works, from the Ukrainian zavod.Timeline* 1895Establishment of the Kharkiv Locomotive Factory ()* 1923Production line for Kommunar tractors established* 1928Renamed Kharkiv Komintern Locomotive Factory (), and the tank design bureau is established* 1936Renamed Factory No. 183 (Zavod No. 183)* 1941Evacuated to Tagil in the Urals and merged with the Factory, to form the Ural Tank Factory No. 183* 1945Re-established at Kharkiv Diesel Factory No. 75* 1957Renamed Malyshev Plant () History The Kharkiv Locomotive Factory (KhPZ) built about 20% of the Empires engines.  After the Russian Revolution and the establishment of the Soviet government in Ukraine, the factory was put to work designing and building tractors, then tanks after 1927.  The Factory in Leningrad and the KhPZ were the first two Soviet tank factories, modernized in 1929 with German assistance under the of Rapallo, 1922.Tank productionIn 1928, a tank design bureau was established in the factory, one of several which would be responsible for the some of the most successful tanks ever built, and eventually become the Design Bureau.  The KhPZ designed and produced twenty-five T-24 tanks, then nearly eight thousand fast tanks.  It also built a handful of multi-turreted T-35 tanks.  Shortly before the German invasion of the Soviet Union the KhPZ started series production of the T-34, the most-produced and arguably the best tank of War II. Series production began in June 1940 in Kharkiv, and later in the Stalingrad Tractor Plant and Sormovo Shipbuilding Plant.  In 1941, due to German advances, the factory and design shops were evacuated to the mountains. The plant was united with Uralvagonzavod Plant in Tagil into one enterprise called Uralskiy Tank Plant No.183.When Kharkiv was recaptured, it began production of the new T-44 tank in 1945, and the first prototypes of the T-54 were built.  After the war was over, the design bureau and factory gradually transferred all operations back to Ukraine.  T-54 production was started in the Urals and Kharkiv in 194748, and the move ended with the 1951 re-establishment of the Design Bureau, now called KB-60M, in Kharkiv.  The Factory No. 183 designation was left in Nizhny Tagil, and the Factory in Kharkiv was now called Factory No. 75, renamed Malyshev Plant in 1957.  The factory built tank engines, and later took up production of T-54, T-55 (1958, the most-produced tank ever), and T-64 (1967) tanks.  The T-64 was also built in the Leningrad Plant and Uralvagonzavod Plant.  In the 1960s the bureau also designed OT-54 and TO-55 flame-thrower tanks, for production at the Omsk Transport Machine Construction Plant.  The T-80 tank, with a high-performance turbine engine was produced beginning in 1983, and T-80UD (more conventional diesel model) in 1985.Finished tanks were assembled in several plants, but Soviet industrial planning was planned to prevent any region from being able to establish independent arms production.  Components and subassemblies were produced in different factories, the Malyshev Factory specializing in engines and transmissions. After Ukrainian independence The Malyshev factorys million-square-metre facility produced 800 tanks in 1991, but underwent difficult times after the breakup of the Soviet Union, producing only 46 tanks until 1996, when a $650 M contract was signed to supply 320 T-80UD tanks to Pakistan.( )  Fulfilling the contract was difficult  the distributed nature of Soviet military industry forced reliance on Russian factories for parts, and Russian political interference forced the development of local capabilities, resulting in the T-84 tank design.Like many Ukrainian industries, Malyshev was not allowed to negotiate contracts directly with foreign governments, but had to rely on Ukrspetsexport, a government arms-trading company.  Although Malyshev was denied exporter status in July 1999, it was given this status by decree of President Kuchma in November of that year, a move seen to be an election gift to the Oblast (province).  Malyshev joined as the leader of thirty-four companies to form an export consortium called Armored Vehicles.Malyshev has demonstrated main battle tanks to Turkey, Greece, and Malaysia, and has entered into a contract to supply engines for Chinese-made Al-Khalid tanks for Pakistan.  In September 2000, a deal was signed to modernize Soviet-made tanks and armoured personnel carries for the Arab Emirates. The Malyshev factory also manufactures parts for Bizon, a Polish producer of agricultural combines.In April 2009, the Malyshev Factory signed a contract to upgrade 29 T-64B -64 tanks to T-64BM Bulat  standard, for the Ukrainian Army for 200 million hryvnia ($25.1 million).  Ten upgraded tanks have been delivered in 2010, and a further 19 are planned to be delivered in 2011.  The T-64B tanks being upgraded were originally produced at Kharkiv in 1980.(wknews.ru      -64, 28 October 2010)(Kharkiv Morozov Machine Building Design Bureau Main Characteristics of the Upgraded BM Bulat Battle Tank) References *  External links * Official website* T-64BV repaired at Malyshev Factoryja:VOim. Wiaczesawa Mayszewa  . . 
3070308
Christian_Ditlev_Frederik_Reventlow
awards       of the Elephant, of the DannebrogChristian Ditlev Frederik, Count of Reventlow (11 March 1748  11 October 1827) was a Danish statesman and reformer, the son of Councillor Ditlev Reventlow (17101775) by his first wife, baroness Johanne Sophie Frederikke von Bothmer.Christian Ditlev Frederik was born into the Reventlow family, an ancient Danish-German family of high nobility. His paternal great-grandfather was the first Danish Minister, Reventlow (then officially titled Grand Chancellor), and his paternal grandfather was the renowned military leader Ditlev Reventlow.After being educated at the academy of Sor and at Leipzig, Reventlow, in company with his younger brother Johan Ludwig and the distinguished Saxon economist Wendt (17311815), the best of cicerones on such a tour, travelled through Germany, Switzerland, France and England, to examine the social, economical and agricultural conditions of civilized Europe. A visit to Sweden and Norway to study mining and metallurgy completed the curriculum, and when Reventlow in the course of 1770 returned to Denmark he was an authority on all the economic questions of the day. In 1774 he held a high position in the Kammerkollegiet, or board of trade, two years later he entered the Department of Mines, and in 1781 he was a member of the Overskattedirectionen, or chief taxing board. He had, in 1774, married Frederica Charlotte von Beulwitz, who bore him thirteen children, and on his fathers death in 1775 inherited the family estate in Laaland. Reventlow overflowed with progressive ideas, especially as regards agriculture, and he devoted himself, heart and soul, to the improvement of his property and the amelioration of his serfs. Fortunately, the ambition to play a useful part in a wider field of activity than he could find in the country ultimately prevailed. His time came when the ultra-conservative ministry of Hegh-Guldberg was dismissed (14 April 1784) and Peter Bernstorff, the statesman for whom Reventlow had the highest admiration, returned to power.Reventlow was an excellently trained specialist in many departments, and was always firm and confident in those subjects which he had made his own. Moreover, he was a man of strong and warm feelings, and deeply religious.The condition of the peasantry especially interested him. He was convinced that free labor would be far more profitable to the land, and that the peasant himself would be better if released from subjugation.His favorite field of labor was thrown open to him when, on 6 August 1784, he was appointed head of the Rentekammeret, or Exchequer. His first step was to appoint a small commission to improve the condition of the crown serfs, and among other things enable them to turn their leaseholds into freeholds. Noting that Frederick VI was sympathetic towards the improvement of conditions for the peasantry, Reventlow persuaded him, in July 1786, to appoint a commission to examine the condition of all the peasantry in the kingdom. This celebrated agricultural commission continued its work for many years, and introduced a series of major reforms. For example, an ordinance of 8 June 1787 modified the existing leaseholds greatly to the benefit of the peasantry; another on 20 June 1788 abolished villenage and completely transformed the much-abused hoveri system whereby the feudal tenant was required to cultivate his lords land as well as his own; and an ordinance of 6 December 1799 abolished the hoveri system altogether. Reventlow was also instrumental in founding the public credit banks, which enabled small cultivators to borrow money on favorable terms. In conjunction with his friend, Ernst Schimmelmann (17471831), he was also instrumental in the passing of ordinances permitting free trade between Denmark and Norway, the abolition of import duty for corn, and the abolition of the mischievous monopoly of the Iceland trade.But the financial distress of Denmark, the jealousy of the duchies, the ruinous political complications of the Napoleonic period, and, above all, the Crown Prince Fredericks growing jealousy of his official advisers, which led him to rule, or rather misrule, for years without the co-operation of his Council of Stateall these calamities were at last too much even for Reventlow. On 7 December 1813 he was dismissed and retired to his estates, where, after working cheerfully among his peasantry to the last, he died in 1827.See Adolph Frederik Bergse, Grey. C. D. F. Reventlows Virksomhed (Copenhagen, 1837); Louis Theodor Alfred Bob, Efterladte Papirer fra den Reventlowske Familiekreds (Copenhagen, 189597).References*Ditlev Frederik ReventlowDitlev ReventlowDitlev Frederik ReventlowDitlev Frederick, hrabia ReventlowDitlev Frederik Reventlow
3075137
Chilcotin_Ranges
The Chilcotin Ranges are a subdivision of the Ranges of the Mountains (in some classifications they are a separate subdivision).  They lie on the inland lea of the Ranges, abutting the Plateau of Columbia.  Their northwestern end is near the head of the River and their southeast end is the River just north of Lillooet; their northern flank is the edge of the Plateau while their southern is the north bank of the River.  In some reckonings they do not go all the way to the Fraser but end at the Yalakom River, which is the North Fork of the Bridge.  They are not one range but a collection of ranges, often very distinct from each other.  There are three major named subranges:*Range*Range*Range (assigned to the Plateau in some definitions)To the west of the western end of the Chilcotin Ranges, and considered by some to be part of the group, are:*Range*RangeSouth of which are the Range and the Icefield. Provincial Parks In recent years major provincial parks and protected areas have been created in the central-eastern part of the Chilcotin Ranges.  These are the Creek Provincial Park, the Provincial Park (where the ? is a glottal stop) and Creek Provincial Park, and the Lake Protected Area and Creek Protected Area. History of the Southern Chilcotin Mountains This region is commonly (but incorrectly) known as the South Chilcotin and is the object of a protracted quarrel between preservationist movements and resource extraction proposals since the 1930s.  A park was established in the 1990s but was downgraded in 2007 to the Lake Protected Area has been established, but its political status is uncertain and the area preserved is greatly reduced from the original proposals to protect it, which began in the 1930s during the heyday of the River goldfield towns just to the south.  Historically this region was the hunting territory of Chief Hunter Jack of the Lakes Lillooet, whose big-game hunting business shared the region with hunters of the Tsilhqotin people.  The shared use of the area north of the River and Gun Creek was part of the settlement of an early-19th-century peace which had ended a long and bloody war between Hunter Jacks people and the Tsilhqotin.  Trails from the River Country led over the many ranges of the region to Taseko Lake and Lake in the Chilcotin Country, and also east across the Range to the River near Big Bar.Though no mines have ever been found in the proposed protected area, other than a few marginal ones in the vicinity of Eldorado Mountain, the south flank of Big Dog Mountain at the northwest end of the Range was the site of a major gold excitement in 1941, connected with the interests who then owned the Bralorne-Pioneer Mine mines nearby.  Physically daunting efforts to reach the alpine-elevation mine site over the Range in order to preserve rights to the claim in the allotted time period almost destroyed the large pack-train, but the papers got filed.  Those claims were shuffled aside during World War II but remained on the map and are currently under exploitation as the Blue Creek Mine.  Other large mine prospects in the area include copper diggings covering the slopes of Red Mountain, the highest in the Camelsfoot Range just north of the Blue Creek Mine.The areas unique and distinct landscape and ecology, so different even from the rest of the Chilcotin Ranges or the rest of the Bridge River Country, is what made it stand out amid a region already wild and extremely beautiful and why its a long-term candidate for protection.  The neighbouring Dickson, Shulaps and Ranges are all unprotected and have been or are being heavily logged, except for special preserves in alpine areas of the Shulaps and in its neighbour to the east, the Range.  Many on the environmentalist side hope that the creation of Tsilos and Creek Provincial Park will help shore up the protection of the Lake Protected Area.  Hunting guide Ted (Chilco) Choate of Gaspard Lake, on the Chilcotin Plateau just northeast of the Lake Protected Area has joined in the call to combine all these three parks, plus the Creek Protected Area to their northeast, plus some of the surrounding country and the deep, much higher heart of the Ranges into a Park.  Industry and government remain committed to shared use and sustainable planning. Resource Interests Mining interests in the area are few, although the area is rich in copper and there are rumours of pitchblende (which contains uranium), but in over 100 years of exploration no profitable deposits of anything have been found and no major mines established.  In recent years, however, clearcut logging has penetrated the flanks of the area and pushed the boundaries of the park from south and east, feeding mills at British Columbia and beyond in the Thompson-Okanagan.  This has generated protests on both sides of the environment vs. resource quarrel, but also instigated a stakeholder committee known as an Integrated Resource Management Process Unit which has had varying degrees of success at resolving disputes and planning land-use in the region.External links**Chilcotin Ranges in the Canadian Mountain Encyclopedia (contains descriptions of unnamed and unofficially named ranges and areas within the region)
3075588
Pierre_Alamire
Pierre Alamire (also Petrus Alamire; probable birth name Peter van den Hove(Atlas, p. 274)) (c. 1470 &ndash; June 26, 1536) was a German-Dutch music copyist, composer, instrumentalist, mining engineer, merchant, diplomat and spy of the Renaissance.  He was one of the most skilled music scribes of his time, and many now-famous works of Franco-Flemish composers owe their survival to his renowned illuminated manuscript copies; in addition he was a spy for the court of VIII of England.LifeHe was born to a family of merchants in Nuremberg, Bavaria, Roman Empire but came to the Provinces at an early age.  Alamire was not his real name; the name was a musical reference, A (the musical pitch) plus the solfege syllables la, mi and re (scale steps six, three and two respectively).  Most likely his actual name was van den Hove (or Imhoff, Imhove), although details on his family background are slim.In the late 1490s he began to receive commissions for work in the Countries, for example at s-Hertogenbosch and Antwerp, where his impressive skill at musical copying and illuminating were immediately valued.  This was the period when the explosion of musical creativity in the Low Countries was at its highest; that region was producing more composers than all of the rest of Europe combined, and these composers were emigrating into other areas, especially into royal and aristocratic courts who had the means to employ them.By 1503 Alamire had already created an edition of music for I of Castile, and by 1509 he was an employee of Archduke Charles, shortly to become V, Holy Roman Emperor.  His manuscripts were to become extremely valuable as gifts, as most European nobility at the time prized music, and many votes for the upcoming election of the Roman Emperor would need to be bought.Alamire moved from Antwerp to Mechelen sometime between 1505 and 1516.  Although he traveled frequently, Mechelen was to remain his permanent home from 1516 on.Career as a spyBetween 1515 and 1518, under cover as a merchant of manuscripts, chaplain, singer, and instrumentalist, he traveled between London and the continent, as a spy for Henry VIII against the pretender to the English throne, de la Pole, who mainly resided in Metz.  He was aided in this enterprise by a Flemish sackbut player, Nagel.  In June 1516, he went to the of England for instruction by the king and Cardinal Wolsey, carrying music manuscripts and instruments along with him.Henry VIII and Wolsey came to distrust him, however, and indeed soon learned that he was working as a counter-spy for de la Pole himself; Alamire, valuing his head, wisely never returned to England after this discovery.  Unsurprisingly, few English composers are represented in his manuscripts.During the 1520s Alamire was a diplomat and courtier in addition to continuing his activity as a music illustrator and copyist.  He carried letters between many of the leading humanists of the time.  Erasmus described him as not unwitty, and Alamires frequent scurrilous commentary on contemporary singers and players bears this out; many of his letters survive, and they are filled with epigrams and clever insults.Music was not his only skill; he received a generous payment on behalf of King III of Denmark for instruction in the craft of mining (unless that was a metaphor for spying; but more details of this commission are not known).In 1534 Alamire received a generous pension from of Austria, for whom he had written a number of manuscripts in the early 1530s, and he disappears from court records after that time.  He died in Mechelen.Manuscript contents and locationsMost of the works of the first rank of Franco-Flemish composers are represented in Alamires manuscripts, including Ockeghem, des Prez, Moulu, Isaac, Willaert, and de la Rue; indeed de la Rue, the favorite composer of Margaret of Austria, has by far the most pieces of any composer, and almost his entire output is preserved in Alamires manuscript collection.Manuscripts copied by Alamire can be found in many European libraries, including the Habsburg court library in Vienna, in London (the Henry VIII manuscript), the Vatican (a manuscript for Leo X), Brussels, Munich, and Jena, which has the court books for III, Elector of Saxony.Only one work is attributed with certainty to Alamire, a four-part instrumental piece Tandernaken op den Rijn; however his evident skill and experience as a composer suggests that many of the anonymous works of the time may be his.NotesReferences and further reading*Herbert Kellman: Pierre Alamire, The New Grove Dictionary of Music and Musicians, ed. Stanley Sadie.  20 vol.  London, Macmillan Publishers Ltd., 1980.  ISBN 1-56159-174-2*Herbert Kellman: Pierre Alamire, Grove Music Online ed. L. Macy (Accessed November 4, 2005), (subscription access) (some information updated from earlier Grove entry)*Eugeen Schreurs, Alamire Foundation, K. U. Leuven, program notes to Naxos CD 8.554744:  The A-La-Mi-Re Manuscripts:  Flemish Polyphonic Treasures for Charles V, sung by Capilla Flamenca*Allan W. Atlas, Renaissance Music:  Music in Western Europe, 14001600. New York, W.W. Norton & Co., 1998.  ISBN 0-393-97169-4External links*The Alamire Foundation, K.U.LeuvenAlamireAlamire
3084120
Mount_Douglas,_Greater_Victoria
thumb|right|The south side of Mount Douglas.Mount Douglas is a prominent,  hill in the Victoria municipality of British Columbia. It is named for the second governor of the of Vancouver Island, Sir James Douglas, and is affectionately known locally as Mount Doug.  The hill and the surrounding area are protected by a  municipal park. It also lends its name to a high school, road, neighbourhood, and several businesses.  Its many trails, mature second growth forest, striking vistas of the city, and nearby beach make the area a popular destination.Originally called Cedar Hill, it was home to logging operations in the mid-nineteenth century.  Local mills supplied the growing city of Victoria, including the original Bay Company fort, transporting lumber south along present day Cedar Hill Road.  It was brought under protected status in 1889.  Although informally renamed in Douglas lifetime (it was given the apellation Mount in order to honour the governors status), the name Mt. Douglas was not officially adopted until 1910.The neighbourhoodThe namesake neighbourhood around the base of Mt. Douglas is a mix of residential neighbourhoods, farms and working farms, roughly bounded by Shelbourne Street, Cordova Bay Road, the Valley and Mckenzie Avenue.  The farms of the Blenkinsop Valley are protected by the provincial Land Reserve.Mount Doug Mining Cavethumb|right|Inside of Mount Douglas Abandoned Mine.Mount doug has many trails. One trail in particular, on its south side, has an old abandoned mine. The cave has a small entrance, but it opens up inside. The cave is about 50 to 60 feet in length. There is a home made youtube documentary on finding and exploring the cave. video link hereExternal links*Description of the location and nomenclature from the BC Ministry of Sustainable Resource Management.*Description of the park from the Saanich municipal website.*A description of the area, including some historical information.*Website for Mount Douglas High School*Mount Doug Cave Video Link
3086501
Cherry_picker
A cherry picker (also known as a boom lift, man lift, basket crane or hydraladder), is a type of work platform that consists of a platform or bucket at the end of a hydraulic lifting system. Design It is often mounted on the back of a large vehicle such as a truck (in which case it may also be called a bucket truck), it can also be mounted on a flat back pick up van known as a Self Drive, or sometimes on a stand-alone trailer or self-moving platform. The bucket is designed for a person to stand in and work from. Often a duplicate set of controls that are used to manipulate the position of the bucket will be available to the person in the bucket, allowing the operator to position himself. The lifting arms of some cherry pickers are capable of telescoping to adjust the reach of the device, usually with automatic safety controls to prevent tipping over.  Articulated boom lifts are more appropriate than stick booms when operating in tight spaces or when clearing nearby obstacles is necessary. Uses Cherry pickers were originally designed for use in orchards (though not just cherry orchards) where they are still heavily used.(Reaching new heights in construction and horticulture, Safetyline Magazine (extract), of Western Australia, Volume No. 20 (November 1993)) It lets the picker pick fruit high in a tree with relative ease. Similar devices, also known as cherry pickers, are used to service telephone, television, and electrical equipment on poles.  light displays and banners can also be affixed with a cherry picker.Some fire trucks have a cherry picker, known as a snorkel,(fire Apparatus Terminology 4) instead of a ladder. Some cleaners also use them. Cherry pickers are also used in mining, construction, exterior painting, and sometimes by arborists to work safely in otherwise unclimbable trees.Cherry pickers have also been used in forms of entertainment. For example, Jackson would generally begin live performances of his song It on a moving cherry picker, with fans blowing, and has also somewhat daringly hung out of it while holding onto the bars with his hands and feet, for an added effect.ImagesImage:Cherrypicker.jpg|A wheeled cherry pickerImage:Lift Table Wheeled Extenders.jpg|A trailer-mounted boom liftFile:Multiple bucket trucks.JPG|Parked bucket trucksFile:2006 International Altec Bucket Truck Under CDL.JPG|Altec bucket truck under CDLFile:Altec International Bucket Truck.jpg|Altec International Bucket Truck(http://www.buckettrucksonline.com)(http://www.i80equipment.com) See also * work platform References de:Cherrypickerlvatrice
3090329
Lorenzo_Sawyer
thumb|Lorenzo SawyerLorenzo Sawyer (May 23, 1820 &ndash; September 7, 1891) was an American lawyer and judge who was appointed the Court of California in 1860 and served as Justice of California from 186870.() He served as a circuit judge for the U.S. Circuit Courts for the Ninth Circuit beginning in 1870 and later served as the first judge on the States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit from June 1891 until his death.( )Early yearsSawyer was born on a farm in Le Roy, New York, the eldest of six children. He worked on the farm during the summer and attended the district school in winter. At the age of fifteen he attended, for a short time, a high school at Watertown, called the Black River Institute, where he became interested in the law. In 1837, having reached the age of seventeen, he went out on his own to pursue a course of study preparatory to commencing the study of law. The next eight years were devoted to preparation for the bar, at first in New York and afterward in Ohio. To support himself during this period, he taught in the district schools, and afterward in academies and as a tutor in college.()CareerIn 1840 he emigrated to Ohio, where he pursued his studies for a time at the Western Reserve College, and afterward continued his studies at Columbus and at College of Ohio near Columbus. He was admitted to the bar of the Court of Ohio in May 1846. He afterward went to Illinois, where he passed a year in the office of future California Senator A. McDougall. Soon afterward he entered into a law partnership with the Lieutenant-Governor Edwin Holmes at Wisconsin, where he was rapidly acquiring an extensive and lucrative practice, when the Gold Rush happened.(Joining a company of men from Wisconsin, he made his way across the country in seventy-two days, arriving in California about the middle of July 1850 in an unprecedentedly short trip.() He wrote sketches of this trip, which were published in the Observer, and copied into many of the western papers. They were highly appreciated and were used as a guide by many emigrants of the succeeding year. After working in the mines for a short time, he went to Sacramento and opened a law office there. Ill health, however, compelled him to seek the climate of the mountains, and accordingly he moved to Nevada City and entered upon the practice of law in October of that year, his law library consisting of eleven volumes which he had brought across the plains. With the exception of a few months from February to August 1851 passed in San Francisco, during which time his office was twice burned, he remained in Nevada City until the autumn of 1853, when he returned to San Francisco. In 1853 he was elected City Attorney.(In 1855 he was a candidate for Justice of the Supreme Court, and came within six votes of reaching the nomination. In the spring of 1861 he formed a law partnership with the General C. H. S. Williams, and in the winter of 1861-62 they determined to open a branch office in City, Nevada. Sawyer went to Virginia City in January 1862 to open the office and establish the business, and while there Governor Stanford of California offered him the appointment of City and County Attorney of San Francisco, which he declined. In June 1862, he was offered a vacant spot in the office of Judge of the Twelfth Judicial District, embracing the city and county of San Mateo, which he accepted, and he was unanimously reelected to office when his first term was up, both political parties giving him their support.(Upon the reorganization of the State courts, under the amended constitution, Judge Sawyer was in 1863 elected a justice of the Court of California, and drew a six-year term, during the last two years of which he was Chief Justice. During his term, he was noted for the thoroughness and elaborateness of his decisions and held in high regard.(In 1869, Congress passed an act to amend the judicial system of the United States, by which the United States Circuit Courts were reorganizedthe appointment of a circuit judge for each of the nine circuits being provided for. In December of that year, as the term of Chief Justice Sawyer was about to expire, President S. Grant nominated him to the States circuit court for the Ninth Circuit (which later became the States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit). Sawyer was confirmed by the Senate in 1870. In 1884, he handed down what became known as the Sawyer Decision in Woodruff v. Bloomfield Mining and Gravel Company which abruptly ended mining in Californias Country.()He served on the court until his death in 1891.( ReferencesExternal links*Woodruff Vs North Bloomfield
3094161
Jan_Smuts_in_the_Boer_War
::See Smuts for a complete profile.::See Boer War.Jan Christiaan Smuts, OM (May 24, 1870 &ndash; September 11, 1950) was a prominent African and Commonwealth statesman and military leader.  He served as a Boer General during the Boer War, a British General during the First World War and was appointed Marshal during the Second World War.  In addition to various Cabinet appointments, he served as Prime Minister of the Union of South Africa from 1919 to 1924 and from 1939 to 1948.  He played a leading part in the post war settlements at the end of both world wars, making significant contributions towards the creation of both the of Nations and the Nations. This article is about Jan Smuts role in the Boer War, from the outbreak of war in 1899 until the of Vereeniging in 1902.  In the disastrous early stages, Smuts served in Pretoria, far behind the front line.  Necessity soon thrust Smuts into the guerrilla campaign that followed.  To him was entrusted the responsibility of infiltrating the Colony, and persuading the Afrikaners there to stir up trouble.  Although this failed, the Kingdom soon came to the negotiating table, whereupon the two sides reached a compromise, negotiated by Smuts.An Inauspicious StartThe War BeginsOn October 11, 1899, the two Boer republics declared war on the Kingdom.  Immediately, commandos, armed with German rifles and artillery, and trained by the best European officers, marched into Natal and the Colony.  The hawkish Smuts, though, saw no service in the early stages of the war.  His battlefield was Pretoria, where he served as President Krugers right hand man.  He wrote dispatches to generals, published propaganda, organised logistics, and liaised with Transvaal diplomats in Europe.  With the initial successes of the war, came much of the credit for it.After the defeats inflicted upon the Boer forces at Ladysmith, Mafeking, and Paardeberg, the British forces, considerably outnumbering the Boers, flooded across the River, and into the republics.  The government of the Transvaal fled from Pretoria to convene in Machadodorp.  These reverses hardened Smuts resolve.  He ordered the destruction of the gold mines, which he saw as the only British objectives, but this action was blocked by a local judge.  Smuts raised an army of 500 men as quickly as he could, and demanded the banks be emptied and their reserves be placed on a train for Machadodorp.  The train carrying Smuts, his soldiers, and all the Transvaals gold was the last to leave Pretoria before the town fell, only hours later, to the Army.The Guerrilla WarWith every Boer town in the hands of the British, President Kruger in exile in the Netherlands, and formal resistance at an end, the British extended an offer of peace to the Boers.  Acting in the name of Kruger, Smuts rejected the terms, and urged the generals to fight on.  He described to Botha a manner of warfare, which would be suited to the vast expanses of the Veldt.  Botha, Hertzog, De Wet, and de la Rey each commanded commando forces to raid the British positions across South Africa.Smuts served with de la Rey, raiding British supply trains across the western Transvaal.  Smuts soon proved himself to be an excellent soldier, brave but intelligently so, and acutely aware of the limitations of their small force.  The small force of 500 men evaded an army forty times its size, and severely weakened the supply lines of the entire British Army in South Africa.  These successes were small, though, in the scale of the conflict.  Whereas de la Rey and Smuts were wildly successful in their region, Botha and Hertzog (leading the two largest armies) found it difficult to replicate the tactics and success of their compatriots.  Gradually, the British built a system of forts, camps, and armed patrols, and cut the country up with great lines of barbed wire and trenches.As it became harder to evade their armies, the Boers ran out of success.  The generals met in secret, and discussed peace.  Botha and Smuts decided that they had greatly underestimated the resolve of the British politicians, and sent a telegram to Kruger to ask for his advice.  He responded, without the full knowledge of the dire situation in which the Boers found themselves, to fight on.  The Free States two representatives, Steyn and De Wet, derided the suggestion of peace.  In the end, they resolved to launch one last attack, and turn the conflict on its head.  For this operation, they chose Smuts.Better off on his OwnThe Raid on the CapeThe plan asked for Smuts to lead an army of 340 men into the Colony, as stealthily as possible.  From there, he would attempt to draw support from the Afrikaners of the Cape, and instigate a general rebellion against the British government in Town.  For Smuts, just getting near British territory would be tough, as Kitchener had recently launched a major campaign to rid the Orange Free State of commandos, and, especially, of Smuts.  Smuts escaped capture by the British no fewer than a dozen times, and his forces rendezvoused on the border after a month, with only 240 men left.Once in the Cape Colony, Smuts raiders were cut off from their homeland.  They were harried by Briton and Basuto alike, and were weakened by disease and starvation.  Those that were worst wounded or sick were left to be captured by the British.  The men turned against Smuts, but he urged them onwards, always optimistic that the tide would turn.  It did, when they encountered a cavalry squadron at camp, and ambushed them, taking their horses, food, uniforms, guns, ammunition, and luxuries.  With this success came their own self-belief again.  For the next few months, the raid was highly successful in distracting and tiring the British.For all this, the aim of the raid was never to distract and tire, but to incite an insurrection of the population.  Despite their success at distracting and disrupting, hardly a single local nationalist Afrikaner took up arms against the British, and Smuts realised that no such small raid would succeed in achieving such a grand objective. In fact, many western cape nationalist Afrikaners supported the British. Smuts decided to establish a headquarters and command as if he were the head of an army.  He made the River valley his home, and sent his men far and wide to enlist and to forage.  Soon, his army numbered three thousand, mostly local Boer farmers.He decided to launch a final attack, to bring the British back to the negotiating table, and to force an agreement in favor of the Boers.  He threw every man into an attack on the copper-mining center of Okiep.  His force surrounded the town, but could not attack the garrison head-on.  In a show of bravado, Smuts packed a train with explosives, and attempted to detonate it in the town, blowing it sky-high.  Although this attempt failed, it proved his resolve to fight through any means.  As soon as possible, the British offered Smuts a peace conference, to be held at Vereeniging, to discuss a final peace treaty and resolution.  Although not achieving its original objective, the raid had been a rousing success.The Treaty of VereenigingTo Vereeniging, the African Republic and the State sent thirty delegates each to meet the British.  Whereas the Transvaal and the Orange Free State had been ravaged by the war equally as thoroughly, only the Transvaal delegates wanted peace.  The Boer commandos knew that President Steyn, General De Wet, Hertzog, and the 27 other Free State delegates would rather fight to the death than sign a treaty of surrender.  Thus, when they elected the representatives of the Transvaal, they chose men of peace, and not war heroes.  Smuts was not elected, but Botha appointed him to be the chief legal advisor to the Transvaal delegation.  In this way, Smuts took a key role in debating the complex legal and semantic arguments.During the debates, Smuts used his knowledge of both military and legal aspects, of government and of academia, to guide the delegation.  His mastery of English, of Afrikaans, and of High Dutch allowed him to speak before others, and, unlike at Bloemfontein, no man dared to speak over the one who had so successfully attacked the Cape.  Smuts dominance of the table at Vereeniging allowed the doves in the Transvaal delegation to win.  William Reitz, tabled a compromise, ending the war, allowing the two republics limited sovereignty, and calling for slimmed down delegations to meet in Pretoria to negotiate with the British.  Reitz knew that the British would reject the proposal, but he also knew that the greatest stumbling block to a resolution wasnt the deputation from London, but that from Bloemfontein.  Thus, the Transvaal needed to buy time, with smaller parties involved, to negotiate fully with the Free State representatives.At Pretoria, the British deputation was led by Baron Kitchener and Baron Milner, who could hardly have been more different.  Smuts and Kitchener had mutual professional respect, and talked alone, avoiding the interjection of administrators, such as Milner.  Moreover, both Kitchener and Smuts had seen the futility of the war, which had descended into little more than mutual murder.  Bilaterally, Smuts and Kitchener negotiated a settlement that suited the Free State representative, De Wet.Hence, on 31 May 1902, the of Vereeniging, a document that was mostly written by Jan Smuts and Lord Kitchener on their own, was signed by representatives of the United Kingdom, the Orange Free State, and the South African Republic.
3099555
Walchand_Hirachand
Walchand Hirachand Doshi (November, 1882  April, 1953) was an Indian industrialist. He established Indias first modern shipyard, first aircraft factory and first car factory. Early life He was born in Sholapur, Maharashtra in a Digambar Jain family engaged in trading and money lending. He matriculated in 1899 but was not interested in the family business. He found the railway contracting business to his liking and became a railway contractor for constructions in partnership with a former railway clerk, Balwant Phatak; the partnership later became Phatak-Walchand private limited. Walchand proved to be a successful railway contractor but was open to other business ideas as well. Construction business It was in the construction business, first as a railway contractor, and then, as a contractor to other departments of Government, that Phatak-Walchand private limited (partnership till 1915) made money. Phatak left the firm after it bought a foundry and undertook a mining lease, with the view that it was stretching itself into too many areas. Meanwhile, the firm found it difficult to bag larger contracts due to small size and absence of marquee names. It was merged into Tata Construction Company in 1920 to overcome these problems. Some of the major projects executed by the company include the commissioning of the tunnels through the Bhor Ghats for a railway route from Mumbai to Pune and laying of water pipes from Tansa lake to Mumbai. Other major projects executed by the firm include the Bridge over Indus and a bridge across the Irrawaddy River in Burma. All these projects were directed by Walchand. In 1929, he became the Director of the company. In 1935, the company was renamed as Premier Construction to reflect the fact that Tatas had sold their stake in the firm to Walchand. Shipping In 1919, after the end of War I, he bought a steamer, the SS Loyalty along with his friends, from the Scindias of Gwalior, a royal family; His underlying assumption was that the post-war years would also spell massive growth for the shipping industry just as the war years had done. However, British companies such as P&O and BI (British India shipping) were strong in the shipping industry and most of the attempts by domestic players till then had failed. Walchand named his company Scindia Steam Navigation Company Ltd. and competed with the foreign players. It was recognised as the first Swadeshi shipping company in the true sense of the term and was referred to widely in Gandhis columns in India and Harijan on Swadeshi, boycott of foreign goods and Non co-operation movement. It barely managed to survive after entering into agreements on routes and fare wars with its foreign competitors. However, Walchand still supported new indigenous shipping ventures, as he believed that a strong domestic shipping industry was the need of the hour. In 1929, he became the Chairman of Scindia Steam and continued in the same position till 1950 when he resigned on grounds of ill health. By 1953, the company had captured 21% of Indian coastal traffic. Aircraft factory In 1939, a chance acquaintance with an American aircraft company manager inspired him to start an aircraft factory in India. Hindustan Aircraft was started in Bangalore in the of Mysore with the active support of its diwan, Ismail in December 1940. By April 1941, the Indian government acquired one-third of ownership and by April 1942, it nationalized the company by compensating shareholders adequately. The reasons that prompted the government for nationalizing were  it was a sensitive and strategic sector; Japans advances in the war meant that the government needed fast responses and hence, direct ownership; and it could not allow a crucial war project to remain undercapitalised or loss-making. Hindustan Aircraft was renamed as Aeronautics Limited. Shipyard To face competition in the shipping business from the British and other foreign businesses, Walchand entered allied businesses such as insurance. He also believed that there was a strong need for a shipyard in the country and started work on it in 1940 at Visakhapatnam. It was named Shipyard Limited and its first product, the ship Jalusha was launched soon after independence by Nehru in 1948. However, the shipyard came under government control a few months later (due to the presumed importance of the project to countrys security and economic growth) and was fully nationalised in 1961. Car factory As early as 1939, Walchand was interested in establishing a car factory in India. family was also working in the same direction. In 1940, he signed an MOU with Chrysler but could not get clearances and concessions from the Mysore government unlike in the case of the aircraft company. In 1945, he established Automobiles near Mumbai. By 1948, the company started indigenisation in a small way with an in-house components department. In 1955, it tied up with Fiat and started manufacturing engines in India. By 1956, parts of chassis were locally made. Business acumen Walchand was noted for his ambition and vision. Among his adversaries, the more charitable termed him a dreamer while the less charitable dismissed him as a person who wanted to run even before learning to walk. Despite not hailing from an established business house, the projects undertaken by Walchand were grand in design, to say the least. While attention to detail in planning was not one of his strengths, he always seemed to know how to find his way around. This was true especially with respect to manpower management, meeting deadlines and raising funds. Most of his projects were highly leveraged. While he seemed to oppose nationalization and government control of some of the projects he started such as the shipyard and the aircraft factory, the fact remains that these businesses may have had to face liquidation but for government investing the money. Also, it needs to be noted that the government also had a strong interest in the operation of these industries as it directly helped in its war efforts. Despite exercising management control in firms such as Scindia Steam Navigation Company Ltd., Hindustan Aircraft and Hindustan Shipyard, he was not the largest shareholder in any of these companies. He understood the power of media and cultivated it to gather public support for his projects; while this may appear to be easy in the politically charged days of the Raj, it also has to be kept in mind that running newspapers perceived to be in opposition with the government was fraught with dangers. Thus, it becomes clear that his persuasive abilities were helpful in generating good press and public goodwill towards his projects. As a contractor engaged in construction, his biggest customer was the British government; he worked with British officials closely in several projects. However, he supported the Independence Movement and most of his projects were inaugurated (including launching of new ships) by famous fighters.  He was able to maintain a fine line between these opposite forces. Legacy In 1949, he suffered from a stroke and retired from business in 1950. He died in 1953 at Siddhapur. However, his legacy remains important. By 1947, when India became independent, the Walchand group of companies was one of the ten largest business houses in the country. The first Indian ship SS Loyalty made its maiden international voyage on 5 April 1919 by sailing from Mumbai to London. Walchand Hirachand was personally present on the ship. After India became independent, April has been declared the National Maritime day to honour that voyage. While Walchand pioneered a role for India in several industries, his dependence on excessive leverage and nationalisation seem to have taken the sheen off his contributions. The car factory, while the first in India, trailed the Birlas Hindustan Motors in terms of share. Among the other companies he pioneered were the Walchandnagar Industries Limited, located at Walchandnagar, an industrial township near Pune and Ravalgaon Sugar. Absence of direct male heirs may also have had a role in the nature of the businesses left behind by him. For Walchand, industry was probably not just a place to make money but also to have adventure. For example, a visit to Hollywood inspired him to construct a huge studio in India and he was in talks with the famous Bollywood producer-director Shantaram without a tangible result. However, for years to come, he would probably be remembered as the man who dared to dream. References *Business Legends by Gita Piramal (1998) - Published by Viking Penguin India.External links* Walchandnagar Industries Limited* Walchandnager Industries Limited: History* PMs speech at the release of a Commemorative Postage Stamp honouring Seth Walchand Hirachand* Hindustan Construction Company Limited
3101181
Colton,_Leeds
Colton is a district of east Leeds, Yorkshire, England, situated between Gates to the north, Halton and Moor to the west, Whitkirk to the north-west and Austhorpe to the north-east. Newsam lies directly south of the estate.The small Whitkirk Lane End estate (which is situated between Colton Road and Colton Roundabout) is often considered more part of the Colton district than Whitkirk, because of its separation from Whitkirk via Selby Road, and its proximity to Colton Road.GeographyThe name Colton derives from the english Coal Town, because the estate was originally developed as a pit mining community in the east of the city. It consists mainly of cul-de-sacs, with inter-linking ginnels, back alleys and housing ranges from detached houses, semi-detached houses, terraced houses, and flats. The area is 4 miles to the east of city centre, and is close to the A63 carriageway and motorway. Colton is also the area of Leeds, where the Outer Ring Road terminates. The area is well served by buses, with the numbers 19 and 19A going to and from the city centre, and the number 9 going to and from Seacroft.At the centre of the estate, there is a cricket club, with a bar, a cricket pitch, two tennis courts and a football pitch. Much of the open space in Colton has been built upon, making it a much more urban area. In the mid-1990s, Colton Retail Park was opened in the east of the district, now with many well known stores. Recently, Thorpe Park business park was also opened in the east of Colton.Police forceIn the late 1990s to mid 2000s, Colton suffered social problems of crime and behaviour.()() As a result, an increased police presence was put into place in Colton and the surrounding estates.Old Colton RoadColton Road is a derelict road running through the west of the area into Whitkirk. It joins onto Selby Road, although it has been closed from the edge of Colton and Whitkirk to Meynell Road, where it terminates in the centre of the estate. It is locally referred to as The Old Road,The Red Road or The Wide Path.ComparisonColton lies in the LS15 postcode area. This is a population comparison between the postcode area and the UK population.Football teamsColton has some very promising young football teams that are being developed. The funding for these football teams comes from Colton Club. The football teams go all the way up to the Under 18s. After that it becomes Colton Open Age. There is also a girls football team that is for all ages.Location gridReferencesExternal links* *Colton websiteLeeds
3107281
List_of_Usagi_Yojimbo_characters
File:UsagiYojimboVol3Issue52Cover.jpg|thumb|right|Cover of Yojimbo Volume 3, Issue 52, by Sakai. Kitsune is holding Sachiko.This list of Usagi Yojimbo characters features characters from the Yojimbo book. Major characters *Ame Tomoe (?) is loosely based on the famous female samurai, Gozen. She is a samurai of the Geishu clan and serves as Lord Noriyukis personal bodyguard and closest advisor. She is an anthropomorphic cat. (Tomoe Ame is also a brand of Japanese candy.)*Chizu, a member of the Neko Ninja and the sister of Shingen. Upon her brothers death she briefly succeeded him as the clans leader, but internal power struggles eventually drove her into exile. She has met Usagi several times and even has developed a crush on him, but their respective senses of duty prevent them from traveling together.Chizu appears in the 2003 Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles series episode The Real World, Part I as a field leader of the Neko Ninja.* Lord Hebi, a ruthless daimyo loyal to Hikiji, often directs Hikijis plots. He is a large snake, several times the size of any other character in the series, and despite not having any arms or legs, he is an awesome fighter, using his size and large teeth to his advantage. Lord Hebi appeared in the 2003 TMNT cartoon, in episodes The Real World, Part 1 and Samurai Tourist, voiced by Schemmel.*Gunichi - A samurai in service of Lord Mifune who was a skilled swordsman with masterful control of the blade. He first meet Usagi when he was a little boy returning a wakizashi to a dead soldier on the battlefield and did not think much of him. That opinion changed when he confronted the rabbit after his training was completed and challenged him to a duel as a test. When that duel was interrupted by rival swordsmen lying in ambush, they fought them off together and Gunichi was impressed enough with Usagis skill to call a draw to their fight and recommend him for his Lords service. The two enjoyed a close comradeship that ended at the Battle of Aichi Plain when Gunichi deserted his lord in battle over Usagis objections. Much later, Gunichi and usagi faced each other for the last time, and Usagi slew him for his betrayal.*Inazuma is an anthropomorphic cat. She is the widow of a samurai, and is one of the fiercest swordswomen in the series, easily matching or besting many of the other characters in fighting skill; unlike other characters, Inazumas skill with a sword is almost all natural talent, as opposed to years of training. Her name ( in kanji) means lightning.*The Informer - A small hooded man with an unquenchable thirst for money. He is never named, but is often seen skulking about in the shadows, looking for a quick gold coin; most often, this involves finding someone with a bounty on their head, and alerting a bounty hunter to their location, for a fee.*Inukai (Stray Dog) - A hunter who is notorious for his ruthlessness and his surly mistrust of others, especially samurai. However, he secretly is a beloved benefactor of an orphanage, and his apparent greediness is partially based on his desire to raise funds for its cause.*Isamu - The brother of Inazuma. He first appears as a enigmatic and stern bounty hunter who is hunting for his sister to bring her home to her forgiving father.*Inspector Ishida is based on real-life Honolulu policeman Apana, who was also the model for the fictional detective Chan. As Allan Collins points out in the introduction to Usagi Yojimbo Book 13: Grey Shadows, Inspector Ishida is, like the real Chang Apana, a more hardboiled character than the mild-mannered Charlie Chan from the novels by Derr Biggers and the subsequent film adaptations.(The Case of Usagi Yojimbo by Max Allan Collins (with Nathan Collins)) He is a police detective in a large city whose government was corrupted by at least two villains until recently. Ishida, however is a steadfastly honest officer with a deep commitment to the cause of justice, regardless of who the criminals are. He is quiet in his manner, but highly observant and astute in his reasoning. Those faculties are invaluable in difficult cases like murder where intensive examinations of dead bodies like an autopsy are taboo. In addition, when force is called for, he has formidable fighting skills to call upon using his standard police weapon, the jutte, although he is allowed to also carry a katana.Ishida first appeared in The Hairpin Murders. Although the character was intended only as a one shot in this story, he soon proved unexpectedly popular and series creator Sakai has used him in numerous other stories. Among these stories are Tameshigiri, The Courtesan, and After the Rat.*Jei - a.k.a. Jei-san, The Blade of the Gods, The Black Soul, The Demon Spearman, and a number of other dark nicknamesis a character from the Usagi Yojimbo comics. Although Lord Hikiji is considered the main villain of the series, Jei is the closest thing to a true nemesis of Miyamoto Usagi. Jei is a tall anthropomorphic wolf with long black hair, wears a black kimono, and is armed with a yari (straight-edged spear) Jeis main weapon which has a black bladeand a daisho (pair of swords). Jei is a samurai who believes that he was chosen by the gods as an emissary, to smite evil and execute sinners. However, in his delusions, Jei perceives everyone to be a sinner and has the tendency of killing anyone who draws his attention. While he is capable of acting normally, once in the throes of his madness almost anyone within sight is marked for death. Because of his brutal rampages, most do not consider him an emissary of the gods, but under demonic possession, or simply insane; whether or not he still has his mental faculties, Jei does possess some supernatural power. The most obvious of Jeis abilities is his immortality, despite being killed numerous times, he has always come back. He was struck by lightning, fell off a cliff, and run through with a holy sword; but Jei has always returned in some form or another. Also, he has the ability to consecrate weapons, turning their blades black to match his soul although the ancient sword, Kusanagi, resists this. In battle, he uses these blades to steal peoples souls; minor injuries can greatly weaken opponents, leaving them helpless; while serious wounds can rip the soul right out of a person, killing them instantly. Finally, he seems to know things about people that he otherwise shouldnt, even though he doesnt always understand it either. In Circles, Jei kidnaps a young boy named Jotaro; he isnt sure why the gods told him to do it, but the readers later find out that Jotaro is Usagis son. After Jeis death by being run through with the Kusanagi, his body was destroyed, but his spirit has possesses others to do his bidding. However, it is unknown if he can voluntarily switch bodies with the death of the current host occurring.*Jotaro - is the son of the titular character, Miyamoto Usagi, but due to circumstances they do not acknowledge it; they treat each other as uncle and nephew, and neither is aware that the other knows the truth. Jotaro is currently training to be a samurai and has displayed formidable skill for his age; he has defeated adult opponents with his bokken in single combat, despite his still small stature.*Katsuichi is a supporting character, Usagis sensei and one of the most formidable swordsmen in the series. His name is said by Stan Sakai to be a combination of Katsu (to win) and ichi (one) or, One who wins. He is an anthropomorphic lion samurai sensei who rejected the orthodox fighting styles to create a distinctive new technique. However, he soon abandoned his school due to his dissatisfaction with the poor quality students available.*Keiko - A little girl who is Jeis companion. She joined him after Jei killed a band of bandits who had murdered her grandfather who was apparently her only relative. She seems to share a strange connection with Jeis spirit as is able to recognize him immediately when he possesses a new host and realize when he has abandoned a host temporarily. She is the only person Jei seems to care about and that is safe near him. She refers to him as uncle. *Kenichi - A childhood rival of Usagi and now magistrate of their village. He has had a spiteful mutual enmity against Usagi since childhood which led to blows more than once. However, in the face of common enemies, the pair has gotten along well on a professional basis.*Kitsune is a street performer by day, and master thief by nightor day as the case may be. An anthropomorphic fox (kitsune, , is Japanese for fox, ), she is as cunning, quick and agile as her profession demands. She has some skill with a sword, but she is no master swordswoman. However, she can throw a heavy object like a top with deadly accuracy. She considers herself a noble thief and only steals from people who can afford it, or who deserve it. She would never steal from the poor, not just because they have nothing worth stealing, but because she was once poor herself. Her motto: A girl has to do what she can to get by, neh? Usagi first meets Kitsune in the story Kitsune where she is working as a street performer. He makes friends with her, but later finds out that she picked his pocket when he finds he cant pay for a meal, and is forced to wash dishes to pay his debt. When they meet the next time, Kitsune considers giving Usagi his purse back, only to find to her accepting amusement that the ronin has already stolen it back. Since then they have met many times, usually when Kitsune is plotting some scheme and Usagi helps out when things go wrong. For his part, Usagi disapproves of her thievery, but refrains from lecturing her or interfering except for more serious cases while Kitsune appreciates his acceptance of her nature. She has also met Gen, who is initially smitten with the beauty, making him a perfect target. Despite that, the two become friends and temporary traveling companions in The Shrouded Moon, and at the end of the story Kitsunes Tale, is it hinted that there might be a romantic attraction between the thief and the bounty hunter. Aside from Usagi and Gen, Kitsune only had three friends in the world, each having a profound impact on her: Sachiko, Noodles, and Kiyoko.*Komori ninja are a clan of ninja bats in the Usagi Yojimbo comic book series. First appearing in Vol.1 #21, Blood Wings, the clan is the foremost rising rival of the Neko ninja clan whose numbers were severely depleted in the climatic battle in the story, The Dragonbellow Conspiracy. They have an open rivalry with the Neko ninja for Lord Hikijis favour which has often led to blood shed. There is however a bit of respect and honour for each other shared by both the ninja clans leaders. Unlike the Neko, who are largely humanoid in body type, the Komori have winged bodies which enable them to fly with ease. Furthermore, they typically arm themselves with long sword blades lining the edges of their wings to make for devastating attacks in flight. A favourite move is used when an opponent attempts to take shelter in a forested area; the ninja would slash at the foliage creating a terrifying and blinding storm of debris that often disorients the victim while they are being exposed. At present, both clans are in the employ of Lord Hikiji as they vie to be the exclusive client for the daimyo. Their kashira (leader) is named Kurokaze (lit. black wind), but little is known about him.*Kurokaze - kashira (leader) of the ninja (bat ninja) clan; his name means black wind. He is occasionally mentioned, but so far Kurokaze is only seen in the Grasscutter II saga; he considers the neko ninja as adversaries of the komori ninja for Lord Hikijis favor, although he respects Chizu for her skills.*Mariko - A childhood friend of Usagi and his great love. However, she married Kenichi after Usagi left to become a samurai with Lord Mifune, but not before Usagi and she had an impulsive tryst that produced a son, Jotaro. Kenichi married her with full knowledge of her illegitimate pregnancy while Usagi was not informed of the situation as to avoid him abandoning his post for her. Eventually, Mariko told Usagi about Jotaro and insisted he leave the village when he returned to stay, although brief future visits were permitted. Later on, she told Jotaro about his biological father, but for some reason did not mention that Usagi knew the truth himself. Despite the fact she still harbors feelings for Usagi, she realizes her place is with Kenichi.*Lord Mifune - Usagis Lord until his death in the Battle of Achi Plain. His character is named for the great Samuri actor, Toshiro Mifune. Lord Mifune was a Tiger of mercy and honor such as when he was presented with Usagi as a kitten, wrongly accused of looting the war dead. Mifune believed the childs firm honest denial of the charge and allowed him to leave unharmed. He later saw Usagi as a young adult winning at a tournament, bestowed a daisho as a prize and hired the rabbit as a retainer. When Mifune family was assassinated by ninja sent on Lord Hikijis orders, he made war and was only defeated when a subordinate commander betrayed him to Hikiji on Achi Plain. However, even death could not silence his spirit completely such as what happened to Usagi after the samurai fled the lost battle with his lords head and buried it in secret to prevent it being desecrated. After that act of honor, Usagi fell into the clutches of a supernatural entity and was saved only when spirit of Mifune appeared and slew the entity for his loyal retainer.*Miyamoto Usagi is the titular character (inspired by Musashi) and an anthropomorphic rabbit (Usagi is Japanese for rabbit) and a ronin now walking the shugyo (the warriors journey).()()()()()()()*Motokazu - Son of General Ikeda. He was born during his fathers exile in hiding as a peasant and had no knowledge of his fathers previous life. That changed when Tomoe Ame and Lord Noriyuki were fleeing an ambush and inadvertently sought shelter at the rebels home. Long past his need for revenge for his defeat, the general agreed to help the fugitives and took his son along in a perilous adventure. At its conclusion where the Lord desired to reward Ikeda, they agreed for Motokazu to join Noriyukis court when he came of age after training by his father. In Grasscutter II, Motokazus father fell in battle, but Lord Noriyuki kept to his word making the young boy his page with Tomoe his mentor. Motokazu has since grown into his new responsibilities well, displaying extraordinary courage in his adventures. As a result, Noriyuki has promoted him to samurai status, despite his youth, with the approval of Motokazus teacher as well as Tomoe and Usagi.*The Mogura ninja are a ninja clan in the Yojimbo story world, composed of anthropomorphic moles. They are the least seen of the three ninja clans, having been seen less than ten times. As moles, their particular talents are digging and lying in wait underground. They characteristically attack an enemy building by tunneling underneath and bypassing the outer defenses; they can also lie underground until an enemy passes overhead, and then spring an ambush. In combat, they use their long, sharp claws as weapons as well as digging tools. Although they are formidable fighters in their element, they have weaknesses that an opponent can exploit, such as vulnerability to bright light. The Mogura appeared in the 2003 Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles episode The Real World, Part I, where they attacked Leonardo, Tomoe Ame, and Lord Noriyuki. Though they were driven off by the timely arrival of Usagi and Gennosuke, they were successful in kidnapping Tomoe, taking her to Lord Hebi.*Murakami Gennosuke is an anthropomorphic rhinoceros who makes a living as a rather disreputable bounty hunter. Originally, he was the son of an important samurai of a prominent lady until she was betrayed by a villainous subordinate. Disgraced, she took her entire entourage, including Gens family, on a quest for vengeance only to gradually slide into utter poverty. Gens family shared the same fate with his mother forced to prostitute herself for her family to survive. Eventually she died leaving father and son alone in the endless vendetta. As Gen matured, his father trained him in the ways of the samurai and despite his resentment to his father, Gen excelled in the instruction, becoming a formidable warrior. Upon reaching adulthood, Gen abandoned his father, wanting nothing to do with his vendetta. Carrying a daisho but with little chance for employment, Gens prospects looked bleak. However, things improved when he encountered a young man and an attractive woman claiming to need medical attention on the road. Tempted by her beauty, he stopped to examine her injury only to find nothing and suddenly realized that the man was about to backstab him. Gen immediately struck him down and subdued his female accomplice. A pair of woodcutters witnessed the incident and, recognizing the defeated criminals, told Gen that there was a bounty on them. Gen claimed the bounty and suddenly had enough money to eat better than he had in years. With that experience, Gen became a professional bounty hunter who disdained bushido in favor of a cynical mercenary attitude determined never to be poor again. Gen appears in the 2003 TMNT series along with Usagi. In the episode Samurai Tourist, Gen , puts on human clothing that makes him look almost identical to Rocksteady, the mutant rhinoceros from the 1987 TMNT cartoon (a homage to the characters and Rocksteady). Also in that episode, Gen is chased by Kojima, an assassin who happens to be a humanoid warthog (a homage to Rocksteadys partner Bebop).*Nakamura Koji - A samurai and teacher of one of the eight traditional schools of fencing, who was to become Lord Hikijis personal trainer. Lord Hikiji wanted Koji to fight a duel against an upstart swordsman who shunned the traditional schools, named Katsuichi; Koji figured he should have won easily, but was beaten three times. Humiliated, Koji realized that he was a victim of hubris, so he left his school and went on a training pilgrimage until he was good enough to challenge Katsuichi again. At Kitanoji Temple, he got his rematch, but fell again, for the last time. A true samurai to the end, he is well respected, and earned the admiration of young Jotaro. In turn, the samurai bequeathed his daisho to the kitten to wield when he comes of age.*The neko ninjalit. cat ninjaare one of three major ninja clans, the others being the mogura ninja (mole ninja) and the komori ninja (bat ninja). The neko ninja possess martial arts skills and secret techniques, such as access to explosives, beyond what the other clans have, but this is due to the neko ninja being the normal ninja clan, while the others have special abilities unique to them; the mogura ninja launch sneak attacks by digging through the ground, and the komori ninja can fly and launch aerial attacks.*Noodles - a giant soba dealer with the mind of a child. He befriended Kitsune, who took care of him, and used his soba stand to hide from the authorities. A corrupt police officer framed him for robbery, and had him executed. Kitsune blamed herself for his death, but later avenged him, by framing the corrupt officer instead.*Noriko - The disguised sister of Tomoe who considers herself a superior fighter to her sibling. She grew away from her family to become a warrior notorious for her murderously sadistic viciousness. She eventually led a plot of mining a secret gold mine with slave labor in Geishu territory to provide a pretext for another clan to invade. She enslaved Tomoe and Usagi in her plot, but they later escaped with the slaves to foil her plans. She apparently died when she deliberately fled into the mine with a gunpowder cache which exploded. However, Tomoe later had a disturbing dream where she witnessed Noriko escaping the cave with considered effort and vowing revenge. The question of whether that vision actually depicted an actual event is unanswered for now. \*Noriyuki is the current daimyo of the Geishu Clans province. Although still a young panda cub, he has proven extraordinarily capable in his position for his age for the intricate task of rule while still keeping his innocent spirit. This includes some developing physical skills such as being able to sense an intruder in his chambers even when asleep and to wake up quickly and yet subtly enough to launch an attack. His closest advisor is Tomoe Ame, a female feline samurai with extraordinary skill which she demonstrated when she saved him and his mother from a ninja assassination attempt. For that spectacular display of skill, Noriyukis mother appointed Tomoe as her sons personal bodyguard, a position she still holds today. His personal appeal has also been a factor in reducing internal schisms in his clan such as when he inadvertently met the hiding rebel, General Ikeda, and reconciled with him for his role in an earlier insurrection. This extended to Ikeda protecting the lord from assassins and Noriyuki offered to reinstate him to his former rank. Ikeda declined and offered the compromise of his son, Motokazu, joining Noriyukis court when he came of age after his father trained him. Although Ikeda later died in battle, Noriyuki was better than his word in bringing Motokazu into his household early to eventually become his personal page and later promoted the valiant cub to samurai. Unfortunately, Noriyuki has proven as gullible about mistreating Tomoe as his mother. A villainous advisor, wishing to get the female warrior (who learned of his treacherous nature in a dream) out of the way, has advised that she be married. The young panda accepted that advice without asking Tomoe if she desired it, making the marriage an unwanted imposition. Whether or not Noriyuki will realize that he is being unfair to her and release her is unknown for now.*General Oyaneko - A samurai who served Lord Hirone, and friend of Yagi, the Lone Goat, but is now the magistrate of a small town. He is dying from an illness when Usagi comes through town, and Oyaneko challenges him to a duel, hoping to die in battle, instead of wasting away; Usagi convinces him to live on and serve his people until his death. He died one week after finishing an irrigation canal.*Sachiko is an anthropomorphic cat and is a master thief, posing as a street performer to hide her criminal livelihood. Very little is known about Sachiko herself as she only appeared in one story in flashback; in the story Kitsunes Tale, shes the one who taught Kitsune everything she knew about being a street performer/thief.*Sanshobo, a supporting character, is a former samurai monk who has lost none of his courage or fighting skill.*Sasuk is an anthropomorphic fox, a demon hunter and skilled swordsman and archer who practices maho (sorcery). He has devoted his life to hunting demons (hence the title of Demon Queller). Sasuk has no known friends; he makes allegiances whenever he must, but is quite willing to do things alone if necessary. He is excessively professional, and many consider him cold and heartless as a result; Miyamoto Usagi prefers not to associate with him beyond the occasions when they happen to face a common enemy, partially due to the fact that Usagi often feels outclassed against Sasuks enemies, who are supernatural in nature. However, Usagis respect for his dedication has risen upon their latest encounter which ended with the mage temporarily aged and drained after a hard battle, but still didnt hesitate to continue when ordered to confront his next menace. In the Yokai graphic novel, Sasuk reveals that he is several hundred years old despite looking around the same age as Usagi.*Shi - A quartet of assassins; the name is fitting because it means 4 or death, depending on how it is written. Each member specialized in a weapon: the sword, the bow and arrow, the spear, and the kusarigama (sickle and chain). Together they are virtually invincible, but Usagi manages to defeat them by separating them and taking them out one at a time. One of them survived the fight and sought revenge, only to be killed by Usagi on their next encounter.*Shingen - He was kashira (leader) of the neko ninja and was a master of his craft. He first appeared in Vol.1 #12 where he was on a mission to steal a Muramasa sword from Lord Noriyuki. His skill was so refined that when he was speared in his hiding place by Tomoe Ame who sensed an intruder, he still escaped detection by refraining from crying out in pain at the wound and wiping the spearhead clean as Tomoe withdrew to remove evidence. However, after getting the sword, he was found by Miyamoto Usagi who followed him and tricked the ninja out of the sword while keeping his attention while the sword was making its way back to the city.*Shunji - One of Katsuichis students; Shunji and his brother found Katsuichi after he fell off a cliff after an ambush, and nursed him back to health. As payback, Katsuichi agreed to take Shunji on as a student, but found his talents to be incompatible with his teaching style; eventually, Katsuichi sent Shunji to train with an old friend of his.*Toady - A cowardly sycophant who concerns himself only with personal monetary benefits. Like the husband and wife woodcutters, he appears mainly as a generic commoner that interacts with several of the characters, both major or minor. It is unclear of what species he is, as he wears a hood that shadows the top half of his face (he is portrayed as a toad in the series of Space Usagi). On several occasions he has bumped into Usagi, but he once tried to assassinate Usagi for a reward, which turned out unsuccessful and sent him fleeing for his life (although Usagi never actually saw him). At one point he worked for Inukai to find the bandit leader General Fujis hideout.*Toda Buichi - A trusted general in the army of Lord Mifune, Usagis master. During the battle of Adachigahara he betrayed Mifune in favor of Lord Hikiji, which enabled Hikiji to win the battle. Hikiji did not reward Toda for his assistance, but rather beat and banished him. Left with nothing, Toda eventually devolved into a goblin who fed on passersby until Usagi avenged his betrayal.*Usagis Father - The former head of Usagis home village. He was a stern rabbit who is never shown smiling, although he had enough warmth to welcome his son back in the midst of battle when he arrived to help his village when beset by brigands. Usagis father died at the hands of Lord Hikiji when he refused to hand over supplies that could not be spared to the villainous daiymo just prior to the Battle of Aichi Plain.*Yagi is an anthropomorphic Goat, and is a highly skilled assassin. His most recognizable trait, is that he carries his son, Gorogoro with him in a baby carriage. He was once an honorable samurai, and despite his dark path, Yagi still considers himself an honorable warrior, and will not accept jobs that target innocent or honest people, although he charges a high fee for his services. He was once a high-ranking samurai who served Lord Hirone, but a corrupt councillor, Lord Wakame framed him for treason; instead of committing seppuku (ritualistic suicide) to preserve his honor, Yagi left, taking his son, Gorogoro with him. He is now a hired assassin, carrying his son in a carriage, and they are often referred to as the Lone Goat and Kid; Yagi is a skilled swordsman, while Gorogoro aids his father by attacking enemies with various weapons concealed in the cart. To signal ones intent to hire them, a person posts a picture of a baby carriage.*Zato-Ino, an anthropomorphic pig, blind since birth, is a skilled swordsman. Though born blind, he learned to get by using his superior sense of smell; limited by his blindness, he became a zato or blind masseur, hence the name Zato-Ino. He was often ridiculed because of his disability, so he learned how to use a sword, thinking that he could be more menacing and keep people from putting him down; but things only got worse. Although he gained the ability to defend himself, he eventually had to kill another in self defence, and was branded a murderer. Since then, hes been looking for a quiet out-of-the-way place where he can live in peace, but is constantly dogged by the bounty on his head. One day, he encounters Usagi, and things start friendly at first, but Ino is soon accosted by a pair of bounty hunters after the reward. Ino kills them, but Usagi now knows who he is; Usagi feels sorry for Ino, but insists that Ino must be stopped. Zato-Ino refuses and duels Usagi. With one stroke, Usagi ends the duel by cutting off Inos nose, leaving Ino completely blind; Usagi believes that Ino is now harmless, but the pig promises revenge on Usagi. He eventually gets a wood carver to make him a new nose out of wood, and Inos sense of smell is restored, aside from everything now having a strange pine scent.:Ino reappears in book 4 (The Dragon Bellow Conspiracy), wherein he is pursued by Gen for his bounty. He and Gen duel, but set aside their feud to aid Usagi and the Neko ninja attack the nearby fortress. Ino commits to the job for the promise of a home in the Geishu province, while Gen simply wants no one to kill Ino other than himself. However, Ino saves Gens life by taking a bullet for him, and the bounty hunter is shocked by the sacrifice. In exchange, he pretends Ino has died. Ino eventually escapes the ruins and finds a secluded village. After protecting it from thieves, Ino decides that the seclusion and self-sufficiency of the village is just what he needs to finally settle down.*Husband and Wife Woodcutters - A pair of woodcutters who occasionally appear as background characters, or as generic commoners that some of the main cast interact with; very rarely do their jobs as woodcutters come into play, but on one occasion, Usagi planted a Muramasa sword on them and took a piece of wood as a decoy. They also witnessed Gen take down his first criminals and mentioned that he could claim a reward for them, starting his career as a bounty hunter. They were originally intended to be human, but Sakai reconsidered and made them monkeys instead. References UsagiUsagiUsagiUsagi
3111745
Alexander_Bonnyman,_Jr.
awards of HonorHeartAlexander Sandy Bonnyman, Jr. (May 2, 1910 &ndash; November 22, 1943) was a States Marine Corps officer who was killed in action at Betio, Tarawa during War II. A combat engineer, he received the of Honor, Heart, Presidential Unit Citation, Campaign Medal with three Bronze Stars and the War II Victory Medal posthumously for his actions during the strategically important assault on a Japanese bombproof shelter during the of Tarawa.Early life and careerBorn on May 2, 1910, in Georgia, Bonnymans family moved to Tennessee, when he was a baby.(( His father was the president of Knoxvilles Blue Diamond Coal Company.(Bonnyman attended University where he studied engineering and played football. Dropping out of college after his sophomore year, he signed up for the Army Air Corps and entered flight training in June 1932 but washed out three months later, reportedly for buzzing too many control towers. He then worked in the coal industry before moving to Mexico, where he started a copper mining business.(Marine Corps serviceAt the outbreak of the war, Bonnyman was exempt from any military obligation due to his age and role in running a company producing strategically vital material for the war effort. Nevertheless, he enlisted in the U.S. Marine Corps as a private at Arizona. Bonnyman received his recruit training at Corps Recruit Depot San Diego, California. In October 1942, Bonnyman sailed for the South Pacific aboard the . He distinguished himself at the of Guadalcanal as part of a Marine pioneer unit (akin to a lightly equipped version of an Army combat engineer group). In February 1943, he received a battlefield commission to the rank of second lieutenant in recognition of what his superiors described as exceptional leadership skills.Bonnymans civilian background, temperament and skills would come to play an important role at Tarawa in November 1943, where he was assigned to a shore party handling beachhead logistics. When the assault troops were pinned down by heavy enemy artillery fire at the seaward end of the long Betio Pier, on his own initiative Bonnyman organized and led five men over the open pier to the beach. There he voluntarily obtained throwers and demolitions and directed the blowing up of several hostile installations.On the second day of the struggle, Bonnyman, determined to effect an opening in the enemys strongly defended defense line, led his demolitions teams in an assault on the entrance to a huge bombproof shelter which contained approximately 150 Japanese soldiers. The enemy position was about forty yards forward of the Marine lines.  Bonnyman advanced his team to the mouth of the position and killed many of the defenders.  His team was forced to withdraw to replenish its supply of ammunition and grenades. Bonnyman again pressed his attack and gained the top of the structure, thereby flushing more than one hundred of its occupants into the open where they were shot down. When the Japanese fought back, the lieutenant stood at the forward edge of the position and killed several attackers before he fell mortally wounded. Betio Island was declared secured on the same day. For his actions during the battle, Bonnyman was posthumously awarded the Medal of Honor. The medal was formally presented to his family by Secretary of the Navy Forrestal in 1947. His 12-year-old daughter, Frances, accepted the medal on behalf of the Bonnyman family.(According to the Defense Missing Personnel Office, Bonnymans remains were non-recovered.( After the war, the Registration Service recorded his body as having been buried as sea, however this report was later determined to be unfounded. It is instead believed that he was buried in a mass grave somewhere on Betio. In 2010, a team from the POW/MIA Accounting Command (JPAC) began a recovery mission on Tarawa in hopes of locating the mass graves and identifying the remains of Bonnyman and other missing Americans.(Awards and honorsThe Pellissippi Parkway bridge over the River on the Knox-Blount county line in Tennessee is designated the Alexander Sandy Bonnyman Memorial Bridge in his memory.() Medal of Honor citationThe of the United States takes pride in presenting the MEDAL OF HONOR posthumously toFIRST LIEUTENANT ALEXANDER BONNYMAN, JR.UNITED STATES MARINE CORPS RESERVEfor service as set forth in the following CITATION:For conspicuous gallantry and intrepidity at the risk of his life above and beyond the call of duty as Executive Officer of the 2d Battalion Shore Party, 8th Marines, 2d Marine Division, during the assault against enemy Japanese-held Tarawa in the Gilbert Islands, 2022 November 1943. Acting on his own initiative when assault troops were pinned down at the far end of Betio Pier by the overwhelming fire of Japanese shore batteries, 1st Lt. Bonnyman repeatedly defied the blasting fury of the enemy bombardment to organize and lead the besieged men over the long, open pier to the beach and then, voluntarily obtaining flame throwers and demolitions, organized his pioneer shore party into assault demolitionists and directed the blowing of several hostile installations before the close of D-day. Determined to effect an opening in the enemys strongly organized defense line the following day, he voluntarily crawled approximately 40 yards forward of our lines and placed demolitions in the entrance of a large Japanese emplacement as the initial move in his planned attack against the heavily garrisoned, bombproof installation which was stubbornly resisting despite the destruction early in the action of a large number of Japanese who had been inflicting heavy casualties on our forces and holding up our advance. Withdrawing only to replenish his ammunition, he led his men in a renewed assault, fearlessly exposing himself to the merciless slash of hostile fire as he stormed the formidable bastion, directed the placement of demolition charges in both entrances and seized the top of the bombproof position, flushing more than 100 of the enemy who were instantly cut down, and effecting the annihilation of approximately 150 troops inside the emplacement. Assailed by additional Japanese after he had gained his objective, he made a heroic stand on the edge of the structure, defending his strategic position with indomitable determination in the face of the desperate charge and killing 3 of the enemy before he fell, mortally wounded. By his dauntless fighting spirit, unrelenting aggressiveness and forceful leadership throughout 3 days of unremitting, violent battle, 1st Lt. Bonnyman had inspired his men to heroic effort, enabling them to beat off the counterattack and break the back of hostile resistance in that sector for an immediate gain of 400 yards with no further casualties to our forces in this zone. He gallantly gave his life for his country.(/S/HARRY S. TRUMANSee also*List of Medal of Honor recipients for World War IIReferencesrefs()()()*** Alexander, Joseph H. (1995). Utmost Savagery: The Three Days of Tarawa. Naval Institute Press. ISBN 1-55750-031-2.
3119530
List_of_Crusader_characters
This is a list of characters appearing in the Systems Crusader games. Interaction between the player and these characters usually takes place through a FMV cutscene playing, therefore each characters description is also accompanied by the name of the actor/actress portraying him/her.Resistance charactersThe Captain The Captain is a Silencer, a fictional type of soldier in the Crusader games, and the silent player-controlled protagonist of the series, introduced in the introduction movie of Crusader - No Remorse. No name is ever given and it is unknown if the character is male or female, with even the Vetron in the intro movie identifying him as ??? despite successfully discerning the names of his squadmates. The Captain receives two nicknames in the game, Tin Man and Red. The Captain was once a member of the WEC Silencer Corps before defecting. His origins are unknown. According to the game manual, Silencers are picked out in their adolescent years and recruited for life. They undergo rigorous training and are trained to be the ultimate soldier. He is distinguished by his red armor. During the course of events of Crusader - No Remorse, the player finds out that the Captain, and other Silencers, are possibly the result of genetic engineering and cloning. The Captain is shown joining the Resistance in the year 2196, after an attack on his team by a WEC Vetron for failing to carry out orders. The Captain joins Echo Base and performs several missions including sabotage, assassination, espionage and intelligence. At the end of the game, the Captain is tasked to destroy the WECs new orbital space station, the Vigilance Platform.The Captain survives the events of No Remorse and returns in No Regret, after successfully destroying the Vigilance Platform. He joins the Resistance on Earths Moon and combats the WECs Lunar Mining Cartel in a series of missions which include sabotage of key installations, espionage and the liberation of Resistance operatives. The game concludes when the Captain destroys the headquarters of the Lunar Mining Cartel and kills his nemesis, Chairman Draygan.While The Captain never speaks, the occasional clue to his nature, that of a human, is revealed. He grunts audibly when injured, and screams when killed, all in an identifiably male voice. Though his defection was out of necessity, his loyalty appears inexplicably unshakeable, even when offered grandiose rewards to return to the fold by Dr. Hoffman and Senator Snell. If killed, the death animation occasionally reveals the caucasian flesh of the Silencers chin under his helmet, and he always produces a blood puddle when he dies, confirming perhaps that he is not in fact an android as Denning posits. In the opening animation, just before his compatriots are slain, The Captain shows obvious distress, clutching the side of his helmet as if somehow sensing danger through a premonition of some sort, but the most revealing clue to The Captains humanity is an E-mail from General Maxis, following the mission involving clone soldiers. Maxis confirms receiving an inquiry from The Captain regarding his origins, and reports Central searching all Resistance as well as WEC records but could find no evidence to prove, nor disprove that he is genetically engineered. This is consistent with the Vetron in the intro movie being unable to identify him at all.Gen. Quentin Maxis Citizen # 4R-3G9-8773-XXXAge: 57 (at beginning of No Remorse)Height: 178 cmWeight: 88 kgBrown hair, brown eyesA former colonel of the WEC military, Quentin Maxis (Lunning) began to feel a growing distrust of the bureaucrats and the means through which they governed while he was in the military. After abandoning his life with the WEC, Maxis joined the ranks of the Resistance, where he quickly became one of their most important leaders, assuming the rank of General, and apparently becoming the head of all armed forces in the Resistance. At present he is part of Central (the Resistance directive office) and from his hidden HQ directs the efforts against the WEC. Maxis is the man responsible for welcoming the Captain into the Resistance, convincing the rest of Central to give the Silencer a chance, as he sympathizes with the Silencers apparent motivations for leaving the service of the WEC. His only appearance in No Regret is in the form of an e-mail (viewable from the games help files). He offers condolences on the loss of Resistances Echo sector personnel, and notes that even his most skeptical officers no longer doubt the Silencers loyalty--and as such he is expanding the Captains clearance on the Resistance server, allowing him access to information about the Resistances activities, goals, and personnel on the Moon, where he assumes the Silencer will turn up next.Col. Stephon Ely Citizen # 9A-8T99-5613-XXXAge: 40 (at beginning of No Remorse)Height: 190 cmWeight: 95 kgBlack hair, black eyes Ely (Alex Morris) is the Commanding Officer of the Echo Sector Resistance base and the man the Silencer reports to for briefing during No Remorse. He is a tall black man who enjoys smoking cigars and chewing their stubs in the corner of his mouth. An ex-WEC soldier himself, Ely had an undistinguished career, aside from achieving the rank of Captain and qualifying for Special Forces duty, yet it seems to have been mainly lack of enthusiasm--hes admired and respected by his troops in Echo base. Colonel Ely is skeptical about the addition of a Silencer to his unit, but comes to trust the new recruit upon seeing the results of his missions, whether unqualified successes or snatching victory from the jaws of defeat. Ely is captured by the WEC during a mission, probably because security forces were tipped off about his location by the spy in the Resistance. Sent for detainment to the Darkside station on the Moon, he is later rescued by the Captain. Its unclear if he takes actual command of the base. Perhaps due to his long captivity, he seems content to let Shepherd take the initiative, at least at first.Lt. Col. Matt ShepherdCitizen # 3D-24GT-4742-DDDAge: 36 (at beginning of No Regret)Height: 183 cmWeight: 82 kgBrown hair, brown eyesLt. Col. Shepherd (Porter) was an officer working for the WEC Security Cartel on the Moon, but became a Resistance sympathizer upon witnessing the harsh treatment of the prisoners working in the mines. After working as a spy for the Resistance, Shepherd was helped to stage his death in a shuttle accident and later covertly returned to the WEC base on the Moon to become the first full-time Resistance officer of the lunar garrison. He has great admiration for the Silencers skills, but is not above ribbing him a little if he makes a harmless mistake--or chewing him out if he makes a major one. He is also a fair strategist--among others, its his idea to implant a program allowing the Resistance to take control of trams, granting them greater mobility on Darkside base.Major Jo Anne VargasCitizen # 4V-9G31-4556-XXXAge: 32 (at beginning of No Remorse)Height: 173 cmWeight: 56 kgDark brown hair, hazel eyes An attractive and charismatic woman, Major Vargas (Savoy) has been part of the Resistance for years and has often worked with Central in preparing various manifestos for the movement. She was assigned to the Philadelphia unit when that base was attacked by WEC forces and captured. Unknown to anyone in the Resistance, while in captivity, she struck a deal with Chairman Draygan to work as a double agent, spying on Resistance activities and reporting them back to the WEC. Rescued by the Silencer, she is taken back to Echo base. As rumor about the theorized mole spreads, Vargas drops hints and fires off misdirecting suggestions, such as hinting the mole could have infiltrated Central, rather than Echo base, and framing Brooks for the kidnapping of Colonel Ely. When her betrayal is later discovered, Vargas has the Resistance base destroyed and its personnel killed. Assigned by Draygan to direct the efforts to crush the Resistance from the Vigilance platform, she assumes the role of the games final boss figure as the platform is on the verge of overload. The final confrontation finds her guarding the stations last lifepod, numerous bodies of guards, scientists and even senators strewn about her, implying she has been killing them all as they attempted to escape. Enraged that not only is her career with the Resistance over, but with the Consortium as well with the destruction of the Vigilance Platform, Vargas claims to have numerous backup plans in place once she kills the Silencer in a fight over the last lifepod, to which she has the only access card. She is ultimately slain, either by the Silencers hand, or with the explosive demise of the Vigilance Platform (should the player realize that hers is, in fact, not the only access card available and steal the one on a box by the escape hatch, or strangely enough, discover that neither card is necessary to open it).Sgt. Shannon Brooks Citizen # 2N-9U3-2214-DXXAge: 28 (at the beginning of No Remorse)Height: 168 cmWeight: 54 kgBrown hair, hazel eyes A fierce young woman, Shannon Brooks (Perensky) is a fanatical Resistance believer, mostly because of her early life: Brooks parents were both killed when the WEC annihilated the city of Petra for declaring its independence from the Consortium. Among the operatives of Echo base, she probably feels the most distrust towards the Captain (she is also arguably the most skeptical of Major Vargas). Due to the spys activities, she is captured by the WEC and even fingered as the spy for a short time, until the Silencer catches the real spy red-handed and rescues Brooks from a WEC prison. Brooks, though heavily injured, helps guide the Silencer through the Vigilance platform, and shows at least grudging respect for him. Brooks only appearance in No Regret is in e-mail form, where she notes, approximately 46 hours after the end of No Remorse, that the Resistances doctors have declared her fit for duty; apparently, she has also been promoted to Lieutenant. She also seems to genuinely like the Captain by this point, nicknaming him Red, and addressing him as sir in her sign-off (whereas in the early part of No Remorse, she was blatantly insubordinate and even threatened the Silencers life more than once).Cpl. Troy Wizard Reaves Citizen # 7B-8Y21-5489-XXXAge: 26 (at beginning of No Remorse)Height: 180 cmWeight: 80 kgBrown hair, blue eyes Cpl. Reaves (Gibbler) is the head of Echo bases technical division. He is a specialist in informatics and picked up the nickname Wizard during childhood, due to his prodigious hacking talents. His computer skills are vital to the Resistance, not only because Reaves can infiltrate the WEC network and scavenge for information, but, most importantly, he is their extraction specialist (a position hes quite proud of), capable of tapping into the WEC teleporter grids and taking temporary control of pads, thus allowing Resistance operatives to get in and out of enemy installations quickly and easily. He has an active sense of humor; he is the first to call the Captain Tin Man, and in the personnel files in one of No Remorses manuals, added a number of handwritten joking comments in the margins (Maxis notes Reaves likely didnt know the General would be reviewing the material personally). Reaves was murdered by Major Vargas when she had the WEC troopers assault Echo base.Cpl. Nicholas Yo-Yo CardovaCitizen # 6Y-5B52-4589-XXXAge: 32 (at beginning of No Remorse)Height: 173 cmWeight: 90 kgBrown hair, brown eyes A Latino man, Nicholas Cardova (Compean) has been in the Resistance for some time and has undergone a good share of operations. He is notable for his belligerent attitude, quick temper (both of which according to WEC files goes back to grammar school), and the number of times hes been promoted to and demoted from the rank of corporal--when the Silencer first meets him, he is a private yet again. Despite (or perhaps because of, in a society that values conformity and ignorance) his hotheadedness, he is actually quite intelligent, having attended college and majored in political science. Yet again it was his impulsiveness that got him into trouble; in his sophomore year he was convicted for dissemination of anti-Consortium propaganda. After serving his three-year sentence, he was recruited by the Resistance, and has remained underground with them since. He initially welcomes the Silencer with pure venom. However, after several operations in support of the Captain, including one where he is restored to corporal and witnesses the biggest explosion hes ever seen, his attitude reverses, and he becomes almost fond of the Silencer, if only because of the Captains talent for destruction. He is killed after Major Vargass betrayal leads WEC forces to Echo Sector base.Pvt. Derrick Taxman AndrewsCitizen # 46-9L22-1677-XXXAge: 38 (at beginning of No Remorse)Height: 188 cmWeight: 84 kgBrown hair, green eyes Andrews (Folse) worked for the most part of his life for the WEC in the Revenue Assessment Division (i.e. the IRS) and was nicknamed Taxman by Resistance members after his defection. Disgusted by the methods of the WEC--most likely by the El Paso Tax Insurrection of 2189--he became a Resistance soldier and was assigned to Echo base. Aside from Reaves, Andrews seems to be viewed as the least skilled fighter on base, and often appears nervous, particularly in combat situations. Andrews is one of the few Resistance operatives who is not hostile to the Silencer; in fact, he seems to have more respect for the Captain than anyone at Echo Base, possibly due to sympathizing with his defection and the attitude the others treat them with. During the fourth in-game mission, Andrews is ambushed by a squad of WEC soldiers. Badly outnumbered, he is killed in action, but not before managing to shut down a forcefield blocking the Silencers way. Its very likely the ambush had been set up by the spy in the Resistance, who probably warned the WEC of the Rebels upcoming raid. Andrews death does nothing for the Silencers reputation: Brooks and Cardova (Cardova only if you leave the mission without achieving the objective, which is possible in this mission, unlike in most) both threaten him with pain and death if they find out he had anything to do with the betrayal.WeaselA.K.A.: Alvin Tarkin, Leroy Cern, Alberto Devense, Sally Horrowitz, Lyle Lepardo, Antonio ZeroCitizen # UnknownAge: Unknown, presumed early 30s (at beginning of No Remorse)Height: 180 cmWeight: 72 kgBrown/silver hair, blue eyes A mysterious fellow with brizzolato hair, Weasels (Perella) full name is unknown. Even the WEC database does not hold much data on his background since he is a refusenik--a man whose identity has not been registered. Weasel has at least half a dozen other known aliases (listed above), and has a truly staggering rap sheet, including crimes such as exploitation of a minor and maintaining a bawdy house. His nickname probably stems from the weasel, whom he calls Baby, occasionally hanging on his left shoulder, or perhaps his ability to wriggle through tight spots. Weasel is portrayed as a slightly twitchy, theatrical man. In the game, Weasel works as a black market arms dealer, rather than as an actual Rebel operative, and is the individual the Captain has to rely upon for buying new equipment between missions if he cant find it during the missions. Barring finding secret and hidden areas in-game, one can get weapons and equipment farther along the power curve much sooner with him than in missions. It is speculated that Weasel was killed by WEC soldiers when Echo base was overrun, but unlike the others, his body is not found at the base (although that may be because the designers were able to use generic Rebel corpses for the others, but would have had to create a unique body for him).Allen DenningCitizen # 4F-16DT-2729-EXXAge: 36 (at beginning of No Regret)Height: 172 cmWeight: 82 kgBrown hair, brown eyesDenning (Page) is a civilian operator in the Resistance. Imprisoned at 18 by the WEC for vandalism, his sentence was extended due to his adulthood, and he was later deported to the Moon, where he worked as a Di-Corellium miner. After completing his term, he was offered a job as shuttle pilot thanks to the help of a WEC administrator, who was also a Resistance sympathizer. Introduced to the underground movement himself, Denning now acts as a courier and smuggler, but also takes part in Resistance guerrilla operations. Diagnosed with untreatable leukemia linked to Di-Cor poisoning, Denning has requested to continue Resistance operations as long as he remains physically able. Within the game, Denning is the first Luna operative to contact the Silencer, and guides him through the LMCs freighter to the plasma turbine, allowing the two of them to destroy it and get clear to the moon. Denning acts as the Captains contact back at the Resistances Lunar base during the fifth mission. He claims he has never seen anything as efficient as Silencer in his life, and wonders if hes an android, or perhaps genetically altered. Denning is killed in an ambush planned by Director Leach.Marian Torch LeibnitzCitizen # 9G-26TF-3732-AXXAge: 30 (at beginning of No Regret)Height: 193 cmWeight: 132 kgBlack hair, brown eyesA heavyset man, Torch (Curvey jr) much prefers to be referred to by his nickname only. He was a problematic boy long before being arrested and imprisoned by the WEC. He always had a knack for explosives, and after entering the Resistance he became one of the movements most trusted demolitions experts. Captured during a London operation, he was sentenced to life imprisonment on the Moon to mine Di-Corellium. Torch kept his role as an active Resistance operative until an accident in the mines and complications from a poorly-treated wound resulted in the loss of his left arm (which has since been replaced with a working prosthetic mining drill, a compromise he appears alarmingly content with). Currently he is tasked with mission planning and coordination, and his expertise in the mines makes him the go-to man for reconnaissance and aiding other Resistance soldiers navigate through often mazelike tunnels. He is also able to lend some of his demolitions knowledge, advising fellow operatives where and how to place explosives for maximum effect. Almost immediately after the Silencer teleports into the mines, Torch contacts him. At the end of that mission, he disappears, only to appear a few missions later after disposing of some LMC agents (hinting very obviously at the use of his mining drill arm to this end), and guide the Silencer through the mines to an ore separator that is to be destroyed. Throughout the rest of the game, Torch reliably provides navigational advice with enthusiasm and good humor, reacting with amusement if his advice is unheeded. In his last appearance in the game, he is well pleased with the Silencers accomplishments. It can be assumed he survives later events in the game, though he doesnt appear in the final transmission to the Silencer from the Resistance base.Professor SekadaProfessor Sekada (Deleon) is a female scientist formerly of the Consortium working at Darkside station on the Moon. Her research was aimed at seeking alternative power sources to Di-Corellium--their funding came from Senators who believed that the reliance on Di-Cor was a mistake. When Sekadas work was about to show the first promising results, her lab was stormed by WEC troopers under orders from Director Leach. The guards destroyed the lab, killed all of Sekadas staff, imprisoned the Professor, and stole the research results. She is later rescued by the Silencer and then becomes a member of the Resistance, occasionally helping the other operatives by directing missions from the control room of the Resistance base.WEC charactersPresident GauthierAn character, President Gauthiers (Grant James) presence is limited to his voice which is heard during some conversations with Chairman Draygan in No Regret. Presumably the highest-ranked politician in the Consortium, Gauthier seems to be the only person of whom Draygan is afraid, likely because the President is his only superior. Judging from his words, Gauthier is definitely hostile to the Resistance, but seems happy enough to let Draygan do all the dirty work for him, and definitely wouldnt mourn Draygan upon his death.Chairman Nathaniel DrayganOver the course of No Remorse Chairman Draygan (Everett Woody Skaggs) is the visible presence of WEC political power. A man in his mid forties with gray hair, Draygan is a strong opposer of the Resistance and he seeks to destroy the underground movement by any means necessary, be it plain old military assaults or devious gas attacks. He is also the man behind the Vigilance platform, an orbital installation designed to be the ultimate solution against the Resistance. In the events of No Regret, Draygan has apparently become obsessed with taking vengeance against the Silencer, who has thwarted the Chairmans plans and projects time and again. The Silencers dogged survival and success even seems to have unhinged him slightly, as he attempts to destroy the entirety of Darkside Station, which would kill everyone on-station--including the Silencer, the Resistance, and probably himself. This plot, too, is foiled by the Captain. Ultimately his failure leads President Gauthier to condemn him, leaving this...carpet stain you call a soul to the mercy of the Rebels. When The Silencer finally breaches LMC headquarters, Draygan is there to engage him directly, piloting a tremendous, heavily-armed servomech, but is inevitably defeated. While there is no doubt the end result of the confrontation itself is fatal to the Chairman (his head visibly explodes all over the cockpits glass dome), the following explosion of LMC Headquarters adds to the certainty of his demise.Senator Everette SnellA corrupt Consortium politician, Senator Snell (Ron Jackson) is a man whose main interest seems to be enjoying the power coming from his political position. Snell is also the man whom Draygan turns to when the Chairman requires the Senate to vote according to his desires. Captured for interrogation by the Captain, Snell is later able to flee from Resistance custody, but is shot by Draygan when he reports back to the WEC headquarters, possibly because he was of no more use to the Chairman, or maybe because the WEC suspected he gave up information to the Resistance.Dr. Gregor HoffmanWhile most of the population is led to believe that Dr. Hoffmans (Neal) research is aimed at preserving lives through his discoveries, the simple truth is that Hoffman is a classic scientist. As shown in his conversations with his assistant Doyle, Hoffman is more than willing to use Resistance prisoners like they are guinea-pigs for his experiments, like the mind probe project, and behaves with utter amorality mixed with more than a touch of theatricality. Hoffman is the mastermind of yet another project, aimed at creating the perfect soldier: he genetically engineered at least one batch of troopers which are supposed to be the newest members of the Silencer Corps (and may have created an earlier one, of which the Captain may have been a member). As the first group of this batch approaches physical maturity in their vats, Hoffman is killed by the Captain during a raid against the Consortium research center where he is working on his Silencer project.Director Judith LeachJudith Leach (Chris Wall) is the woman in charge of the direction of Darkside Station on the Moon. Despite the relatively small size of the lunar base and the Lunar Mining Cartel itself, her position is crucial, as most of Earths energy supply relies on di-corellium, and at least half the known reserves in the solar system are on the Moon. Soon after being appointed she began a zero tolerance policy against the prisoners with the precise purpose of keeping di-corellium production on schedule with the ever-growing demands of Earth industries. Leach is absolutely uncaring of the lives of the prisoners; her interest is to get the job done, whether that means increasing Di-Cor production or crushing the Resistance presence on the Moon. During his visit to the lunar base, after several attempts are launched to find and kill the Silencer (and the Resistance, too), Chairman Draygan has Director Leach arrested by his bodyguards, feeling she has failed the WEC too many times. Her status remains unknown since it is not clearly stated if she has been imprisoned or executed. However, in No Remorse, Draygan made it quite clear he is not above killing a subordinate personally, and members of the team that briefly worked on Crusader 2 stated she would have played a part in the game.Other charactersThere are other characters in the game who are not explicitly aligned with or against the Captain after he makes his decision to join the Resistance.Professor Joseph Willmar A slightly overweight, middle-aged man working for the Consortium, Professor Willmar (Perkins) is a brilliant scientist working in the field of weapons development. He has struck a deal with General Maxis to help the Resistance to gain access to restricted structures by supplying key cards. He is nervous, unhappy, and worried about his role, often whining, Im just a scientist!, and at one point theorizing hell be dead soon--from a heart attack. While working on his latest invention, the graviton shield, he is arrested, probably because the spy in the Resistance revealed Willmars Resistance complicity to the WEC. In an extraction attempt, Prof. Willmar is killed after stepping on a sabotaged teleporter whose signal had been scrambled by the spy, liquefying him (a fate shared by The Silencer should the he be foolhardy enough to try to use the teleport pad himself).Trina JenkinsTrina Jenkins (MacKenzie) is one of the WECs best known anchorwomen. She appears in the daily WEC News show (often in company of Josh Starns), reading the propaganda-filled news supplied by the Consortium. Usually such reports describe the results of the latest mission undergone by the Silencer as acts of terrorism or crimes against humanity while concealing the truth about such operations from the general population and downplaying the effects of the attack. She seems to believe what she says most of the time, although after the Resistance destroys a stockpile of nerve gas with a small nuclear bomb in No Remorse, she vehemently denies there was a mushroom cloud, calling the explosion a celebration of recent Consortium victories against the Resistance. She then falters very slightly when she reads the next line: that due to a small accident, the base will be closed for the next two years.Josh Starns Another WEC news anchorman, Starns (Forest) usually appears on screen with Trina Jenkins, but on some editions he will be the only newsreader present. He too blindly reports the fake news provided by the Consortium. One example is when the Silencer kills Gregor Hoffman, in the midst of his engineering a new breed of soldier; Starns says that Hoffman was gunned down while working in the critical care unit of a hospital. Starns also tends to add opinionated statements derogatory to the Resistance, such as if youre listening out there, Rebels, theres no escape, so you might as well give up, though whether these are scripted or his own ad libs isnt clear. Starns doesnt appear in No Regret.Col. Anton Zurovec Zurovec was the head of the Captains team leading up to the beginning of No Remorse. Though a Silencer, he seems a bit idealistic, at once certain that it is not his place to kill civilians, and at the same time believing that the WEC will hear them out. He is killed by a Vetron while discussing with Vittek what they should do next.Maj. Marcus VittekVittek was one of the Captains group leading up to the beginning of No Remorse. Vittek seems cynical and pragmatic, apparently thinking the three of them should not have let the civilians go, and is quite certain that the WEC will be hunting them down and killing them, as has already been tried by sending a Vetron after the three of them. He references someone named Owens, who is implied to be a Silencer who was killed for committing similar acts of disobedience. He is killed while discussing with Zurovec what they should do next.Trivia* Some of the characters in the games are named after members of the Crusader development team. Two of the Silencers in the intro of No Remorse are named Zurovec and Vittek like Crusaders producer and lead programmer respectively. Colonel Ely is probably named after Asylum Sound System programmer Ely and similarly the games Professor Willmar probably owes his name to programmer Willmar. Also, in one of the missions, a WEC senator is called Spector, likely an homage to Spector who was working for Origin at that time.* Many of the actors for the FMV scenes in both Crusader games also appeared on the childrens educational show Wishbone (which were all filmed in Texas). In particular Mary Chris Wall (Director Leach) and Alex Morris (Colonel Ely) had a regular role and a recurring guest role respectively.References*In-game literature for Crusader - No Remorse*In-game literature and datafile (RESIST.TXT) for Crusader - No Regret*Tyler M., Frase T., McCubbin C. (1995) Origins official guide to Crusader - No Remorse, Origin Systems, Inc. ISBN 0-929373-26-X*McCubbin C., Frase T. (1996) Origins official guide to Crusader - No Regret, Prima Publishings ISBN 0-76150925-9See also* Main Crusader article
3125065
Royal_School_of_Military_Engineering
The Royal School of Military Engineering (RSME) is the main training establishment for the Armys Engineers. After they have successfully completed their Phase 1 - Basic Soldier Training, members of the Corps of Royal Engineers attend 3 RSME, at Minley  for Phase 2a - Engineering Training. If artisan or design trade streamed, they then go to 1 RSME in Chatham, Kent,for Phase 3 - Trade and Artisan Training and other career, promotion and specialist trade courses. 3 RSME is also home to the professional HQ of the Corps (HQ Engineer in Chief (Army)), whilst 1 RSME is the spiritual home of the Corps, Corps Museum and HQ Messes.Backgroundthumb|A Military Engineer - Fabricator in IraqThe Royal School of Military Engineering is the Armys Centre of Excellence for Engineering and Ordnance Disposal (EOD) training. Located on several sites in Chatham, Kent, Camberley in Surrey, Mowbray in Leicestershire and Bicester, Oxfordshire.The Royal School of Military Engineering offers superb training facilities for the full range of Engineer skills. The RSME encourages and promotes a wide range of sporting activities and clubs enabling all personnel to participate either as individuals or as part of a team.  All sites have well equipped gymnasiums, squash and tennis courts, hockey, rugby and football pitches. The Combat Engineer Wing at Camberley maintains a swimming pool in order to enable combat and competitive swimming training.The RSME was founded by Major (later General Sir) Pasley, as the Royal Engineer Establishment in 1812.(Corps History Part 6 Royal Engineers Musem) It was renamed the School of Military Engineering in 1868 and granted the Royal prefix in 1962.(Corps History Part 17 Royal Engineers Musem)The RSME at Bromton Barracks at Chatham is also home to the Engineers Museum and the Institution of Royal Engineers (InstRE).The Royal EngineerThe Royal Engineer is a engineer. The training combines the discrete but complementary disciplines of combat engineering and construction engineering which, together, provide the unique range of skills that are fundamental to the Royal Engineers.These skills include the command and management of engineer tasks; combat engineering; artisan, technical, and professional engineering; counter terrorist search; communication; watermanship; and driving specialist engineer vehicles.Soldier trainingSappers are firstly trained as a soldier and then as a combat engineer. Many Royal Engineering trades require minimal qualifications on entry; however most trades require individuals to possess good practical ability, technical aptitude and an appetite for continuous learning.(http://www.army.mod.uk/training_education/training/20946.aspx)On completion of Phase 1 training, all Royal Engineers proceed to RSME Minley to complete their Phase 2a training in which they will qualify as a combat engineer. In the 9 week long course, soldiers will learn combat engineering skills such as how to clear mines, construct bridges and cross water obstacles. On successful completion soldiers will be awarded their Royal Engineer Stable Belt and officially become a Sapper.(http://www.army.mod.uk/training_education/training/20947.aspx Phase 2A)On completion of Phase 2a training, Sappers commence their Phase 2b training. For most trades, this will mean artisan trade training at Chatham in Kent. Course lengths vary and can last up 53 weeks at the end of which Sappers will be posted their first Regiment. For some this will include further training as a paratrooper, commando or EOD specialist. All successful graduates of their Phase 2b courses are awarded a Military Engineer Class 2 qualification for their particular trade.(http://www.army.mod.uk/training_education/training/20948.aspx Phase 2B)At some stage during their careers, most Sappers will return to Chatham to continue their professional development. This phase of their training is known as Phase 3. Phase 3 training can be split into 3 main categories: trade training, command and leadership training, and professional engineering.(http://www.army.mod.uk/training_education/training/20949.aspx RE Phase 3)Officer trainingAlthough more than 80% of Officer Cadets are university graduates, some are accepted with A-Levels or equivalent qualifications, or are serving soldiers who have been selected for Officer training. Age on entry must be between 17 years 9 months and 28 years. Following the 48 weeks of Officer training at the Royal Military Academy Sandhurst, Royal Engineer Officers proceed to Command Wing at the RSME where they complete a 6 month long Troop Commanders Course.(http://www.army.mod.uk/training_education/training/20950.aspx Officer Training)The course, which is split between the Minley and Chatham sites, aims to provide the Corps of Royal Engineers with trained and motivated commanders and leaders through operationally focused command and leadership training. With particular emphasis on engineering principles, doctrine and tactics, the training provides the necessary technical, supervisory and administrative knowledge to command engineer soldiers in peace and on operations. On passing the Troop Commanders Course, Officers are posted to their unit where they will become a Troop Commander. This may entail further training as a Paratrooper, Commando or Disposal Officer.During their commission, high quality Officers may be selected to attend the Battle Captains Course and/or Squadron Commanders Course where they will be provided with the necessary command and supervisory training required to operate effectively in their unit.Professional engineer trainingProfessional Engineering Wing delivers advanced technical training to foundation degree standard for selected Junior NCOs and post-graduate learning for officers with engineering degrees to be awarded a MSc degree and be well placed to apply for Engineer (CEng) status, in order to deliver force infrastructure, reconstruction and development projects on operations. Soldiers who have proved themselves as high quality tradesmen may apply to attend Clerk of Works/Military Plant Foreman courses whilst high quality officers apply to become Professionally Qualified Engineers in order to lead the Corps civil, electrical and mechanical engineering effort.Other beneficiariesThe RSME also provides training for the Navy, Air Force, other Arms and Services of the Army, Other Government Departments, and Foreign and Commonwealth countries as required. These skills provide vital components in the Armys operational capability, and Engineers are currently deployed in Afghanistan, Iraq, Cyprus, Bosnia, Kosovo, Kenya, Brunei, Falklands, Belize, Germany and Ireland. Engineers also take part in exercises in Arabia, Kuwait, Italy, Egypt, Jordan, Canada, Poland and the USA.OperationsImage:Royal Engineers Metcalf and Manduwi (photo Andy V Byers).JPG|thumb|Engineers Surveyors in EuropeThe RSME is based at Brompton Barracks in Chatham in Kent, England.  It also has a subsidiary site at Camberley in Surrey. Its mission is To deliver trained and motivated Military Engineers to meet the operational requirements of the Armed Forces. It has the following schools:(Royal Engineers to benefit from new training deal Defence News, 2 December 2008)* The Combat Engineer School, which is based at Gibraltar Barracks at Minley in Hampshire, runs training for up to 1,000 students at any one time.* The Construction Engineer School, which is based at Chatham, runs courses for over 8,500 students a year.* The Defence Explosive Munitions and Search School, which is based at Bicester in Oxfordshire, provides specialist traing for Explosives Ordnance Disposal and counter terrorist search for the Army, Navy, Air Force and UK Police Forces.* The Defence Animal Centre. The Animal Centre, based in Mowbray, east Leicestershire, trains animals (mainly dogs) for all three armed forces. It is also home of the Army Veterinary Corps.* The Band of the Corps of Royal Engineers. The RE Band based in Bromton Barracks, Chatham is one of the Armys top military bands and provides a Marching Band, Concert Band and ensembles to the Corps, wider Army and public events.* The Royal Engineers Museum and Library, The Museum in Gillingham, Kent, England, tells the story of the Corps of Royal Engineers and British military engineering in general. The Library was founded in 1812. The Museum and Library collection received Designated status in 1998 (it is recognised as having an outstanding collection of national and international significance), one of only three military or regimental museums in the country to hold this status.* The Institution of Royal Engineers, the professional institution of the Corps of Engineers, was established in 1875 and in 1923 it was granted its Charter by George V. The Institution is co-located with the Engineers Museum, within the grounds of the Royal School of Military Engineering at Brompton in Chatham, Kent.Headquarters RSMEthumb|left|200px|HQ Royal School of Military Engineering.Image:Royal Engineers Museum, Prince Arthur Rd, Gillingham (2) - geograph.org.uk - 1148711.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Ravelin Building now houses the InstRE and Engineers Museum.Headquarters Royal School of Military Engineering provides policy, strategy and direction to its three schools. It manages a budget of almost 50 million per annum between the schools and itself. The RSME is commanded by a Brigadier, the Commandant RSME, from the headquarters in Brompton Barracks, Chatham.The Institute building was built in 1872 and housed the Engineers college: a central lecture room flanked by specialised teaching rooms. It is now occupied by Headquarters RSME, Headquarters Construction Engineer School and the Corps Library. It is a fine grade II listed building.The Institution of Royal Engineers is now housed in the Ravelin Building, co-located with the Engineers Museum.Holdfast Training ServicesImage:British engineers demining.jpg|thumb|Combat Engineers of 20 Field Squadron, 36 Engineer Regiment practice landmine clearance.In a private partnership (PPP) that will span 30 years, Holdfast Training Services Ltd and the RSME will modernise training and the management of training through the development of new initiatives. It will also provide new & improved living and training accommodation.In August 2008 Holdfast Training Services Ltd, a consortium comprising Babcock Support Services Ltd (76%) and Carillion Private Finance (Defence) Ltd (24%), signed a 30-year Public Private Partnership Contract, worth in the region of 3 billion, with the MoD. The contract, which commenced on 5th January 2009, provides the Royal School of Military Engineering with training, training support services, a seven year build programme as well as hard and soft facilities management services. The design, build and transition phase involves three locations and includes 32 new builds, 21 refurbishments and the development of five training areas.FacilitiesA 7-year build programme is in progress at both sites. This will provide new living and working accommodation including classrooms and Officers, Warrant Officers and Sergeants Messes.(http://www.army.mod.uk/training_education/training/20945.aspx)Four Junior Ranks Single Living Accommodation blocks will also be built - all providing en suite rooms for single occupancy with a sitting room, kitchen and drying area for every 4-5 rooms. The first two of these new blocks have been built and are already occupied. Many existing blocks will also be refurbished to provide a similar standard of accommodation throughout the RSME.The RSME encourages and promotes a wide range of sporting activities and clubs enabling all personnel to participate either as individuals or as part of a team.  All sites have well equipped gymnasiums, squash and tennis courts, hockey, rugby and football pitches. The Combat Engineer Wing at Camberley maintains a swimming pool for combat and competitive swimming and water polo.Pay as you Dine facilities exist at both sites and provide a wide range of hot and cold food for all soldiers and staff. Both sites also have a NAAFI shop, relaxation facilities, licensed bars, internet access, large screen TVs and pool tables.HistoryThe Peninsular War (1808-14) revealed deficiencies in the training and knowledge of officers and men in the conduct of siege operations and bridging. During this war low ranking Engineers officers carried out large scale operations. They had under their command working parties of two or three battalions of infantry, two or three thousand men, who knew nothing in the art of seigeworks. Engineers officers had to demonstrate the simplest tasks to the soldiers often while under enemy fire. Several officers were lost and could not be replaced and a better system of training for siege operations was required. On 23 April 1812 an establishment was authorised, by Royal Warrant, to teach Sapping, Mining, and other Military Fieldworks to the junior officers of the Corps of Engineers and the Corps of Royal Military Artificers, Sappers and Miners.Image:SirCharlesPasley.jpg|thumb|left|Maj Gen Sir Pasley KCBCaptain Pasley who had been pressing for such an establishment since 1809 was selected as the first Director with the rank of major. The location chosen was Chatham which was, at that time, a strongly fortified naval town. The town was surrounded by batteries, bastions and ditches designed to be defended by 7000 men and so provided excellent areas for training in siege operations. (Records show that there had been an military base on the high ground above Chatham built to defend Dockyard since at least 1708.) Pasley received his orders to move from Plymouth on 2 May 1812 and ten days later he was in Chatham.In 1815 Pasley recommended that the Royal Sappers and Miners Training Depot at Woolwich be closed, to concentrate all training at Chatham. But that was not achieved until 1850 when the training Depot was moved to Brompton Barracks, Chatham. The move was made possible by the completion of North Kent Railway, which facilitated a fast transport link into London. The Headquarters of the Engineers, also based in Woolwich, was not moved to Chatham until 1857.The first courses at the Engineers Establishment were done on an all ranks basis with the greatest regard to economy. To reduce staff the NCOs and officers were responsible for instructing and examining the soldiers. If the men could not read or write they were taught to do so and those that could read and write were taught to draw and interpret simple plans. The Royal Engineers Establishment quickly became the centre of excellence for all fieldworks and bridging. Pasley was keen to confirm his teaching and regular exercises were held as demonstrations or as experiments to improve the techniques and teaching of the Establishment. From 1833 bridging skills were demonstrated annually by the building of a pontoon bridge across the Medway which was proved by the infantry of the garrison and the cavalry from Maidstone. These demonstrations had become a popular spectacle for the local people by 1843, when 43,000 came to watch a field day laid on to test a method of assaulting earthworks for a report to the Inspector General of Fortifications. In 1869 the title of the Royal Engineers Establishment was changed to The School of Military Engineering (SME) as evidence of its status, not only as the font of engineer doctrine and training for the Army, but also as the leading scientific military school in Europe.Its range of courses at this time included instruction in:* Field fortifications* Siege works & mining* Demolitions* Fitting & Lathe work* Bridging* Stoking & management of steam boilers* Engine driving* Electric light in field operations* Electricity & telegraphy* Model making* Woodworking machinery* Photography & chemistry* Ballooning* Survey* Submarine mining* Railway work* Lithography (printing)* Estimating & building constructionAt the start of War I the Royal Engineer battalions based at Chatham were deployed to defend the local area. Immediately recruits started to arrive - in the first six weeks of the war 15,000 men arrived. A hundred recruits per day had been expected to arrive but they arrived at a rate of two hundred rising to a peak of nine hundred per day. The Depot coped so well with this influx that on 3 October 1914, the King and Queen paid a private visit to the Corps, 12,001 all ranks were on parade in uniform on the Great Lines.The courses at Chatham had to change to produce soldiers at the rate required by the war. Training in the Construction, Survey and Electrical Schools was cut back to allow for increases in fieldworks and military training. Recruit courses were cut from eight months to four months and a batch of thirty officers arrived every month for five months training. After the war, the SME returned to its peacetime training role. In 1920 officers started to go to University for one year courses. This was limited to wartime officers who then also had to do one year at SME, but by 1926 all officers spent two years at University, after their course at SME, and received a degree. Between the wars sports were an important part of life at SME.The barracks had an open air swimming pool. New sports field were built on the Black Lion fields, and a new hockey ground was built to the north of the Great Lines. The enthusiasm for sports went so far that in 1921 three tennis courts were marked out on Brompton Barracks square and were used frequently.In 1939 SME mobilised again and the Training Battalion left Chatham forming two training battalions at Ripon and Shorncliffe.Image:Robert Napier, 1st Baron Napier of Magdala - Project Gutenberg eText 16528.jpg|thumb|left|Marshal Napier, 1st Baron Napier of Magdala, GCB, GCSI, CIE, FRS.Image:John-fox-burgoyne.jpg|thumb|right|Marshal Sir Fox Burgoyne, 1st Baronet GCB.Young Officer training was cut short to allow the officers to be dispatched to units. No basic training was now done at Chatham since the officers were trained at the RE OCTU and the men were to be trained in the training battalions. Specialist, instructor and higher trade continued at Chatham but from June 1940 training was seriously interrupted by German efforts to destroy the dockyard. Approximately 100 bombs, and one Spitfire, fell on the SME damaging buildings including the Commandants residence. One caused heavy casualties when it burst in the basement of a barrack block. Staff and students were also required to direct the building of defences in the dockyard and the surrounding area. It was difficult to continue trainingunder these circumstances so it was decided to look for a new site for SME. In September 1940 the decision was taken to move to Ripon. Despite the disruptions caused by the move, only one months training was lost. Trade training remained at Chatham throughout the war due to the difficulty of finding suitable workshops elsewhere. The school at Ripon was expanded to keep pace with the growing demands of the war. In 1940 an Experimental Tunnelling Section was formed and in 1941 Assault Engineer and Disposal Schools were formed. The schools ran a wide range of courses for all arms and the long courses were designed to be taken in sections so that students could attend the relevant parts.After the war SME remained at Ripon while a decision was made about the future location of the school. Several sites with better training facilities were considered but the Treasury could not afford the cost of providing new quarters and SME returned to Chatham. The move back was completed in March 1950. The close relationship the SME had with the civilian population led to the Corps being granted the Freedom of Ripon before the departure of the SME in July 1949. The SME was also involved in the parades granting the Freedom of Gillingham in September 1953 and of Rochester in May 1954.In 1950 trade training courses were six months long, and these were put to good use around the barracks. By 1953 they had built Burgoyne House for the Mess Secretary and Napier House for the Institution Secretary. In 1962 the School of Military Engineering celebrated its 150th birthday, and as a birthday present HM The Queen bestowed the Royal title on the School, becoming The Royal School of Military Engineering (RSME). This was announced by HRH Duke of Edinburgh when he visited Chatham to lay the foundation stone for a new barracks for the RSME at Chattenden, to house Fieldworks, Signal and Tactics Schools and to provide accommodation for Plant, Roads and Airfields School.In 1993 Battlefield Engineer Wing moved from Chatham to Minley, and became RSME (Minley). In 1997 they became Combat Engineer School. In April 1998 the Defence Ordnance Disposal School came under the command of the RSME. The Corps Museum in Chatham is the ideal place to delve into the rich history of the Engineers.Curriculum HistoryImage:Jebb-map2-e002342777-print 1816 Survey.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Survey of the Canal by Captain Jebb.Image:Pentonvilleiso19.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Prison designed by Captain Jebb.Image:Victoria Barracks looking East.JPG|thumb|right|200px|Victoria Barracks, Sydney, designed by Lieutenant Colonel Barney. Under Pasleys Directorship the Establishment gained a reputation for experimentation, innovation and achievement. The Establishment  provided the foundation upon which the high reputation of the Corps of Engineers was built and prepared it for its participation in the widest aspects of engineering throughout the 19th century and beyond. Some of the subjects taught and innovations included:Field fortification This was the original course of instruction and covered: field defence, siege works, bridging, demolition. Railway work was introduced in 1830s.Survey First introduced in 1833, covered Technical Surveying and Military Topography. This led to officers and soldiers conducting surveys (e.g. India 1820-1947, Palestine1865-83, and Uganda railway 1890s) and boundary commissions throughout the world, (e.g. North American 1843 and 1858, Russo-Afghan 1884, Gambia 1890, Kenya 1892 and Chile-Argentine 1902). Both tasks are still practiced to this day.Electricity First introduced in 1830s, covered battery construction, telegraphy, firing of mines, and electric light (search-lights) - From this department grew; the Army Signals Service, which became the Corps of Signals (1920) and the Electrical and Mechanical Engineers (1942). The Professional Engineer Wing of the School still qualifies Clerks of Works, Technicians, Incorporated Engineers and Chartered Engineers in Engineering and trains electricians for deployment with the Corps.Photography and Chemistry First introduced in the early 1850s just before the Crimean war (1854-56) because its potential as a method of photo-reconnaissance was seen. Captain (later Sir) de Wiveleslie Abney RE, whilst acting as department head in 1870s, invented the photolithographic process called `Papyrotype. The interest in chemistry continued through to the First World War and gave rise to the development, by the Corps, of weapons in response to the German use of poison gas in 1915.Lithography First introduced into the curriculum in 1850s. It was invented in 1798 as a method of printing using stones.Diving and Submarine mining This subject was of a personal interest to Pasley, who introduced it in 1838. To trained divers in coast defence, underwater demolition, guided torpedoes (Brennan torpedo) and port wreck clearance.Estimating and Building Construction First introduced in 1830s and included: building materials, sewerage, drainage, ventilation, gas and water supply, building design and architecture. Architecture was introduced in 1825 and by the 1840s onwards, this department was training world-class building designers and architects; men such as Lieutenant Colonel Barney (designer of Victoria Barracks, Sydney, Australia), Captain Jebb (prison designer whose works included; Prison, Hospital, a secure hospital, and Prison in the centre of Dublin), Captain Fowke (architect of the Albert Hall), and Major General Young Darracott Scott (builder of Albert Hall). The Professional Engineer Wing of the School still qualifies Clerks of Works, Technicians, Incorporated Engineers and Chartered Engineers in Engineering.Ballooning First introduced in 1860s as a means of aerial reconnaissance. After the Anglo-Boer war (1899-1902) developments shifted from air balloons to fixed-wing aircraft, which eventually led to the formation of the Flying Corps in 1912 and the Air Force.Mechanics Brought about with the adaptation of the Steam Engine for military purposes in the 1870s; this gave rise to the interest in railways, which led to the formation of the Royal Engineers Transport Section responsible for railways, waterways and ports, and from this the Corps of Transport was formed in 1965.The Professional Engineer Wing of the School still qualifies Clerks of Works, Technicians, Incorporated Engineers and Chartered Engineers in Engineering and trains Mechanical Fitters for the wider Corps.The Fowke MedalSee also: Royal Engineers Museum - Francis Fowke.Image:London-Victoria and Albert Museum-Building-01.jpg|thumb|left|200px|North Side of and Albert Museum designed by Captain Fowke, Engineers.Image:Royal Albert Hall, London.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The Albert Hall designed by Captain Fowke, Engineers.Fowke (7 July 1823  4 December 1865) was a British Engineer, Architect and a Captain in the Engineers, who was educated at the School of Military Engineering.  Most of his architectural work was executed in the Renaissance style, although he made use of relatively new technologies to create iron framed buildings, with large open galleries and spaces.Among his projects were the Consorts Library in Aldershot, the Albert Hall and parts of the and Albert Museum in London, the Museum in Edinburgh, and the Gallery of Ireland in Dublin. He was also responsible for planning the 1862 International Exhibition in London. Working on the International Exhibition building, described as a wretched shed by Art Journal; Crystal Palace at the Exhibition of 1851, being a hard act to follow. Parliament declined the Governments proposal to purchase the building; the materials were sold and used for the construction of Palace. Before his sudden death from a burst blood vessel, he won the competition for the design of the History Museum, although he did not live to see it executed. His renaissance designs for the museum were altered and realised in the 1870s by Waterhouse, on the site of Fowkes Exhibition building.The presentation of the Fowke Medal was instigated by the Institution of Royal Engineers in 1865, as a memorial prize for young officers who demonstrated outstanding architectural ability at the School of Military Engineering. With the demise of great architectural works the prize has been transferred and today it is reproduced in bronze and is awarded to the top student in each of the Clerk of Works (Construction), (Electrical), (Mechanical) and Military Plant Foremans courses at the Royal School of Military Engineering (RSME).Brompton BarracksSee also: Brompton Barracks Cultural Heritage Appraisal.Records show that there has been a military base on the high ground above Chatham since at least 1708, built to defend Dockyard.Brompton Barracks forms the centrepiece of the Brompton Lines Conservation Area, an area designated in 1982 acknowledging the importance of the Dockyard as having the best-preserved dockyard defences in the country, and a set of historic assets of international significance. Brompton Barracks now forms part of the headquarters of the Royal School of Military Engineering (RSME) and are one of the highest quality Georgian barracks in the country. The Georgian core of the barracks has been enhanced by a collection of 19th and early 20th century buildings and monuments associated with the school and the carefully designed formal landscaping around these structures.World Heritage StatusSee also: Chatham World Heritage and Existing UK World Heritage Sites.Chathams UNESCO Heritage Site application is funded by Medway Council, Heritage and the Historic Dockyard Trust. Communities and Local Government (CLG) have also made important contributions to project work. Brompton Barracks proliferation of Listed Buildings, museum and historical links to the area and the nation are key elements in the attempt by Chatham to achieve World Heritage status. The RSME is represented on Steering Group of the bid.Scheduled monumentThe Brompton Lines were built in 1755-1757, during the Seven Years War, to protect Dockyard from the landward side. The initial construction was in earth.  The Lines were improved in the 1780s, during the  American War of Independence, when a further French threat was recognised. This work included the defensive ditches with brick retaining walls that still survive today. In 1803 a new magazine and protective Ravelin were built in the north-east corner of the 1780s fortifications. The site of the magazine and Ravelin are outside the boundary of the Scheduled Monument, although their surviving below ground elements have the same historic significance as the other parts of the Lines.  The defences were extended to the north-east from 1803-1809, with the construction of the Lower Lines.  This work ran concurrently with the construction of the original buildings of Brompton Barracks. Advances in military engineering rendered them redundant by the mid 19th century although they continued in use as a training area until the late 19th century and were sporadically occupied during the First and Second World Wars.Listed buildingsIn addition to the Institute building, built in 1872, Brompton Barracks North, South and West Blocks, flanking the Parade Square are also Grade II* Listed. Following the resumption of war in 1803, the Board decided to build new Artillery Barracks, similar to those at Woolwich. Building work was completed in 1806. It was first occupied by Foot Artillery, but the Royal Military Artificers also had a company at Brompton in 1806, and in 1812 it became the Royal Engineers Establishment. Also included in the building works were stables for 200 horses and sheds for 30 gun carriages.The Listed buildings in Brompton Barracks are arranged in a formal, mostly symmetrical arrangement that centres on an axis that runs east-south-east to west-north-west through the centre of BR029, through the middle of four Grade II* Listed war memorials and through the middle of the parade ground. The South Africa Arch a memorial to the Corps dead and wounded of the War was unveiled on the 26th July 1905 by King  Edward VII. The memorial was constructed by Ingress Bell, starting in 1902, and its construction was subsidised by all ranks of the Corps. The memorial is Grade II* listed. The Crimean War Memorial Arch dates to 1858, the Gordon Memorial to 1890 and the Great War Obelisk.The HQ 1 RSME Regiment, a former school house, is Grade II* listed.References External links *HQ RSME website*General RSME website*Holdfast Training Services*Royal Engineers Museum*Extreme close-up hi-res aerial photos of RSME Chattenden and Lodge Hill Camp, Chatham, Kent - September 2006
3131262
List_of_protest_marches_on_Washington,_D.C.
The following is a list of protest marches on Washington, D.C..Following a controversy over the Man March in 1995, the Park Service stopped releasing crowd size estimates for rallies on the Mall.(http://news.google.com/newspapers?idiV4zAAAAIBAJ&sjid2gcGAAAAIBAJ&pg3805,2933475)  Crowd estimates after that point have come from protest organizers, researchers or news outlets.  Owing to different methodologies, estimates can vary greatly.()Most marches and rallies in Washington are one-time events.  Two exceptions are the for Life and Rolling Thunder, both held annually.  The March for Life is a pro-life protest held on January 22 marking the anniversary of the v. Wade Supreme Court case legalizing abortion.  The march has been held annually since 1974.  Rolling Thunder is a motorcycle demonstration held since 1987 on Day to raise awareness of issues related to American POW/MIA. Pre-1900 * 1894 - April 30, Army.  Protest march by unemployed American workers. 19001949 * 1913 - March 3, Woman Suffrage March. 5,000 march to support womens voting rights the day President-elect Wilson arrived for his swearing in the next day.* 1914 - AprilMay, Coxeys Army Second March.* 1926 - August 8, Klux Klan march. 35,000 Klux Klan members march to show support for the KKK.* 1932 - January, Army. A march of 25,000 unemployed Pennsylvanians to encourage Congress to start a public works program.* 1932 - June 17, Army. March by 20,000 War I veterans and their families seeking advance payment of bonuses from the Hoover administration; several killed.* 1943 - October 6, march. Protest for American and allied action to stop the destruction of European Jewry. 19501999 :See also: for Life (annual; on or near January 22; since 1974) and Rolling Thunder (annual motorcycle demonstration on Memorial Day, since 1987)* 1968 - May 12  June 19, Peoples Campaign. SCLC campaign to push for a Federal $30 billion anti-poverty package. Several thousand demonstrators built and camped in Resurrection City, while they lobbied Congress for the program.* 1969 - October 15, to End the War in Vietnam. Moratorium. 200,000 demonstrate against the Vietnam War.* 1969 - November 15, Mobilization Committee to End the War in Vietnam. Vietnam Moratorium, 600,000 demonstrate against the war in Vietnam.* 1970 - April 4, Victory March, A rally, organized by the Reverend McIntire, the fundamentalist preacher and anticommunist radio commentator, calling for victory in the Vietnam War. Drew 50,000 supporters.* 1970 - May 9, State/Cambodia Incursion Protest.  A week after the State shootings, 100,000 demonstrators converged on Washington to protest the shootings and President Nixons incursion into Cambodia.* 1970 - July 4, America Day, A rally put together by supporters of President Nixon.* 1970 - August 26, Strike for Equality. Held nation-wide, it brought out thousands in D.C. and millions elsewhere to demand equal rights for women.  The march helped expand the womens movement.* 1971 - April 1923. Operation Dewey Canyon III. Sponsored by the Veterans Against the War and named after Dewey Canyon, this anti-Vietnam War march included over 2,000 veterans camping on the Mall and protests all over the city. Kerry testifies in front of Senate.* 1971 - April 24. War Out Now rally. 500,000 call for end to Vietnam War.* 1971 - May 3, May Day Protests.  Mass action by Vietnam anti-war militants to shut down the federal government.* 1972 - May 21, Emergency March on Washington  organized by the National Peace Action Coalition and the Peoples Coalition for Peace and Justice to protest the U.S.s increased bombing of North Vietnam and the mining of N.V. harbors. Demonstration draws between 8,000 to 15,000 protesters.* 1972 - May 27, March to protest apartheid in Africa.  8,000-10,000 attendees.( )* 1973 - January 20, Anti-war protest demonstration. Includes the Yippies-Zippie RAT float & SDS, March Against Racism & the War contingent.* 1974 - January 22, for Life.  Pro-life demonstration held (annually) on the anniversary of v. Wade. (Typically draws 100,000-300,000 per year.)* 1974 - April 27, Impeachment of President Richard M. Nixon. Ten thousand participants.* 1976 - May, Organization for Women leads a march of 16,000 for the Rights Amendment* 1977 - August 26, March for the Equal Rights Amendment. Drew thousands of feminists, including original suffragettes.* 1978 - July 9, March for the Equal Rights Amendment.  Drew 100,000 feminist women and men.()* 1978 - July 11, Walk. Thousands of Native Americans finish their 3200 miles long walk from Francisco, rallying at the National Mall for religious freedom for traditional American Indians and against eleven drafts discussed at the Congress, and considered anti-Indian by native community.* 1979 - February 5, Tractorcade. 6000 family farmers drove their tractors to Washington D.C. to protest American farm policy.* October 14, 1979 - March on Washington for Lesbian and Gay Rights.  First such march on Washington drew 75,000 gay men and lesbians to demand equal civil rights.* 1979, November 9 - Hostage Crisis. A sign said Deport all Iranians and Get the hell out of my country.* 1981 - March 23, Registration Protest. About 30,000 rally against the renewal of Draft Registration, signed into law by President Jimmy Carter.(http://news.google.com/newspapers?idvvgRAAAAIBAJ&sjidRO4DAAAAIBAJ&pg3452%2C3474576)* 1981 - September 19, Day march. AFL-CIO organized march to protest Administration labor and domestic policies; 260,000 march.* 1982 - November 27, Washington Anti-Klan Protest.* 1983 - August, March on Washington commemorating the 20th anniversary of the MLK I Have a Dream speech.* 1986 - March 1  November 15, Great Peace March for Global Nuclear Disarmament. From Los Angeles, California to Washington D.C. (a.k.a. The Great Peace March) to raise awareness of the growing danger of nuclear proliferation and to advocate for complete, verifiable elimination of nuclear weapons from the earth.* 1987 - May 25, Rolling Thunder is an annual motorcycle demonstration to bring awareness to issues related to American POW/MIA.  It has evolved to be a more generic demonstration in support of soldiers and veterans.(http://www.rollingthundermotorcyclerally.com)* 1987 - October 11, National March on Washington for Lesbian and Gay Rights. The second such march on Washington drew 500,000 gay men and women to protest for equal civil rights and to demand government action in the fight against AIDS.* 1989 - April, March for Womens Lives, sponsored by the National Organization for Women. Attendance estimated at 500,000.* 1991 - January 19 and  26, Marches against the Gulf War. The National Campaign for Peace in the Middle East estimated 250,000 attended the march on the 26th, but the National Park Service estimated attendance at 75,000. The march on January 19 was estimated at 25,000.* 1992 - April 5, March for Womens Lives. Pro-choice march organized by the Organization for Women. The name would be reused for a similar 2004 event.* 1992 - May 16, our Cities! Save our Children!. Estimates put the crowd at 150,000.* 1993 - April 25, on Washington for Lesbian, Gay and Bi Equal Rights and Liberation. Organizers estimated 1,000,000 attended, but the National Park Service estimated attendance at 300,000.* 1995 - October 16, Man March. United States Park Police officially estimated the crowd size at 400,000.* 1996 - October 12, Immigrant Rights March. First national march in D.C. for equal rights for immigrants.* 1997 - October 4, Keepers. Event titled Stand in the Gap: A Sacred Assembly of Men, an open-air gathering at the National Mall. 20002009 :See also: for Life (annual; on or near January 22) and Rolling Thunder (annual motorcycle demonstration on Memorial Day)* 2000- April 16, Protests of the IMF/World Bank meeting.  Supporting march for the A16 street blockades of an IMF/World Bank meeting.* 2000 - April 30, March on Washington. Controversial LBGT political rally.* 2000 - May 14, Mom March.  March against violence.* 2000 - August 26, Rev. Al Sharpton organized the Redeem the Dream march in Washington DC commemorating the 37th anniversary of Rev. Martin Luther Kings I Have a Dream speech.* 2000 - September 2,  TheCall DC for Gods move in this nation.  400,000 gathered.(http://www.charismamag.com/index.php/news/29143-thecall-marks-10-years-with-prayer-event-to-shift-us)* 2000 - September 26, March Against Domestic Violence. Demonstration of several women in wedding dresses marching to raise domestic violence awareness.* 2001 -  January 20, Counter-Inaugural demonstrations against President W. Bush, organized by the Action Center at the Inauguration parade route, by Lou Posner of  Voter March at Circle and the Rev. Sharpton at the Supreme Court.(`Rent-a-Mobs Descend on D.C, Insight on the News, 2001)(Bush: Whos Protesting and Why, BBC News, January 20, 2001)(Inauguration Protests in Washington, DC, Jan 21, 2001, Largest Since Nixon, Voter March Archives, by Lou Posner)* 2001 - May 19, Voter Rights March, by Lou Posner of Voter March at the West Capitol steps.(Voters Rally for Electoral Reform, CNN Politics, May 19, 2001) Election reform advocates seeking a full investigation into the Presidential election.* 2001 - September 29, Convergence. Originally an organized protest to counter planned World Bank and IMF meetings, many protesters backed out after the World Bank and IMF canceled their meetings in the wake of the 11 attacks.  The protest was turned into the first of several against the invasion of Afghanistan, the first major action of the 11 anti-war movement.* 2002 - October 26, against the Iraq War. First of numerous, attended by over 100,000 people.* 2003 - January 18, Anti-war Demonstration.  Between 10s of thousands and 200,000 in attendance () on the National Mall.* 2004 - April 25, for Womens Lives.  A pro-choice march; between 500,000 and 1,100,000 attend.()* 2004 - October 17, Worker March.* 2005 - January 20, Counter-inaugural protests.  Demonstrations against W. Bushs second inauguration.* 2005 - September 24, Anti-War in Iraq protest.* 2005 - October 15, More Movement.  March to commemorate the 10th Anniversary of the Million Man March.* 2006 - March 6, ProjectMARCH.  March for colon cancer screening for all adults* 2007 - January 27, 27, 2007 anti-war protest. Sponsored by for Peace and Justice.* 2007 - March 17, 17, 2007 anti-war protest.  March against the War sponsored by Coalition.* 2007 - June 10, 10, 2007 anti-Israeli occupation protest.  Rally and march against the Israeli occupation of the Palestinian territories for peace and anti-violence.* 2007 - September 15, 15, 2007 anti-war protest.  March against the Iraq War sponsored by ANSWER Coalition.* 2007 - October 19  20, Rebellion.  Series of demonstrations protesting the policies of the World Bank and International Monetary Fund.* 2008 - March 19, 19, 2008 anti-war protest.* 2008 - April 19, National Socialist Movement protest march. Against illegal immigration.* 2008 - June 1, Federation of Greater Washington.  Israel at sixty years celebration.()* 2008 - July 11, Hundreds of the Longest Walk 2 participants and supporters from the USA, Canada, Mexico, Japan, Poland, and many Native American nations finish their 8000 miles walk from Island in Francisco to Washington, D.C. Walkers, gathered to protect sacred sites, defend human rights, and clean Mother Earth by the Indian Movement co-founder Banks and other native leaders, present their Manifesto for a Change to Rep. Conyers at the Capitol Hill. Two days of pow-wow and concerts at the Mall follow.* 2008 - July 12, Revolution March. Rally and march protesting numerous violations of the Constitution due to the Iraq Invasion, Reserve, Revenue Service, and policies of the Bush Administration.  Over 10,000 people marched,(http://www.huffingtonpost.com/jordan-page/revolution-march-blacked_b_116429.html) participated in the rally, and enjoyed the musical guests.  Keynote speaker: Ron Paul, Guest Speakers: Wolf, Edward Griffin, Thomas E. Woods, Jr., Baldwin and more.(http://www.revolutionmarch.com/rallydetails.aspx)* 2008 - July 19, Over 9000 Anonymous March.  Protest at the Lincoln Memorial by Anonymous against the of Scientology.* 2008 - November 15, Anti-Proposition 8. Protest against the passage of California Proposition 8.* 2009 - January 10, Coalition protest against Israeli bombing of civilians of Gaza.* 2009 - March 19, the War 7. Sponsored by the DC chapter of Students for a Democratic Society.* 2009 - March 21, 21, 2009 anti-war protest. A march on the Pentagon and Crystal City, Virginia sponsored by ANSWER.* 2009 - April 15, Party protests. Against high taxes and big government in Park draw approximately 1000.()* 2009 - April 25, IMF and World Bank protest march.* 2009 - June 18  21, Protest against the disputed Iranian elections.* 2009 - July 4, Tea Party protest. Opposing fiscal policies of Obama administration and Congress.* 2009 September 12, March on Washington. Largest Tea Party rally on Washington protesting excess taxation and promoting fiscal responsibility.* 2009 - October 11, Equality March. Approximately 200,000 people() demonstrated in support of equal protection for lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender people. 2010present :See also: for Life (annual; on or near January 22) and Rolling Thunder (annual motorcycle demonstration on Memorial Day)* 2010 - March 20, 20, 2010 anti-war protest. March on the White House against wars in Afghanistan and Iraq.* 2010 - March 21, for America. 200,000 people() call for comprehensive immigration reform.* 2010 - August 28, Honor Rally, cosponsored by Operations Warrior Foundation and promoted as a celebration of Americas heroes and heritage. The number of attendees is disputed.  Event organizer Beck also held an event at the Kennedy Center called Divine Destiny focused more on faith and religion on 8/27.* 2010 - September 27, Rising, a march of 4,000 residents from across Appalachia, to the EPA and the White House, demanding an end to destructive Removal mining practices. About 113 people were arrested in front of the White House as part of a direct action protest, including Hansen, known as the father of the global warming movement. A series of workshops and seminars were held by the events organizers at Georgetown University the weekend directly prior to the march, discussing topics such as Jobs, Appalachian History, and political organizing.* 2010 - October 2, One Nation Working Together March for Jobs, Peace and Justice. Rally at the Lincoln Memorial to press for immigration reform, financial reform.*2010 - October 30, to Restore Sanity and/or Fear - Held by talk show hosts Stewart and Colbert to oppose radical political trends in American politics. A crowd estimate commissioned by News by AirPhotosLive.com estimated 215,000 people attended, with a of error of plus or minus 10 percent. According to Stelter of the York Times, the Park Service privately told Viacom there were well over 200,000 people present.(Jon Stewart Rally Attracts Estimated 215,000. CBS News, October 30, 2010)*2010 - December 16, Veterans for Peace rally in Lafayette Park and on the White House sidewalk. 131 people arrested for blocking the view of the White House per 36 CFR 7.96 (g)(5)(viii), the ten yards rule, upheld in 1984-5271 in the White House Vigil for the ERA v. Clark, as a time-place-manner exception to the First Amendment, to achieve a fundamental purpose of 16 USC article 1. See also * of incidents of political violence in Washington, D.C. References  Further reading * Barber, Lucy G. Marching on Washington: The Forging of an American Political Tradition. Berkeley and Los Angeles: University of California Press, 2002. ISBN 0-520-22713-1des manifestations  Washington D.C.   
3137531
Dmitry_Ivanovich_Vinogradov
Dmitry Ivanovich Vinogradov () (c.1720&ndash;) was a Russian chemist, the inventor of Russian hard-paste porcelain and the founder of the Porcelain Factory.Vinogradov was born into a low-income household in Suzdal and was trained at the Greek Latin Academy where he came to know Lomonosov. In 1736, Lomonosov and Vinogradov went abroad to study chemistry, metallurgy, and mining under Christian Wolff. Upon his return to Russia in 1744, he was sent to a ceramics manufactory that was established that year under the direction of Christoph Conrad Hunger, who had been induced by Empress Elizabeth to come to Petersburg from Stockholm.  At that time porcelain was produced only in China and Japan and in Meissen, Saxony, where a deposit of suitable kaolin had been discovered and first successfully employed in 1709 (see porcelain). Other European factories were beginning to emulate Meissen wares, but in porcelain. The recipe for porcelain was a closely guarded secret at Meissen and the price of Meissen porcelain might exceed the price of silver of equal weight. Hunger proved to be unable to produce porcelain from the materials at hand and was dismissed in 1748, leaving the venture in the hands of Vinogradov. Eight years Vinogradov and Lomonosov spent developing an original Russian recipe for porcelain. In 1752, Vinogradov published a treatise advertising his success in producing the first satisfactory samples of porcelain, made of Russian materials, employing clay from Gzhel) mixed with finely-ground Olonets quartz and alabaster. Vinogradov trained the first Russian master craftsmen of porcelain at the factory. The first products were small wares, cups, snuffboxes and their lids, cane heads, doorknobs, knife handles and the like. The production of large items, like plates, was going to be essential if the manufactory was to produce more than small luxuries;  In December 1756  Vinogradov completed the construction of a large furnace and made a successful first firing. As a mark of its impending success the venture was renamed the Imperial Porcelain Factory. The Imperial factorys greatest period of success was to come under the direction of Prince Vyazemsky, after Vinogradovs death. The factory exists today as the Porcelain Factory.References*The State Hermitage Museum: Museum of the Lomonosov porcelain factory  
3142118
Brampton_Bierlow
Brampton Bierlow, often known simply as Brampton, is a former mining village and parish situated in the Borough of Rotherham, Yorkshire, England, on the south side of the Valley, between Barnsley and Rotherham. According to the 2001 census, the parish had a population of 3,658. Brampton was within the historic county boundaries of the Riding of Yorkshire.  Employment in the village was primarily related to the coal industry; the economy and residents suffered after the sudden closure of mines in the 1980s, which was, in part, sparked by the announcement of the closure of Cortonwood Colliery in the village.  The hardship caused by this has left a significant amount of bad feeling in the locality, which, although waning over time, has still not gone away.  Despite some recovery, Brampton was, at one point, declared one of the poorest areas in the Union  (prior to the 2004 expansion). Recently, the economy of the area has improved, as much investment has been put into infrastructure and developing light industry and service industries in the area.Notable people*Guitarist of the band Marillion, Rothery was born in Brampton.*Footballers Robledo and Robledo (both played for United) grew up in the village: they were born in Chile but moved to Brampton (their mothers home) as children due to war. George even represented Chile at the FIFA World Cup.External links*http://www.bramptonbierlow.co.uk/BierlowBierlow
3144369
Cross_Industry_Standard_Process_for_Data_Mining
CRISP-DM stands for Cross Industry Standard Process for Data Mining(Shearer C. The CRISP-DM model: the new blueprint for data mining. J Data Warehousing 2000;5:1322.). It is a mining process model that describes commonly used approaches that expert data miners use to tackle problems.  Polls conducted in 2002, 2004, and 2007 show that it is the leading methodology used by data miners.(Gregory Piatetsky-Shapiro (2002) KDnuggets Methodology Poll)  (Gregory Piatetsky-Shapiro (2004) KDnuggets Methodology Poll)  (Gregory Piatetsky-Shapiro (2007) KDnuggets Methodology Poll)Major phasesCRISP-DM breaks the process of mining into six major phases():  *Business Understanding*Data Understanding*Data Preparation*Modeling*Evaluation*DeploymentHistoryCRISP-DM was conceived in 1996.  In 1997 it got underway as a European Union project under the ESPRIT funding initiative.  The project was led by four companies: SPSS, Corporation, Daimler-Benz and OHRA.  This core consortium brought different experiences to the project: ISL, later acquired and merged into Inc. The computer giant Corporation produced the Teradata data warehouse and its own data mining software. Daimler-Benz had a significant data mining team. OHRA, an insurance company, was just starting to explore the potential use of data mining.The first version of the methodology was released as CRISP-DM 1.0 in 1999.CRISP-DM 2.0In July 2006 the consortium announced that it was going to start the process of working towards a second version of CRISP-DM. On 26 September 2006, the CRISP-DM SIG met to discuss potential enhancements for CRISP-DM 2.0 and the subsequent roadmap.  However, these efforts appear to be stalled.  The SIG has not met, updated the CRISP website, or communicated anything to members since early 2007. As of June 22, 2011, the website redirects to an IBM page about SPSS.Advantages*Industry neutral*Tool neutral*Closely related to the Discovery in Databases Process Model*Anchors the data mining processReferences(External links* CRoss Industry Standard Process for Data Mining Blog* Le site des dataminers Article publi par Pascal BIZZARI, Mai 2009* The Data Mining Group (DMG): The DMG is an independent, vendor led group which develops data mining standards, such as the Predictive Model Markup Language (PMML)de:CRISP-DMIndustry Standard Process for Data MiningIndustry Standard Process for Data Mining
3150710
Mashava
Mashava (formerly known as Mashaba) is a mining village in Province, Zimbabwe and is located 40 km from Masvingo. Asbestos was and still is being mined in this small Zimbabwean town. There are three mines in the town namely Gaths Mine, King Mine and Temeraire Mine.Gaths Mine: The mining operations have stopped at this mine, though some of the major buildings are located here such as the General Office - Administration, the hospital, the training centre and the high(Chemberi) and low(Gaths) density residential areas for the workers.Temeraire Mine: This place  has also stopped operations and was until recently a services area with some of the departments still operating from there such as transportincluding the garage, laboritories, the mechanical machine shop,the electrical and civil departments. High (Mupatagore) and low(Temeraire, Eastvale and Westonlee)density residential areas still exist for the workers.King Mine: This is only place left with mining operations, 1 Shaft and 2 Shaft, the Mill, and the Stores Department are located here. There are also high (Mambo) and low (King) density residential areas are also found here.The mines were up until the 90s part of Shabani and Mashaba Mines owned by Turner and Newell, who then sold both mines to Mutumwa Mawere for 60 000 000 in a deal sponsored by the World Bank. Both are now under government control after Mawere left the country. The two mines mine asbestos, with Gaths Mine producing the longer fibre.There are other mines in the area which have now all ceased operations such as D.S.O. Mine, Boss Mine, and Reedbuck formerly Lennox(Rex) Mine.Bere Township is also in existence and Balmain which is the main shopping centre for the town with 1 petrol station, the police station, the post office and a supermarket.Most of the local population belongs to the Karanga Shona ethnic group. According to the 1992 Population Census, the mining  had a population of 15,507.The name Mashava came from the local Karanga term - Makomo Mashava meaning the red mountains. However, the most popular and widely used derivation today is mavhu mashava, which means red soil - most people who live in surrounding villages and districts still call it by this long phrase even today.Latest rumour has it that the grandchildren of Turner and Newell intend to acquire the mines and resume full production. Chimuroyi sources believe negotiations are currently underway right now.The situation today is that Shabanie and Mashaba Mines have stopped operating, though the government appointed administarator is still at work. Chakachaya, kaput.de:Mashavaro:Mashava
3156897
Bruay-la-Buissire
Bruay-la-Buissire is a commune and seat of a canton in the Pas-de-Calais department in the Nord-Pas-de-Calais region of France.Geographyleft|300px|thumb|Slag heapnone|300px|thumb|Miners housesAn ex-coalmining town some  southwest of Bthune and  southwest of Lille, at the junction of the D57 and the N47 roads.HistoryThe two places of Bruay-en-Artois and La Buissiere were joined as one commune in 1987.With 4 mines, it was the headquarters of the mining company. The mines closed during the 1960s, to be replaced by light industrial work and chemical factories.Image:Fosse n 3 de Bruay.jpg||thumb|left|A head of the Compagnie des mines de BruayPopulationPlaces of interest* The Hotel de Ville (Town Hall), 47m tall and built in 1927. The windows recount scenes from the lives of miners.* The Deco swimming pool, built in 1936 (the last remaining Art Deco pool open to the public)* The Museum of mining.* The Church of Saint Martin, dating from the fifteenth century, was expanded and renovated in 1974.* Ballencourt manor in La Buissire, was built in 1777. Partially renovated, it now hosts the music school.* The donjon of the castle of La Buissire, built in 1310 by Countess of Artois.* The church at La Buissire, presently closed to the public for renovation work.* The Velodrome at La Buissire built by the Bruay Mining Co., in 1925.* The Museum of calculation and Scripture. Traces the history of writing and calculating machines such as the Enigma German coding machine.See also*of the Pas-de-Calais departmentReferences* INSEE commune fileExternal links* The CWGC graves in the Bruay-la-Buissire communal cemetery* Official website of the commune * A website about the commune * The website of the intercommunality * Website of the Communaut du Bruaysis * Bruay-la-Buissire on the Quid website br:Bruay-la-Buissireca:Bruay-la-Buissireceb:Bruay-la-Buissirede:Bruay-la-Buissirees:Bruay-la-Buissireeo:Bruay-la-Buissireeu:Bruay-la-Buissirefr:Bruay-la-Buissireit:Bruay-la-Buissiresw:Bruay-la-Buissiremg:Bruay-la-Buissirenl:Bruay-la-Buissireno:Bruay-la-Buissireoc:Bruay-la-Buissirepms:Bruay-la-Buissirepl:Bruay-la-Buissirept:Bruay-la-Buissirero:Bruay-la-Buissiresimple:Bruay-la-Buissiresl:Bruay-la-Buissire sv:Bruay-la-Buissireuk:--vi:Bruay-la-Buissirevo:Bruay-la-Buissirewar:Bruay-la-Buissire
3162012
S._O._Davies
Stephen Owen Davies (c. 9 November 1886(Davies was suspected of being considerably older than he claimed. There is no birth for a Stephen Owen Davies registered in the last quarter of 1886; however there is one in the last quarter of 1879.) &ndash; 25 February 1972) was a Welsh politician, and a member of the House of Commons from 1934 to his death.Born in Abercwmboi, he began work as a miner at the age of 12, combining mining work with study for a degree.  Davies was educated at the of Wales and the of London.  He was active as a trade unionist, and became vice-president of the Federation of Great Britain in 1933. He was a councillor on Tydfil Borough Council and mayor in 1945-46.In 1934 he was elected as a Labour Party of Parliament (MP) for the Merthyr, which was renamed Merthyr Tydfil in 1950.Davies was often out of step with the party line.  Following the disaster, he was a vocal critic of the way in which the government compensated the families of those killed.In the run-up the 1970 general election his Labour Party felt that as he was now in his 80s he ought to stand down, and de-selected him in favour of a younger man. He fought the election as an independent Labour candidate, and won. In Parliament he maintained discreet links with the Labour Party and was sent a copy of the Labour whip, though he was nominally an independent. However he died in 1972 and the Labour Party won the subsequent by-election, although there was a significant swing to Cymru.See also* of UK minor party and independent MPs electedReferencesBibliography*(2003 reprint), Dale, The Times House of Commons 1929, 1931, 1935, Politicos. ISBN 1-84275-033-XExternal links*Article on Davies*BBC article, comparing his position with that of Law in 2005.*BBC TV interview; S.O. Davies speaking in Welsh at the scene of the Aberfan disaster in 1966. O. Davies
3169490
Castrop-Rauxel
Castrop-Rauxel () is a former mining city in the eastern part of the Area.GeographyCastrop-Rauxel is between Dortmund to the east, Bochum (south), Herne (west), and to the north, Recklinghausen, Datteln and Waltrop. Urban Area The urban area of Castrop-Rauxel has an total expanse of . The Schwerin is marked as the highest point of the city with 147 m over NN, the lowest point is the Pppinghauser street beside house number 264 with 50.2 m over NN. The city is divided into 15 districts, listed in order from north to south: Becklem, Henrichenburg, Ickern, Habinghorst, Pppinghausen, Deininghausen, Rauxel, Bladenhorst, Behringhausen, Castrop, Dingen, Schwerin, Obercastrop, Frohlinde and Merklinde.The total area of the city divided into different uses (31.12.2010):Population figures for the individual districts (Stand: 2005):HistoryFirst mentioned in 834 as Villa Castorpe, the city of Castrop was founded in 1902 by merging the municipalities Castrop, Obercastrop and Behringhausen. On April 1, 1926 Castrop-Rauxel was formed when Castrop merged with 10 other municipalities.  During World War II, a plant at Castrop-Rauxel used the process to produce synthetic () oil products.In 1975, the village of Henrichenburg was annexed and Castrop-Rauxel became part of the (district).  In 1984 the last of 7 coal mines at Castrop-Rauxel (Erin) closed.TransportationCastrop-Rauxel has access to three major highways, the Emscherschnellweg A 42,the Sauerlandlinie A 45 and the A 2.There are 3 railway stations within the city. The central station (Castrop-Rauxel Hauptbahnhof) on the Cologne-Minden Railway is located in the suburb of Rauxel.  Connecting Castrop-Rauxel to the western Ruhr cities like Duisburg, Oberhausen, Essen, Gelsenkirchen, Herne and in the east to Dortmund and Hamm. The unmanned stations of Castrop-Rauxel South (Castrop-Rauxel Sued) and Castrop-Rauxel Merklinde on the Emschertalbahn are offering hourly services with trains to Dortmund, Herne and Dorsten. Located in the city centre is the central bus station Muensterplatz. From here passengers can travel to almost all suburbs and to neighboring  cities like Herne, Dortmund and Bochum. The Canal runs right through Castrop-Rauxel; Castrop-Rauxel also has a small Yacht club on this body of water.International relationsCastrop-Rauxel is twinned with:()*  Wakefield, Kingdom(*  Vincennes, France(*  Kuopio, Finland(*  Delft, Netherlands(*  Zehdenik, Germany(EconomyCastrop-Rauxel has been attempting to change from a former mining city to a city with a modern lifestyle, high recreational value, new economy companies, a 27 hole golf course, and various cultural events.CultureThe WLT (Westphalian State Theater) is the oldest and most relevant source of theatrical entertainment in Castrop-Rauxel. There is one cinema with two screens in Castrop.Castrops history is closely connected to racing, the Reiterbrunnen in the very center of Castrops market square is a reminder of the race days on the Naturhindernisbahn, now part of the Goldschmieding Park.References;Notesda:Castrop-Rauxelde:Castrop-Rauxelet:Castrop-Rauxeles:Castrop-Rauxeleo:Castrop-Rauxelfa:-fr:Castrop-Rauxelit:Castrop-Rauxelsw:Castrop-Rauxelnl:Castrop-Rauxelno:Castrop-Rauxelnn:Castrop-Rauxelnds:Castrop-Rauxelpl:Castrop-Rauxelpt:Castrop-Rauxelro:Castrop-Rauxelru:-simple:Castrop-Rauxelsr:-fi:Castrop-Rauxelvo:Castrop-Rauxelwar:Castrop-Rauxel
3174112
Boris_Pregel
Boris Pregel (1893 - 1976) was a dealer in uranium and radium.  He was born in the Ukraine but moved to Paris after the Revolution. In 1937 he married Alexandra Avksentiev, daughter of Avksentiev. The couple moved to York in 1940, due to the Nazi invasion of France.From the 1920s to the World War Pregel and Sengier, a Belgian mining engineer, controlled the worlds supply of radium which mainly came from the Congo and Canada. Sengier was effectively in charge of the mining company, Union Minire, in the Congo.  Boris Pregel was president of the Canadian Radium & Uranium Corp. of New York.During World War II, Pregel was the agent for the Canadian Eldorado Mining & Refining Co. which supplied the Project with nearly all the uranium mined in the North America. He also sold 500 pounds of uranium oxide to the Soviet Union during the war although the U.S. Government had authorized the sale.(Magazine March 13, 1950)In March 1945 the Canadian Foreign Exchange Control Board began formal hearings into Pregels financial dealings. The case was settled out of court but Pregel and the other defendants paid over $1million in cash and other assets to settle. Furthermore Pregel agreed to terminate his agency agreement between Eldorado and the Canadian Radium & Radium Corp.( Eldorado, Canadas national uranium company, Robert Bothwell, University of Toronto Press, 1984, ISBN 0802034144)Pregel founded the Pregel Awards for science, awarded by the York Academy of Sciences.ReferencesExternal links*Photo*Dialogue for a play
3177315
GiveALink.org
GiveALink is a non-commercial bookmarking website. It is an academic research project, started at Indiana University Bloomington, with the goal of analyzing the structure and content of bookmark files in order to build a new generation of Web mining techniques and new ways to search, recommend, surf, personalize and visualize the Web.GiveALink features a engine which, given a URL, finds other Web pages that people bookmark together with it (i.e. similar Web pages). The search engine also supports keyword search and the results can be personalized based on the users submitted bookmark files. In addition, users can view, organize, augment their bookmarks online, as well as download their bookmark files to several computers.All of the (anonymized) data at GiveALink is available online to other researchers and Internet users. You can download the URL collection, matrix containing similarity values for pairs of URLs, and the output from several ranking algorithms. Search results can be obtained in XML format through an RSS feed, to help you integrate them into your own applications. GiveALink uses the existing hierarchical structure in bookmark files (folders and subfolders), as well as filtering techniques, to measure similarity between Web pages. This means that if many people put two URLs in the same folder in their bookmarks, then these two URLs are considered similar.External links*givealink.org*GiveALink:Mining a Semantic Network of Bookmarks for Search and Recommendations (Proc. LinkKDD 05)*Implicit Tagging using Donated Bookmarks (Proc. WWW2006 Workshop on Collaborative Web Tagging)*Social Bookmarks for Collaborative Search and Recommendation (Preprint, Proc. AAAI 2006)See also*Connotea - Social bookmarking for scientists*StumbleUpon - A (commercial) social bookmarking tool that uses collaborative filteringru:GiveALink.org
3183582
Wire_rope
thumb|Steel wire rope (right hand lay)Wire rope is a type of rope which consists of several strands of metal wire laid (or twisted) into a helix.  Initially iron wires were used, but today steel is the main material used for wire ropes.Historically wire rope evolved from steel chains which had a record of mechanical failure. While flaws in chain links or solid steel bars can lead to catastrophic failure, flaws in the wires making up a steel cable are less critical as the other wires easily take up the load. Friction between the individual wires and strands, as a consequence of their twist, further compensates for any flaws. HistoryModern wire rope was invented by the German mining engineer Albert in the years between 1831 and 1834 for use in mining in the Harz Mountains in Clausthal, Saxony, Germany. It was quickly accepted because it proved superior to ropes made of hemp or to metal chains, such as had been used before. (Modern History of Wire Rope - Donald Sayenga)Wilhelm Alberts first ropes consisted of wires twisted about a hemp rope core, six such strands then being twisted around another hemp rope core in alternating directions for extra stability. Earlier forms of wire rope had been made by covering a bundle of wires with hemp.In 1840, Scotsman Stirling Newall improved the process further.(Iron: An illustrated weekly journal for iron and steel, Volume 63 By Sholto Percy)In America wire rope was later manufactured by A. Roebling, forming the basis for his success in bridge building. Roebling introduced a number of innovations in the design, materials and manufacture of wire rope.Wire Rope ConstructionWiresSteel wires for wire ropes are normally made of non-alloy carbon steel with a carbon content of 0.4 to 0.95%. The wires are patented 6(heat process) 70 and 2450 N/mm. The very high strength of the rope wires enables wire ropes to support large tensile forces and to run over sheaves with relative small diameters.StrandsIn the so-called cross lay strands, the wires of the different layers cross each other. In the mostly used parallel lay strands, the lay length of all the wire layers is equal and the wires of any two superimposed layers are parallel, resulting in linear contact. The wire of the outer layer is supported by two wires of the inner layer. These wires are neighbours along the whole length of the strand. Parallel lay strands are made in one operation. The endurance of wire ropes with this kind of strand is always much greater than of those (seldom used) with cross lay strands. Parallel lay strands with two wire layers have the construction Filler, Seale or Warrington. Spiral RopesIn principle, spiral ropes are round strands as they have an assembly of layers of wires laid helically over a centre with at least one layer of wires being laid in the opposite direction to that of the outer layer. Spiral ropes can be dimensioned in such a way that they are non-rotating which means that under tension the rope torque is nearly zero.The open spiral rope consists only of round wires. The half-locked coil rope and the full-locked coil rope always have a centre made of round wires.  The locked coil ropes have one or more outer layers of profile wires. They have the advantage that their construction prevents the penetration of dirt and water to a greater extent and it also protects them from loss of lubricant. In addition, they have one further very important advantage as the ends of a broken outer wire cannot leave the rope if it has the proper dimensions. Stranded Ropesthumb|Left-hand ordinary lay (LHOL) wire rope (close-up). Right-hand lay strands are laid into a left-hand lay rope. |300pxthumb|Right-hand Langs lay (RHLL) wire rope (close-up). Right-hand lay strands are laid into a right-hand lay rope. |300pxStranded ropes are an assembly of several strands laid helically in one or more layers around a core. Most types of stranded ropes only have one strand layer over the core (fibre core or steel core). The lay direction of the strands in the rope can be right (symbol Z) or left (symbol S) and the lay direction of the wires can be right (symbol z) or left (symbol s). This kind of rope is called ordinary lay rope if the lay direction of the wires in the outer strands is in the opposite direction to the lay of the outer strands themselves. If both the wires in the outer strands and the outer strands themselves have the same lay direction, the rope is called a lang lay rope (formerly Alberts lay or Langs lay). Multi-strand ropes are all more or less resistant to rotation and have at least two layers of strands laid helically around a centre. The direction of the outer strands is opposite to that of the underlying strand layers. Ropes with three strand layers can be nearly non-rotating. Ropes with two strand layers are mostly only low-rotating. More details in EN 12 385 or ISO 17 893.Classification of Ropes According to UsageDepending on where they are used, wire ropes have to fulfil different requirements. The main uses are: *	Running ropes (stranded ropes) are bent over sheaves and drums. They are therefore stressed mainly by bending and secondly by tension. *	Stationary ropes, stay ropes (spiral ropes, mostly full-locked) have to carry tensile forces and are therefore mainly loaded by static and fluctuating tensile stresses. *	Track ropes (full locked ropes) have to act as rails for the rollers of cabins or other loads in aerial ropeways and cable cranes. In contrast to running ropes, track ropes do not take on the curvature of the rollers. Under the roller force, a so called free bending radius of the rope occurs. This radius increases (and the bending stresses decrease) with the tensile force and decreases with the roller force. *	Wire rope slings (stranded ropes) are used to harness various kinds of goods. These slings are stressed by the tensile forces but first of all by bending stresses when bent over the more or less sharp edges of the goods.Rope Drive 6 There are technical regulations for the rope drives of cranes, elevators, rope ways and mining installations not exceeding a given tensile force and not falling short of a given diameter ratio D/d of sheave and rope diameters. A general dimensioning method of rope drives (and used besides the technical regulations) calculate the five limits *		Working cycles up to rope discarding or breakage (mean or 10% limit)*	 	Donandt force (yielding tensile force for a given bending diameter ratio D/d)*		Rope safety factor, minimum breaking force (ability to resist extreme forces)       *		Discarding number of wire breaks (detection to need rope replacement)*		Optimal rope diameter (economic reasons)For these particularly complicated calculations there is an EXCEL-program SEILLEB2:XLS that can be downloaded free of charge under the address	http//www.uni-stuttgart.de/ift/forschung/berechnung.htmlSafety	The wire ropes are stressed by fluctuating forces, by wear, by corrosion and in seldom cases by extreme forces. The rope life is finite and the safety is only given by inspection for the detection of wire breaks on a reference rope length, of cross-section loss as well as other failures so that the wire rope can be replaced before a dangerous situation occurs. Installations should be designed to facilitate the inspection of the wire ropes. 		Lifting installations for passenger transportation require that a combination of several methods should be used to prevent a car from plunging downwards. Elevators must have redundant bearing ropes and a safety gear. Ropeways and mine hoistings must be permanently supervised by a responsible manager and the rope has to be inspected by magnetic method with that inner wire breaks can be detected too.The lay of a wire rope describes the manner in which either the wires in a strand, or the strands in the rope, are laid in a helix.Terminationsthumb|500px|Right-hand ordinary lay (RHOL) wire rope terminated in a loop with a thimble and ferrule.The end of a wire rope tends to fray readily, and cannot be easily connected to plant and equipment.  There are different ways of securing the ends of wire ropes to prevent fraying. The most common and useful type of end fitting for a wire rope is to turn the end back to form a loop.  The loose end is then fixed back on the wire rope.  Termination efficiencies vary from about 70% for a Flemish eye alone; to nearly 90% for a Flemish eye and splice; to 100% for potted ends and swagings.ThimblesWhen the wire rope is terminated with a loop, there is a risk that it will bend too tightly, especially when the loop is connected to a device that spreads the load over a relatively small area. A thimble can be installed inside the loop to preserve the natural shape of the loop, and protect the cable from pinching and abrading on the inside of the loop.  The use of thimbles in loops is industry practice.  The thimble prevents the load from coming into direct contact with the wires.Wire rope clamps/clips A wire rope clamp, also called a clip, is used to fix the loose end of the loop back to the wire rope.  It usually consists of a u-shaped bolt, a forged saddle and two nuts.  The two layers of wire rope are placed in the u-bolt.   The saddle is then fitted over the ropes on to the bolt (the saddle includes two holes to fit to the u-bolt).  The nuts secure the arrangement in place.  Three or more clamps are usually used to terminate a wire rope.  As many as eight may be needed for a  diameter rope.There is an old adage which has over time became the rule; when installing clamps to secure the loop at the end of your wire rope make sure you do not saddle a dead horse. The saddle portion of the clamp assembly is placed and tightened on the opposite side of the terminal end of the cable (the load-bearing or live end). According to the US Navy Manual S9086-UU-STM-010, Chapter 613R3, Wire and Fiber Rope and Rigging, This is to protect the live or stress-bearing end of the rope against crushing and abuse. The flat bearing seat and extended prongs of the body (saddle) are designed to protect the rope and are always placed against the live end.(S9086-UU-STM-010/CH-613R3  NAVAL SHIPS TECHNICAL MANUAL, CHAPTER 613, WIRE AND FIBER ROPE AND RIGGING http://www.fas.org/man/dod-101/sys/ship/nstm/ch613.pdf)The US Navy and most regulatory bodies do not recommend the use of such clips as permanent terminations.Swaged terminationsSwaging is a method of wire rope termination that refers to the installation technique.  The purpose of swaging wire rope fittings is to connect two wire rope ends together, or to otherwise terminate one end of wire rope to something else.  A mechanical or hydraulic swager is used to compress and deform the fitting, creating a permanent connection.  There are many types of swaged fittings.  Threaded Studs, Ferrules, Sockets, and Sleeves a few examples.  Swaging ropes with fibre cores is not recommended.Wedge SocketsA wedge socket termination is useful when the fitting needs to be replaced frequently.  For example, if the end of a wire rope is in a high-wear region, the rope may be periodically trimmed, requiring the termination hardware to be removed and reapplied.  An example of this is on the ends of the drag ropes on a dragline.  The end loop of the wire rope enters a tapered opening in the socket, wrapped around a separate component called the wedge.  The arrangement is knocked in place, and load gradually eased onto the rope.  As the load increases on the wire rope, the wedge become more secure, gripping the rope tighter.Potted ends or Poured socketsPoured sockets are used to make a high strength, permanent termination; they are created by inserting the wire rope into the narrow end of a conical cavity which is oriented in-line with the intended direction of strain. The individual wires are splayed out inside the cone, and the cone is then filled with molten zinc, or now more commonly, an epoxy resin compound.(http://www.escocorp.com/markets/rigging/socketfast.html)Eye splice or Flemish eyethumb|The ends of individual strands of this eye splice used aboard a cargo ship are served with natural fiber cord after the splicing is complete. This helps protect seamans hands when handling. An splice may be used to terminate the loose end of a wire rope when forming a loop.  The strands of the end of a wire rope are unwound a certain distance, and plaited back into the wire rope, forming the loop, or an eye, called an eye splice. When this type of rope splice is used specifically on wire rope, it is called a Molly Hogan, and, by some, a Dutch eye instead of a Flemish eye.(Primer of Towing / George H. Reid - 3rd ed. Fig. 3-5 p30 - Cornell Maritime Press, 2004. ISBN 0-87033-563-4) See also *Cable*Wire*structure*Non-metallic ropesReferences6.^Wire Ropes - Tension, Endurance, Reliability/ Klaus Feyrer - Springer, 2007, ISBN 3-540-33821-77. ^Theory of wire ropes. 2. edition / G. A. Costello - Springer 1997, ISBN 0-387-98202-7External links* U.S. Navy Technical Manual for Wire and Fiber Rope* Modern history of wire rope* Calculation programs for rope problems, usage free of chargedacerde:Drahtseilel:de acerode tractionhr:elik-eloit:Funelb:Drotseelnl:Staalkabelno:Stltaunn:Stltaude aoropelanofi:Vaijerisv:Vajer
3191574
Dipannita_Sharma
 website      Dipannita Sharma () (born 2 Nov 1976  in Assam, India) is a model and an aspiring actress.A well known model(http://www.khojhyderabad.com/fashion/models/female/dipannita%20sharma/Index.htm) and an actress, who came into the limelight after making to the final five of the India 1998 contest. She was also judged the Miss Photogenic in the same contest. She has also done a couple of television shows starting with Life Nahi Hai Laddoo. She made her film debut with December (2002).Personal lifeShe was born in the Oil India Limited colony town of Duliajan in Assam. Her father was a doctor in the O.I.L hospital. She was in Holy Child School, Chandmari, Guwahati till her ninth standard (high school) ,and  pursued the rest of her school academics from St. Marys school, Naharkatia.(http://www.assamspider.com/resources/2489-Profile-Dipannita-Sharma-Indian-Assamese.aspx)She is married to Delhi hotelier Dilser Singh Atwal, a third generation businessman and who is into his family business of mining,(http://www.dnaindia.com/entertainment/report_there-s-no-three-year-itch-dipannita-sharma_1506217) http://httabloid.com/news/7242_2092822,00180012.htm and currently lives in Mumbai, India.FilmographyTV showsFactor - Khatron Ke Khiladi on TVReferencesMaking the cut on MTV
3196232
History_of_New_South_Wales
The history of New South Wales refers to the history of the Australian State of South Wales and its preceding Indigenous and British colonial societies. The Lake remains indicate occupation of New South Wales by Australians for at least 40,000 years. The English navigator Cook became the first European to map the coast in 1770 and a Fleet of British convicts followed to establish a colony at Sydney in 1788. The colony established an autonomous democracy from the 1840s and became a state of the of Australia in 1901 following a vote to Federate with the other British colonies of Australia. Through the 20th century, the state was a major destination for an increasingly diverse collection of migrants from many nations. In the 21st century, the state is the most populous in Australia, and its capital, Sydney is a major financial capital and host to international cultural and economic events.Ancient historyImage:Ku-ring-gai Chase - petroglyph.jpg|thumb|left|130px|Petroglyph in Sydneys Chase National Park.The first people to occupy the area now known as New South Wales were Aborigines.  Their presence in Australia began around 40,00060,000 years ago with the arrival of the first of their ancestors by boat from what is now Indonesia. Their descendants moved south and, though never large in numbers, occupied all areas of Australia, including the future New South Wales.(Geoffrey Blainey; A Very Short History of the World; Penguin Books; 2004; ISBN 978-0-14-300559-9) Man and other remains have been found at the dried up Mungo in New South Wales, some 3000 km south of the North Coast of Australia, and have been dated to approximately 40,000 years ago. These early humans appear to have been buried with ceremonial accompaniment and have been found close to stone tools and the bones of now extinct fauna (such as giant kangaroos and wombats).(http://us.sydney.com/Mungo_National_Park_p629.aspx) These are the earliest human remains yet found in Australia, though precise dating is difficult and debated. They nevertheless appear to confirm that New South Wales was populated some tens of thousands of years before the arrival of the British Fleet at a time when the climate was far wetter and humans were conducting some of their earliest religious and artistic practices. Examples of Aboriginal stone tools and art (often recording the stories of the Dreamtime religion) can be found throughout New South Wales: even within the metropolis of modern Sydney, as in Chase National Park.(www.auinfo.com/Ku_Ring_Gai_National_park_Sydney.html)Arrival of Europeans1770 James Cooks proclamationIn 1770 Lieutenant (later Captain) Cook, in command of the HMS Endeavour, sailed along the east coast of Australia, becoming the first known Europeans to do so. On 19 April 1770, the crew of the Endeavour sighted the east coast of Australia and ten days later landed at a bay in what is now southern Sydney. The ships naturalist, Sir Banks, was so impressed by the volume of flora and fauna hitherto unknown to European science, that Cook named the inlet Bay. Cook charted the East coast to its northern extent and, on 22 August, at Possession Island in the Strait, Cook wrote in his journal: I now once more hoisted English Coulers sic and in the Name of His Majesty King George the Third, took possession of the whole Eastern Coast from the above Latitude 38S down to this place by the name of South Wales. Cook and Banks then reported favourably to London on the possibilities of establishing a British colony at Botany Bay.Britain thereby became the first European power to officially claim any area on the Australian mainland. New South Wales, as defined by Cooks proclamation, covered most of Australia, from  (near the later site of Victoria), to the tip of Cape York, with an unspecified western boundary. By implication, the proclamation excluded: Van Diemens Land (later Tasmania), which had been claimed for the Netherlands by Tasman in 1642; a small part of the mainland south of 38 (later southern Victoria) and; the west coast of the continent (later Western Australia), which Louis de Saint Aloarn officially claimed for France in 1772 &mdash; even though it had been mapped previously by Dutch mariners.1788: Establishment of the colonythumb|350px|left|Map showing the territorial evolution of Australia.The British claim remained theoretical until January 1788, when Phillip arrived with the Fleet to found a convict settlement at what is now Sydney. Phillip, as of New South Wales, exercised nominal authority over all of Australia east of the meridian east between the latitudes of 1037S and 4339S, which included most of Zealand except for the southern part of Island.() of New South Wales as occupied by the native tribes.jpg|thumb|Aboriginal tribes in New South Wales, from an 1892 mapFile:The Founding of Australia.jpg|thumb|right|Governor Phillip hoists the British flag over the new colony at Sydney in 1788.The Fleet of 11 vessels consisted of over a thousand settlers, including 778 convicts (192 women and 586 men).(Rosalind Miles (2001) Who Cooked the Last Supper: The Womens History of the World Three Rivers Press. ISBN 0-609-80695-5 http://books.google.com/books?id6vPOD6Ol15MC&printsecfrontcover&dqwomens+history++of+the+world&hlen&ei2lCATOC9BcKC8gbPrNT3Cw&saX&oibook_result&ctbook-thumbnail&resnum2&ved0CD0Q6wEwAQ#vonepage&qfirst%20fleet&ffalse) A few days after arrival at Bay the fleet moved to the more suitable Jackson where a settlement was established at Cove on 26 January 1788.(Peter Hill (2008) p.141-150) This date later became Australias national day, Day. The colony was formally proclaimed by Governor Phillip on 7 February 1788 at Sydney. Sydney Cove offered a fresh water supply and a safe harbour, which Philip famously described as:( http://www.sl.nsw.gov.au/discover_collections/history_nation/terra_australis/letters/phillip/index.html)Governor Phillip was vested with complete authority over the inhabitants of the colony. Enlightened for his Age, Phillips personal intent was to establish harmonious relations with local Aboriginal people and try to reform as well as discipline the convicts of the colony. Phillip and several of his officers - most notably Tench  left behind journals and accounts of which tell of immense hardships during the first years of settlement. Often Phillips officers despaired for the future of New South Wales. Early efforts at agriculture were fraught and supplies from overseas were few and far between. Between 1788 and 1792 about 3546 male and 766 female convicts were landed at Sydney  many professional criminals with few of the skills required for the establishment of a colony.  Many new arrivals were also sick or unfit for work and the conditions of healthy convicts only deteriorated with hard labour and poor sustenance in the settlement. The food situation reached crisis point in 1790 and the Second Fleet which finally arrived in June 1790 had lost a quarter of its passengers through sickness, while the condition of the convicts of the Third Fleet appalled Phillip. From 1791 however, the more regular arrival of ships and the beginnings of trade lessened the feeling of isolation and improved supplies.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A020292b.htm?hiliteArthur%3BPhillip)Phillip sent exploratory missions in search of better soils and fixed on the Parramatta region as a promising area for expansion and moved many of the convicts from late 1788 to establish a small township, which became the main centre of the colonys economic life, leaving Sydney Cove as an important port and focus of social life. Poor equipment and unfamiliar soils and climate continued to hamper the expansion of farming from Farm Cove to Parramatta and Toongabbie, but a building programme, assisted by convict labour, advanced steadily. Between 178892, convicts and their gaolers made up the majority of the population - but after this, a population of emancipated convicts began to grow who could be granted land and these people pioneered a non-government private sector economy and were later joined by soldiers whose military service had expired - and finally, free settlers who began arriving from Britain. Governor Phillip departed the colony for England on 11 December 1792, with the new settlement having survived near starvation and immense isolation for four years(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A020292b.htm?hiliteArthur%3BPhillip)For the next 40 years the history of New South Wales was identical with the of Australia, since it was not until 1803 that any settlements were made outside the current boundaries of New South Wales, and these, at Hobart and Launceston in Diemens Land (Tasmania), were at first dependencies of New South Wales. It was not until 1825 that Van Diemens Land became a separate colony. Also that year, on 16 July, the border of New South Wales was set further west at the Australia border (129th meridian) to encompass the short lived settlement on Melville Island. In 1829 this border became the border with Australia, which was proclaimed a colony.The Australians or Aboriginal people had lived in what is now New South Wales for at least 50,000 years, making their living through hunting, gathering and fishing. The impact of European settlement on these people was immediate and devastating. They had no natural resistance to European diseases, and epidemics of measles and smallpox spread far ahead of the frontier of settlement, radically reducing population and fatally disrupting indigenous society. Although there was some resistance to European occupation, in general the indigenous people were evicted from their lands without difficulty. Dispossession, disease, violence and alcohol reduced them to a remnant within a generation in most areas. Accounts of early encounters between Sydneys Aboriginal people and the British are provided by the author Tench, who was an officer on the Fleet and the writer of one of the first works of literature about New South Wales. The colony struggled in its early days for economic self-sufficiency, since supplies from Britain were few and inadequate. The whaling industry provided some early revenue, but it was the development of the wool industry by John MacArthur and his wife Macarthur and other enterprising settlers that created the colonys first major export industry. For the first half of the 19th century New South Wales was essentially a sheep run, supported by the port of Sydney and a few subsidiary towns such as Newcastle (where a permanent settlement was established in 1804(http://www.newcastle.nsw.gov.au/about_newcastle/history_and_heritage/newcastles_history/discovery_and_founding)) and Bathurst (1815). Newcastle, north of Sydney, was named after the English coal mining city and would grow to be a major industrial centre and the States second largest city, but it was initially established as a severe punishment camp for troublesome convicts following the Hill Rebellion.() The States third city, Wollongong, south of Sydney, began in 1829 as an outpost for a contingent of soldiers sent in response to conflict between local Aborigines and the unruly timber-getters who had established themselves in the area. Agriculture soon established itself and dairy and coal mining had begun by the 1840s and the city also grew to become a major industrial centre.() Constitutionally, New South Wales was founded as an autocracy run by the Governor, although he nearly always exercised his powers within the restraints of British law. In practice the early Governors ruled by consent, with the advice of military officers, officials and leading settlers. The South Wales Corps was formed in England in 1789 as a permanent regiment to relieve the marines who had accompanied the Fleet. Officers of the Corps soon became involved in the corrupt and lucrative rum trade in the colony. In the Rebellion of 1808, the Corps, working closely with the newly established wool trader John Macarthur,  staged the only successful armed takeover of government in Australian history, deposing Governor Bligh and instigating a brief period of military rule in the colony prior to the arrival from Britain of Governor Macquarie in 1810.(http://www.adb.online.anu.edu.au/biogs/A010111b.htm?hilitewilliam%3Bbligh)File:Ln-Governor-Lachlan macquarie.jpg|thumb|upright|The 5th of New South Wales, Macquarie, was influential in establishing civil society in Australia.Macquarie served as the last autocratic of New South Wales, from 1810 to 1821 and had a leading role in the social and economic development of New South Wales which saw it transition from a colony to a budding free society. He established public works, a bank, churches, and charitable institutions and sought good relations with the Aborigines. In 1813 he sent Blaxland, Wentworth and Lawson across the Blue Mountains, where they found the great plains of the interior.() Central, however to Macquaries policy was his treatment of the emancipists, whom he decreed should be treated as social equals to free-settlers in the colony. Against opposition, he appointed emancipists to key government positions including Greenway as colonial architect and Redfern as a magistrate. London judged his public works to be too expensive and society was scandalised by his treatment of emancipists.(http://www.adb.online.anu.edu.au/biogs/A020162b.htm?hilitelachlan%3Bmacquarie) His legacy lives on with Street, Sydney bearing his name as the well as the South Wales Parliament and various buildings designed during his tenure including the UNESCO listed Park Barracks.In 1821 there were still only 36,000 Europeans in the country. Although the number of free settlers began to increase rapidly after the end of the Wars in 1815, convicts were still 40% of the population in 1820, and it was not until the 1820s that free settlers began to occupy most of what is now rural New South Wales. An inland settlement was established at Bathurst, west of the Blue Mountains, on the banks of the Macquarie River. It was proclaimed a town in 1815 and properties across the plains began to support cattle and grow wheat, vegetables and fruit and produce fine wool for export to the knitting mills of industrial Britain.(http://www.bathurst-nsw.com/History.html)  The period from 1820 to 1850 is regarded as the golden age of the squatters. In 1825 the South Wales Legislative Council, Australias oldest legislative body, was established, as an appointed body to advise the Governor. In the same year trial by jury was introduced, ending the militarys judicial power. In 1842 the Council was made partly elective, through the agitation of democrats like Wentworth. This development was made possible by the abolition of transportation of convicts to New South Wales in 1840, by which time 150,000 convicts had been sent to Australia. After 1840 the settlers saw themselves as a free people and demanded the same rights they would have had in Britain.Development of the colonyExplorationImage:Sturt-map.jpg|thumb|300px|Early expeditions of Sturt.In October 1795 Bass and Flinders, accompanied by William Martin sailed the boat Tom Thumb out of Jackson to Bay and explored the River further upstream than had been done previously by the colonists.  Their reports on their return led to the settlement of Banks Town.() In March 1796 the same party embarked on a second voyage in a similar small boat, which they also called the Tom Thumb.()  During this trip they travelled as far down the coast as Illawarra, which they called Tom Thumb Lagoon.  They discovered and explored Hacking. In 1798-99, Bass and Flinders set out in a sloop and circumnavigated Tasmania, thus proving it to be an island.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A010062b.htm)Aboriginal guides and assistance in the European exploration of the colony were common and often vital to the success of missions. In 1801-02 Matthew Flinders in The Investigator lead the first circumnavigation of Australia. Aboard ship was the Aboriginal explorer Bungaree, of the Sydney district, who became the first person born on the Australian continent to circumnavigate the Australian continent.( http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A010062b.htm) Previously, the famous Bennelong and a companion had become the first people born in the area of New South Wales to sail for Europe, when, in 1792 they accompanied Governor Phillip to England and were presented to George III.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A010062b.htm)In 1813, Blaxland, William Lawson and Wentworth succeeded in crossing the formidable barrier of forested gulleys and shere cliffs presented by the Blue Mountains, west of Sydney, by following the ridges instead of looking for a route through the valleys. At Blaxland they looked out over enough grass to support the stock of the colony for thirty years, and expansion of the British settlement into the interior could begin.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A010109b.htm?hiliteblaxland)In 1824 the Governor Sir Thomas Brisbane, commissioned Hume and former Royal Navy Captain Hovell to lead an expedition to find new grazing land in the south of the colony, and also to find an answer to the mystery of where New South Waless western rivers flowed. Over 16 weeks in 1824-25, Hume and Hovell journeyed to Port Phillip and back. They made many important discoveries including the River (which they named the Hume), many of its tributaries, and good agricultural and grazing lands between New South Wales and Bay, Victoria.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A010527b.htm?hilitehume%3Band%3Bhovell)Sturt led an expedition along the Macquarie River in 1828 and discovered the River. A theory had developed that the inland rivers of New South Wales were draining into an inland sea. Leading a second expedition in 1829, Sturt followed the River into a broad and noble river, the Murray River, which he named after Sir George Murray, secretary of state for the colonies. His party then followed this river to its junction with the River, facing two threatening encounters with local Aboriginal people along the way. Sturt continued down river on to Alexandrina, where the Murray meets the sea in Australia. Suffering greatly, the party had to then row back upstream hundreds of kilometers for the return journey.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A020458b.htm)Surveyor General Sir Thomas Mitchell conducted a series of expeditions from the 1830s to fill in the gaps left by these previous expeditions. He was meticulous in seeking to record the original Aboriginal place names around the colony, for which reason the majority of place names to this day retain their Aboriginal titles.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A020206b.htm?hilitethomas%3Bmitchell)The Polish scientist/explorer Count Edmund Strzelecki conducted surveying work in the Alps in 1839 and  became the first European to ascend Australias highest peak, which he named Kosciuszko in honour of the Polish patriot Kosciuszko.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A020457b.htm)Gold Rushotto holterman with 630lb gold from Hill End.jpg|130px|thumb|upright|A 630 lb gold nugget from Hill End, unearthed in 1872A golden age of a new kind began in 1851 with the announcement of the discovery of payable gold near Bathurst by Hargraves. In that year New South Wales had about 200,000 people, a third of them within a days ride of Sydney, the rest scattered along the coast and through the pastoral districts, from the Phillip District in the south to Bay in the north. In 1836 a new colony of Australia had been established, and its territory separated from New South Wales. The gold rushes of the 1850s brought a huge influx of settlers, although initially the majority of them went to the richest gold fields at Ballarat and Bendigo, in the Port Phillip District, which in 1851 was separated to become the colony of Victoria. Victoria soon had a larger population than New South Wales, and its upstart capital, Melbourne, outgrew Sydney. But the New South Wales gold fields also attracted a flood of prospectors, and by 1857 the colony had more than 300,000 people. Inland towns like Bathurst, Goulburn, Orange and Young flourished. Gold brought great wealth but also new social tensions. Multiethnic migrants came to New South Wales in large numbers for the first time. Young became the site of an infamous anti-Chinese miner riot in 1861 and the official Act was read to the miners on the 14th July  the only official reading in the history of New South Wales.(http://www.visityoung.com.au/pages/history-heritage/) Despite some tension, the influx of migrants also brought fresh ideas from Europe and North America to New South Wales  Norwegians introduced in Australia to the hills above the Mountains gold rush town of Kiandra around 1861. A famous Australian son was also born to a Norwegian miner in 1867, when the balladeer Lawson was born at the Grenfell goldfields.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A100016b.htm?hilitehenry%3Blawson)In 1858, a new gold rush began in the far north, which led in 1859 to the separation of Queensland as a new colony. New South Wales thus attained its present borders, although what is now the Territory remained part of the colony until 1863, when it was handed over to South Australia.The separation and rapid growth of Victoria and Queensland mark the real beginning of New South Wales as a political and economic entity distinct from the other Australian colonies. Rivalry between New South Wales and Victoria was intense throughout the second half of the 19th century, and the two colonies developed in radically different directions. Once the easy gold ran out by about 1860, Victoria absorbed the labour force from the gold fields in manufacturing, protected by high tariff walls. Victoria became the Australian stronghold of protectionism, liberalism and radicalism. New South Wales, which was less radically affected demographically by the gold rushes, remained more conservative, still dominated politically by the squatter class and its allies in the Sydney business community. New South Wales, as a trading and exporting colony, remained wedded to trade.At Hill, New South Wales in the 1880s, Billiton (now a major global mining and gas company) began as a silver, lead and zinc mine operation.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/aboutUs/companyOverview/ourHistory/bhpHistory.jsp) By 1891, the population of the Outback town had passed 21,000, making Broken Hill the third largest town in the colony of New South Wales.(http://www.brokenhill.nsw.gov.au/about/1002/1011.html)Cultural developmentImage:SydneyGS1842.jpg|right|thumb|Park, Sydney with the Museum under construction in the distance, 1842In the course of the 19th century the increasingly ambitious colony established many of its major cultural institutions. The first Royal Easter Show, an agricultural exhibition and New South Wales cultural institution, began in 1823.(www.rasnsw.com.au/history.htm) Macleay started collecting the exhibits of Australias oldest museum - Sydneys Museum  in 1826 and the current building opened to the public in 1857.(australianmuseum.net.au) The Morning Herald newspaper began printing in 1831. The of Sydney commenced in 1850. The National Park, south of Sydney opened in 1879 (second only to National Park in the USA). An academy of art formed in 1870 and the present Gallery of New South Wales building began construction in 1896.(www.artgallery.nsw.gov.au/aboutus/history) The South Wales Rugby Union (or then, The Southern RU  SRU) was established in 1874, and the very first club competition took place in Sydney that year. In 1882 the first New South Wales team was selected to play Queensland in a two-match series (initially popular, the sport would became secondary in popularity in New South Wales after the creation of the South Wales Rugby League as a professional code in 1907). In 1878 the inaugural first class cricket match at the Cricket Ground was played between New South Wales and Victoria.(http://www.sydneycricketground.com.au/SCG-Trust-Timeline.html)The Sydney International Exhibition of 1879 showcased the colonial capital to the world. Some exhibits from this event were kept to constitute the original collection of the new Technological, Industrial and Sanitary Museum of New South Wales (todays Museum).Two Sydney journalists, Archibald and John Haynes, founded Bulletin magazine: the first edition appeared on 31 January 1880. It was intended to be a journal of political and business commentary, with some literary content. Initially radical, nationalist, democratic and racist, it gained wide influence and became a celebrated entry-point to publication for Australian writers and cartoonists such as Lawson, Paterson, Franklin, and the illustrator and novelist Lindsay. A celebrated literary debate played out on the pages of the Bulletin about the nature of life in the bush featuring the conflicting views of such as Paterson (called romantic) and Lawson (who saw bush life as exceedingly harsh) and notions of an Australian national character were taking firmer root.(http://www.cultureandrecreation.gov.au/articles/lawson/)Self-government and democracyFile:NSWParliament1.jpg|thumb|left|The South Wales Parliament is Australias oldest parliament. First elections were held in 1843.Wentworth established the Patriotic Association (Australias first political party) in 1835 to demand democratic government for New South Wales. The reformist attorney general, Plunkett, sought to apply Enlightenment principles to governance in the colony, pursuing the establishment of equality before the law, first by extending jury rights to emancipists, then by extendeding legal protections to convicts, assigned servants and Aborigines. Plunkett twice charged the colonist perpetrators of the Creek massacre of Aborigines with murder, resulting in a conviction and his landmark Church Act of 1836 disestablished the of England and established legal equality between Anglicans, Catholics, Presbyterians and later Methodists.()File:Henryparkes.jpg|thumb|upright|Sir Parkes was a of New South Wales and one of the Fathers of Australian Federation.In 1838, the celebrated humanitarian Chisolm arrived at Sydney and soon after began her work to alleviate the conditions for the poor women migrants of the colony.  She met every immigrant ship at the docks, found positions for immigrant girls and established a Female Immigrants Home. Later she began campaiging for legal reform to alleviate poverty and assist female immigration and family support in the colonies.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A010208b.htm)In 1840, the City Council was established. Men who possessed 1000 pounds worth of property were able to stand for election and wealthy landowners were permitted up to four votes each in elections. Australias first parliamentary elections were conducted for the South Wales Legislative Council in 1843, again with voting rights (for males only) tied to property ownership or financial capacity.(http://aec.gov.au/Elections/Australian_Electoral_History/reform.htm) The Australian Colonies Government Act 1850 was a landmark development which granted representative constitutions to New South Wales, Victoria, South Australia and Tasmania and the colonies enthusiastically set about writing constitutions which produced democratically progressive parliaments  though the constitutions generally maintained the role of the colonial upper houses as representative of social and economic interests and all established Constitutional Monarchies with the monarch as the symbolic head of state.(http://aec.gov.au/Elections/Australian_Electoral_History/righttovote.htm)The end of transportation and the rapid growth of population following the gold rush led to a demand for British institutions in New South Wales, which meant an elected parliament and government. In 1851 the franchise for the Legislative Council was expanded, but this did not satisfy the settlers, many of whom (such as the young Parkes) had been Chartists in Britain in the 1840s. Successive Governors warned the Colonial Office of the dangers of republicanism if the demands for self-government were not met. There was, however, a prolonged battle between the conservatives, now led by Wentworth, and the democrats as to what kind of constitution New South Wales would have. The key issue was control of the pastoral lands, which the democrats wanted to take away from the squatters and break up into farms for settlers. Wentworth wanted a hereditary upper house controlled by the squatters to prevent any such possibility. The radicals, led by rising politicians like Parkes and journalists like Deniehy, ridiculed suggestions of a bunyip aristocracy.1855 saw the granting of the right to vote to all male British subjects 21 years or over in Australia. This right was extended to Victoria in 1857 and New South Wales the following year (the other colonies followed until, in 1896, Tasmania became the last colony to grant universal suffrage).(The New South Wales Constitution Act of 1855, steered through the British Parliament by the veteran radical Lord John Russell, who wanted a constitution which balanced democratic elements against the interests of property, as did the Parliamantary system in Britain at this time. The Act created a bicameral of New South Wales, with a lower house, the South Wales Legislative Assembly, consisting of 54 members elected by adult males who met a moderate property qualification (anyone who owned property worth a hundred pounds, or earned a hundred pounds a year, or held a pastoral licence, or who paid ten pounds a year for lodgings, could vote). The Assembly was heavily malapportioned in favour of the rural areas. The Legislative Council was to consist of at least 21 members (but with no upper limit) appointed for life by the Governor, and Council members had to meet a higher property qualification.These seemed like formidable barriers to democracy, but in practice they did not prove so, because the Constitution Act could be modified by simple majorities of both Houses. In 1858 the property franchise for the Assembly was abolished, and the ballot introduced. Since the principle that the Governor should always act on the advice of his ministers was soon established, a Premier whose bills were rejected by the Council could simply advise the Governor to appoint more members until the opposition was flooded: usually the threat of flooding was enough. The ministry of Cowper marked the victory of colonial liberalism, although New South Wales liberals were never as radical as those in Victoria or South Australia. The major battle for the liberals, unlocking the lands from the squatters, was more or less won by John Robertson, five times Premier during the 1860s, who passed the Land Acts to break up the squatters estates.File:georgereid.jpg|thumb|upright|Sir Reid was Premier of New South Wales in the lead up to Federation.From the 1860s onwards government in New South Wales became increasingly stable and assured. Fears of class conflict faded as the population bulge resulting from the gold rushes was accommodated on the newly available farmlands and in the rapidly growing towns. The last British troops left the colony in 1870, and law and order was maintained by the police and a locally raised militia, which had little to do apart from catching a few bushrangers. The only issue which really excited political passions in this period was education, which was the source of bitter conflict between Catholics, Protestants, and secularists, who all had conflicting views on how schools should be operated, funded and supervised. This was a major preoccupation for Henry Parkes, the dominant politician of the period (he was Premier five times between 1872 and 1889). In 1866 Parkes, as Education Minister, brought in a compromise Schools Act that brought all religious schools under the supervision of public boards, in exchange for state subsidies. But in 1880 the secularists won out when Parkes withdrew all state aid for church schools and established a statewide system of free secular schools.New South Wales and Victoria continued to develop along divergent paths. Parkes and his successor as leader of the New South Wales liberals, George Reid, were Gladstonian liberals committed to free trade, which they saw as both economically beneficial and as necessary for the unity of the Empire. They regarded Victorian protectionism as economically foolish and narrowly parochial. It was this hostility between the two largest colonies, symbolised by Victorian customs posts along the River, which prevented any moves towards uniting the Australian colonies, even after the advent of the railways and the telegraph made travel and communication between the colonies much easier by the 1870s. So long as Victoria was larger and richer than New South Wales, the mother colony (as it liked to see itself) would never agree to surrender its free trade principles to a national or federal government which would be dominated by Victorians.StatehoodFile:Federation Pavillion.jpg|thumb|Federation Pavilion, Park, Sydney, 1 January 1901.FederationBy the 1890s, several new factors were drawing the Australian colonies towards political union. The great land boom in Victoria in the 1880s was followed a prolonged depression, which allowed New South Wales to recover the economic and demographic superiority it had lost in the 1850s. There was a steady rise in imperial sentiment in the 1880s and 90s, which made the creation of united Australian dominion seem an important imperial project. The intrusion of other colonial powers such as France and Germany into the south-west Pacific area made colonial defence an urgent question, which became more urgent with the rise of Japan as an expansionist power. Finally the issue of Chinese and other non-European immigration made federation of the colonies an important issue, with advocates of a Australia policy arguing the necessity of a national immigration policy.As a result the movement for federation was initiated by Parkes with his Oration of 1889 (earning him the title Father of Federation), and carried forward after Parkes death by another New South Wales politician, Barton. Opinion in New South Wales about federation remained divided through the 1890s. The northern and southern border regions, which were most inconvenienced by the colonial borders and the system of intercolonial tariffs, were strongly in favour, while many in the Sydney commercial community were sceptical, fearing that a national Parliament would impose a national tariff (which was indeed what happened). The first attempt at federation in 1891 failed, mainly as a result of the economic crisis of the early 90s. It was the federalists of the border regions who revived the federal movement in the later 90s, leading up to the Constitutional Convention of 1897-98 which adopted a draft Constitution.When the draft was put to referendum in New South Wales in 1899, Reid (Free Trade Premier from 1894 to 1899), adopted an equivocal position, earning him the nickname Yes-No Reid. The draft was rejected, mainly because New South Wales voters thought it gave the proposed Senate, which would dominated by the smaller states, too much power. Reid was able to bargain with the other Premiers to modify the draft so that it suited New South Wales interests, and the draft was then approved. On 1 January 1901, following a proclamation by Queen Victoria, New South Wales ceased to be a self-governing colony and became a state of the of Australia. Although the new Governor-General and Prime Minister were sworn in  Sydney, Melbourne was to be the temporary seat of government until the permanent seat of government was established. This was to be in New South Wales, but at least 100 miles (160 km) from Sydney. The first Prime Minister (Barton) the first Opposition Leader (Reid) and the first Labor leader (Watson) were all from New South Wales.Federation to World War IIFile:Bondi Bay, Sydney from The Powerhouse Museum.jpg|thumb|Beach - a photo from circa 1900 from The MuseumAt the time of federation the New South Wales economy was still heavily based on agriculture, particularly wool growing, although mining - coal from the Valley and silver, lead and zinc from Broken Hill - was also important. Federation was followed by the imposition of protective tariffs just as the Sydney Free Traders had feared, and this boosted domestic manufacturing. Farmers, however, suffered from increased costs, as well as from the prolonged drought that afflicted the state at the turn of the century. A further boost to both manufacturing and farming came from the increased demand during War I. By the 1920s New South Wales was overtaking Victoria as the centre of Australian heavy industry, symbolised by the Broken Hill Proprietary (BHP) steelworks at Newcastle, opened in 1915, and another steel mill at Port Kembla in 1928.The growth of manufacturing and mining brought with it the growth of an industrial working class. unions had been formed in New South Wales as early as the 1850s, but it was great labour struggles of the 1890s that led them to move into politics. The most important was the Workers Union (AWU), formed from earlier unions by Spence and others in 1894. The defeat of the great shearers and maritime strikes in the 1890s led the AWU to reject direct action and to take the lead in forming the Labor Party. Labor had its first great success in 1891, when it won 35 seats in the Legislative Assembly, mainly in the pastoral and mining areas. This first parliamentary Labor Party, led by Cook, supported Reids Free Trade government, but broke up over the issue of free trade versus protection, and also over the pledge which the unions required Labor members to take always to vote in accordance with majority decisions. After federation, Labor, led by McGowen, soon recovered, and won its first majority in the Assembly in 1910, when McGowen became the states first Labor Premier.This early experience of government, plus the social base of New South Wales party in the rural areas rather than in the militant industrial working class of the cities, made New South Wales Labor notably more moderate than its counterparts in other states, and this in turn made it more successful at winning elections. The growth of the coal, iron, steel and shipbuilding industries gave Labor new safe areas in Newcastle and Wollongong, while the mining towns of Broken Hill and the Hunter also became Labor strongholds. As a result of these factors, Labor has ruled New South Wales for 59 of the 96 years since 1910, and every leader of the New South Wales Labor Party except one has become Premier of the state.File:Sydney Harbour Bridge opening.jpg|thumb|float|Ribbon ceremony to open the Harbour Bridge on 20 March 1932. Breaking protocol, the soon to be dismissed Premier Jack Lang cuts the ribbon while Governor Game looks on.But Labor came to grief in New South Wales as elsewhere during War I, when the Premier, Holman, supported the Labor Prime Minister Hughes in his drive to introduce conscription. New South Wales voters rejected both attempts by Hughes to pass a referendum authorising conscription, and in 1916 Hughes, Holman, Watson, McGowen, Spence and many other founders of the party were expelled, forming the Nationalist Party under Hughes and Holman. Federal Labor did not recover from this split for many years, but New South Wales Labor was back in power by 1920, although this government lasted only 18 months, and again from 1925 under Jack Lang.In the years after World War I it was the farmers rather than the workers who were the most discontented and militant class in New South Wales. The high prices enjoyed during the war fell with the resumption of international trade, and farmers became increasingly discontented with the fixed prices paid by the compulsory marketing authorities set up as a wartime measure by the Hughes government. In 1919 the farmers formed the Country Party, led at national level by Page, a doctor from Grafton, and at state level by Bruxner, a small farmer from Tenterfield. The Country Party used its reliable voting base to make demands on successive non-Labor governments, mainly to extract subsidies and other benefits for farmers, as well as public works in rural areas.The Depression which began in 1929 ushered a period of unprecedented political and class conflict in New South Wales. The mass unemployment and collapse of commodity prices brought ruin to both city workers and to farmers. The beneficiary of the resultant discontent was not the Communist Party, which remained small and weak, but Jack Langs Labor populism. Langs second government was elected in November 1930 on a policy of repudiating New South Wales debt to British bondholders and using the money instead to help the unemployed through public works. This was denounced as illegal by conservatives, and also by Scullins federal Labor government. The result was that Langs supporters in the federal Caucus brought down Scullins government, causing a second bitter split in the Labor Party. in May 1932 the Governor, Sir Game, convinced that Lang was acting illegally, dismissed his government, and Labor spent the rest of the 1930s in opposition.In a Shield cricket match at the Cricket Ground in 1930, Bradman, a young New South Welshman of just 21 years of age wrote his name into the record books at by smashing the previous highest batting score in first-class cricket with 452 runs not out in just 415 minutes.(http://www.cultureandrecreation.gov.au/articles/donbradman/) Although Bradman would later transfer to play for South Australia, his world beating performances provided much needed joy to Australians through the emerging Depression.The British Empire Games were held in Sydney from February 512, timed to coincide with Sydneys sesqui-centenary (150 years since the foundation of British settlement in Australia).World War IIFile:Cowrapowcamp.jpg|thumb|Japanese POW camp at Cowra, shortly before the BreakoutBy the outbreak of War II in 1939, the differences between New South Wales and the other states that had emerged in the 19th century had faded as a result of federation and economic development behind a wall of protective tariffs. New South Wales continued to outstrip Victoria as the centre of industry, and increasingly of finance and trade as well.The radicalism of the Lang period subsided as the Depression eased, and his removal as Labor Leader in 1939 marked the permanent (as it turned out) defeat of the left of the New South Wales Labor Party. Labor returned to office under the moderate leadership of McKell in 1941 and stayed in power for 24 years.World War II saw another surge in industrial development to meet the needs of a war economy, and also the elimination of unemployment. When Chifley, a railwayman from Bathurst, became Prime Minister in 1945, New South Wales Labor assumed what it saw as its rightful position of national leadership. After launching their War, the Japanese Navy managed to infiltrate New South Wales waters and in late May and early June 1942, Japanese submarines made a series of attacks on the cities of Sydney and Newcastle. Though casualties were light, the population feared Japanese invasion. The main Japanese naval advance towards Australian territory was however halted with the assistance of the States Navy, in May 1942, at the of the Coral Sea. The Breakout of 1944 saw Japanese prisoners of war launch a suicidal escape attempt from their camp in the Central West of New South Wales. This is considered the only fighting within New South Wales of the war.Post World War TwoFile:Tumut3GeneratingStation.jpg|thumb|Tumut 3 Power Station was constructed as part of the vast Mountains Scheme in New South Wales (1949-1974). Construction necessitated the expansion of Australias immigration program.The postwar years, however, saw renewed industrial conflict, culminating in the 1949 coal strike, largely fomented by the Party of Australia, which crippled the states industry. This contributed to the defeat of the Chifley government at the 1949 elections and the beginning of the long rule at a Federal level of Menzies, a politician from Victoria, of the newly founded Party of Australia. The postwar years also saw massive immigration to Australia, begun by Chifleys Immigration Minister, Calwell, and continued under the Liberals. Sydney, hitherto an almost entirely British and Irish city by origin (apart from a small Chinese community), became increasingly multi-cultural, with many immigrants from Italy, Greece, Malta and eastern Europe (including many Jews), and later from Lebanon and Vietnam, permanently changing its character.The Mountains Scheme began contruction in the states south. This hydroelectricity and irrigation complex in the Mountains called for the construction of sixteen major dams and seven power stations between 1949 and 1974. It remains the largest engineering project undertaken in Australia and necessitated the employment of 100,000 people from over 30 countries.(The Snowy Mountains Scheme) Socially this project symbolises a period during which Australia became an ethnic melting pot of the twentieth century but which also changed Australias character and increased its appreciation for a wide range of cultural diversity. The Scheme built several temporary towns for its construction workers, several of which have become permanent: notably  Cabramurra, which became highest town in Australia. The sleepy rural town of Cooma became a bustling construction economy, while small rural townships like Adaminaby and Jindabyne had to make way for the construction of Lakes Eucumbene and Jindabyne.()(http://snowymountains.com.au/Jindabyne.html)(http://snowymountains.com.au/Talbingo.html)  Improved vehicular access to the High Country enabled ski-resort villages to be constructed at Thredbo and Guthega in the 1950s by ex-Snowy Scheme workers who realised the potential for expansion of in Australia.(http://www.thredbo.com.au/about-thredbo/history/)(http://www.visitnsw.com/town/Guthega.aspx) Labor stayed in power in New South Wales until 1965, growing increasingly conservative and (according to its critics) lazy and even corrupt in office. In 1965 a vigorous Liberal leader, Askin, finally broke Labors long grip on power, and stayed in office for ten years. During these years Sydney began its transformation into a world city and a centre of the arts, with the building of the Opera House as the great symbol of the period. The rest of the state, however, began a gradual decline, demographically and economically, as Australia lost some of its traditional export markets for primary products in Britain and as New South Wales iron, steel and shipbuilding industries became increasingly uncompetitive in the face of competition from Japan and other new entrants. Sydneys share of the states population and wealth grew steadily. One consequence of this was a strong secessionist movement in the New England region of northern New South Wales, which for a time looked as though it might succeed in forming a new state, but which faded away in the late 1960s.Post 1970sFile:Sydney Opera House - Dec 2008.jpg|thumb|left|The Opera House was opened in 1973.Since the 1970s New South Wales has undergone an increasingly rapid economic and social transformation. Old industries such as steel and shipbuilding have largely disappeared, and although agriculture remains important, its share of the states income is smaller than ever before. New industries such as information technology, education, financial services and the arts, largely centred in Sydney, have risen to take their place. Coal exports to China are increasingly important to the states economy. Tourism has also become hugely important, with Sydney as its centre but also stimulating growth on the North Coast, around Coffs Harbour and Byron Bay. As aviation has replaced shipping, most new migrants to Australia have arrived in Sydney by air rather than in Melbourne by ship, and Sydney now gets the lions share of new arrivals, mostly from Asia, Latin America and the Middle East.Image:Riverina Sheep (during drought).jpg|thumb|right|Dry paddocks in the Riverina region during the 2007 droughtFile:Vladimir Putin at APEC Summit in Australia 7-9 September 2007-19.jpg|thumb|World leaders with Prime Minister Howard in Sydney for the 2007 APEC conference.Although generally of mild climate, the State endured several notable natural disasters around the turn of the century. In 1989, an earthquake struck Newcastle. It was a Richter magnitude 5.6 earthquake() and one of Australias most serious disasters, killing 13 people and injuring more than 160. The damage bill has been estimated at A$4 billion (including an insured loss of about $1 billion).( The Newcastle earthquake was the first Australian earthquake in recorded history to claim human lives.()() The following, year, 1990, saw major flooding in the States central west, with Nyngan suffering a devasting innundation. In 1993-4, the State suffered a serious bushfire season, causing destruction even within urban areas of Sydney. Agricultural production was severely curtailed by prolonged drought during the late 1990s and early 2000s, particularly in the basin.(http://www.webcitation.org/5k4GYQlaE) The drought was followed by sever flooding in 2010.(http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2011/01/11/3110174.htm)In 1973, after a long period of planning and construction, the Opera House was officially opened. The building was from a design by Utzon. It became a symbol not only of Sydney, but of the Australian nation and was inscribed by UNESCO in 2007.(http://whc.unesco.org/en/list/166) Sydney has maintained extensive political, economic and cultural influence over Australia as well as international renown in recent decades. The city hosted the 2000 Olympic Games, the Rugby World Cup and the APEC Leaders conference of 2007. From 1991-2007, Sydney-siders governed as Minister of Australia - first Keating (1991-1996) and later Howard(1996-2007).In recent decades Sydney has also undergone a major social liberalisation, with huge entertainment and gambling industries. Though there has been a decline in the dominance of Christianity through increased secularisation and the growing presence of an increasingly diverse migrant population, Sydneys two outspoken Archbishops, Pell (Catholic) and Peter Jensen (Anglican) remain vocal in national debates and the hosting of Catholic Youth Day 2008, led by Benedict XVI, drew huge crowds of worshipers to the city.() An evangelical Christian bible belt has developed in the north-western suburbs. Buddhist and Muslim communities in particular are growing, but so is irreligiosity. While a grant from the State government permitted the final completion of the spires of Marys Cathedral, Sydney in 2000 (the foundation stone was laid in 1868), construction of the present structure of the large Gallipoli Mosque began in 1986 and at Wollongong, south of Sydney, Tien Temple opened in 1995 as one of the hemispheres largest Buddhist temples. Sydney has gained a reputation for secularism and hedonism, with the Gay and Lesbian Mardi Gras becoming a world-famous event. City Casino opened in the mid 1990s as Sydneys only legal casino.The Labor Party has had long periods of governance in New South Wales in recent decades, holding power under Wran and Unsworth from 1976 to 1988. A period of Liberal-National Coalition rule followed under Greiner and Fahey from 1988 to 1995, but the Labor Party was led back to power by Carr in 1995 and has remained in office ever since. Carr retired and was succeeded by a series of Labor premiers between 2005-2011:  Iemma won the 2007 Election but his party replaced him with Rees in 2007, who was, in turn, replaced by Keneally in 2008. Two recent Premiers have been of non-British background: Greiner (Liberal 1988-92), who is of Hungarian descent, and Iemma whose parents are Italian. The current of New South Wales, Bashir, is of Lebanese origin and is the first woman to be appointed to the office of Governor. The current of New South Wales, Keneally, was born and raised in the United States and became the first female Premier when her party selected her as leader in 2008. Elections to the 55th Parliament of New South Wales are fixed to be held on Saturday, 26 March 2011.Most commentators predict that Sydney and the coast areas of northern New South Wales will continue to grow in the coming decades, although Bob Carr and others have argued that Sydney (which by 2006 had over 4 million people) cannot grow any bigger without putting intolerable strain on its environment and infrastructure. The southern coastal areas around Canberra are also expected to grow, although less rapidly. The rest of the state, however, is expected to continue to decline, as traditional industries disappear. Already many small towns in western New South Wales have lost so many services and businesses that they are no longer viable, causing population to consolidate in regional centres like Dubbo and Wagga.See also* of New South Wales* of Sydney* History of NewcastleNotes and references*Graham Freudenberg, Cause for Power: The Official History of the New South Wales Labor Party, Pluto Press 1991*Gordon Greenwood, Australia: A Social and Political History, Angus and Robertson 1955*A.C.V. Melbourne, Early Constitutional Development in Australia, University of Queensland Press 1963*Edward Shann, An Economic History of Australia, Georgian House 1930External links* NSW Migration Heritage Centrede la Nouvelle-Galles du Sud
3200315
Chesterton,_Staffordshire
Chesterton is a small, former mining village, located in the of Newcastle-under-Lyme, Staffordshire, England. It sits near the market town of Newcastle-under-Lyme.Chesterton is the second largest individual ward in the Borough of Newcastle-under-Lyme, of which Kidsgrove is the largest. In the 2001 census, Chestertons population stood at 7,111.HistoryImage:Memorialchesterton.JPG|left|thumb|160px|The War II memorial in Chesterton ParkChesterton was a parish in the Rural District from 1894 to 1904. Following that, it became part of the United Urban District until 1932, when it was added to the Borough of Newcastle-under-Lyme.The main employer in Chesterton was Colliery. The colliery employed 1,500 men and mined ironstone in addition to coal. Despite heavy investment in the 1960s and 1970s the colliery closed down in 1988, just three years after the end of the year long miners strike. Many of the miners transferred to nearby Colliery, which itself closed down on Christmas Eve 1998.The current site of Holditch Colliery is now a large business park with warehouses and was where a large Vodafone call centre stood until the building was vacated in November 2009.EducationIt has a small school, Community Sports College, that has just under 500 pupils, and four primary schools, Primary, Primary, Bank Primary and Primary.ReligionChesterton is home to six churches, Chesterton Holy Trinity Church, Elim Pentecostal Church, St Johns the Evangelist Church, Holy Trinity C of E Church, Chesterton URC and St Chads Church.Places of interest*Community Country Park*Heritage Centre*Railway Trust*Road StadiumNotable people*Bowyer, footballer*Downing, motor racing driver*Loska, footballer*Moores, footballer* Mike (Mick) Pejic , Stoke City and England International FootballerExternal links* Roman Fort at Chesterton* Apedale Heritage Centre and Country Park* The Moseley Railway Trust website(Staffordshire)
3210158
Greg_Stumbo
religionGregory D. Greg Stumbo is the Speaker of the House of Representatives. Stumbo, a member of the Democratic Party, is a former  Kentucky General from 2003 to 2007 and, prior to his election as attorney general, served in the Kentucky House of Representatives for twelve terms from 1980 to 2003. During this time Stumbo was Kentuckys longest-serving House Majority Leader (19852003). Stumbo returned to the House of Representatives not long after his Attorney General term ended. On January 6, 2009, he was endorsed by Democratic lawmakers to be the partys nominee for Speaker of the House.() He was sworn in as Speaker the next day, January 7.( )A native of Prestonsburg in Floyd County, Stumbo served as Assistant Floyd Attorney and held the position of Martin attorney for three years. He also served as trial commissioner to the Floyd County District Court for one year.Stumbos office led an investigation into the hiring practices of Kentucky Republican Governor Fletcher which resulted in indictments, but was dismissed by agreement with the prosecutors. On September 12, 2007, Stumbo sued Fletcher for appointing too many Republicans to the governing bodies of state universities. State law requires proportional representation of the two leading political parties based on voter registration. A majority of registered voters in Kentucky are Democrats, but Fletcher appointed seven Republicans and two Democrats to the of Kentucky and eight Republicans and two Democrats to the of Louisville.() Stumbo was also, in his time as Attorney-General, known for leading a somewhat controversial and very effective attack on the sale of prescription drugs over the internet and through pill mills, which led to the most stringent laws preventing these sales in the nation. The Ryan Haight Act, the federal law that prohibits the internet only based sale of narcotic prescription drugs by these same websites was modeled on the law Stumbo passed in Kentucky. A large part of the controversy surrounding Stumbos efforts to control the sale of internet prescriptions was based in the objections of other states, who saw part of Stumbos efforts intruding on their own state sovereignty and authority. particularly in the states where the internet pharmacy sites were based. Stumbo also faced considerable criticism from pain patients rights groups, particularly The Pain Relief Network and its president, Siobhan Reynolds, who threatened to file lawsuits challenging the constitutionality of the proposed law. The suit was never filed and the law became the first in the nation requiring registration of internet pharmacies, wherever they were located, in the state in order for them to deliver any medication to Kentucky. It remains one of the most effective laws of its type in the United States.Stumbo was the running mate for Lunsford in the 2007 Democratic gubernatorial primary, but their ticket lost to that of Beshear and Mongiardo, 40.9% to 20.4%.http://www.lex18.com/Global/story.asp?S6554860&navmenu203_2  Stumbo formed an committee to run against Senator McConnell in 2008, but did not run for the office.Greg Stumbo has also worked with NBC in their series Catch a Predator in Green, Kentucky.  The show exposes men who seek to molest minors.  Greg Stumbo has also worked with the group Perverted-Justice twice without NBC in similar sting operations.(Dateline NBC)In his free time, Stumbo is an outdoorsman, a golfer, and a chess player. Stumbo advocates creating new usable land for recreational opportunities from strip mining techniques, as well as for other forms of post-mining economic reclamation. As an indication of his commitment to Kentuckys coal industry, Stumbo built his home in Prestonburg on a clearing where a mountaintop used to be, near the manicured, 18-hole Stone Crest Golf Course.()On February 24, Greg Stumbo reportedly spoke in favor of cockfighting in Kentucky. The Lexington Herald Leader quoted Stumbo as saying, A lot of people argue that its a tradition in our country. References  External links *Representative Greg Stumbo (D), Speaker of the House official Kentucky Legislature site** Bills, amendements and roll call votes from KentuckyVotes.org* Attorney General Greg Stumbo  archived biography* 2007 Campaign Site* 2008 Exploratory Campaign Site* http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/35570631
3215285
Ontology_editor
Ontology editors are applications designed to assist in the creation or  manipulation of ontologies.They often express ontologies in one of many ontology languages. Some provide export to other ontology languages however.Decision criteria for software choiceAmong the most relevant criteria for choosing an ontology editor are the degree to which the editor abstracts from the actual ontology representation language used for persistence and the visual navigation possibilities within the model. Next come built-in engines and extraction facilities, and the support of upper ontologies such as OWL-S, Core, etc. Another important feature is the ability to import & export foreign representation languages for matching.Ontologies are developed for a specific purpose and application.   Ensure the tool has the right interface for the information science team developing it - which could be highly technical for a help desk/decision tree system and could be a non-technical librarian or business analyst for a knowledge map over an intranet.  Also make sure that the end product can be used - i.e. that the tool has an API or appropriate export capability to plug the ontology into the desired application(s).Example editors*a.k.a. software(Ontology, taxonomy and thesaurus management software available from The Synercon Group)*Anzo for Excel (Includes an RDFS and OWL ontology editor within Excel; generates ontologies from Excel spreadsheets)*Chimaera (Other web service by Stanford)*CmapTools Ontology Editor (COE) (Java based ontology editor from the Florida Institute for Human and Machine Cognition. Supports numerous formats)*EMFText OWL2 Manchester Editor, Eclipse-based, open-source, Pellet integration*FluentEditor for OWL, OWL ontologies editor with Controlled Natural Language (Controlled English). Supports OWL, RDF, DL and Functional rendering, unlimited imports and built-in reasoning services.*HOZO (Java-based graphical editor especially created to produce heavy-weight and well thought out ontologies, from University and Enegate Co, ltd.)*Java Ontology Editor (JOE)  (1998)*KAON (single user and server based solutions possible, open source, from FZI/AIFB Karlsruhe)*KMgen (Ontology editor for the KM language. KM: The Knowledge Machine)*Knoodl (Free web application/service that is an ontology editor, wiki, and ontology registry.  Supports creation of communities where members can collaboratively import, create, discuss, document and publish ontologies.  Supports OWL, RDF, RDFS, and SPARQL queries.  Available since early Nov 2006 from Revelytix, Inc..)*Model Futures IDEAS AddIn (free) A plug-in for Sparx Systems Enterprise Architect that allows Group 4D ontologies to be developed using a UML profile*Model Futures OWL Editor (Free) Able to work with very large OWL files (e.g. Cyc) and has extensive import and export capabilities (inc. UML, Thesaurus Descriptor, Word, ERwin Data Modeler, CSV, etc.)*myWeb (Java-based, mySQL connection, bundled with applet that allows online browsing of ontologies (including OBO))*Neologism (Web-based, open source, supports RDFS and a subset of OWL, built on Drupal)*NeOn Toolkit  (Eclipse-based, open source, OWL support, several import mechanisms, support for reuse and management of networked ontologies, visualization, etc.from NeOn Project)*OBO-Edit (Java-based, downloadable, open source, developed by the Ontology Consortium for editing biological ontologies)*OntoStudio (Eclipse-based, downloadable, support for RDF(S), OWL and F-Logic, graphical rule editor, visualizations, from ontoprise)*Ontolingua (Web service offered by Stanford University)*Protg (Java-based, downloadable, open source, many sample ontologies, from Stanford University)*ScholOnto (net-centric representations of research)*Semantic Turkey (Firefox extension - also based on Java - for managing ontologies and acquiring new knowledge from the Web; developed at University of Rome, Tor Vergata )*Swoop (Java-based, downloadable, open source, OWL Ontology browser and editor from the University of Maryland)*Semaphore Ontology Manager  (Commercial ontology, taxonomy and thesaurus management software available from Semaphore Limited. Intuitive tool to manage the entire build - enhance - review - maintain ontology lifecycle.)*Synaptica  (Ontology, taxonomy and thesaurus management software available from  from Synaptica, LLC. Web based, supports OWL and SKOS.)*TopBraid Composer  (Eclipse-based, downloadable, full support for RDFS and OWL, built-in inference engine, SWRL editor and SPARQL queries, visualization, import of XML and UML, from TopQuadrant)*Transinsight (The editor is especially designed for text mining ontologies)*WebODE (Web service offered by the Technical University of Madrid)*OWLGrEd (A UML based graphical ontology editor)*TwoUse Toolkit (Eclipse-based, open source, model-driven ontology editing environment especially designed for software engineers)*Be Informed Suite (Commercial tool for building large ontology based applications. Includes visual editors, inference engines, export to standard formats)*Thesaurus Master (Manages creation and use of ontologies for use in data management and semantic enrichment by enterprise, government, and scholarly publishers.)External links*The Sweet Compendium of Ontology Building Tools*http://www.xml.com/pub/a/2004/07/14/onto.html Ontology Tools Survey*Platypus http://platypuswiki.sourceforge.net/ A semantic Wikide:Ontologie-Editorzh:
3221976
Tobyhanna_Army_Depot
Tobyhanna Army Depot, is a logistics center for the States Department (DoD), specializing in electronic systems and located in Coolbaugh Township, Monroe County, near Pennsylvania.  Established Feb. 1, 1953 as Tobyhanna Signal Depot, today it is a facility for the repair, upgrade and integration of Command, Control, Computer, Communications, Intelligence, Surveillance and Reconnaissance (C4ISR) systems for all branches of the Armed Forces.Current activitiesThe depots mission is total sustainment, including design, manufacture, repair and overhaul, of hundreds of electronic systems.  They include satellite terminals, radio and radar systems, telephones, electro-optics, night vision and anti-intrusion devices, airborne surveillance equipment, navigational instruments, electronic warfare, and guidance and control systems for tactical missiles.  Tobyhanna is DoDs recognized leader in the areas of automated test equipment, systems integration and downsizing of electronics systems. The Army has designated Tobyhanna as its Center of Industrial and Technical Excellence for C4ISR and Electronics, Avionics, and Missile Guidance and Control. The Air Force has designated Tobyhanna as its Technical Source of Repair for command, control, communications and intelligence systems.Tobyhanna has gained new missions and workload in each of the five rounds of Base Realignment and Closure (BRAC) between 1988-2005. The depot also is the largest employer in northeastern Pennsylvania, with more than 5,000 personnel working at the installation.  The depots regional economic impact approaches $2 billion annually.  The depot also operates 30 Forward Repair Activities at major U.S. installations and overseas, including in Southwest Asia.In 2005, President W. Bush delivered his Day address at Tobyhanna Army Depot, commending the installation as a facility that has provided critical services for our armed forces and applauded the depot workers as men and women who have been carrying out dangerous missions with bravery and skill.In 2006, the depot earned the Prize for Excellence in Manufacturing as well as the 2006 Best Manufacturing Practices Award of Excellence.HistoryFrom 1900 to 1936, Lake, and nearby lakes at Gouldsboro and Klondike, were sites of ice collection and storage, producing up to 150 boxcar loads per day between them that was shipped as far as Florida.  In 1912, Tobyhanna had a railway station, telegraph, and post office.  At that time the U.S. Army had no artillery training range east of Wisconsin, and Major Charles P. Summerall, commander of the 3rd Field Artillery at Fort Myer, Virginia chose the site as a suitable training range.  After leasing land for $300 in 1912 and 1913, Summerall persuaded Congress to authorize the purchase of 18,000 acres (73 km) for $50,000; eventually the military reservation was expanded to 22,000 acres (89 km) (according to the Tobyhanna Army Depot) or 26,000 acres (105 km) (according to Pennsylvania DCNR).  The land was used as a tank and ambulance corps training center from 19141918, for artillery training from 19181931 and 19371941, and to house Conservation Corps enrollees 1931-1937.()  During War II, initial plans for use of the site as a training site for anti-aircraft artillery were dropped, due to the long range of more modern weapons - some shells strayed onto private land, and the Times reported that crews could only fire one or two shells during each pass of a target, and guns were limited to a 65-degree firing arc. (http://72.14.207.104/search?qcache:wKhJ-C01H9IJ:www.tobyhanna.army.mil/about/tobyhanna/history.html+%22tobyhanna+history%22&hlen&glus&ctclnk&cd1)  Subsequently the camp became the base of an all-black segregated ambulance corps, and a military hospital (19 single-story structures) was constructed in expectation of casualties from the invasion of Japan.  At the end of World War II the military reservation became one of 138 sites around the U.S.(http://vikingphoenix.com/public/rongstad/military/pow/axispow.htm) holding German prisoners of war (a maximum of 300 POWs), and was used for storage of gliders used in the D-Day invasion.(Tobyhanna Army Depot (TYAD))  From 1946-1948 it was used by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers.  In April 1949, most of the military reservation was returned to Pennsylvania, and converted into Game Land 127, State Park, and State Park, while 1400 acres (5.7 km), after briefly being transferred to Pennsylvania, were reacquired by the Army Signal Corps in 1951 as the Tobyhanna Army Depot. This site was selected as having access to East Coast shipping and manufacturers while being outside of possible nuclear blast radii surrounding York City and Scranton.  At that time the decline of coal mining in the region had led to the unemployment of 35,000 workers in the region, and the new Depot received 600 job applications a day two years in advance of its opening. Tobyhanna is Northeastern Pennsylvanias largest employer.(ReferencesExternal links*Tobyhanna Army Depot Official Website*Transcript of President Bushs 2005 Veterans Day Iraq Policy Address At the Depot
3231094
Cerrejn
thumb|right|300px|Trucks loaded with coal at The Cerrejon.Cerrejn is a coal mine located in the Guajira department in the north of Colombia.  It is the largest mining operation in Colombia and among the largest open-pit coal mines in the world.  The legal entity managing the Cerrejn operation is known as Carbones del Cerrejn Ltd. The current Cerrejn company was created in 2002 as a venture of three international mining firms Billiton, American PLC and International AG, each with a 33.33% shareholding; in 2006, Glencores share was bought by Xstrata Plc.The output of the mine in 2009 was 30.3 million tons.  Cerrejn contributes close to half of Colombias coal exports of 73.1 million tons, with Colombia ranked fourth among major coal exporting nations as of 2007.() Cerrejn gives its name to the, prehistoric, ,  Titanoboa cerrejonensis, fossils of which have been found in the mining areas. () History North ZoneIn December 1976, an Association Contract was signed between Carbocol S.A., a state owned Coal Company, and Intercor, an ExxonMobil affiliate, for the development of Cerrejn North Zone. This contract consists of three phases: Exploration (1977-1980), Construction (1981-1986) and Production (1986-2009). In January of 1999, an agreement with the Government of Colombia extended this phase an additional 25 years more, until 2034.In November of 2000, the Colombian Government sold Carbocol S.A. (50%) participation in Cerrejn North Zone Association Contract, to a consortium, whose members were subsidiaries of BHP Billiton plc, Anglo American plc and Glencore International AG. Later on Glencore sold its participation to Xstrata plc.In February of 2002, this consortium acquired from Intercor the other 50%, owned by ExxonMobil, thus becoming the sole owner of the Cerrejn north zone. In November of 2002, the merger between Intercor and Carbones del Cerrejn S.A was legalized and Intercors name was changed today Carbones del Cerrejn Limited, Cerrejn.Central ZoneThis zone has two contracted areas::Central Deposit (Comunidad de El Cerrejn) in production since 1981. After successive contracts with different companies (Domi Prodeco Auxini consortium, Prodeco, Carbones del Caribe and others), it was acquired by Glencore in 1995, thus creating Carbones del Cerrejn S.A. Then, in 1997, Anglo American joined the business and in 2000, BHP Billiton became the third associate.Oreganal Deposit (State owned), initially contracted between Carbones del Caribe and Colombian state (today Minercol), then in 1995 with Oreganal S.A. who in turn assigned its participation to Carbones del Cerrejn.Patilla AreaIn 2001, through a public bid, this area was assigned to a consortium, whose members are today Carbones del Cerrejn Limited (former Intercor) and Cerrejn Zona Norte S.A., that also belong to subsidiary companies of BHP Billiton plc, Anglo American plc and Xstrata plc.South ZoneThrough a bid in 1997, an exploration and exploitation contract of this zone was assigned to a consortium integrated today by subsidiary companies of BHP Billiton plc, Anglo American plc and Xstrata plc. Currently, this zone is at exploration stage. Production thumb|right|300px|Open cast mine at CerrejonThe operation is an open-pit mine, in which thetopsoil and other material is cleared away to expose the coal seam.The coal is loaded onto trucks that carry it to the crushingfacilities and then to two silos, from where it is loaded ontotrains.The company has its own 150 km  (gauge) railroad, connectingthe mine to its coal-loading terminal at Puerto Bolvar on theCaribbean coast.  There are two 128-car unit trains, each carrying12,000 tons of coal per trip.  The round-trip time for each train,including loading and unloading, is about 12 hours.  The coalfacilities at the port are capable of loading at peaks of 4,800 tons per hour onto vessels of up to 175,000 tons of dead weight.The mine, railroad and port operate 24 hours per day.Cerrejn directly employs about 5,300 workers, with a further 5,000 approximately employed by contractors.The reserves at Cerrejn are low-sulfur, low-ash, coal.The coal is mostly used for electric power generation, with somealso used in steel manufacture and house heating.  The surface mineable reserves forthe current contract are 330 million tons.  However, total provenreserves to a depth of 300 metres are 3,000 million tons.thumb|right|300px|Overburden removal See also * Bolivar Airport* Titanoboa, worlds largest prehistoric snake found in Cerrejn mine. References  External links  *Cerrejn Coal website. Contains information on operations as well as the companys environmental and community projects.*http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/ourBusinesses/energyCoal/cerrejonCoalCompany.jsp.  Information from BHP Billiton on the mine.Cerrejnes:Cerrejnde charbon de Cerrejnid:Cerrejn
3236014
History_of_South_Australia
The history of South Australia refers to the history of the Australian State of Australia and its preceding Indigenous and British colonial societies. Australians have lived in South Australia for tens of thousands of years, while British colonists arrived in the 19th century to establish a free colony, with no convict settlers. European explorers were sent deep into the interior, discovering some pastoral land but mainly large tracts of desert terrain. The colony became a cradle of democratic reform in Australia. The of South Australia began in 1857, when the colony was granted self-government. Votes for women came in the 1890s. South Australia  became a state of the of Australia in 1901 following a vote to Federate with the other British colonies of Australia. While smaller than the Eastern states, South Australia has often been at the vanguard of political and social change in Australia.Aboriginal settlement The first people to occupy the area now known as South Australia were Aborigines.  Their presence in northern Australia began around 40,00060,000 years ago with the arrival of the first of their ancestors by boat from what is now Indonesia. Their descendants moved south and, though never large in numbers, occupied all areas of Australia, including the future South Australia.(Geoffrey Blainey; A Very Short History of the World; Penguin Books; 2004; ISBN 978-0-14-300559-9) thumb|right|Aboriginal Family Travelling by W.A. Cawthorne.Evidence for human activity in Australia dates back as far as 20,000 years ago with flint mining activity and rock art in the Cave on the Plain. In addition wooden spears and tools were made in an area now covered in peat bog in the South East. Island was inhabited long before the island was cut off by rising sea levels.European explorationThe first recorded European sighting of the South Australian coast was in 1627 when the Dutch ship t Gulden Zeepaerdt (The Golden Seahorse), skippered by Thijssen, examined the coastline. Thijssen named his discovery Nuyts Land, after the highest ranking individual on board. In 1801-02 Matthew Flinders led the first circumnavigation of Australia aboard the HMS Investigator, a Navy ship. French Captain Baudin was also on a survey mission in 1802, independently charting the southern coast of the Australian continent with the French naval ships the Gographe and the Naturaliste. The British and French expeditions sighted each other, and despite France and Britain being at war at the time, they met peacefully at Bay, on the Peninsula.Baudin referred to the land as Terre Napolon. On the same voyage, Baudin named the Fleurieu Peninsula after Pierre Claret de Fleurieu, a French explorer and statesman. In 1802 Flinders named Lofty but recorded little of the area which is now Adelaide.Sturt led an expedition from South Wales in 1829, which followed first the River into a broad and noble river, which he named the Murray River. His party then followed this river to its junction with the River and continued down river on to Alexandrina, where the Murray meets the sea in Australia. Suffering greatly, the party had to then row back upstream hundreds of kilometers for the return journey.(http://adbonline.anu.edu.au/biogs/A020458b.htm)Establishing a colonythumb|right|1835 advertisementA group in Britain led by Gibbon Wakefield were looking to start a colony based on free settlement rather than convict labour. Wakefield suggested that instead of granting free land to settlers as had happened in other colonies, the land should be sold. The money from land purchases would be used solely to transport labourers to the colony free of charge, who were responsible and skilled workers rather than paupers and convicts. Land prices needed to be high enough so that workers who saved to buy land of their own remained in the workforce long enough to avoid a shortage.In 1830 Sturt explored the River and was impressed with what he briefly saw while passing through Lake Alexandrina, later writing::Hurried ....as my view of it was, my eye never fell on a country of more promising aspect, or more favourable position, than that which occupies the space between the lake (Lake Alexandrina) and the ranges of the St. Vincent Gulf, and, continuing northerly from Mount Barker stretches away, without any visible boundary.Captain Barker, sent by South Wales Governor Darling conducted a more thorough survey of the area in 1831, as recommended by Sturt. After swimming the mouth of the Murray River, Barker was killed by natives who may have had contact with sealers and escaped convicts in the region. Despite this, his more detailed survey led Sturt to conclude in his 1833 report::It would appear that a spot has at last been found upon the south coast of New Holland to which the colonists might venture with every prospect of success ....All who have ever landed upon the eastern shore of the St. Vincents Gulf agree as to the richness of its soil and the abundance of its pastures.In 1834 the South Australian Association, with the aid of such figures as Grote, William Molesworth and the Duke of Wellington persuaded British Parliament to pass the South Australia Colonisation Act 1834.  The Act stated that 802,511 square kilometres would be allotted to the colony and to be convict-free. The plan for the colony to be the ideal embodiment of the best qualities of British society, that is, no religious discrimination or unemployment. The province and its capital were named prior to settlement. The Act further specified that it was to be self-sufficient; 20,000 surety had to be created and 35,000 worth of land had to be sold in the new colony before any settlement was permitted. These conditions were fulfilled by the close of 1835. While New South Wales, Tasmania and (although not initially) Western Australia were established as convict settlements, the founders of South Australia had a vision for a colony with political and religious freedoms, together with opportunities for wealth through business and pastoral investments. The South Australia Act 1834 reflected these desires and included a promise of representative government when the population reached 50,000 people. South Australia thus became the only colony authorised by an of Parliament, and which was intended to be developed at no cost to the British government. Transportation of convicts was forbidden, and poor Emigrants, assisted by an Emigration Fund, were required to bring their families with them.(http://foundingdocs.gov.au/item.asp?sdID37) Significantly, the Patent enabling the South Australia Act 1834 included a guarantee of the rights of any Aboriginal Natives and their descendants to lands they now actually occupied or enjoyed.(http://foundingdocs.gov.au/item.asp?sdID38)In 1836, two ships of the South Australia Land Company left to establish the first settlement on Island.Colony of 1836Image:Portrait of col william light.jpg|thumb|right||150px|Colonel LightThe first settlers and officials set sail in early 1836.  A total of nine ships consisting of 636 people set sail from London for South Australia. Most took supplies and settlers to Island on the present site of Kingscote to await official decisions on the location and administration of the new colony.Surveyor Colonel Light, who was given two months to locate and survey the colony of Adelaide, rejected locations for the new settlement such as Kangaroo Island, Port Lincoln and Bay. He was required to find a site with a harbour, land, water, ready internal and external communications, materials and drainage. Most of the settlers were moved from Kangaroo Island to Holdfast Bay with Governor Hindmarsh arriving in December 1836 to proclaim the province of South Australia. The River was sighted and deemed to be a suitable harbour, but there was no fresh water available nearby. The Torrens was discovered to the south and Light and his team set about determining the citys precise location and layout. The survey was completed on 11 March 1837.  Lights poorly paid and ill-equipped surveying team were expected to begin another massive task of surveying at least 405 km of rural land. Light, despite slowly succumbing to tuberculosis, managed to survey 605.7 km by June 1838.Most other colonies had been founded by Governors with near total authority, but in South Australia, power was initially divided between the Governor and the Resident Commissioner, so that government could not interfere with the business affairs or freedom of religion of the settlers. Relation between Hindmarsh and the Resident Commissioner quickly broke down.Expansion of the colonyUntil 1851, the Governor ruled with the assistance of an appointed Executive Council of paid officials. Land development and settlement was the basis of the Wakefield vision. Land law and regulations governing it were fundamental to the foundation of the Province and allowed for land to be bought at a uniform price per acre (regardles of quality), with auctions for land desired by more than one buyer, and leases made available on unused land. Proceeds from land were to fund the Emigration Fund to assist poor settlers to come as tradesmen and labourers.(http://foundingdocs.gov.au/item.asp?sdID40) Agitation for representative government quickly emerged.(http://www.parliament.sa.gov.au/AboutParliament/History/Overview/Pages/18341851ColonialGovernment.aspx) Most other colonies had been founded by Governors with near total authority, but in South Australia, power was initially divided between the Governor and the Resident Commissioner, so that government could not interfere with the business affairs or freedom of religion of the settlers. From 1843 to 1851, the colony was governed by a Legislative Council of seven appointed members - but by 1851 the colony was experimenting with a partially elected council.(http://www.parliament.sa.gov.au/AboutParliament/History/Overview/Pages/Legislative%20Council.aspx)The first sheep and other livestock in South Australia were brought in from Tasmania. Sheep were overlanded from New South Wales from 1838, with the wool industry forming the basis of South Australias economy for the first few years. Vast tracts of land were leased by Squatters until required for agriculture. Once the land was surveyed it was put up for sale and the Squatters had to buy their runs or move on. Most bought their land when it came up for sale, disadvantaging farmers who had a hard time finding good and unoccupied land. Farms took longer to establish than sheep runs and were expensive to set up. Despite this by 1860 wheat farms ranged from Bay in the south to Clare in the north.The wine growing regions of Vale and the Barossa Valley were established in the 1840s. Port Pirie was founded in 1845.File:Mary MacKillop.jpg|thumb|150px|Saint Mackillop (1842-1909) co-founded an order of nuns in rural South Australia in 1866 and became the first Australian saint of the Church in 2010.File:Catherine Helen Spence.jpg|thumb|150px|Australian suffragette Helen Spence (1825-1910). In 1895 women in South Australia were among the first in the world to attain the vote and were the first to be able to stand for parliament.Copper was discovered near Kapunda in 1842. In 1845 even larger deposits of copper were discovered at Burra which brought wealth to the Adelaide shopkeepers who invested in the mine. John Ridley invented a machine in 1843 which changed farming methods throughout South Australia and the nation at large. By 1843, 93 km of land was growing wheat (compared to 0.08 km in 1838). Toward the end of the century South Australia would become known as the granary of Australia. Gold discoveries in Victoria in 1851 brought a severe labour shortage  in Adelaide which was created by the exodus of workers leaving to seek their fortunes on the goldfields. However, this also created high demand for South Australian wheat. The situation improved when prospectors returned with their gold finds.South Australians were keen to establish trade links with Victoria and South Wales, but overland transport was too slow. A 4,000 prize was offered in 1850 by the South Australian government for the first two people to navigate the River Murray in an iron steamboat as far as its junction with the River.  In 1853 William Randell of Mannum and Francis Cadell of Adelaide, unintentionally making the attempt at the same time, raced each other to Swan Hill with Cadell coming in first.By the mid 19th century, there was a strong desire for representative and responsible government in the colonies of Australia. In 1840, the City Council was established as the first city council in the Australian colonies. The Australian Colonies Government Act 1850 was a landmark development which granted representative constitutions to New South Wales, Victoria, South Australia and Tasmania and the colonies enthusiastically set about writing constitutions which produced democratically progressive parliaments with the monarch as the symbolic head of state.(http://aec.gov.au/Elections/Australian_Electoral_History/righttovote.htm) In 1850 and elections for legislative councils were held in the colonies of Victoria, South Australia and Tasmania.(http://aec.gov.au/Elections/Australian_Electoral_History/reform.htm) In 1855, limited self government was granted by London to New South Wales, Victoria, South Australia and Tasmania. An innovative ballot was introduced in Victoria, Tasmania and South Australia in 1856, in which the government supplied voting paper containing the names of candidates and voters could select in private. This system was adopted around the world, becoming known as the Ballot. 1855 also saw the granting of the right to vote to all male British subjects 21 years or over in Australia. South Australia became  a colony in 1856 with the ratification of a new constitution by the British parliament. A bicameral parliament was elected on 9 March 1857, by which time 109,917 people lived in the province.South Australias 1856 constitution was among the most democratic in the world - moreso than the other Australian colonies, the United Kingdom and most European countries at that time. It provided for: Adult suffrage (including indigenous men); Secret ballot voting; one man, one vote; no property qualifications for Members of its House of Assembly and a relatively low property qualification for Members of its Legislative Council.(http://www.parliament.sa.gov.au/AboutParliament/History/TimelineorSouthAustralianFirsts/Pages/Democracyandhumanrightsinthe19thcentury.aspx)In 1877, became the first part of the Empire to legalise Unions and in 1891, four United Labor Party candidates were elected to Parliament, becoming the first endorsed Labor members in Australia.(Further copper discoveries were made in 1859 at Wallaroo and in 1861 at Moonta.South Australia was a haven for religious refugees leaving Europe over this period. German Lutherans established the influential Hermmannsberg Mission in Central Australia in 1870.() Unaipon who was to become a preacher and Australias first Aboriginal author was born at Point McLeay Mission in South Australia in 1872. The son of Australias first Aboriginal pastor, he is today honoured on the Australian $50 note.Saint Mackillop co-founded the of St Joseph of the Sacred Heart in rural South Australia in 1866. Dedicated to the education of the children of the poor, it was the first religious order to be founded by an Australian. Mackillop established schools, orphanages and welfare institutions throughout the colonies. She became the first Australian to be honoured by canonisation as a saint of the Catholic Church in 2010.(http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2009/12/19/2776743.htm)During McDouall Stuarts 1862 expedition  to the north coast of Australia he discovered 200,000 km of grazing territory to the west of Torrens and Eyre. Stuart succeeded in traversing Central Australia from south to north. His expedition mapped out the route which was later followed by the Overland Telegraph Line.(Tim Flannery; The Explorers; Text Publishing 1998) South Australia was made responsible for the administration of the Territory.In the 1890s Australia was affected by a severe economic depression. Financial institutions in Melbourne and banks in Sydney closed. The national rate fell and immigration was reduced to a trickle. The value of South Australias exports nearly halved. Drought and poor harvests from 1884 compounded the problems with some families leaving for Western Australia. Adelaide was not as badly hit as the larger gold-rush cities of Sydney and Melbourne, and silver and lead discoveries at Hill provided some relief.Propertied women in the colony of South Australia were granted the vote in local elections (but not parliamentary elections) in 1861. Women became eligible to vote for the of South Australia in 1895. This was the first legislation in the world permitting women also to stand for election to political office and, in 1897, Helen Spence became the first female political candidate for political office, unsuccessfully standing for election as a delegate to the Federal Convention on Australian Federation. Australia granted voting rights to women in 1899.()(http://foundingdocs.gov.au/item.asp?dID8) By the 1890s, several new factors were drawing the Australian colonies towards political union and South Australians voted by referendum to join the Commonwealth of Australia.20th CenturyOn 1 January 1901, following a proclamation by Queen Victoria, South Australia ceased to be a self-governing colony and became a state of the of Australia. In 1906, South Australias first mine was opened at Hill.() In 1910, the government of Verran served as the first complete Labor party government in the world.(http://www.parliament.sa.gov.au/AboutParliament/History/TimelineorSouthAustralianFirsts/Pages/Democracyandhumanrightsinthe20thcentury.aspx) 28,000 South Australians volunteered to fight during Australias involvement in the First World War. Adelaide enjoyed a post-war boom but with the return of droughts, entered the depression of the 1930s, later returning to prosperity with strong government leadership. Secondary industries helped reduce the states dependence on primary industries. The 1933 census recorded the state population at 580,949, which was less of an increase than other states due to the states economic limitations.After the second world war, the Woomera rocket range was established in 1947 as part of the Anglo-Australian Joint Project - at that time one of only four rocket ranges in the world. Busy through the 1950s, Woomera played an important role in the development of space technologies.(http://www.abc.net.au/science/articles/2007/07/18/1980913.htm) With US assistance, Wresat 1, the first Australian satellite, was launched from Woomera, in November 1967 - a joint project of the Weapons Research Establishment and the of Adelaide. The project made Australia only the 4th country to launch its own satellite from its own territory - and a landmark in Australian science.(http://www.adelaide.edu.au/news/print23081.html) Rocket launches largely ceased from the early 1970s, though some space related activity has continued into the 21st century and the base is now controlled by the Australian Airforce.(www.space.com/businesstechnology/hypersonic-rocket-test-launch-100325.html) The University of Adelaide has a long history of scientific research and scholarship of international significance, and five Laureates have been associated with the University: Sir Henry Bragg (Physics 1915); Sir Lawrence Bragg (Physics 1915); Sir Walter Florey (Physiology or Medicine 1945); M. Coetzee (Literature 2003); Warren (Physiology or Medicine 2005).(http://www.adelaide.edu.au/research/about/nobel/)After War II, an assisted migration scheme brought 215,000 emigrants of all nationalities to South Australia between 1947 and 1973. The 1960s and 1970s saw the introduction of a series of landmark Australian legislative firsts in South Australia, including: the 1966 Prohibition of Discrimination Act, which prohibited discrimination on the grounds of race, colour, or country of origin; and 1975 The Sex Discrimination Act, which made discrimination on the grounds of gender, marital status, or sexuality unlawful. In 1975 Parliament decriminalised homosexual acts; and in 1976 rape in marriage was made a criminal offence.(Construction of the Festival Centre began in 1970 and South Australias Sir Helpmann became director of the Adelaide Festival of Arts.(http://www.adelaidefestivalcentre.com.au/afc/history.php)(http://www.helpmannawards.com.au/default.aspx?ssir_robert_helpmann) The Australian Film Corporation (SAFC) was established by the Dunstan government in 1972 and played a significant role in the revival of cinema, with such works as at Hanging Rock and Morant. In 1976, the Pitjantjatjara Land Rights Act gave the Pitjantjatjara and Yankunytjatjarra Aboriginal peoples inalienable freehold title over 100,000 km of their land.( That same year, South Australia appointed the first Aboriginal governor of an Australian state when Sir Nicholls was made of South Australia.(http://www.curriculum.edu.au/cce/nicholls,9156.html)In 1987, copper, gold, and silver production began at the Olympic Dam mine. Olympic Dam also possesses the worlds largest known deposit of uranium.During the commercial property boom of the 1980s the Bank of South Australia was the fastest growing bank in Australia - but in 1991, the bank collapsed and Labor Premier Bannon announced that, due to bad debts, the bank would have to be rescued by the taxpayers - subsequently, the banks book debt rose to $3 billion. A Royal Commission was called and Premier Bannon resigned after appearing before it.(http://blogs.abc.net.au/sa/2008/05/top-10-financia.html)See also* of South Australian history* Overland Telegraph Line* of cities and towns in South Australia* Day* Australia-Victoria border dispute* pole* nuclear tests at Maralinga* LineReferences*Susan Marsden South Australia in G Davison, J Hirst, S MacIntyre, eds, The Oxford Companion to Australian History, Oxford University Press, Melbourne (1998) ISBN 0-19-553597-9*Elizabeth Kwan Living in South Australia: A Social History Volume 1:From Before 1836 to 1914 (1987)*Derek Whitelock Adelaide: From Colony to Jubilee (1985)*Dorothy Jauncey, Bardi Grubs and Frog Cakes  South Australian Words, Oxford University Press (2004) ISBN 0-19-551770-9de Australia Meridionalde lAustralie-Mridionale
3240978
Barnwell_and_Searchlight_Railway
The Barnwell and Searchlight Railway is a defunct 23-mile (37 km) shortline that operated from 1906 - 1911.  The railroad ran from California to Nevada.  It was always operated by the Topeka and Santa Fe Railway.Construction of lineThe discovery of gold in Nevada in 1897 led to a rush in the area.  In 1900 the Quartette Mining Company was formed and two years later the area was booming with activity and peaking in 1907 at a population of 5,000.  It was at the peak of this boom that the Barnwell & Searchlight Railway was formed.  The railway was constructed between May 1, 1906 and March 31, 1907 and was built to serve the Searchlight gold mining district at Searchlight, Nevada.  On April 7, 1907, only 7 days after construction was completed the railway was leased to and became a subsidiary of ATSF.Consolidated into California, Arizona and Santa Fe RailwayOn December 28, 1911 the Barnwell & Searchlight was consolidated into ATSFs subsidiary, the Arizona and Santa Fe Railway.Abandonment of lineOn September 23, 1923 the lines track was washed out and was abandoned on February 18, 1924.  The town during this time was dying and by 1927 the population was only 50 people.Timeline*April 1906 Railroad formed*May 1906 Grading begins*September 1906 Laying rails begins*March 1907 Construction completed*April 1907 Leased to ATSF as a non-operating subsidiary*December 1911 Railroad is consolidated into ATSFs non-operating subsidiary California, Arizona and Santa Fe Railway*September 1923 Line washed out*February 1924 Line abandonedInterchange at BarnwellAt Barnwell, the Barnwell and Searchlight branched from ATSFs non-operating subsidiary, the Eastern Railway.  The California Eastern ran south from North Ivanpah, California - Leastalk (Ivanpah on the Pedro, Los Angeles and Salt Lake Railroad interchange) - Barnwell (Barnwell & Searchlight interchange) - Blackburn - Blake (Goffs on the ATSF mainline from Los Angeles - Needles).Route*Barnwell (Interchange with California Eastern)*Hitt*Juan (Nevada)*NevadaSee also*of defunct California railroads*of defunct Nevada railroadsReferences**** * *
3247053
John_W._Metzger
John William Metzger (April 4, c. 1911 &ndash; January 25, 1984) was a prominent Denver lawyer, who later became the General for the state of Colorado.( John Metzger History)Early LifeJohn W. Metzger is widely reported to have been born on April 4, 1911 in County, Colorado though some reports place his birth in Creek, Colorado as late as 1914. Metzgers father, Charles William Metzger, homesteaded in Logan County in the early 1900s but abandoned it after a number of years to move to Cripple Creek and take up mining. Metzgers mother, Nora Mahoney Metzger, was previously married to miner named Lacaille and had three children with him. After Lacailles death Nora married Charles who was now working as a miner. The date of their marriage and the fact they married in Cripple Creek lead the current Metzger family to believe John was born in 1911 or 1912 in Cripple Creek.(Together Charles and Nora had three children, the youngest of whom was John. In 1917 Charles was seriously injured in a mining accident and died shortly after. A few years later Nora died after developing cancer leaving the three children without any family to care for them. The younger two were declared wards of the state and sent to live in the Colorado Childrens Home in Denver. As was the practice at the time, when the children reached the age of 12 they were sent to work for a family in exchange for and board. Metzger was sent to the Johnson family near Colorado and worked on their farm. At fourteen he ran away to Denver where he eventually met Hugh Neville. With guidance from Neville, Metzger finished high school and attended Westminster School of Law (now part of University). Neville represented many war veterans and when he began to have difficulty speaking he had Metzger present to the court on his behalf. In 1936 Metzger was admitted to the bar by Hadlett P. Burke, even though he had not yet finished his formal law degree.( Professional LifeJohn Metzger was considered a peoples attorney and represented many common people in issues involving widows pensions, probate matters, small business, and planning. For his work on behalf of the Spanish-American war veterans he was granted an honorary membership in the United Spanish War Veterans association. From 1938 to 1941 he served as clerk and referee of the Denver Juvenile Court in addition to his legal practice. Metzger worked as a legal practitioner alone and was never part of a firm. Metzger was turned down for service in World War II due to ulcers. During the war he opened a munitions manufacturing plant originally named John W. Metzger Co. which produced 20mm anti-aircraft shells. The plant eventually produced shells for .09 cents each with a low failure rate and earned an Army-Navy E for excellence.In addition to his legal work, Metzger owned many rental properties in Denver and raised cattle on a 320-acre rural property near the town of Colorado. PoliticsMetzger was a supported of President Roosevelt and co-founded the Colorado Young Democrats in 1934. He was the organizations president for three terms in the 1930s as well as editor of the magazine with the same name. After Metzger moved to County, Colorado in the mid-1940s, he took an more of an interest in local politics eventually going to the Democratic National Convention in 1948 as a delegate. He soon became the county Democratic Party chair and Colorados Second Congressional District Chairman. In 1948 he was elected Attorney General. Metzger used his new position to challenge the quo; he required state commissions to comply with state purchasing laws and stop giving out contracts, he started a campaign against gambling, and in one of his biggest moves he banned using school facilities for religious activities which he believed violated the state constitution. Rocky Mountain News editorial columnist Lee Casey wrote:()Thus far in his career, Mr. Metzger has not demonstrated the possession of a great store of legal learning. But he is certainly active, he pokes his long nose into everything and he doesnt mind trouble. And thereby he affords a decided contrast to most of the incumbents of his high office. ... He affords welcome relief from the reluctance of so many officials to take a position. He may get into trouble but at least he gives the action that is badly needed in public life. Although in August 1949 he declared that he had no interest in running for any future political office, in the summer of 1950 he ran once again for Attorney General where he was defeated. In 1952 he choose to run for Governor but lost to incumbent Thornton. In the following years he stayed engaged in local politics and ran for state office a number of times but was never elected.Personal LifeJohn Metzger married Betty Amen on December 26, 1944. They had two children together Karen, born in 1945, and John William, born in 1949.(Betty Metzgers obituary) Around 1960 the historic Trianon property (formerly called Claremont) in Springs was transferred to Metzger after the nuns for whom Metzger had helped acquire the property found they could not afford the upkeep. Metzger attempted to run it as a museum but due to issues regarding zoning laws was not able to keep it profitable. Metzger sold large portions of the art and book collection, including around 15,000 rare books to State University. Eventually he sold the property to Colorado Springs School. He brought the remaining art pieces to Denverand placed them in a building at 14th Avenue and Tremont Street which became known as the Trianon Museum and Art Gallery. Metzger and his family maintained the museum until it closed in 2004.John Metzger died of cancer in 1984 and is entombed in mausoleum at Fairmount Cemetery, in Denver.(The Political Graveyard: Politician Who Died of Prostate Cancer) Betty Metzger died February 19, 2008 and was interred at Fairmount Cemetery. References
3252891
Matthew_Butler
battles Civil WarWarMatthew Calbraith Butler (March 8, 1836 April 14, 1909) was an American military commander and politician from Carolina. He served as a major general in the States Army during the Civil War, postbellum three-term United States Senator, and a major general in the States Army during the War.Early life and careerButler was born at Crag near South Carolina, to a large and prominent family of politicians and military men.(Boyd, p. 67.) His grandfather was U.S. Congressman William Butler.( His mother, Julie, worked as a maid serving various members of congress between 1842 and 1853. His father, William Butler, Jr., was also a Congressman beginning in 1841.(Hess, p. 649.) His uncle Butler, was a U.S. Senator from South Carolina and uncle Mason Butler was of South Carolina.( One of Matthew Butlers first cousins was Congressman Brooks, who assaulted Senator Sumner in 1856 on the floor of the U.S. Senate with a gutta-percha cane because Sumner had insulted Senator Andrew Butler, at whose home Matthew lived as a young man.(Martin, p. 8.)Butler was the nephew of Commodore Hazard Perry and Matthew Calbraith Perry, and the son-in-law of South Carolina Governor Wilkinson Pickens.(Wittenberg, p. 19.) Two of Butlers first cousins twice removed were Bonham (killed at the of the Alamo) and Confederate General Luke Bonham.(Burton, pp. 6667.)In 1848 Butler went with his father to Arkansas, but returned in 1851 to live with his uncle, who resided in South Carolina. He received his initial education in the citys Edgefield Academy, and then attended the South Carolina College, graduating in 1856. He then studied law, was admitted to the states association in 1857, and then began practicing as a lawyer in Edgefield.(Wakelyn, p. 119.) On February 25, 1858, Butler married Maria Calhoun Pickens, the daughter of Francis Pickens. He was elected to the Carolina House of Representatives in 1860, but resigned in 1861 when the American Civil War began.(Martin, pp. 1112.)PostbellumFinancially ruined as a result of the war, Butler resumed his career as a lawyer in Edgefield and served in the Carolina House of Representatives beginning in 1866.( He became a member of the Democratic Party and ran unsuccessfully for lieutenant governor in 1870.( In 1877, as Reconstruction ended and the Democratic Party regained control of the state, he was elected by the South Carolina state legislature to the United States Senate.(Welsh, p. 32.) He also played a role in the Massacre.(Trefousse, p. 100.) He served in the U.S. Senate for three terms, from 1877 to 1895, but lost the Democratic primary in 1894 to Tillman.(United States Congress, p. 66.) He served on the Senate Foreign Relations, Territories, Military Affairs, Naval Affairs, Interstate Commerce, Civil Service and Retrenchment committees.(Butler then practiced law in D.C., until 1898, when he was appointed major general of U.S. Volunteers during the Spanish-American War, one of a handful of former Confederate officers to serve in the U.S. Army during that campaign.( After the American victory that year, he supervised the evacuation of Spanish troops from Cuba.(Porter, p. 44.) He was honorably discharged from the U.S. Army on April 15, 1899.(Warner, p. 41.)In 1903, Butler was elected vice president of the Historical Society, and in 1904 he relocated to Mexico, where he served as president of a mining company. Two years later he married Nannie Whitman, after his wife Maria had died years before. Butler died in 1909 while semi-retired in D.C. His body was returned to Edgefield, South Carolina, where he was buried in the citys Willow Brook Cemetery.(The Matthew C. Butler Camp #12 of the South Carolina Society of the Order of the Stars and Bars is named in his honor.See also*List of American Civil War generalsNotesReferences* Boyd, James Penny; Vital Questions of the Day: Or Historic and Economic Reviews of the Issues of Labor ... Tariff Legislation ..., Publishers union, (1894)* Burton, Orville Vernon; My Fathers House Are Many Mansions: Family and Community in Edgefield, South Carolina, UNC Press, (1987) ISBN 0-8078-4183-8.* Eicher, John H., and Eicher, David J., Civil War High Commands, Stanford University Press, 2001, ISBN 0-8047-3641-3.* Emerson, W. Eric; Sons of Privilege: The Charleston Light Dragoons in the Civil War, University of South Carolina Press, (2005) ISBN 1-57003-592-X.* Hess, Stephen; Americas Political Dynasties, Transaction Publishers, (1997) ISBN 1-56000-911-X.* Madigan, Patrick F.; A Biographical Index of American Public Men, BiblioBazaar, (2008) ISBN 0-554-40642-X.* Martin, Samuel J., Southern Hero, Matthew Calbraith Butler, Stackpole Books, (2001) ISBN 0-8117-0899-3- .* Porter, Robert Percival; Industrial Cuba: Being a Study of Present Commercial and Industrial Conditions, with Suggestions as to the Opportunities Presented in the Island for American Capital, Enterprise, and Labour, G. P. Putnams Sons, (1899).* Wakelyn, Jon L., Biographical Dictionary of the Confederacy, Greenwood Press, 1977, ISBN 0-8371-6124-X.* Warner, Ezra J., Generals in Gray: The Lives of the Confederate Commanders, Louisiana State University Press, 1959, ISBN 0807108235* Welsh, Jack D.; Medical Histories of Confederate Generals, Kent State University Press, (1999) ISBN 0-87338-649-3.* Wittenberg, Eric J., Rhea, Gordon C.; Glory Enough for All: Sheridans Second Raid and the Battle of Trevilian Station, University of Nebraska Press, (2007) ISBN 0-8032-5967-0.*States Congress; Official Congressional Directory (1882).Further reading* Brooks, Ulysses Robert, Butler and His Cavalry in the War of Secession 18611865. original date of publication 1909, republished, 1991 J.J. Fox, Camden, South Carolina: South Carolina Regimentals Series, by Guild Bindery Press, Oxford Miss.* Martin, Samuel J., Southern Hero: Matthew Calbraith Butler, Confederate General, Hampton Redshirt, and U.S. Senator. Mechanicsburg, Pennsylvania: Stackpole Books, 2001. ISBN 0-8117-0899-3.*Official Report of the Battle of Hamburg (a.k.a. Hamburg Massacre)External linksButlerButler
3256335
Gold_Belt_Byway
thumb|Scenery along the byway.The Gold Belt Byway is a national scenic byway located entirely within the state of Colorado in the States of America. The byway received its name because it runs through Colorados gold country. It connects the gold mining districts to each other and to the Arkansas Valley.  HistoryThe Gold Belt Byway is made up mostly of roads that connected mining towns to the Arkansas Valley. On the byway you will see many abandoned mines, buildings, and towns that prospered during the Gold Rush. Along the byway you will see numerous buildings that have been unchanged since the mines went bust. Although gold is no longer the main mining export of this region many mines still exist. Roads The Gold Belt Byway contains many roads. Most of them are dirt roads that are narrow and run through canyons and other geological features. Phantom Canyon Road Phantom Canyon Road is a scenic road that connects Caon City and Victor. The road goes through Phantom Canyon. The road has two tunnels and three elevated bridges. It has many camp locations. It was originally the route of a railroad that connected Florence and Cripple Creek. The route contains many narrow roads and high wooden bridges. The road is unpaved. Shelf Road thumb|A Climber In the Shelf Road Portion of the byway.Shelf Road is a portion of the byway going through Canyon. It was originally used as a stagecoach road. The cliffs of the canyon near Shelf Road offer some of the best sport climbing in Colorado. High Park Road High Park road was the first route to connect gold mines with the Arkansas Valley. Unlike Shelf Road and Phantom Canyon road it doesnt run through a canyon and is paved. High Park Road is located in area where cattle ranching takes place. Teller County Road 1 Teller County Road 1 was the first stagecoach route to Cripple Creek and thus it is called County Road 1. It is a paved road. It offers diverse views of scenery. For example along the road are steep mountains and rolling hills where cattle graze. Major Landmarks thumb|Pikes Peakthumb|Window RockMajor landmarks along the route include the following:*Peak*Gorge*Phantom Canyon Towns Along Route Important towns along the byway include:*Creek*Victor*Florence *Caon City *Florissant*Divide External links *Gold Belt Byway*Byways.org*A journey through phantom canyon
3264812
2006_in_Canada
 dn32030sEvents from the year 2006 in Canada.IncumbentsEventsJanuary to March*January 1 - Thirty cities across the province of Quebec are reconstituted as the result of a referendum held on June 20, 2004.*January 1029 seniors injured in a Toronto bus crash.*January 23 - The 39th Canadian general election results in the Party of Canada holding the largest number of seats in Parliament, meaning Harper will become  the first Conservative Prime Minister in 13 years.*February 1 - Justice John Gomery releases the final report of a Royal Commission investigating the federal scandal.*February 6 - Harper is sworn in as the 22nd Minister of Canada.*February 11 - MacDonald wins the leadership of the Scotia Progressive Conservative Party.*February 24 - MacDonald is sworn in as the 32nd of Nova Scotia.*February 24 - Rothstein is nominated to the Court of Canada by Prime Minister Stephen Harper. Rothstein will be the first Supreme Court nominee to face an all-party committee hearing in Parliament before his appointment is confirmed.*February 24 - An earthquake of 4.5 in magnitude strikes the Valley ranging from Eastern Ontario to Western Quebec.*March 2 - The Court of Canada rules in favour of Gurbaj Singh Multani, saying that kirpan can be worn in Canadian schools*March 23 - a British led multinational military operation involving American, British, Canadian and Iraqi forces results in the rescue of three Christian Peacemaker hostages held in Iraq for nearly four months; Briton Kember and Canadians Singh Sooden and James Loney.April to June*April 16 - Hunter Jim Martell kills a bear hybrid on Island in the Territories.*May 15 - The village of Ontario has its 150th anniversary.*May 16 - 2006 Census day*May 29 - A labour dispute leads to a one-day shutdown of the Transit Commission, stranding commuters in Ontario.*May 31 - 100 millimeters of rain in a few hours caused landslides in and around the small town of La Tuque, in central Quebec, damaging roads and flooding houses. State emergency was decreted right away and people has been evacuated.*June 2 - Terrorism plotmore than 400 police officers raid homes in Toronto and Mississauga, Ontario, and arrest 15 people (10 men and five youths), part of a terrorist cell. All men were born in Canada and were reportedly planning to attack the Parliament in Ottawa, the Bank of Toronto, some military installations, kidnap deputees and behead prime minister Harper.*June 13 - The Scotia general election, 2006 is won by Rodney MacDonalds Conservatives.*June 26 - Prime minister Harper apologizes on behalf of the Canadian government for the head tax.July to September*July 7 - Two police officers are shot and killed in Saskatchewan. See Incident.*July 17 - A series of severe thunderstorms hits Ontario, causing the worst damage to the provinces power grid since the Storm of 1998 and killing two people. Some communities in the Sudbury, Manitoulin and Nipissing regions go without power for a week before it can be restored. See the Great Lakes-Atlantic Coast derecho.*August 2 - The day after record-breaking heat in Ontario and Quebec and just two weeks following another series of powerful storms, severe thunderstorms hit a vast swath of country in central and eastern Ontario. Eight confirmed tornadoes touch down, the single largest one-day outbreak in the province since 1985. The two strongest tornadoes are rated F2, one near Bancroft and other a direct hit on the town of Combermere in Renfrew County. Close to 200,000 residents lose power in the storms and more than 20,000 remain without power for over one week after the event. Extensive property and forest damage results. Amazingly no fatalities result.*August 9 - Journalist Kay publishes a controversial piece in the Post, The Rise of Quebecistan, which accuses several Quebec politicians of endorsing terrorism and anti-semitism.*August 13 - The XVI International AIDS Conference opens in Toronto. Prime Minister Harper is widely criticized in the media for declining to attend.*August 26 - May is elected leader of the Party of Canada*September 13 - Two people are killed and nineteen injured in the College shooting in Montreal*September 16 - Wong publishes a controversial piece in Globe and Mail, Get under the desk, alleging that Dawson College shooter Gill was motivated by linguistic and cultural alienation from Quebec society.*September 18 - The Brunswick general election, 2006 is won by Grahams Liberal Party*September 30 - A highway overpass on Autoroute 19 in Laval collapses, killing five people and injuring six others.October to December*October 3 - Shawn Graham becomes premier of New Brunswick, replacing Lord*October 18 - MP Turner is suspended from the Conservative caucus for criticizing Prime Minister Stephen Harper in his online blog*October 19 - Environment Minister Ambrose introduces the controversial Air Act, which is criticized by environmentalists and Opposition politicians for offering virtually no substantive action on climate change until at least 2011. During debate on the act, several Opposition politicians allege that they hear External Affairs Minister MacKay refer to Liberal MP Stronach as a dog.*October 20 - The Radio-television and Telecommunications Commission approves the sale of controversial City radio station CHOI-FM to Media.*October 23 - Inco Limited shareholders accept a takeover offer by Brazilian mining corporation Vale do Rio Doce*October 25 - and Tatiana Hogan, twins, are born in Vancouver*November 25 - First round of balloting in the Conservative Association of Alberta leadership election, 2006. As no candidate achieved 50% of the votes, a runoff was held on December 2 between top three finishers Dinning, Morton and Stelmach.*November 27 - The House of Commons votes to recognise the Qubcois ethnic group as a nation within Canada in an informal motion.*November 27 - Byelections are held in the ridings of North Centre and Repentigny; Pearson retains London North Centre for the Liberals, and Gravel retains Repentigny for the Qubcois.*December 2 - Party of Canada leadership election, 2006 was held.  Liberal delegates select Dion as their new leader.  Also the second round of balloting in the Conservative Association of Alberta leadership election, 2006 selects Stelmach as their new leader.*December 14 - Stelmach is sworn in as Premier of AlbertaFull date unknown*The land dispute ecalates when the Provincial Police move in to remove the protesters but are stopped.*Ltd. is acquired by Swiss mining company Xstrata*Wireless to begin deployment of Canadas first 3G Wireless Network.Arts and literatureNew music*Aglukark, I Will Return*Wine, Speaking*Avila, Somewhere Else*Delerium, du Monde*Furtado, Loose*Lapointe, Fort des Mal-Aims*Gratton, Il tait une fois dans lest*Malajube, Trompe-loeil*McKennitt, Ancient Muse*Sguin, Lettres ouvertes*Talent, Talent II*Hip, Container*Kreviazuk, Ghost StoriesNew books*Stewart Anderson, The Toronto You Are Leaving*Atwood, Disorder*Peter Behrens, Law of Dreams*Coupland, jPod*Fradkin, Honour Among Men*Hage, Niros Game*Irani, Song of Kahunsha*Munro, View from Castle Rock*ONeill, for Little CriminalsAwards*April 2 - Awards of 2006*June 11 - Canadian musical, Drowsy Chaperone, wins five Awards*September 23 - Inaugural Festival held in Montreal.*November 21 - Governor Generals Awards.*Foster, musical producer, is appointed to the of Canada*Steve Smith, comedian, is appointed to the Order of Canada*Thompson, playwright, is appointed to the Order of Canada*Lee, musician, is appointed to the Order of Canada*duPont, artist, wins the Bell Canada Award in Video Art*Legriss Nerve Squall is named winner of the Canadian Poetry Prize*Giller Prize - Lam, and Miraculous CuresFilm*January 20  Karla, the controversial movie about the murders of two Canadian teens, Mahaffy and French, is released in Canada.*September 7  Journals of Knud Rasmussen*October 11  Media reports announce that Cop, Bad Cop has beaten Porkys to become the top-grossing Canadian film of all time in domestic box office; these are later disputed as not having taken inflation into account.*C.R.A.Z.Y. is named best picture at the Genie Awards.TelevisionSport*January 6 - The Junior Hockey Team wins its 12th gold medal in the 2006 Junior Hockey Championship*January 8 - Nissen, Bean, Shouldice and Blais finish first, second, third, and fourth in mens Freestyle Grand Prix at the Cup Aerials.*January 915 - Figure Skating Championships(Ottawa to Host 2006 Canadian Figure Skating Championships at Civic Centre | Ottawa Start)**Mens medalists - Buttle, Gold; Sandhu, Silver; Sawyer, Bronze.**Womens medalists - Rochette, Gold; Leung, Silver; Hawker, Bronze.**Pairs medalists - Marcoux / Buntin, Gold; Dub / Davison, Silver; Wakamatsu / Fecteau, Bronze.**Dance - Dubreuil / Lauzon, Gold; Wing / Lowe, Silver; Virtue / Moir, Bronze.*January 24 -  Lemieux announces his second retirement.*Winter Olympic Games held in Turin, Italy:**February 11 - Heil wins gold in style skiing, womens monguls**February 12 - Klassen wins bronze in Ladies 3000 m skating**February 14 - Renner and Scott win silver medals in Ladies Team Sprint in Skiing**February 15 - Leblanc-Boucher wins bronze in the Ladies 500 m in Track Speed Skating.**February 16 - Buttle wins bronze medal for mens skating solid free skate.**February 16 - Canadas mens speed skating team wins silver for mens team pursuit in skating**February 16 - Canadas womens speed skating team wins silver for womens team pursuit in skating**February 16 - Hollingsworth-Richards wins bronze in womens skeleton.**February 17 - Gibson and Pain win gold and silver respectively in mens skeleton.**February 17 - Maltais wins bronze in ladies snowboard cross.**February 17 - Pain wins silver in mens skeleton.**February 19 - Lueders and Brown win silver for two:man competition in bobsleigh.**February 19 - Klassen wins silver in the ladies 1000 m for skating.**February 20 - The Canadian womens hockey team win gold.**February 22 - Groves wins silver in the womens 1500 m in skating.**February 22 - Canadas womens speed skating team wins silver for womens 3000 m relay in track speed skating**February 22 - Klassen wins gold in the Ladies 1500 m in Skating.**February 22 - Crawford wins gold in the Ladies Sprint for Cross Country Skiing.**February 23 - The Canadian womens curling team wins bronze by beating Norway 115.**February 24 - The Canadian mens curling team beats Finland 10:4 and wins gold.**February 25 - Hughes wins gold in the Ladies 5000 m in skating.**February 25 - Tremblay wins a medal in track speed skatings mens 500 m.**February 25 - The mens speed skating team wins silver in track speed skatings mens 5000 m relay.**February 25 - Klassen wins bronze in the Ladies 5000 m in skating, giving her a total of 5 medals making her the best Canadian Olympian ever.*May 7 - Basketball Association: Canadian Nash is named NBA MVP for the 2nd year in a row.*September 17 - WWE: Canadian Stratus retires from professional wrestling.*November 19 - Football League: The Grey Cup is held in Winnipeg, Manitoba. The Lions beat the Alouettes 2514.Births*October 25 - and Tatiana Hogan, twinsDeathsJanuary to June*January 4 - Layton, poet (b.1912)*February 24 - John Martin, broadcaster (b.1947)*February 25 - Margaret Gibson, novelist and short story writer (b.1948)*March 11 - Geoffrion, ice hockey player (b.1931)*April 16 - Horwood, novelist and non-fiction writer (b.1923)*April 25 - Jacobs, urbanist, writer and activist (b.1916)*May 6 - Saxberg, television journalist and news anchor (b.1958)*May 10 - M. Rosenthal, columnist and newspaper editor (b.1922)*June 12 - Thomson, 2nd Baron Thomson of Fleet, businessman and art collector (b.1923)July to September*August 9 - Melissa Hayden, ballerina (b.1923)*August 23 - Ferguson, jazz trumpet player and bandleader (b.1928)*August 24 - Simoneau, lyric tenor (b.1916)*Weinzweig, composer (b.1913)*August 28 - Sauvageau, politician (b.1963)*September 13 - De Sousa (b.1988)*Gill, murderer responsible for the College shooting (b.1981)*September 16 - Curry, ice hockey player (b.1925)*September 29 - Vachon, educator and Cardinal of the Catholic Church (b.1912)October to December*October 16 - Sinclair, broadcaster, playwright and polymath (b.1921)*November 4 - Arthur Calder, politician, first Indian to be elected to any legislature in Canada (b.1915)*November 7 - Parker, American football player*November 14 - Banks, broadcaster and producer (b.1917)*November 22 - Allan Cameron, folk singer (b.1938)Referencesau Canada  
3272577
Silkstone
Silkstone is a village and parish in the Borough of Barnsley in Yorkshire, England.  It is situated in the foothills of the Pennines, between the towns of Barnsley and Penistone, and includes the village of Silkstone Common.  At the 2001 census it had a population of 2,954.(Census 2001)Silkstone is twinned with Saint-Florent-des-Bois in France.HistoryThe name Silkstone is Old English in origin and is thought to derive from the Anglo-Saxon mans name Sylc and the suffix tn meaning a farmstead, giving Sylcs farmstead.() The earliest known written record of Silkstone is the Book of 1086, when Silkstone is referred to as a part of the manor of Cawthorne:In Calthorne (Cawthorne) Ailric had three carucates of land to be taxed and there may be two ploughs there. The same now has it of Ilbert; himself two ploughs there, and four villanes with two ploughs. There is a priest and a church, wood pasture two miles long and two broad; the whole manor three miles long and two broad. Value in King Edwards time forty shillings, now twenty shillings. To this manor belongs Silchestone (Silkstone), one carucate and a half.Image:Silkstone Church.jpg|thumb|left|250px|of All Saints, SilkstoneThe church mentioned may be a predecessor of the current Church of All Saints, the parish church in Silkstone().  Silkstone parish originally included Cawthorne, Bretton, Cumberland, Barnsley, Dodworth, Stainborough, Thurgoland, and Hoylandswaine.The Silkstone seam is at its shallowest in the Silkstone area, and mining was an important local industry. In 1809 a waggonway was built through the village by the Barnsley Canal Navigation Company(). The waggonway was used to transport coal from collieries in the Silkstone valley to Cawthorne. A memorial commemorating the waggonway stands in the village.()Notable PersonsMidgley, former Emmerdale actress lived in Silkstone for 8 (1994-2001) years-she is currently concentrating on her studies but is believed to want to make a return to the small screen in the future. She returned to Bradford with her family where they originate from.SportThe village has sporting facilities, in the shape of the Pavilion. It is host to both a football and cricket team, with both sports being played at junior and senior levels. Silkstone is frequented by ramblers as many walking routes start from the village.Culture and attractionsThe Church of All Saints was constructed in the 12th century (with alterations/renovations in the 15th and 19th centuries), it is a Grade I listed building.(). It is locally known as the minster of the moors. The Grade II listed Noblethorpe Hall near the village was built in the early 19th century for the Clarke family (local colliery owners).() During War II it was used as an army camp. House Hamlet is located below Silkstone Church and was the site of a 17th century pottery and 18th century glassworks. English Heritage have deemed this an underground national ancient monument.(No 35494 authorised by the Secretary of State for Culutre, Media and Sport on 12 June 2003.) Pot House Hamlet today houses many independent retail outlets.One of the villages famous sons was Charles Brooke, Esq, FSA (1748 - 1794) who became Herald in 1777. He was crushed to death in a crowd at the Haymarket Theatre in London on 3 February 1794.thumb|300px|The Silkstone Wagonway MemorialThe Wagonway runs through Silkstone and also as far as its neighbouring village Cawthorne, it was used as a route for the transportation of coal from the nearby mines. The sleeper stones were originally laid in the early 19th century when coal mining was booming, and was used throughout until the 20th century. The stones can still be from the ring o bells pub to Pot House Hamlet on the route. Today, the Wagonway is a scenic route ideal for country walks, with storey boards, it is preserved as a historic route and is part of the villages history.The village is also home to Old Silkstone Band. The band has a long history dating back almost 150 years. In recent times, the band has been very successful, competing for the first time in the championship section, against more famous bands like Grimethorpe and Black Dyke. (the Championship section, is the brass band version of footballs premier league!)It is a band run without major sponsporship, and is well supported by the villages of Silkstone and Silkstone Common.Silkstone CommonSilkstone Common has Junior and Infants Schools, a railway station, a single local shop and the Station Inn.One of the most notable events in the history of the village was the Huskar Pit Disaster, which occurred on 4 July 1838 when a freak storm flooded part of the mine, killing 26 children, the youngest was 7 years, the oldest 17. A historical account of this event has been documented in the book entitled Children of the Dark.Notable buildings include Knabbes Hall which was built in late 17th century for William and Elizabeth Wood of Wortley Forge.()Silkstone Common house prices are high due to the local amenities and close proximity to Grammar School.References(South Yorkshire)pl:Silkstone
3282563
WA_Inc
File:Curtin Foundation.jpg|thumb|right| A Curtin Foundation gathering Left to right, rear: Denis Cullity, John Horgan, Alan Bond, Connell, Ric Stowe, James McCusker, Rod Evans; Front: Parry, prime minister Hawke, state premier Burke, John Roberts and former Perth lord mayor Ernest Lee-Steere WA Inc was a scandal in Western Australia. In the 1980s, the state government, which was led for much of the period by premier Burke, engaged in business dealings with several prominent businessmen, including Alan Bond, Connell and Warren Anderson.  These dealings resulted in a loss of public money, estimated at a minimum of $600 million and the insolvency of several large corporations. Bond and Connell were major contributors to the party in government, the Labor Party and its remarkable fundraising structure, the Curtin Foundation.() A commission (the Royal Commission into Commercial Activities of Government and Other Matters) was established in 1990 by Labor premier Lawrence to examine the dealings.In 1991, political scientist Paddy OBrien identified the members of the government most associated with WA Inc deals as premier Burke and his successor Dowding, deputy premier David Parker, industrial development minister Grill and attorney-general Berinson.(OBrien P. The Origins and Development of WAs Executive State, in The Executive State &mdash;WA Inc & The Constitution, (Perth 1991).) Corporate failures As an outcome of questionable business practices, precipitated by the stock market crash, several major businesses based in Perth found themselves in difficulties and ultimately went into bankruptcy.  These included:*Rothwells. Described as a merchant bank owned by Connell, but more accurately known in business circles as a of last resort, Rothwells had built up a stable of businesses it had acquired during the 1980s through aggressive takeovers.  In October 1987, investors made a run on the bank and it had to close its doors.  Burke, on behalf of the government, provided a $150 million government guarantee.  Connell had previously been the adviser to the 1983 government purchase of Northern Mining from Corporation for between $7 and $12 million over value but, as Burke knew at the time and concealed from parliament, Connell was also acting for Bond Corporation.*Bell Group, Holmes  Courts flagship company, encountered a cash crisis and Bond Corporation and the government, through the state Government Employees   Superannuation Board (GESB), acquired major stakes in the business, allowing Holmes  Court to walk away with $350 million.*Bond Corporation&mdash;see Alan Bond.A proposed petrochemical plant was to be built as a joint venture between Laurie Connell and Dallas Dempster, both being businessmen with close government connections. $100,000 was outlaid as a deposit on a block of land at Kwinana but otherwise the proposal did not proceed beyond designs and stood as a basis for extravagant fund-raising, loans, collateral transactions, development of proposed plant, management fees to Bond Corporation and, eventually, was sold for $400 million &mdash;$175 million being provided by a government agency, WA Government Holdings. Losses incurred by the government The government had lent large sums of money, offered financial guarantees and acquired assets at inflated prices. Because of the connections between many of the deals and cross-ownership of businesses involved, it is difficult to say precisely where the governments fault started and ended.  A minimum loss to the state of $600M has been reported.http://www.smh.com.au/news/opinion/a-role-in-the-fall-of-a-labor-mate-conveniently-omitted-from-theeulogies/2005/07/19/1121538972499.htmlIn 1991, barrister Lawrence published what he regarded as a conservative itemisation of the governments actual losses. The figures are summarised as follows:: The royal commission On 19 November 1990, Lawrence, the then Labor premier, announced her governments intention to hold a commission to inquire into certain matters. This decision followed more than a year of strong public advocacy by the activist group, for Fair and Open Government(Lawrence B., WA Inc: Why Didnt We Hear The Alarm Bells? (link below)) headed by the premiers brother, barrister Lawrence, Professor Emeritus Webb and prominent political scientist Paddy OBrien. OBrien edited The Burke Ambush, subtitled Corporatism and Society in Western Australia, which was the first substantial expos of Burkes pro-corporate governmenta collection of articles by himself and other Western Australian writers, including Hal Colebatch, Robert Bennett, Joseph Poprzeczny, John Hyde, Paul Nichols, Michael McKinley, Anthony Dale and Tom Herzfeld.(OBrien, P (ed.) The Burke Ambush: Corporatism and Society in WA Apollo Press, Nedlands 1986))The commission of three was headed by Kennedy and joined by Sir Wilson and Peter Brinsden, with a brief To inquire into and report whether there had been corruption, illegal conduct, improper conduct, or bribery on the part of any person or corporation in the affairs, investment decisions and business dealings of the Government of Western Australia or its agencies.Main findingsAfter approximately 21 months of enquiries and hearings, the commissions final report began:1.1.1 The Commission has found conduct and practices on the part of certain persons involved in government in the period from 1983 to 1989 which were such as to place our governmental system at risk. Unfortunately, some of that conduct and someof those practices were peculiar to Western Australia; but there is no reason to believe that many of the fundamental questions raised by our inquiry were unique to this period or to this State. On the contrary, as detailed studies in other States and overseas clearly demonstrate, they have been raised elsewhere as a consequence of events similar to those which we have experienced.1.1.2 Some ministers elevated personal or party advantage over their constitutional obligation to act in the public interest. The decision to lend Government support to the rescue of Rothwells in October 1987 was principally that of Mr Burke as Premier. Mr Burkes motives in supporting the rescue were not related solely to proper governmental concerns. They derived in part from his well-established relationship with Mr Connell, the chairman and major shareholder of Rothwells, and from his desire to preserve the standing of the Australian Labor Party in the eyes of those sections of the business community from which it had secured much financial support.1.1.3 Subsequently, Mr Dowding, as Premier, presided over a disastrous series of decisions designed to support Rothwells when it was or should have been clear to him and to those ministers closely involved that Rothwells was no longer a viablefinancial institution. This culminated in the decision to involve the Government, through WAGH, in the Kwinana petrochemical project as a means of removing the Governments contingent liability for certain of the debts of Rothwells. Electoral advantage was preferred to the public interest.1.1.4 Personal associations and the manner in which electoral contributions were obtained could only create the public perception that favour could be bought, that favour would be done.(WA Inc Royal Commission Final Report)In an earlier finding, the commission had summarised:Government was not entitled to risk the public resources of the State without its actions being subjected to critical scrutiny and review. Effective accountability was a casualty of its entrepreneurial zeal. Influence in the conduct of this States public affairs was captured by a small group of self-interested businessmen.(WA Inc Royal Commission Report, Vol. 6)Summary of main issues(Summarised from table of contents of the main report of the WA Inc Royal Commission, downloadable as a PDF file from Government Publications 12 November 1992) ;Report Volume I:The gas sales agreements entered into by the Energy Commission of Western Australia for the purchase of natural gas from the North West Shelf Joint Venturers:The contracts relating to the Dampier to Perth natural gas pipeline project:Financial assistance by Government to Bunbury Foods Limited:Government Employees Superannuation Board (formerly the Superannuation Board) involvement in the Head development;Report Volume II:Government Employees Superannuation Board (formerly the Superannuation Board) involvement in the Fremantle Anchorage development:The acquisition of Northern Mining Corporation NL in 1983:The Burswood Island Casino:The sale of the Midland Abattoir site in 1986;Report Volume III:Purchase of the Fremantle Gas and Coke Company by the Energy Commission of Western Australia in 1986:Swan Building Society:Teachers Credit Society;Report Volume IV:The rescue of Rothwells Limited; the immediate aftermath of the rescue and continuing liquidity problems:SGICs acquisition of shares in BHP Limited:Rothwells from mid November 1987 to early April 1988:SGICs acquisition of shares in the Bell Group Limited and subsequent NCSC investigations:The Kwinana petrochemical project to the signing of the memorandum of understanding;Report Volume V:The Kwinana petrochemical project to the settlement on 17 October 1988:Events from the PICL settlements to the liquidation of Rothwells:Conclusions on Rothwells-related matters:Central City property transactions entered into from 1984 onwards by the Australian Development Corporation, the Government Employees Superannuation Board (formerly the Superannuation Board) and the State Government Insurance Commission;Report Volume VI:Allegations of bribery with respect to planning decisions in the of Stirling for Observation City:Other allegations arising from the trial of Robert Mark Smith and Robert Paul Martin held in the District Court of Western Australia before His Honour Judge Keall and a jury in October 1990, including those with respect to surveillance activities:The adequacy of the police investigation of the matters referred to in chapters 23 and 24:Political donations:ConclusionCosts and outcomesThe royal commission cost $30 million, including $12.5 million in witness costs. Of the latter, $3.6 million funded Burkes own legal fees ($1.71 million) and those of David Parker ($1.92 million).Burke and his predecessor, the Liberal premier OConnor ultimately served prison sentences as a result of convictions which arose from findings of the commission. The premier immediately after Burke, Dowding, and public servant Len Brush were both found to have acted improperly.ReferencesNotesFurther reading** External links * W.A. Government Commissions of Inquiry links to the WA Inc Royal Commission reports (PDFs)*** Bond, Bell and Holmes  Court: Chronology at Ketupa.net, media industry reference* Alan Bond at Ketupa.net * Holmes a Court and Bell at Ketupa.net
3292076
Ilmenau
Ilmenau is a town located in the district of Ilm-Kreis, Thuringia, Germany.Ilmenau is situated in the valley of the Ilm river, at an altitude of 431 metres (1,415 feet) above sea level,( and is the biggest town in Ilm-Kreis district, with 6,200 students studying at the Universitt Ilmenau. The surrounding area is marked by the Forest and its mountains. The highest mountain of Ilmenau is the Kickelhahn (German for rooster, which is also found in the coat of arms of Ilmenau), with a height of 861 metres. The highest mountains of the Thuringian forest are the Schneekopf (meaning snow-head) with a height of 978 metres and the Groer Beerberg (982.9 meters), a few kilometres to the south-west of Ilmenau. Goethe also enjoyed staying in Ilmenau, mostly on holiday. Etymology The name comes from the German words Ulmen (i.e. Elms) and Aue (i.e. floodplain), in reference to the floodplain of the Ilm river, which was covered with elms before the foundation of the town. The town animals of Ilmenau are the hen and the goat.GeographyIlmenau sits between the Forest to the southwest and the lower hills and plains of the Thringer Becken (to the northeast).  The mineral resources important in the history of Ilmenau were largely deposited as a result of the uplift of the metamorphic rock underlying the Thuringian Forest.(SubdivisionsThere are five nearby villages belonging to the town of Ilmenau:*Oberprlitz*Unterprlitz*Heyda*Roda*ManebachNeighbouring municipalitiesImage:Ortseingangsschild Ilmenau.jpg|thumb|left|Sign at the beginning of the town area, reading University town of Ilmenau, Ilm-Kreis.*Erfurt,  in north*Gotha,  in northwest*Weimar,  in northeast*Arnstadt,  in north*Saalfeld and Rudolstadt,  in east*Suhl,  in southwest*Meiningen,  in southwestVicinityNearly 80,000 people live around the city in an area of , which has Ilmenau as a centre of their work, school, shops and other supplies. The biggest towns and villages nearby are Grfenroda (3,600 inhab.), Knigsee (3,500 inhab.), Gehren (3,300 inhab.) and Langewiesen (3,200 inhab.).Historythumb|Main stationIlmenau was founded in the 13th century, it is first named in 1273. Since 1341 it has some town rights. Between 1660 and 1920 it belonged to Saxe-Weimar, earlier the majors about Ilmenau were the Kfernburger (from Arnstadt), the Schwarzburger (from Arnstadt, later Rudolstadt), and the Henneberger (from Meiningen).Between 1471 to 1626, copper mining made an important contribution tothe economy of Ilmenau.  In 1611, these mines produced an estimated 38 tons of copper and 188 kg of silver.  Production reached these levels again in the 1730s, during a brief revival of copper mining under the leadership of Wolfgang von Goethe. Later, in the 19th and 20th centuries, fluorite and Braunstein (manganese ore) were mined here.(((In the early 19th century, Ilmenau was one of several places where people went for water cure treatments at hydropathic establishments. Ilmenaus hydropathic establishment was serviced by Drs Schwabe, Fitzler, Baumbach, and Preller.((  Until 1870, Ilmenau stayed a small town of circa 3000 inhabitants, but then the revolution reached the town. Some factories for porcelain (Graf von Henneberg Porzellan since 1777), glasswares (the Sophienhtte since 1852) and toys developed. In 1879 the town got a railway connection to Erfurt (north), 1881 to Gehren/Grobreitenbach (south-east) and 1904 to Schleusingen (south-west). The university was founded in 1894 as Thringisches Technikum. Now, it is the Universitt Ilmenau, where the ISWI takes place every two years. The European Luge Championships 1934 took place in the town.1952 the district Kreis Ilmenau was founded. It had an area of about  with a population of circa 70,000 inhabitants. Ilmenau has been the capital of this district. In 1994 it was merged with Kreis Arnstadt in the North to the new district Ilm-Kreis with Arnstadt as capital.Development of number of inhabitantsEconomythumb|Oldest building of the universityThe economy of Ilmenau is marked by production of glasswares and some high-tech-industries like programming software. Ilmenau has a stronger economy than other Eastern German regions. The unemployment rate remains high at 11.3% (Oct. 2009), but it is getting smaller. Per capita annual earnings are about 14,000 Euros. 300px|thumb|Land usage in the town of Ilmenau (red areas are urban, yellow are arable, and green are wooded.)Ilmenau is the locale of the Universitt Ilmenau with circa 6,200 students.InfrastructureIlmenau is crossed by the federal highways 4 (Erfurt-Nrnberg), 87 (Ilmenau-Leipzig) and 88 (Eisenach-Ilmenau-Jena). A motorway A 71 from Erfurt to Wrzburg runs five kilometres to the north. There is still a railway to Erfurt while the other former railway lines to Schleusingen and Grobreitenbach are out of operation. The high-speed rail line nearby is under construction.In the arts* In literature Ilmenau is (hypothetically) one of the closest towns to the fictional displaced town of Grantville Virginia and is featured in various deep background stories published in Grantville Gazettes e-publications.International relationsIlmenau is twinned with:*Ash, Ohio*Saarland*Wetzlar*Mure Notable persons * Behrendt, luger, born in Ilmenau* Dpel, nuclear physicist, died in Ilmenau* Fiedler, luger, born in Ilmenau* Gutheil-Schoder, soprano, died in Ilmenau* Henkel, biathlete born in Ilmenau* Ludwig von Knebel, poet, retired to Ilmenau* Kraue, luger, born in Ilmenau* Lange, bobsledder, born in Ilmenau* Libavius, chemist, taught in Ilmenau* Lbe, politician, worked as a printer in Ilmenau* Jens Mller, luger, lives in Ilmenau* Oberhoffner, luger, born in Ilmenau* Platzeck, politician, studied and graduated in Ilmenau* Reinhardt, Nazi Finance Minister, born in Ilmenau* Sauckel, Nazi war criminal, studied in Ilmenau* Schrter, singer, died in Ilmenau* Sendel, biathlete, born in IlmenauReferencesrefs( Ilmenau mentioned several places, but see p.vi for reference to Dr Fitzler.)(Atlas of Minerals website)()( Translations via Google.)()( Cites doctors practicing at Ilmenaus hydropathic establishment.)af:Ilmenaubs:Ilmenaubg:ca:Ilmenaucs:Ilmenauda:Ilmenaude:Ilmenaudsb:Ilmenauet:Ilmenaues:Ilmenaueo:Ilmenaufa:fr:Ilmenaugl:Ilmenauhr:Ilmenauit:Ilmenau()hu:Ilmenaunl:Ilmenauno:Ilmenauuz:Ilmenaupl:Ilmenaupt:Ilmenauro:Ilmenauru:sr:fi:Ilmenausv:Ilmenauvo:Ilmenauwar:Ilmenauzh:
3296040
Diamond_Trading_Company
The Diamond Trading Company (DTC) is the rough diamond sales and distribution arm of the Beers Family of Companies. The DTC sorts, values and sells approximately 75% of the worlds rough diamonds by value. The DTC has a combination of wholly owned and joint venture operations in South Africa (DTCSA), Botswana (DTCB), Namibia (NDTC) and the United Kingdom (DTC).(Sales and distribution  The De Beers Group)The DTC sells diamonds that are sourced primarily from De Beers mining operations in South Africa and Canada, and through its partnerships with the governments of Botswana, Namibia and Tanzania. Sorters in London, Kimberley, Windhoek and Gaborone sort these diamonds into approximately 12,000 different categories based on size, shape, quality and colour. DTC clients are known as Sightholders, and are selected by a process known as Supplier of Choice.(Supplier of Choice  The De Beers Group) There are 79 Sightholder companies who buy the rough diamonds from the DTC and its partner offices. The Sightholders travel to London, Kimberley, Gaborone and Windhoek ten times a year for their Sight.(Sights and Sightholders  The De Beers Group)DTC Sales in 2009 were $3.84bn.() The DTC also develops and produces diamond technology, which ensures consistency of DTC rough diamond assortments for its Sightholder clients.The DTCs Sightholders are required to comply with the De Beerss Best Practice Principles (BPP)s which set out various objective standards of conduct within three main areas  Business responsibilities; Social responsibilities; Environmental responsibilities. The BPPs ensure that the De Beers Family of Companies, DTC Sightholders and applicable third parties are operating to the specific ethical, legal, professional, social and environmental standards. The DTC also requires its clients to be 100% committed to the Kimberley Process.(Best Practice Principles  The De Beers Group)The Kimberley process started when Southern African diamond-producing countries met in Kimberley, South Africa, in May 2000, to discuss ways to stop the trade of diamonds and ensure that diamond purchases were not funding violence or terrorism activities. In December 2000, the Nations General Assembly adopted a landmark resolution supporting the creation of an international certification scheme for rough diamonds. By November 2002, negotiations between governments, the international diamond industry and civil society organisations resulted in the creation of the Process Certification Scheme (KPCS). The KPCS sets out the requirements for controlling rough diamond production and trade. The KPCS became effective in 2003.()ReferencesSee also* Diamonds* (gemstone)* Process* as an investment   Related links*De Beers Group  Sales and Distribution *De Beers Group  Sights and Sightholders *De Beers Group  De Beers Reports
3304108
Structured_content
Structured content refers to information or content that has been broken down and classified using metadata.  Structured content often refers to information that has been classified using XML, but can also relate to information classified using other standard or proprietary forms of metadata. See also *mining
3308004
Hearst_Memeorial_Mining_Building
#redirect Memorial Mining Building
3315728
Cannington
Cannington may refer to:* Somerset (see also of Cynwit)* Ontario, a village* Western Australia, a suburb of Perth* Queensland, a mining location* (electoral district), an electorate of the Saskatchewan Legislative Assembly* district of Cannington, an electorate of the Western Australian Legislative AssemblyCannington
3320908
Empire_Zinc_Company
The Empire Zinc Company was a subsidiary of the Jersey Zinc Company.  It originally held claims in the Gilman Mining district in Colorado.  From 1912 to 1915, the New Jersey Zinc Company acquired and consolidated the mines as the Eagle Mines and operated Empire Zinc Company as a subsidiary.  It also bought the town of Colorado and ran it as a company town.  The Eagle Mine site at Gilman is an EPA Superfund site.The 1954 movie of the Earth was based on the 1951 strike against New Jersey Zinc Companys Empire Zinc mine in New Mexico. 
3328317
Paddy_Blagden
Brigadier Patrick Martin Blagden CBE is a retired Army officer and was the Nations foremost expert on de-mining working for UNMAS. Born 15 March 1935, Paddy Blagden spent nearly 35 years in the British Army, of which the last 9 years were spent in Research and Development, operational needs for special equipment and the purchasing of equipment.  In May 1988 he joined the engineering staff of Royal Ordnance plc, part of British Aerospace.In September 1991, he was sent to direct the Royal Ordnance mine clearance and EOD contract in the Gulf, which he managed until the end of the mine clearance phase. In July 1992 he was appointed Project Manager of a Royal Ordnance weapons system, but in August 1992 he was recruited by the UN to set up their mine clearance office, which later became UNMAS.He ran the UN demining office until August 1995, when he left to become a freelance consultant for the World Bank, the ICRC, the EU (including assistance to the JRC and the writing of contracts for clearance of a minefield in Zimbabwe), and a number of other agencies including the Japanese and Swiss Governments.In September 1998 he was invited by the Swiss government to assist in the formation of the GICHD, and then to act as its Technical Director, a post he continues to hold.Blagden was commissioned into the Engineers from Sandhurst in 1955. He was promoted Lieutenant in 1957, Captain in 1961, Major in 1967, Lieutenant-Colonel in 1975, and Colonel in 1980. He retired in 1988.http://www.eudem.vub.ac.be/files/patrickblagden.htm(London Gazette)References
3338112
Economy_of_Scotland
Image:Bank of Scotland HQ.jpg|right|thumb|300px|The headquarters of the of Scotland, located on the Mound in Edinburgh.The  economy of Scotland is closely linked with the rest of the United Kingdom and the wider Economic Area. Scotland has the second largest GVA per capita of countries in the Kingdom after England, though it is still lower than the average of the United Kingdom as a whole. Revenue from Sea oil is not included in these figures.    Scotland was one of the industrial powerhouses of Europe from the time of the Revolution onwards, being a world leader in manufacturing industries, at the time, which today has left a legacy in the diversity of goods and services which the Scottish economy produces, from textiles, whisky and shortbread to aeroengines, buses, computer software, ships, avionics and microelectronics to banking, insurance, fund management and other related financial services.In common with most other advanced industrialised economies, Scotland has seen a decline in the importance of the manufacturing industries and primary-based extractive industries. This has, however, been combined with a rise in the service sector of the economy which is now the largest sector in Scotland, with significant rates of growth over the last decade.The British Sterling is the official currency in Scotland, and the central bank of the UK is the of England which retains responsibility for the policy of the whole of the United Kingdom.OverviewAfter the Industrial Revolution, the Scottish economy concentrated on heavy industry, dominated by the shipbuilding, mining and steel industries. Scottish participation in the Empire also allowed the Scottish economy to export its output throughout the world. However heavy industry declined in the latter part of the 20th century leading to a remarkable shift in the economy of Scotland towards a technology and service sector based economy. The 1980s saw an economic boom in the Glen corridor between Glasgow and Edinburgh, with many large technology firms relocating to Scotland. Today the industry employs over 41,000 people. Scottish-based companies have strengths in information systems, defence, electronics, instrumentation and semi-conductors. There is also a dynamic and fast growing electronics design and development industry, based around links between the universities and indigenous companies like Wolfson,(Wolfson Microelectronics) 4i2i,(4i2i Communications) Linn, Nallatech.(Nallatech) and Axeon(Axeon, in Dundee) There is also a significant presence of global players like Semiconductor and Motorola. Other major industries include banking and services, construction,(http://www.homesforscotland.co.uk/docs/ECONOMIC%20VALUE%20OF%20HOUSE%20BUILDING%20INDUSTRY%20NOV%202007.pdf homesforscotland.co.uk) education, entertainment, biotechnology, transport equipment, oil and gas, whisky, and tourism. The Domestic Product (GDP) of Scotland was 131,163 million, including oil and gas produced in Scottish waters, for2009-10 .()Edinburgh is the financial services centre of Scotland, with many large financial firms based there. Glasgow is the fourth largest manufacturing centre in the UK, accounting for well over 60% of Scotlands manufactured exports. Shipbuilding, although significantly diminished from its heights in the early 20th century, is still a large part of the Glasgow economy. Aberdeen is the centre of North Sea offshore oil and gas production, with giants such as Shell and BP housing their European exploration and production HQs in the city. Other important industries include textile production, chemicals, distilling, agriculture, brewing and fishing.Natural resourcesScotland has a large abundance of natural resources from fertile land, suitable for agriculture, to oil and gas. In terms of mineral resources, Scotland produces coal, zinc, iron, shale. The coal seams beneath central Scotland, in particular in Ayrshire and Fife contributed significantly to the industrialisation of Scotland during the 19th century. The mining of coal - once a major employer in Scotland has declined in importance since the later half of the 20th century, due to cheaper foreign coal and the exhaustion of many seams. The last deep-coal mine was at Longannet on the of Forth. It closed in 2002. A modest amount of opencast coal mining continues.Agriculture and forestryOnly about one quarter of the land is under cultivation - mainly in cereals. Barley, wheat and potatoes are grown in eastern parts of Scotland such as Aberdeenshire, Moray, Highland, Fife and the Borders. The Tayside and Angus area is a centre of production of soft fruits such as strawberries, raspberries and loganberries, owing to the mild climate.  Sheep raising is important in the less arable mountainous regions, such as the northwest of Scotland which are used for rough grazing, due to its geographical isolation, poor climate and acidic soils. Parts of the east of Scotland (areas such as Aberdeenshire, Fife and Angus) are major centres of cereal production  and general cropping. In such areas, the land is generally flatter, coastal, and the climate less harsh, and more suited to cultivation. The south-west of Scotland - principally  Ayrshire and and Galloway - is a centre of dairying. Agriculture, especially cropping in Scotland, is highly mechanised and generally efficient. Farms tend to cover larger areas than their European counterparts. farming is also prominent in the Uplands in the south of Scotland, resulting in the production of wool, and mutton. Cattle-Rearing particularly in the east and south of Scotland results in the production of large amounts of beef. Farming in Scotland has been particularly hard hit in recent years and is still recovering from the effects of the BSE and the European ban on the importation of British beef from 1996. Dairy and Cattle farmers in south-west Scotland were affected by the 2001 UK Foot and Mouth outbreak, which resulted in the destruction of much of their livestock as part of the biosecurity effort to control the spread of the disease.Because of the persistence of feudalism and the land enclosures of the 19th century the ownership of most land is concentrated in relatively few hands (some 350 people own about half the land). In 2003, as a result, the Scottish Parliament passed a Land Reform Act that empowered tenant farmers and communities to purchase land even if the landlord did not want to sell.()About 13,340 km of land in Scotland is forested() - this represents around 15% of the total land area of Scotland. The majority of forests are in public ownership, with forestry policy being controlled by the Commission. The biggest plantations and timber resources are to be found in and Galloway, Tayside, Argyll and the Highlands. The economic activities generated by forestry in Scotland include planting and harvesting as well as sawmilling, the production of pulp and paper and the manufacture of higher value goods. Forests, especially those surrounding populated areas in Central Scotland also provide a recreation resource.FishingThe waters surrounding Scotland are some of the richest in Europe. Fishing is an economic mainstay in parts of the North East of Scotland and along the west coast, with important fish markets in places such as Aberdeen and Mallaig. Fish and shellfish such as herring, crab, lobster, haddock and cod are landed at ports such as Fraserburgh, Stornoway, Lerwick and Oban. There has been a large scale decrease in employment in the fishing industry within Scotland. This is due to the historically low abundances of commercially valuable fish in the Sea and parts of the Atlantic. In order to rebuild stocks the EUs Fisheries Policy places restrictions on the total tonnage of catch that can be landed, on the days at sea allowed and on fishing gear that can be deployed. These measures have so far been unsuccessful. In tandem with the decline of sea-fishing, commercial fish farms - especially in salmon, have increased in prominence in the rivers and lochs of the north and west of Scotland. Inland waters are rich in fresh water fish such as salmon and trout although here too there has been an inexorable and so far unexplained decline in abundance over the past decades.(Fisheries Research Services The Changing Abundance of Spring Salmon)Image:North Sea oil platform.jpg|thumb|250px|left|A Sea Oil rig. North Sea oil production is centred on the waters to the NE of the Scottish mainland.Oil and gasWith waters consisting of a large sector of the North Atlantic and the North Sea, containing the largest oil resources in the Union -Scotland is the EUs largest petroleum producer, with the discovery of Sea oil transforming the Scottish economy. Oil was discovered in the North Sea in 1966, with the first year of full production taking place in 1976. With the growth of oil exploration during that time, as well as the ancillary industries needed to support it, the city of Aberdeen became centre of the North Sea Oil Industry, which it still is today, with the port and harbour serving many oil fields off shore.  Voe in Shetland is the site of a major oil terminal, where oil is piped in and transferred to tankers. Similarly the Flotta Oil Terminal in Orkney is linked by a 230 km long pipeline to the Piper and Occidental oil fields in the Sea.(Flotta - Undiscovered Scotland) Grangemouth is at the centre of Scotlands petrochemicals industry. The oil related industries are a major source of employment and income in these regions. It is estimated that the industry employs around 100,000 workers (or 6% of the working population) of Scotland.(Scottish Enterprise - Oil and Gas Key Facts)Although North Sea oil production has begun to decline, an estimated 920 million tonnes of recoverable crude oil remain. Over two and a half billion tonnes were recovered from UK offshore oil fields between the first North Sea crude coming ashore in 1975 and 2002,(http://www.scottish-enterprise.com/sedotcom_home/your-sector/sector-energy/energy-background/energy-oil-gas.htm) with most oil fields being expected to remain economically viable until at least 2020.(Scottish Enterprise - Oil and Gas Key Facts ) High oil prices have resulted in a resurgence of oil exploration, specifically in the North East Atlantic basin to the west of Shetland and the Hebrides, in areas that were previously considered marginal and unprofitable.(Hopes of Western Isles bonanza as Shell starts searching for oil The Times December 2005)EnergyImage:Cockenzie Power station.jpg|right|thumb|250px|Cockenzie Power Station near EdinburghScotland is endowed with some of the best energy resources in Europe, and is a net exporter of electricity, with a generating capacity of 10.1GW primarily from coal, oil, gas and nuclear generation.(Scottish Development International - Scotlands Energy Sector)The principal companies operating in the sector are Power, and Southern Energy and Energy. With prevailing international concern over the use of fossil fuels in power generation, Scotland has been identified as having significant potential for the development of renewable energy sources, with abundant wave, tidal and wind power. The Government has set ambitious targets that 18% of Scotlands electricity generation be derived from renewable sources by 2010, rising to 40% by 2020. Currently renewable energy sources provide Scotland with 13% of its electricity production, with onshore wind generation making the largest contribution, and supporting several thousand jobs. There are many windfarms along the coast and hills, with plans to create one of the worlds largest onshore windfarms at Barvas Moor on the Hebridean island of Lewis.(Plan for Worlds Largest Windfarm Generates Controversy National Geographic October 2005)There have also been major developments in harnessing the wave and tidal potential around the Scottish Coast, with the LIMPET (Land Installed Marine Power Energy Transformer)(Wavegen) energy converter being installed off the island of Islay, which produces power for the National Grid. LIMPET, developed in Scotland, is the worlds first commercial scale wave-energy device.ManufacturingImage:Glenfiddich Distillery stills.jpg|right|thumb|250px|Whisky stills at Glenfiddich Distillery in Moray.Scotlands heavy industry began to develop in the second half of the 18th century. The Company established its ironworks at Falkirk in 1759, initially using imported ore but later using locally sourced Ironstone.The iron industry expanded tenfold between 1830 and 1844.() The shipbuilding industry on the River Clyde increased greatly from the 1840s and by 1870 the Clyde was producing more than half of Britains tonnage of shipping.() The heavy industries around shipbuilding and locomotives went into severe decline after World War II.()Manufacturing in Scotland has shifted its focus in recent years with heavy industries such as shipbuilding and iron and steel declining in their importance and contribution to the economy. It is generally argued that this has been in response to increasing globalisation and competition from low cost producers across the world, which has eroded Scotlands advantage in such industries over the later half of the 20th century. However, the decline in heavy industry in Scotland has been supplanted with the rise in the manufacture of lighter, less labour intensive products such as optoelectronics, software, chemical products and derivatives as well as sciences. The Engineering and Defence sectors employ around 30,000 people in Scotland. The principal companies operating in the sector include; Systems, Rolls-Royce, Raytheon, Dennis, Thales, Selex and Babcock. The decline of heavy industry resulted in a sectoral shift of labour. This has led to smaller firms strengthening links with the academic community and  substantial, industry-specific retraining programmes for the workforce.WhiskyWhisky is probably the best known of Scotlands manufactured exports contributing around 800 million to the Scottish economy, supporting 41,000 jobs as well as adding 2 billion to the balance of trade making it one of the UKs top five manufacturing export earners.(Liddell Toasts Success Of Scotch Whisky Industry, Scotland Office January 2003) The Whisky industry also generates a substantial income for the government with around 1.6bn raised in duty each year.(Scots raise a glass to economy boosting industry) The principal whisky producing areas include Speyside and the island of Islay where there are 8 distilleries providing a major source of employment for the island. In many areas the whisky industry is closely related with tourism, with many distilleries also functioning as tourist attractions worth 30 million Value Added to the industry each year.()Image:HMSDaring.jpg|thumb|HMS Daring was built in Glasgow and launched in 2006. Although diminished from its early 20th century heights, Glasgow remains the hub of the UKs Shipbuilding industry.ElectronicsThe electronics industry in Scotland Glen is the phrase that is used to describe the growth and development of Scotlands hi-tech and electronics industries in the Central Belt through the 1980s and 1990s, analogous to the larger concentration of hi-tech industries in Valley, California. Companies such as IBM and Hewlett-Packard have been in Scotland since the 1950s being joined in the 1980s by others such as Microsystems (now owned by Oracle). 45,000 people are employed by electronics and electronics-related firms, accounting for 12% of manufacturing output. Today, Scotland produces 28% of Europes PCs; more than seven per cent of the worlds PCs; and 29% of Europes notebooks.(Key Facts and Figures on the Electronics Industry from Scottish Enterprise)TextilesHistorically Scotlands export trade was based around animal hides and wool. This trade was firstly organised around religious centres such as Abbey.() The trade expanded towards long-established maritime bases for Scottish trade at Bruges and then Veere()() in the Low Countries and at Elblg and Gdask in the Baltic.()During the 18th century, the trade in linen overtook that in wool, peaking at over 12 million yards produced in 1775.(Lynch, p381.) Production remained in cottage industry units but the trading conditions were locked into the modern economy and gave rise to institutions such as the Linen Bank. The cotton mills began to replace linen in economic importance during the 1770s, with the first mill opening in Penicuik in 1778.(Lynch, p382-3) The trade brought urbanisation of the population, including large numbers of migrants from the Highlands and from Ireland. The thread manufacturers plc had its origin in that trade.   In modern times, Knitwear and tweed are seen as traditional cottage industries but names like Pringle have given Scottish knitwear and apparel a presence on the international market. Despite increasing competition from low-cost textile producers in SE Asia and the subcontinent, textiles in Scotland is still a major employer with a workforce of around 22,000. Furthermore the textiles industry is the 7th largest exporter in Scotland accounting for over 3% of all Scottish manufactured products.(Scottish Enterprise - Textile Industry, Facts and Figures)ConstructionScotland builds around 24,000 new homes per year, about 1% of its existing dwelling stock. The home building industry in Scotland directly and indirectly contributed around 5 billion to the Scottish economy in 2006 - thats 6% of GDP and greater than that of higher profile industries such as  agriculture, fishing, electronics and tourism. The net value of new building and repairs, maintenance and improvements combined is just under 11.6 billion, which is 14.0% of Scottish GDP in 2006.(The Scottish Government plans to increase the number of new homes built each year to 35,000 by 2015. Scotland, the government agency previously responsible for housing strategy has been replaced, this function now being undertaken by core Government bodies. The Right to Buy has also been ended for new social housing built by councils and housing associations, and a new Sustainable Communities Initiative has been established to encourage local authorities and their partners to plan for and build sustainable new settlements.(Facts and figures Homes For Scotland. Retrieved 30 March 2008.)(Future for housing in Scotland Scottish Government press release. Retrieved 30 March 2008.) Eight out of every ten new homes are for private purchase. The industry works in partnership with local authorities and housing associations to provide low cost housing for sale and social housing for rent.(McKay Consultants The Economic Value of the Housebuilding Industry in Scotland (November 2007) (pdf) Homes for Scotland. Retrieved 30 March 2008.)Major trading partnersExcluding intra UK trade, the States and the EU constitute the largest markets for Scotlands exports. As part of the Kingdom and the Union, Scotland fully participates in the Market and Trade Area which exists across all EU member states and regions. Recently with the high rates of growth in many emerging economies of SE Asia such as China, Thailand and Singapore, there has been a drive towards marketing Scottish products and manufactures in these countries, with Singapore entering the top ten markets for Scottish exports in 2004.ServicesEdinburgh is Europes 11th largest financial centre,() with influential financial players such as the Bank of Scotland , the of Scotland, Widows and Life all having a presence in the city. Centred primarily on the cities of Edinburgh and Glasgow, the financial services industry in the Scottish Economy expanded greatly in recent years, with a growth rate of over 35% over the period 2000 to 2005.(Scottish Financial Enterprise Industry Overview) The sector employs 5% of the Scottish workforce or 113,160 people and generates 5bn or 6% of Scotlands GDP.(Scottish Enterprise Financial Statistics)BankingBanking in Scotland has a long history, beginning with the creation of the of Scotland, in Edinburgh, in 1695 and expanding greatly to support the trading developments of the 18th and 19th centuries. Retail banking services to ordinary people followed in the 19th century, on the savings bank model pioneered by Rev. Henry Duncan() Today Scotland is home to 4 clearing banks - the of Scotland, the Bank of Scotland, the Bank and TSB Scotland. The Bank of Scotland expanded internationally to the second largest bank in Europe, fourth largest in the world by capitalisation in 2008 but has subsequently declined;(Forbes.com Global2000 in 2008, Forbes.com Global2000 in 2010) its new global headquarters in Edinburgh augmented the citys position as a major financial centre. In 2005 Scotland ranked second only to London in the European league of headquarters locations of the 30 largest banks in Europe as measured by market value.(Scottish Financial Enterprise - Financial Industry Overview)(TSB Bank: History)Although the of England remains the central bank for the UK Government, three Scottish clearing banks still issue their own banknotes: (the of Scotland, the Bank of Scotland and the Bank). These notes have no status as tender; but in practice they are accepted throughout the UK.(http://www.scottish.parliament.uk/business/research/briefings-03/sb03-51.pdf) The full range of Scottish bank notes commonly accepted are 5, 10, 20, 50 and 100. (See banknotes for further discussion).Investment, Insurance and Asset ServicingImage:Standard Life Building.JPG|right|thumb|300px|Life Bank, in the Financial District of EdinburghThe first half of the 19th century brought the creation of many life assurance companies in Scotland, predominantly on the mutual model. By the 1980s there were 9 members of the Association of Scottish Life Offices but these have demutualised and most were taken over.() Standard Life, based in Edinburgh, demutualised and has remained independent.()Starting in 1873 with Robert Flemings Scottish American Investment Trust,() a relatively broad stratum of Scots invested in international investment trust ventures. Around 80,000 Scots held foreign investment assets in the early 20th century.(Fry, p269)Nowadays Scotland is one of the worlds biggest fund management centres with over 300bn worth of assets directly serviced or managed in the country.(Overview of the Scottish Financial Industry) Scottish fund management centres have a major presence in areas such as pensions, property funds, investment trusts as well as in retail and private client markets. Similarly asset servicing on behalf of fund managers has become an increasingly important component of the financial services industry in Scotland with Scottish based companies providing expertise in securities servicing, investment accounting, performance measurement, trustee and depositary services and treasury services.TourismImage:Gleneagles Hotel and grounds.jpg|right|thumb|300px|Gleneagles Hotel, Perthshire. Tourism is one of Scotlands fastest growing economic sectors. It is estimated that tourism accounts for 3% of Scotlands economic output. Scotland is a well-developed tourist destination with attractions ranging from unspoilt countryside, mountains and abundant history. Tourism is responsible for sustaining 200,000 jobs mainly in the service sector, with tourist spending averaging at 4bn per year.(Scottish Executive Tourism Statistics) Domestic tourists (those from the Kingdom) make up the bulk of visitors to Scotland. In 2002, for example, UK visitors made 18.5 million visits to Scotland, staying 64.5 million nights and spending 3.7 billion. In contrast, overseas residents made 1.58 million visits to Scotland, staying 15 million nights and spending 806 million. In terms of overseas visitors, those from the United States made up 24% of visits to Scotland, with the States being the largest source of overseas visitors, and Germany (9%), France (8%), Canada (7%) and Australia (6%), following behind.(Statistics on Tourism and Research UK)InfrastructureInfrastructure in Scotland is varied in its provision and its quality. The densest network of roads, railways and motorways is concentrated in the Central Lowlands of the country where around 70% of the population live. The motorway and trunk road network is principally centred on  the cities of Edinburgh and Glasgow and connecting them to other major concentrations of population, and is vitally important to the economy of Scotland. Key routes include the M8 motorway, which is one of the busiest and most important major routes in Scotland, with other primary routes such as the A9 connecting the Highlands to the Central Belt, and the A90/M90 connecting Edinburgh and Aberdeen in the east. The M74 and A1, in the west and east of the country, respectively, provide the main road corridors from Scotland to England. The Executive has stated that it intends to spend 3bn on a capital investment scheme to improve Scotlands road and rail system, over the next decade,(Transport Scotland www.transportscotland.gov.uk) with the setting up of a national agency in January 2006 - Scotland to oversee this. Many roads in the Highlands are single track, with passing places.The rail network is primarily centred on the central belt and is used principally as a means of public transport, with some freight movements - for example from the port facilities at Grangemouth and Ore Terminal. After a large rationalisation of routes in the 1960s, which led to station and line closures, the rail network is currently being expanded, to cope with ever increasing levels of passenger demand. The rail-operator ScotRail operates most routes within Scotland, with long-distance connections to London operated by Express or Trains. Proposals which have been mooted include the electrification of the rail system in order to cut journey times.In 2004, 22.6 million passengers used Scotlands airports, with there being 514,000 aircraft movements(Scottish Transport Statistics) with Scottish airports being amongst the fastest growing in the Kingdom in terms of passenger numbers. Plans have been published by the major airport operator plc to facilitate the expansion of capacity at the major international airports of Aberdeen, Edinburgh and Glasgow, including new terminals and runways to cope with a large forecast rise in passenger use. Prestwick Airport also has large air freight operations and cargo handling facilities. Scotland is well-served by many airlines and has an expanding international route network, with recent long-haul services to Dubai, York, Atlanta and Canada.Major deep-water Port facilities exist at Aberdeen, Grangemouth, Greenock, Peterhead, Flow and Voe. Scotland was connected to mainland Europe by a dedicated ferry service between Rosyth (near Edinburgh) and Zeebrugge. In addition to this many remote island communities on Scotlands western seaboard are served by lifeline ferry services operated by the state-owned company MacBrayne, which carry tourists as well as freight and are vital to the economies of these islands.The role of the public sectorSee also: of Scotland, formula, autonomyThe public sector, in Scotland, has a significant impact upon the economy and comprises central government departments, local government, and public corporations. In quarter 3 of 2005, there were 577,300 people employed in the public sector, which accounts for 23.4% of employment in Scotland - this includes all medical professionals employed within the National Health Service in Scotland, those employed in the services and those employed in the state education and higher education sector.(Public Sector Employment in Scotland 2005 Scottish Executive) This is in addition to employees of the government in the civil service and in local government as well as bodies and corporations.There is a clear separation of responsibility of the powers of both the UK government and the devolved Government in relation to the formulation and execution of national economic policy as it affects Scotland - this is set out under Section 5 of the Act 1998.UK GovernmentThe Government along with the of the United Kingdom retains full control over Scotlands fiscal environment, in relation to taxation (including tax rates and tax collection) and the overall share of central government expenditure apportioned to Scotland, in the form of an annual grant. It also retains complete responsibility for the operation of the Welfare State, in terms of pensions, unemployment insurance and benefit - as part of the UK-wide Welfare State exercised by the UK for Work and Pensions and Treasury.Scottish GovernmentThe Government has very limited power to raise or lower the rate of tax in Scotland by up to 3p in the pound, but has the power to vary rates and can regulate the application of local taxes such as the tax levied by local authorities in Scotland. Nevertheless the Scottish Government has full control over how Scotlands annual block grant is divided between government departments, such as healthcare and education and on state-owned enterprises, such as Water and MacBrayne. The Scottish Government does however have control over Economic Development policy, and controls, funds and regulates the national Economic development Agency - Enterprise. In 2008, for example, the budget of the Government was around 33bn,(Scottish Consolidated Fund, Section 3 of the Budget (Scotland) Act 2006) which the Scottish Government can spend on the areas under its jurisdiction such as education, healthcare, transport, the environment and justice.LocalThe 32 unitary authorities in Scotland have the ability to levy a local tax, called the Tax which is used to pay for local services such as refuse collection, street lighting, roads, pavements, public parks and museums. The value of residential property is the base for the tax, with each dwelling allocated to one of eight bands coded by letters A through H (H being the highest) on the basis of its assumed capital value. Each local authority sets a tax rate expressed as the annual levy on a Band D property inhabited by two liable adults. The budget of local authorities is supplemented by direct grants from the Executive.EducationEducation in Scotland is well-funded with very high levels of participation in all sectors of education. Participation in further and higher education is especially high, with Scottish universities generally being recognised as amongst the best in the teaching of medicine, law, engineering, science and technology. Increasingly Scotland is being seen as an exporter of education, with the number of overseas students applying to studying at universities throughout Scotland, rising substantially in recent years.(Foreign Students Flock to Scotland The Times October 2005) Most universities are linked with a  flourishing research and development sector; the of Dundee is at the heart of a biotechnology and  medical research cluster;(Dundee School of Life Sciences Research) the of Edinburgh is a centre of excellence in the field of Intelligence and the of Aberdeen is a world-leader in the study of offshore technology in the oil and gas industry.(Scottish Enterprise North East Scotland Area Information) Scotland generally has a well-educated population - adult Literacy rates are at over 99%.HealthAnother major component of central government expenditure in Scotland is on healthcare and healthcare related services. The Health Service (NHS) is the publicly controlled provider of the majority of healthcare in Scotland, with the NHS being a major employer not only in terms of doctors nurses and other key healthcare workers, but also in terms of administration. The service is administered differently from the rest of the Kingdom and is largely free at the point of use to residents in Scotland, except for dental services where those over 18 must pay. In the short term spending on healthcare in Scotland remains high in response to the populations poor diet and high instance of disease. In the medium to long term, the challenges of an ageing population are likely to increase demand for health services and put increasing pressure on the health service in Scotland.Other economic indicatorsRefs(Scottish Economic Statistics 2005 - Quick Facts Scottish Executive)(http://www.statistics.gov.uk/pdfdir/gva1206.pdf ONS Regional Economic Statistics 2006) http://www.scotland.gov.uk/Topics/Statistics/Browse/Economy/SNAP/expstats/GDPi2010Q1Total Population:  5,494,801 (2007 est)Working Age Population:  2,475,386 (2007 est.)GDP (billion):   128,929 (2006) 143,834 (2009) Manufacturing GVA (million):  28, 900 (2007)  Number of VAT registered companies:  185,925 (2007 est.)Number of Large Companies (250+ employees) in Scotland:  2,240 (2007)Number of new homes built pa.:  24,581 (2006)Employment Rate (% of adults of working age):  78.7 (2007)Median Gross Weekly Earnings of full-time workers on adult rates ():  592.70Claimant Unemployment Rate (%):  2.1 (2007)People of working age claiming key Social Security benefits (%):  11.7 (Feb. 2007)See also*of the United Kingdom*Tiger*of Scotland*of Scotland in the High Middle Ages*of Economic Advisers (Scotland)*Council for Development and Industry*Enterprise References *Scottish Economic Statistics 2005*Scottish Enterprise Statistics*Scottish Financial Enterprise - Information about Scotlands financial services industry from Financial EnterpriseExternal links*Scottish Government*Scottish Government Statistics*HM Treasury*Scottish Enterprise*Scottish Development International (SDI)*Scotlands Economy - The Scotsman* The 1974 Gavin McCrone Report into Scotlands Economy - unclassified*The Top Secret 1974 Gavin McCrone Report into Scotlands Economy - classifiedde lcosseekonomikada Escciaeconomye Skocis
3346261
Victor_H._Krulak
relationsC. Krulak, sonVictor H. Krulak (January 7, 1913 &ndash; December 29, 2008) was a decorated States Marine Corps officer who saw action in War II, Korea and Vietnam. He was born in Colorado to Jewish parents.  (He later denied Jewish ancestry and claimed to have been raised Episcopalian.)() Krulak, considered a visionary by fellow Marines,() was the author of First to Fight: An Inside View of the U.S. Marine Corps and the father of the 31st of the Marine Corps, C. Krulak.Marine Corps careerKrulak was commissioned a U.S. Marine Corps second lieutenant upon graduation from the U.S. Naval Academy on May 31, 1934. His early Marine Corps service included: sea duty aboard USS Arizona, an assignment at the U.S. Naval Academy; duty with the 6th Marines in Diego and the 4th Marines in China (193739); completion of the Junior School, Quantico, Virginia (1940); and an assignment with the 1st Marine Brigade, FMF, later the 1st Marine Division.While stationed as an observer in Shanghai during the Sino-Japanese War in 1937, Krulak took photographs with a telephoto lens of a ramp-bowed landing boat that the Japanese had been using. Recognizing the potential use of such a craft by the U.S. armed forces, Krulak sent details and photographs back to Washington, but discovered years later that they had been filed away as having come from some nut out in China. Krulak built a model of the Japanese boat design and discussed the retractable ramp approach with boat builder Higgins who incorporated elements of Krulaks input into the Landing Craft, Vehicle, Personnel (LCVP) or Higgins boat, which played critical roles in the Landings and amphibious assaults in the Pacific.(World War IIAt the outbreak of War II, Krulak was a captain serving as aide to General M. Smith, the Commanding General, Amphibious Corps, Atlantic Fleet.  He volunteered for parachute training and on completing of training, he was ordered to the Pacific area as commander of the 2nd Parachute Battalion, Marine Amphibious Corps. He went into action at Lavella with the 2nd New Zealand Brigade.As a lieutenant colonel in the fall of 1943, he earned the Cross and the Heart on Choiseul Island, where his battalion staged a week-long diversionary raid to cover the Bougainville invasion.(Goldstein, Richard. Victor H. Krulak, Marine Behind U.S. Landing Craft, Dies at 95 , New York Times, January 4, 2009. Accessed January 5, 2009.) Later, he joined the newly formed 6th Marine Division and took part in the Okinawa campaign and the surrender of Japanese forces in the China area, earning the of Merit with V device for valor and the Bronze Star.;Navy Cross citation: The Navy Cross is presented to Victor H. Krulak, Lieutenant Colonel, U.S. Marine Corps, for extraordinary heroism as Commanding Officer of the Second Battalion, First Marine Parachute Regiment, during operations on Choiseul Island, Solomon Islands, October 28 to November 3, 1943. Assigned the task of diverting hostile attention from the movements of our main attack force en route to Empress Augusta Bay, Bougainville Island, Lieutenant Colonel Krulak landed at Choiseul and daringly directed the attack of his battalion against the Japanese, destroying hundreds of tons of supplies and burning camps and landing barges. Although wounded during the assault on October 30, he repeatedly refused to relinquish his command and with dauntless courage and tenacious devotion to duty, continued to lead his battalion against the numerically superior Japanese forces. His brilliant leadership and indomitable fighting spirit assured the success of this vital mission and were in keeping with the highest traditions of the United States Naval Service.()A boat captained by F. Kennedy helped evacuate Krulaks force from Choiseul at the end of the operation.  In response, Krulak promised Kennedy a bottle of whiskey which he delivered almost 20 years later when Kennedy was serving as of the United States.(Liewer, Steve, Brute Krulak Commemorated, Diego Union-Tribune, January 9, 2009.)After the war, Krulak returned to the United States and served as Assistant Director of the Senior School at Corps Base Quantico, and, later, as Regimental Commander of the 5th Marines at Camp Pendleton.Korean WarHe was serving as Assistant Chief of Staff, G-3, Fleet Marine Force, Pacific, when the War erupted, and subsequently served in Korea as Chief of Staff, 1st Marine Division, earning a second of Merit with Combat V and Air Medal.From 1951 to 1955, Krulak served at Marine Corps as Secretary of the General Staff, then rejoined Fleet Marine Force, Pacific, as Chief of Staff.1956 to 1959In July 1956, he was promoted to brigadier general and designated Assistant Commander, 3rd Marine Division on Okinawa. From 1957 to 1959, he served as Director, Marine Corps Educational Center, Quantico. He was promoted to major general in November 1959, and the following month assumed command of the Corps Recruit Depot, San Diego.Vietnam WarFrom 1962 to 1964, Krulak served as Special Assistant for Counter Insurgency Activities, Organization of the Chiefs of Staff; for which he was presented a third of Merit for exceptional meritorious service by General Maxwell D. Taylor, of the Joint Chiefs of Staff. During this period, American military advisors were providing assistance to the South Vietnamese in their war against the Viet Cong. In September 1963, then Major General Krulak and Mendenhall, a senior Foreign Service officer,  led a fact-finding mission to learn about the progress of the war. Krulak said that the situation was very good and supported President Dinh Diem, while Mendenhall claimed the opposite, leading Kennedy to famously ask the pair if they had visited the same country. In late December 1963, the new president, B. Johnson, ordered an interdepartmental group to be headed by Krulak with the purpose of studying OPLAN 34A and selecting from it those targets the United States could hit in North Vietnam with the least amount of risk to its people.  This was in keeping with the administrations policy of graduated pressure on the North Vietnamese.()On March 1, 1964, Krulak was designated Commanding General, Marine Force, Pacific, and promoted to Lieutenant General. For the next four years, Krulak was responsible for all Fleet Marine Force units in the Pacific, including some 54 trips to the Vietnam theater. At the beginning of the War, Krulak put forward the Spreading Inkblot Theory. This promoted a spreading inkblot of small units actions to pacify Vietnam village by village. When large enemy units were encountered then General Westmorelands overwhelming firepower should be employed. He also called for intensive bombing of Vietnam and mining of Haiphong Harbor. Krulaks plans were eventually rejected as Westmoreland favored hammering the enemy into submission through superior firepower and the Johnson administration feared relentless bombing of the North would provoke Soviet and Chinese intervention.(Crocker(2006): 365.)  Krulak opposed the establishment of a Marine base at Khe Sanh.(Perry, Tony, Victor H. Krulak, 1913 - 2008, Angeles Times, December 31, 2008, p. B6.)Krulak hoped to become the next of the Marine Corps, but in 1967 B. Johnson selected F. Chapman, Jr..  As a result, Krulak retired on June 1, 1968, receiving a Distinguished Service Medal for his performance during that period.(  Military historian Robert Coram states that it was Krulaks comments to President Johnson criticizing the restraints placed on American military operations in Vietnam that resulted in Johnsons selection of Chapman over Krulak.( General Krulaks son C. Krulak eventually became the 31st of the Marine Corps, serving from 1995 to 1999.Medals and decorationsKrulaks medals and decorations include:(Whos Who in Marine Corps History.) Strategic vehicle advocacyKrulak was an early advocate of using helicopters as attack platforms. He was also instrumental in the development of Higgins boats, which enabled beach landings of men and material in WWII.(http://online.wsj.com/article/SB123093700626550109.html Report from Street Journal.)Post-military careerAfter retiring from the Marine Corps, Krulak worked for Copley Newspapers, including  serving as president of Copley News Service and vice president of Copley Press.  He retired from Copley in 1977, though he continued to contribute to their news service.()  Krulak also wrote a number of books, including the iconic Marine Corps history First to Fight.(In retirement, Krulak was active in community organizations, as well as participating in Marine Corps activities.  He served as president and trustee of the Zoological Society of San Diego.(  His wife, Amy, died in 2001.(On December 29, 2008, LtGen Krulak died at age 95 in San Diego, California.()()  He was survived by his three sons &mdash; retired Marine Corps Commandant General Charles Krulak, Rev. Victor Krulak (Commander Navy Chaplain Corps), Rev. William Krulak (Colonel USMCR) &mdash; four grandchildren, and 10 great-grandchildren.(  Krulaks funeral was held on January 8, 2009 in the chapel at Miramar, with burial at Rosecrans National Cemetery.(HonorsIn 2004, LtGen Krulak was the recipient of the U.S. Naval Academys Distinguished Graduate award, which honors alumni who have provided a lifetime of service to the nation or armed forces, have made significant and distinguished contributions to the nation via their public service and have demonstrated a strong interest in supporting the Navy or Marine Corps and the United States Naval Academy. These individuals are the embodiment of the Naval Academys mission to provide graduates who will be ready to assume the highest responsibilities of command, citizenship and government.()In 2007, at the Corps Associations first annual banquet, of Defense Gates recounted the story of Krulaks time in China and his career:()Books written by Victor Krulak***See also*of Korean War veterans who are recipients of the Bronze StarNotesReferences:;Web*** *;Bibliography**Krulak, Victor H. Organization for National Security, Cambridge, Massachusetts: United States Strategic Institute, 1983. (ISBN 0-913187-00-3)*Krulak, Victor H. First to Fight: An Inside View of the U.S. Marine Corps, Anapolis, Maryland: Naval Institute Press, 1984. (ISBN 0-87021-785-2) This book is on the of Naval Operations Professional Reading List and the Commandant of the Marine Corps Reading List*Coram, Robert Brute: The Life of Victor Krulak, U.S. Marine Further reading****H. KrulakKrulak
3353337
Boreal_Shield_Ecozone_(CEC)
:This article is about an ecozone.  For the landform covering the same region, see Shield.The Boreal Shield Ecozone is the largest ecozone in Canada.FormationShield rock forms the nucleus of the North American continent. Other geological structures assumed positions around or on top of the Shield millions of years after it was formed. The Mountains are relative newcomers on the geological stage, having risen a mere 60 million years ago. Most Shield rocks were formed well over a billion years earlier, during the very first chapter of the planets history known as the era.What once may have been a towering mountain chain is today a great rolling plain of ancient bedrock. During the late Precambrian era, fierce convulsions in the Earths crust resulted in a warped, collapsed Shield. The foundation of much of the ecozone is now metamorphic gneiss, a highly banded rock formed by intense pressure and heat. Many of the minerals that contribute to the Shields economy may have formed during these geologically turbulent times.During the last age, which ended 10 000 years ago, the advance of glaciers continuously plucked and scoured the Boreal Shield, forming striations in the bedrock and carrying large boulders many kilometers. In retreat, massive glaciers enveloped most of the landscape with great amounts of glacial deposits including gravel, sand, shale, and numerous sediments. The vast majority of inadequately drained depressions that were left behind, as well as natural faults in the bedrock, now form the millions of lakes, ponds and wetlands that give this ecozone its distinctive character.Changing conditionsAs for the boreal forest, fire suppression, insect control, clear-cutting and single-species tree farming are widespread. These practices may, over the long term, reduce the diversity of both plant and animal species and increase the forests vulnerability to disease.Many Shield lakes and soils are extremely sensitive to changes in pH. rain from local sources and from the long-range transport of airborne pollutants has already taken an ominous toll. It may be weakening the general vigour and growth rate of trees, as well as of aquatic species, in sensitive areas.Mining, forestry, hydro generation and fisheries are all important contributors to the Canadian economy. With the help of environmentally responsible regulations and policies, they will be able to continue well into the future. Beyond its economic opportunities, the Boreal Shield continues to provide more intangible but priceless giftspure air and water, food and habitat for wildlife, and recreational, aesthetic and spiritual benefits.References(External links*Boreal Shield (The Canadian Atlas)Schild
3358522
James_Esmond
James William Esmond (11 April 1822 &ndash; 3 December 1890), was an Irish-Australian gold prospector and miner, and was one of the first people to discover gold in Australia.Early lifeEsmond was born in Enniscorthy, a town in Wexford in the south-east of Ireland, in 1822, the son of a merchant.() Migrating to the Phillip District (later the colony of Victoria) in 1840, Esmond worked a number of jobs, including working on stations in the Port region, and driving the coach from Buninyong to the region around Horsham, a major town in the Wimmera.(ProspectingIn 1849, having heard news of the gold rush, Esmond sailed for California to try his luck. Arriving too late to be successful as a prospector, Esmond took work as a supervisor on the diggings, before returning to Sydney, South Wales in 1850.( Esmond travelled on the same ship as Hargraves, the man credited with first discovering gold in New South Wales.( Esmond returned to Buninyong, and took work as a contractor digging post holes.() There he met Dr Hermann Bruhn, a German doctor and geologist who was returning from Clunes. Bruhn told Esmond that in Clunes he had met with the pastoralist Donald Cameron; gold had been found on Camerons property in March 1850, and Bruhn told Esmond of quartz reefs there which were likely to bear gold.(Esmond set out for Clunes, with his colleague James Pugh. Having investigated the area, they concluded that there was gold there, and so they hired two sawyers, known as Burns and Kelly, to work the site.( Having recovered several ounces of gold from the site, Esmond travelled to Geelong on 5 July 1851 and showed the gold to Advertiser journalist Alfred Clarke.( When questioned by Clarke about the location the gold came from, Esmond was vague; but once he returned from Melbourne on 15 July, having purchased materials to make a cradle, he told Clarke that the gold had come from Clunes.( News of the find was broken in the Melbourne newspapers on 16 July,() and by Clarke in the Advertiser on 22 July.( Esmond sent the first saleable gold produced in Victoria &ndash; fourteen ounces &ndash; to Clarke on 22 August, which was later sold in Melbourne.(Esmond would later claim that he first found gold on 28 June. Mining engineer and amateur historian Peter McCarthy has suggested that Esmond had set up as a prospector in the Pyrenees on his return and kept himself fed somehow, without officially stealing the Queens gold, for several months.( On 22 May 1851 the of New South Wales had issued regulations under lands legislation to control gold mining, impose mining licences and collect licence fees.( Meanwhile Victoria was to become a separate colony from New South Wales on 1 July 1851, and the of Victoria &ndash; which had very few police or military forces at its disposal &ndash; would be responsible gold mining from then on.( McCarthy suggests that Esmond nominated 28 June (or 29 June in some sources) as the date of discovery because, accounting for the travel times between Clunes and Melbourne, his claim would reach the authorities there on 1 July 1851, when he would be free from New South Wales strict licencing scheme.(In 1853 and 1854, the Council of Victoria established the first of several Select Committees to consider rewards for the discovery of goldfields. The committee considered Esmonds claim of discovery, and accepted that he found gold on 28 June 1851 and that the site was revealed on 22 July.( However, the committee also considered the claim of Michel, who had discovered gold at Andersons Creek, in the town of Warrandyte; the committee determined that Michel had both discovered gold and reported the discovery on 5 July 1851, the same day that Esmond showed the Clunes gold to Alfred Clarke in Geelong.( Ultimately, the committee found that Michel was the first to discover and publicise a goldfield, but that Esmond was the first actual producer of gold, and both were granted rewards of  1000.(Esmond continued to be involved in gold mining, eventually moving to the goldfields at Ballarat, where he became politically prominent among the miners organisations, ultimately commanding a section of miners in the Stockade.( In 1865, Esmond started a gold mining company conducting deep shaft mining in the area north of Clunes. Despite his efforts, the company was unsuccessful, and he ultimately sold it.(Later lifeEsmond suffered from disease later in life, and struggled with financial problems; the mining community sought government aid for him, though none was forthcoming, but public donations had raised 150 for his family by the time of his death.( Esmond died on 3 December that year, 36 years to the day after the Eureka Stockade. Historian William Withers, in his obituary of Esmond on 5 December, wrote that he walked to the top of a hill overlooking Ballarat and saw a shining white shaft of granite marking the spot where the Stockade took place, a monument erected six years earlier to mark but not commemorate those who had died there.() Withers respectful tribute to Esmond, one of a number of Eureka diggers who had recently died, was unusual at the time, when the Stockade was still regarded by many as a disloyal rebellion.(Esmond was survived by his wife Margaret, their three sons and six daughters.(See also* gold rushReferences
3367760
Cities_in_the_Great_Depression
Throughout the industrial world, cities in the Great Depression were hit hard, beginning in 1929 and lasting through most of the 1930s. Worst hit were ports (as world trade fell) and cities dependent on heavy industry, such as steel and automobiles. Service-oriented cities were less hurt. Political centers such as D.C., London and Berlin flourished during the Depression as the expanded role of government added many new jobs.EuropeGermanyIn Germany, the depression had reached its worst in 1932, with 6 million unemployed, spread throughout every city. From 1928 to 1932 unemployment in Berlin soared from 133,000 to 600,000. In Hamburg, a port city, the numbers went from 32,000 to 135,000.  In Dortmund, in the Ruhr industrial region, it went from 12,000 to 65,000. Berlin verged on political chaos as Communist and Nazi paramilitary forces fought for control of the streets. Overall the Nazis were weakest in the largest cities, which were controlled by Socialist and Communist parties (and in Catholic areas, the Center party).United StatesAmericas larger cities in the 1920s enjoyed strong growth. With the end of large-scale immigration, populations stabilized and the plentiful jobs in the cities pulled families upwards in terms of social mobility. Investment in office buildings, stores, factories, utilities, streets, and, especially, apartments and single-family homes, added substantially to the infrastructure, supported a very even better times were ahead. After 1929, the optimism ebbed away, overwhelmed by a deepening pessimism that made long-term private investment seem inadvisable.The Depressions damage to large cities, suburbs, towns and rural areas varied according to the economic base.  Most serious in larger cities was the collapse of the construction industry with new starts falling to less than 10% of the norm of the late 1920s.  Although much needed work was deferred, maintenance and repair of existing structures comprised over a third of the private sector construction budget in the 1930s. Devastating was the disappearance of 2 million high paying jobs in the construction trades, plus the loss of profits and rents that humbled many thousands of landlords and real estate investors.Second came the general downturn in industry, especially heavy manufacturing. Steel in Pennsylvania, and Indiana, and automobiles in Detroit took the heaviest hits, along with railroads and mining. In these sectors, the largest cities suffered somewhat less than smaller mill towns, mining camps and railroad centers.  Unemployment was a problem everywhere, but it was less severe among women than men, among workers in nondurable industries (such as food and clothing), in services and sales, and in government jobs.  A sharp educational gradient meant that the less skilled inner city men had much higher unemployment rates than the high-school and college educated men who lived in outer zones and suburbs.Although suburbia stopped growing, it did not suffer nearly as much as the central cities.  While some unemployed came to the cities looking for relief (especially African Americans), it appears that even larger numbers of unemployed returned to family farms. For the first time ever, the movement of native population was away from cities and toward rural America.The fiscal soundness of city and county governments was challenged by the rise in relief expenditures and the sharp fall in tax collections. The Hoover Administration had encouraged state and local government to expand public works projects, which they did in 1930 and 1931. While this expansion may have slowed the rise in unemployment, the spending was a luxury that could not be borne in the face of falling tax revenues and the unwillingness of investors to put more money into municipal bonds. After 1933, new sales taxes and infusions of federal money helped relieve the fiscal distress.ReliefWhile local relief before 1932 focused on providing small sums of cash or baskets of food and coal for the neediest, the federal programs launched by Hoover and greatly expanded by the Deal tried to use massive construction projects with prevailing wages to jumpstart the economy and solve the unemployment crisis.  ERA, FERA, WPA and PWA built and repaired the public infrastructure in dramatic fashion but did little to foster the recovery of the private sector. In sharp contrast to Britain, where private housing construction pulled the country out of depression, American cities saw little private construction or investment, and so they languished in the economic doldrums even as their parks, sewers, airports and municipal buildings were enhanced. The problem in retrospect was that the New Deals investment in the public infrastructure had only a small multiplier effect, in contrast to the high multiplier for jobs that private investment might have created.(Richard J. Jensen, The Causes and Cures of Unemployment in the Great Depression, Journal of Interdisciplinary History (1989) 19:553-83.)New Deal politicsDelano Roosevelt had a magnetic appeal to the city dwellers&mdash;he brought relief and recognition of their ethnic leaders and ward bosses, as well as labor unions. Taxpayers, small business and the middle class voted for Roosevelt in 1936 but turned sharply against him after the recession of 1937-38 seemed to belie his promises of recovery. Roosevelts Deal Coalition discovered an entirely new use for city machines in his three reelection campaigns of the Deal and the World War. Traditionally, local bosses minimized turnout so as to guarantee reliable control of their wards and legislative districts. To carry the college, however, Roosevelt needed to carry the entire state, and thus needed massive majorities in the largest cities to overcome the hostility of suburbs  and towns.With Hopkins his majordomo, Roosevelt used the WPA as a national political machine.  Men on relief could get WPA jobs regardless of their politics, but hundreds of thousands of well-paid supervisory jobs were given to the local Democratic machines.  The 3.5 million voters on relief payrolls during the 1936 election cast 82% of their ballots for Roosevelt. The vibrant labor unions, heavily based in the cities, likewise did their utmost for their benefactor, voting 80% for him, as did Irish, Italian and Jewish voters. In all, the nations 106 cities over 100,000 population voted 70% for FDR in 1936, compared to his 59% elsewhere. Roosevelt won reelection in 1940 thanks to the cities.  In the North, the cities over 100,000 gave Roosevelt 60% of their votes, while the rest of the North favored Willkie 52%-48%. It was just enough to provide the critical electoral college  margin. With the start of full-scale war mobilization in the  summer of 1940, the cities revived. The new war economy pumped  massive investments into new factories and funded round-the-clock  munitions production, guaranteeing a job to anyone who showed up at the factory gate.(Voting inofrmation on groups from , Hadley Cantril and Mildred Strunk, eds. Public Opinion, 1935-1946 (1951) and George Horace Gallup, ed. The Gallup Poll; Public Opinion, 1935-1971 vol. 1 (1972); and Richard Jensen, The Last Party System: Decay of Consensus, 1932-1980, in The Evolution of American Electoral Systems (Paul Kleppner et al. eds.) (1981) pp 219-225,)Organized CrimeThe mafia and some other crime syndicates, which had emerged during Prohibition, gained power during the Depression years. Those mob figures that had not been shut down by the authorities often already ran powerful business empires and, though the declining economy severely challenged them, the desperation of the unemployed and underemployed working class often increased their power and influence. Casinos, brothels, and other vice industries thrived as city officials often looked the other way rather than hurt businesses that were actually succeeding.Some to thrive during the Depression because of the economic activity generated by criminal enterprises. City, long an established resort town, struggled during the Depression but managed to maintain a strong economy in large part due to illegal gambling activities. Texas was one of the most successful examples; the island city, run by the Maceo syndicate, became a major resort town due to its lavish, illegal casino districts enabled by a corrupt law enforcement environment (unemployment there was virtually unheard of). The small, desert town of Vegas, Nevada began to develop based on vice businesses during this period with the added advantage that laws there were much less strict.CanadaCanadas economy at the time was just starting to shift from primary industry (agriculture, farming, fishing, mining, logging) to manufacturing. Exports of materials plunged, and employment, prices and profits fell in every sector. Canada was the worst-hit (after the States) because of its economic position. It was further affected as its main trading partner (until 1942) was England, followed by (and eventually becoming) the States, both of which were badly affected by the Depression.The hardest-hit cities were in the heavy industry centers of Ontario and those of the Provinces, where much of Canadas productive farmland and manufacturing centers were (and still are) located. They included Ontario (Canadas largest steel center, analogous to Pittsburgh or Allentown), Toronto, Ontario, and Ontario, an automotive manufacturing center, analogous to its larger neighbour, Detroit. Windsor also took a devastating blow, being a general manufacturing center, and home to auto manufacturers, much like its larger neighbour, Michigan. In Ontario, unemployment skyrocketed to roughly 45%. Much like in the United States, the of Ontario decided to start numerous Works projects (such as highways, dams, bridges, and tunnels) in order to employ construction workers and pump money into the economy. By 1937, the provinces unemployment levels began to recede towards their pre-crash levels. It was during this time that the Elizabeth Way, Highway 2A (which would later become Highway 401), and the routes of todays 400-Series Highways were set. During this time, Highway 7 was also paved by hand and man-power from Ontario to Ontario, through some of Ontarios roughest terrain. The Province of Ontario used manpower whenever possible, to employ as many people as it could. In Ontario an unemployment relief camp on Barriefield lower common was set up under the command of the Commandant of the Military College of Canada. Public works projects at the Military College of Canada included rebuilding the dry stone wall and moat of Fort Frederick; the physics building extension, the connection from the Fort Frederick Dormitory to the new Yeo mess building, the new wing of the hospital, a new garage, roadwork, levelling the grounds at RMC for new football fields and a new running track.(http://data4.archives.ca/netacgi/nph-brs?s2&s4&s3&s1kingston&s6y+and+gif&s8&Sect4AND&l0&Sect1IMAGE&Sect2THESOFF&Sect4AND&Sect5FOTOPEN&Sect6HITOFF&dFOTO&p1&uhttp://www.archives.ca/02/02011503_e.html&r123&fG Public works projects at the Military College of Canada)The Prairie Provinces and Canada were the hardest-hit; they fully recovered after 1939. The fall of wheat prices drove many farmers to the towns and cities, such as Alberta, Saskatchewan, and Manitoba.The American Hawley Tariff Act, passed on June 17, 1930, hurt every export sector and led to Canadian retaliation and closer ties to the Empire.The Federal Government initially refused to offer large-scale aid or relief to the provinces, much to the anger of provincial premiers, but it eventually gave in and started a Canadian New Deal type of relief by 1935. By 1937, the worst of the Depression had passed, but it left its mark on the countrys economic landscape. Canada was especially hard hit. Newfoundland (an independent dominion at the time) was bankrupt economically and politically and gave up responsible government by reverting to direct British control.The public at large lost faith in both the Party of Canada and the Conservative Party of Canada. This caused the rise of a third party: the Commonwealth Federation (a socialist party that achieved some success before joining the Labour Congress in 1961, becoming the Democratic Party).ReferencesFurther readingWorld*The World in Depression, 1929-1939 by Charles P Kindleberger (1986.)*The Nazi Economic Recovery 1932-1938 by Richard J Overy (1996).*The Nazi Voter: The Social Foundations of Fascism in Germany, 1919-1933 by Thomas Childers  (1983).* Timothy Hatton and Roy Bailey, Unemployment Incidence in Interwar London (2000)online* George Orwell. Down and out in Paris and London (1930) online; with commentary* Llewellyn Smith,  The new survey of London life and labour (London, 19301935). Data availableUnited States* JoAnn E. Argersinger, Toward a New Deal in Baltimore: People and Government in the Great Depression (1988)* Roger Biles, Big City Boss in Depression and War: Mayor Edward J. Kelly of Chicago (1984).* Douglas L. Smith, The New Deal in the Urban South (1988)* Charles H. Trout, Boston, The Great Depression, and the New Deal (1977).
3377077
John_Smith_(Conservative_politician)
Sir John Lindsay Eric Smith, CH, CBE (3 April 1923 &ndash; 28 February 2007) was a British banker, Conservative of Parliament, and Lieutenant of Berkshire. He was involved with many architectural, industrial and maritime conservation charities.  He founded the Trust in 1965.Early and private lifeSmith was born in London, the son of Captain Evan Cadogan Eric Smith MC of Ashfold in Sussex and his wife, Beatrice Helen (ne Williams).  He was a scion of an old banking family: Smiths of Nottingham was founded in the 1650s, and merged with the Provincial Bank after the World War, and his father became its chairman.  His mother was the daughter of Albert Williams and granddaughter of Sir George Williams, founder of the YMCA, and a great-granddaughter of Cook.  His elder sister, Fortune, married Hugh FitzRoy, Earl of Euston (later 11th of Grafton) in 1946; she was a of the Bedchamber to Elizabeth II from 1953 and 1966, and has been the of the Robes since 1967.Smith was educated at Eton, where he was Captain of the Oppidans and won the Rosebery Prize for History.  He joined the Air Arm in 1942 and trained as an observer at HMS Daedalus.  He served in the World War in a Swordfish squadron in the Mediterranean and the Atlantic, then as a liaison officer to the Ninth Air Force, and then with a squadron of Barracudas in the North Atlantic.  He flew as a navigator in an operation to dive-bomb the German battleship Tirpitz in Kvnangen fjord in July 1944.  He joined the aircraft carrier HMS Indomitable, and served in the Far East with Naval Air Squadron, flying Avengers.  He was in Ceylon at the end of the War.After the War, he read history at College, Oxford, where he later became an honorary fellow in 1979.  He met his future wife, Carnegy, in Oxford, where she was reading English.  They married in 1952.  They had two sons and three daughters:*Serena Mary Smith (married Hon. Nicholas Soames MP, son of Soames, Baron Soames)*Bartholomew Evan Eric Smith (born 1 February 1955; founder of the Amber Foundation and London Aero Club)*Adam Carnegy Eric Smith (born 1953)*Dido Smith*Emma Smith, who pre-deceased himSmith owned a property at No. 1, Square, in his former constituency. However, he resided at Shottesbrooke Park, near Maidenhead in Berkshire, the ancient home of the Vansittart family which he inherited from his fathers second cousin in 1962. He died in Windsor.  He was survived by his wife, their two sons, and two of their three daughters.Financial and political careerHe followed the family calling to become a director of and Co, the private bank and a subsidiary of National Provincial, in 1950.   He was the ninth generation of Smiths, father and son, to work in the bank.  He remained a director for 43 years, until 1993.He also joined the boards of many other companies, including Limited, the Bank, and the Times.  He was also a deputy-governor of Exchange Assurance.  He was awarded the OBE in 1964.He was a British Conservative politician. After the death of the Speaker of the House of Commons, Sir Harry Hylton Foster in 1965, Smith was elected to succeed him in the subsequent by-election as Member of Parliament for the Cities of London and Westminster. Smith served until he stood down in 1970.  He was awarded the CBE in 1975.He served as High Steward of Maidenhead, and as of Berkshire from 1975 to 1978.  He was knighted in 1988 and became a of Honour in 1994.  He greatly enjoyed travelling, and claimed to be the first man to visit all of the explorers huts in Antarctica.ConservationSmith served on committees of the National Trust from 1952 to 1995, and was deputy chairman from 1980 to 1995.  He assisted financially with repairs to Hall, damaged by subsidence due to mining. He also served on the Committee for Museums and Galleries from 1958 to 1966, the Buildings Council from 1971 to 1978, the Churches Fund from 1972 to 1974, and the Heritage Memorial Fund from 1980 to 1982.He founded the Trust in 1962, to raise money for charity by buying  long leases close to the date of their expiry.  The rather speculative venture was very successful, producing a cataract of gold which funded many of his charitable interests, including the Trust, which he founded three years later, and which still operates from his estate at Shottesbrooke.   He was involved in canal restoration through his friendship with T. C. Rolt, and was a driving force behind the preservation of HMS Belfast, HMS Warrior and SS Great Britain.References*thePeerage.com*Obituary, Independent, 1 March 2007* Obituary, Daily Telegraph, 3 March 2007*Obituary, Times, 3 March 2007*Obituary, Guardian, 10 March 2007
3384586
List_of_New_Hampshire_Historical_Markers_(5175)
This is part of the list of Hampshire Historical Markers.Markers 51 to 7551. Dr. Jeremy Belknap (1744-1798):City of Dover:Noted preacher, educator, naturalist, and historian. Born Boston, Mass. College 1762. School teacher at Portsmouth and Greenland. Pastor of First Congregational Church at nearby Dover, 1766-1786. Published first History of New Hampshire. Founded Historical Society 1794. A New Hampshire county perpetuates his name.52. Stoddard Glass:Town of Stoddard:Glassmaking in this town covered the years 1842-1873. Nearby stood the South Stoddard Glass Works founded by Joseph Foster in 1842. A second works was erected in 1846 at Mill Village two miles north. In its day, a major industry of the State, Stoddard glass products are now highly prized by collectors.53. Wentworth Estate:Town of Wolfeboro:This marker stands on the northwesterly part of a 4,000-acre tract which comprised the elegant country estate of John Wentworth, last royal governor of New Hampshire (1765-1775). The manor house, erected in 1769 on the northeast shore of this lake, was the earliest summer home in the Lakes Region. It was destroyed by fire in 1820.54. Potter Place:Town of Andover:The community takes its name from Richard Potter, noted magician, ventriloquist and showman. This 19th century master of the Black Arts was known throughout America. He died here in 1835 in his mansion, a showplace in the town. He is buried in a small plot on his once extensive estate.55. Baker River:Town of Rumney:Known to Indians as Asquamchumauke, the nearby river was renamed for Lt. Thomas Baker (1682-1753) whose company of 34 scouts from Northhampton, Mass. passed down this valley in 1712. A few miles south his men destroyed a Pemigewasset Indian village. Massachusetts rewarded the expedition with a scalp bounty of L40 and made Baker a captain.56. Rangers:Town of Northumberland:This rivers junction two miles north was rendezvous for Rogers Rangers after their destruction of St. Francis, Que., October 4, 1759. Pursuing Indians and starvation had plagued their retreat and more tragedy awaited here. The expected rescue party bringing food had come and gone. Many Rangers perished and early settlers found their bones along these intervales.57. Union Church:City of Claremont:Located easterly on Old Church Road, this wood-frame structure, built in 1771-1773, is the oldest standing Episcopal church in the State, serving the second oldest parish. The parish began in 1768 as a mission of the for the Propagation of the Gospel in Foreign Parts. The first rector was Reverend Cossitt (1771-1785).58. Scotch-Irish Settlement:Town of Derry:In April 1719, sixteen Presbyterian Scotch-Irish families settled here in two rows of cabins along West Running Brook easterly of Beaver Brook. Initially known as Nutfield, the settlement became Londonderry in 1723. The first year, a field was planted, known as the Common Field, where the potato was first grown in America.59. Ballou (1771-1852):Town of Richmond:Born in an almost uncleared wilderness in an area then known as Ballous Dell, 1.5 miles east of here, on Fish Hatchery Road, this farm boy, raised in the Baptist faith, became known as the Father of Universalism. In the 19th century, as an author and preacher, he expounded religious liberalism from pulpits in Portsmouth, N.H., Salem and Boston, Mass.60. First Methodist Meeting Place in New Hampshire:Town of Chesterfield:In 1772, the people called Methodist held their first religious meeting in this state on the James Robertson farm, 1.2 miles north of here, on Christian Street, with Philip Embury as the preacher. On June 20, 1803, Asbury spoke here using as his text: Let us run with patience the race that is set before us.61. First River Bridge:Town of Walpole:The first bridge across this river was built 1/4 mile north of this location in 1785 by Col. Hale. This toll bridge, replaced in 1840, was recognized in the 18th century as one of Americas outstanding bridges because of its unique engineering style. Its replacement was made a free bridge in 1904.62. Breakfast Hill:Town of North Hampton:On the hillside to be seen to the north of this location a band of marauding Indians and their captives were found eating their breakfast on June 26, 1696, following the attack at the Portsmouth Plains. When confronted by the militia the Indians made a hasty exit leaving the prisoners and plunder. This locality still enjoys the name of Breakfast Hill.63. Atlantic Cable Station and Sunken Forest:Town of Rye:The receiving station for the first Cable, laid in 1874, is located on Old Beach Road opposite this location. The remains of the Sunken Forest (remnants of the Age) may be seen at low tide. Intermingled with these gnarled stumps is the original Atlantic Cable.64. 45th Parallel:Town of Stewartstown:As you stand at this point on the 45th parallel you are halfway between the Equator and the Pole.65. Pierce Homestead:Town of Hillsborough:The Pierce Homestead was built in 1804 by Benjamin Pierce, a general in the Revolution, twice governor of New Hampshire (1827-28, 1829-30), and father of Pierce, the 14th President of the United States (1853-1857). Franklin Pierce was born in Hillsboro November 23, 1804 and the family occupied this dwelling shortly thereafter.66. State Capitol:City of Concord:The State Capitol Building of New Hampshire was built in 1816 to 1819 by Stuart J. Park. It is constructed of New Hampshire granite quarried in Concord. The original part was occupied June, 2 1819 and is the nations oldest State Capitol in which a legislature meets in its original chambers.67. Bridges House-Governors Residence:City of Concord:This house, on land long occupied by Revolutionary Veteran Joshua Thompson, was built by Charles Graham about 1836. Bridges, Governor of New Hampshire (1935-36) and Senator for 25 years thereafter, lived here from 1946 until his death. Left to the State upon the death of his widow, it became in 1969 the Governors official residence.68. Toll House and Toll Gate:Town of Sharon:A Toll House and Toll Gate stood on this site from 1803 to 1822. For many years droves of cattle passed along this 3rd New Hampshire Turnpike (Incorporated in 1799) four rods wide running from Walpole through Keene and Sharon toward Boston to the Massachusetts line.69. Keene Glass Industry:City of Keene:The first of two famous Keene glass factories was established near this site in 1814 and produced window glass for the England area until 1853. Another glass works (1815-1842), 1.5 miles southeast of here on Marlboro Street, made bottles and flasks now known as Keene Glass and prized today by museums and collectors.70. Old Coal Kiln:Town of Lisbon:A reminder of bygone days, this stone structure was used to make wood into charcoal for the nearby iron smelters. Pine knots, a waste material from the adjacent mill, were a prime source for charcoal. Charcoal production through this kiln, built in the 1860s, was necessary to the iron mining industry.71. Kilburn Brothers Stereoscopic View Factory:Town of Littleton:Here, from 1867 to 1909, the world famous Kilburn brothers, Benjamin and Edward, produced and distributed thousands of stereoscopic views. Their collection, largest in the world and collectors items today, provided popular parlor entertainment for generations.72. Mystery Hill:Town of Salem:Four miles east on Route 111 is a privately owned complex of strange stone structures bearing similarities to early stone work found in western Europe. They suggest an ancient culture may have existed here more than 2,000 years ago. Sometimes called Americas Stonehenge, these intriguing chambers hold a fascinating story and could be remnants of a pre-Viking or even Phoenician civilization.73. First Ski School in America:Town of Sugar Hill:In 1929, on the slopes of the hill to the east, Austrian-born Buchmayr established the first organized ski school in the States. Sponsored by Pecketts-on-Sugar Hill, one of the earliest resorts to promote the joys of winter vacationing in the snow, the school provided an initial impetus to the ski sport America knows today.74. Park Hill Meeting House:Town of Westmoreland:This church, built on the northeast corner of Cole Cemetery in 1762, was moved in sections by ox cart in 1779 to this location, then known as Federal Hill. A steeple with a bell cast by the Revere Foundry was added in 1826. This edifice is recognized as one of the most beautiful churches in England.75. Portsmouth Plains:City of Portsmouth:In the pre-dawn hours of June 26, 1696, Indians attacked the settlement here. Fourteen persons were killed and others taken captive. Five houses and nine barns were burned. This plain was the Training Field and Muster Ground. Close by stood the famous Plains Tavern (1728-1914) with its Bowling Green where many distinguished visitors were entertained.See also*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 1-25*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 26-50*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 76-100*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 101-125*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 126-150*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 151-175*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 176-200*of New Hampshire Historical Markers: 201-225External links*NH DHR New Hampshire Historical Markers
3391622
Franklin_Mountains_State_Park
Franklin Mountains State Park is a Texas state park in Paso, Texas in the States. It is at an elevation of .( accessdate2010-06-30) It is the largest park in the nation lying completely within city limits, covering .() Franklin Mountains State Park is open for year-round recreation including hiking, biking, picnicking and scenic driving and vistas.HistoryNative Americans and other travellers have used the natural resources in the Franklin Mountains when crossing the gap between the Franklin Mountains and the Juarez Mountains that is now Jurez across the Grande in Mexico and El Paso. Pictograms and mortar pits confirm a human presence in the mountains dating back more than 12,000 years.(The Franklin Mountains are most likely named for Benjamin Franklin Coons, who in 1849 purchased a ranch in what is now the El Paso. At first known as Coons Ranch, by 1851 the settlement took on Coons middle name and was called Franklin.() Despite the town being officially named El Paso in 1852, the locals continued to call it Franklin throughout the 1850s.() The El Paso Tin Mining and Smelting Company operated a tin mine on the northeast slope of North Franklin Mountain from 1909-1915. While the mine had the distinction of being the only tin mine ever located in the U.S., it was an economic failure.(()Efforts to grant protected status to the Franklin Mountains began as early as 1925. A real estate developer sought to build housing on the mountains and in 1979 he built a road up into them. A local organization known as the Wilderness Park Coalition was to convince the Texas Legislature  to protect the mountains in 1979. Despite this success the legislature, in the same bill, prohibited funding for the development, operation and maintenance of the park.() The property was formally acquired in 1981.( Changes to the legislation were made in 1985 when a plan for park development was established( and the park was opened to the public in 1987.(GeologyThe Franklin Mountains are  long and   wide) and stretch from El Paso into Mexico.() The Franklins were formed due to crustal extension related to the Cenozoic Grande rift. Although the present topography of the range and adjoining basins is controlled by extension during rifting in the last 10 million years, faults within the range also record deformation during the orogeny, between 85 and 45 million years ago.( The mountains are the southernmost tip of the Mountains in the U.S.( The Precambrian rocks atop North Franklin Mountain are the highest geological structure in the state of Texas.( ) The highest peak is Franklin Mountain at . The mountains are composed primarily of rock with some igneous intrusions. Geologists refer to them as tilted-block fault mountains and in them can be found billion-year-old Precambrian rocks, the oldest in Texas.(EcologyFranklin Mountains State Park is part of the Desert. The plants and wildlife found in the park, despite it being within a city, are typical of those found throughout the rest of the desert. cactus, Yucca, Mexican and  Californian poppies are common plants.( Trees like Cottonwood, hackberry, juniper and oak grow along the springs on the mountain slopes.( Mammals in the park include Mule Deer, Mountain Lions, Black Bear and a variety of rodents.(( Birds observed at the park included Eagles, owls, hawks, and a wide variety of smaller birds.(RecreationFranklin Mountains State Park is open for year-round recreation. Development of the park is limited and much of the land is far from paved access roads and parking areas. Two hiking trails can be accessed from the Bean Transmountain Drive. Plans for a network of  of hiking trails are under consideration.( climbing is permitted in the park and well established climbing areas are located in Canyon. Five camping areas are found in the Tom Mays Unit of the park with picnic facilities.(See also*Mountains (Texas)*Franklin Mountain*Paso, Texas*Parks and Wildlife DepartmentReferences
3407122
Geology_of_Somerset
Image:EnglandSomerset.png|thumb|SomersetSomerset is a rural county in the southwest of England, covering . It is bounded on the north-west by the Channel, on the north by Bristol and Gloucestershire, on the north-east by Wiltshire, on the south-east by Dorset, and on the south west and west by Devon. It has broad central plains with several ranges of low hills. The landscape divides into four main geological sections from the Silurian through the Devonian and Carboniferous to the Permian which influence the landscape, together with water-related features.The low lying areas of the North Somerset Levels and Levels have been subject to thousands of years of flooding and mans attempts to control the flow of water. In the north of the county the Limestone of the Hills dominates the landscape, while in the south the Blackdown and Hills rise out of the levels. The highest areas are on Exmoor. The wide variety of landscapes has led to several areas being designated as of Special Scientific Interest for geological reasons, and support a range of flora and fauna as can be seen from the of Sites of Special Scientific Interest in Somerset Rock ages The oldest rocks are of Silurian age (443417 million years ago), the most southerly known outcrop of rocks of this age in Britain. They make up a sequence of lavas, tuffs (volcanic ash), shales and mudstones in a narrow outcrop to the northeast of Mallet, in the eastern Hills.() Rocks from the Devonian (417354 million years ago) are found in much of Exmoor,() the Quantocks and in the cores to the folded masses of the Mendip Hills. Carboniferous Period (354290 million years ago) rocks are represented by the Limestone that forms the Mendip Hills, rising abruptly out of the flat landscape of the Levels and Moors. The limestones are very fossiliferous, and contain evidence of the abundant marine life that existed at the time of their creation, including fossil crinoids (sea-lilies), corals and brachiopods. At the end of the Permian (290248 million years ago) and Triassic periods, the orogeny resulted in the formation of several mountainous areas including Dartmoor in the south, Exmoor and the Quantocks, and the Mendips. In the Taunton area Permian (295250 million years ago) red sandstones and breccia outcrop, although rocks of Triassic age (248204 million years ago) underlie much of Somerset and form the solid geology of the Somerset Moors and Levels.() There are no glacial deposits.The Triassic rocks consist of red marls, sandstones, breccias and conglomerates which spread over the older rocks. The Dolometic Conglomerate is an old shingle beach of Keuper Marl age. The Rhaetic Beds are full of fossils due to invasion of the Jurassic Sea. The Lias consists of clays and limestones, the latter being quarried and are famous for their fossils. Lias was used locally both as a building stone and as a source of lime for making mortar. Blue Lias is believed to be quarried on the Hills in the 15th century; and was quarried in Puriton from the early 19th century until the 1973, when the local cement works closed.(Dunning, R.W. (1992). The Victoria History of the Counties of England. A History of the County of Somerset. Volume VI: Andersfield, Cannington and North Petherton Hundreds (Bridgwater and Neighbouring Parishes). Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 0-19-722780-5. Page 183.) Above the Lias is the Lower Oolite Series which are chiefly clays and oolile limestone. The famous Stone is obtained from the Great Oolite bed.(Hudson, Kenneth (1971). The Fashionable Stone. Bath: Adams & Dart. ISBN 0-239-00066-8.)(Bezzant, Norman (1980). Out of the Rock.... London: William Heinemann Ltd. ISBN 0-434-06900-0. Page 143.) Clay is the chief member of the Middle Oolite Series;( and above this are the Upper Cretaceous rocks with Gault, Upper Greensand and Chalk. Alluvial flats and peat bogs occupy much of the centre of Somerset.( Coastline Image:Stholm2.jpg|altA rocky island with steep sides rises sharply out of the water.|thumb|HolmIn prehistoric times the coastline of Somerset was very different from the present one, the sea level at the last glacial maximum being some  lower than today so that the Channel was almost non-existent. The Bristol Channel has one of the largest ranges in the world, up to  at Burnham-on-Sea for example,() second only to of Fundy in Canada.()() Normal high tide may be enhanced by between  and  during storm surges.(Rippon (1997). The Severn Estuary: Landscape Evolution and Wetland Reclamation. London: Leicester University Press. ISBN 0-7185-0069-5. Chapter 2: Creation of the Levels) This feature has meant that large areas of the county have been liable to flooding by the sea. Thus the present coastline is partly due a belt of marine clay at the coast and partly due to seawalls built to reclaim areas previously flooded at high tide.(Williams, Michael (1970). The Draining of the Somerset Levels. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-07486-X. Chapter 2: Draining: The setting of the Somerset Levels.) The coastline contains exposures of Devonian sediments and tectonics west of Minehead adjoining the classic exposures of Mesozoic sediments and structural features which extend eastward to the Parrett estuary() forming cliffs along the coastline near Clevedon and near Minehead,() with low sandhills near Burnham-on-Sea.(Rippon (1997). The Severn Estuary: Landscape Evolution and Wetland Reclamation. London: Leicester University Press. ISBN 0-7185-0069-5. Chapter 1: Introduction: a regional landscape study.) There are sandy beaches mainly at Burnham-on-Sea, Brean and Weston-super-Mare.() There are also storm ridges, salt marsh, and sand dunes.() Main river valleys The main valleys between the hills are filled with alluvial deposits from the hills or sea. The county has many small rivers, most of which flow into the Channel. Many of the latter rivers now have clysts (the local name for a sluice()) on them to control the sea, but formerly they were tidal for some way inland. The main exception to this is the Parrett, which still has a bore.() However the Chew and the Frome flow into the Avon which forms most of the northern county boundary with Gloucestershire.(Landranger Map 172: Bristol & Bath. Published in 2006 by the Survey) The Cale flows into Dorset through the Vale, while the Exe flows into Devon. The (Dorset) Axe, the Culm and the Otter rise in Somerset but flow into Dorset.(Landranger Map 193: Taunton & Lyme Regis. Published in 2007 by the Survey)Image:Smriver chew.JPG|altRiver flowing between grassy banks surrounded by trees.|thumb|left|Chew between Drew and PensfordThe courses of the rivers Parrett, Somerset Axe, Brue and Cary run across the Levels and have generally been changed to improve the flow.(Rippon, Stephen (2007). Waterways and Water Transport on Reclaimed Coastal Marshlands: The Somerset Levels and Beyond. Chapter 8 In: Blair, John (Edr) (2007). Waterways and Canal-Building in Medieval England. Oxford: Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-921715-1.) The River Axe rises from Hole Caves, due to water draining into the ground at swallet holes on top of the Mendips. The river passes through Panborough Moor, Wedmore Moor, Ox Moor, Stoke Moor and Mark Moor and reaches the sea at Uphill (near Weston-super-Mare) on Bay.(Landranger Map 182: Weston-super-Mare. Published in 2005 by the Survey)The Brue rises at Brewham, close to the county border with Wiltshire. It flows through Bruton and is joined by the rivers Pitt and Alham. The river then flows past East and Lydford to Baltonsborough and then turns north to Street across Butts Moor, South Moor and Kennard Moor. Originally it then joined the Axe but now it flows west across Moor, and Tadham Moors, Moor, Mark Moor and Huntspill Moor.( It is joined by the North Drain and the Hartlake river. In Moor the Brue is linked to the man-made Huntspill river by the artificial Cripps river.(Williams, Michael (1970). The Draining of the Somerset Levels. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-07486-X.) The Brue reaches the sea near Burnham-on-Sea.Image:uk som brue.jpg|altA straight water filled channel surrounded by an avenue of trees and grassy banks.|thumb|Brue near GlastonburyThe Cary originates in Cary in the east of Somerset. It flows south-west through Cary Moor to Fitzpaine.( The river then turns north-west to the north of Somerton. It then used to turn south to join the Parrett but now passes through Somerton Moor and crosses Sedgemoor in an artificial channel, the Sedgemoor Drain, joining the Parrett at Dunball north of Bridgwater.(The River Parrett originates at Cheddington, Dorset, just over the border with Somerset. It enters Somerset at Plucknett where it is joined by the Broad river. It passes to the east of Petherton and flows north through Thorney Moor and Muchelney Level and it is then joined by the Isle and Yeo (Ivel) rivers.( The Parrett flows through Langport and then through Middle Moor, Aller Moor to Burrowbridge where it is joined by the Tone. It then passes through Earlake Moor, Hartlake Moor, Weston Level and Moor. It continues north through Bridgwater, Horsey Level, past Pawlett Ham and Pawlett Level to the coast near Burnham-on-Sea.(The River Tone originates at Beverton Pond on the Hills in the west of Somerset. It flows south into Clatworthy reservoir and then to Greenham(Landranger Map 181: Minehead & Brendon Hills. Published in 2006 by the Survey) where it changes course to go north-east to Taunton. It continues east through Moor, and Hay Moors and Stan Moor to Burrowbridge where it meets the Parrett.(Landranger Map 183: Yeovil & Frome. Published in 2005 by the Survey)The River Exe rises at Exehead on Exmoor(Landranger Map 180: Barnstaple & Ilfracombe. Published in 2008 by the Survey) and flows south-east to Exton where it is joined by the Quarme. It then flows south to Exebridge where it meets the Barle and passes into Devon.(Landranger Map 192: Exeter & Sidmouth. Published in 2007 by the Survey) Levels and moors Image:uk som levels.jpg|altView over flat landscape with a patchwork of fields.|thumb|The view towards Knoll from TorThe North Somerset Levels are to the east of Weston-super-Mare, while the Axe valley is separated by the Isle of Wedmore from the Brue valley.( The latter is separated by the Hills from the main wetland of the Parrett/Tone/Cary valleys.( The Poldens are a low narrow ridge of Lias with alternating bands of limestone and clay. Because of the nature of the Levels and Moors, the Poldens have a significant visual impact.The Levels run from the coast up to  inland. These wetlands cover , most of which is no higher than  above sea level.() There are coastal marine clay deposits, and further inland there are many peaty areas.( Dotted within this wetland landscape are slightly raised inter-glacial islands called burtles.() These have been settled from the Mesolithic onward, with wooden causeways linking them to higher ground.() There are also rocky outcrops, such as Knoll and Tor which have also housed ancient settlements.(Croft, Robert and Aston, Michael (1993). Somerset from the air: An Aerial Guide to the Heritage of the County. Taunton: Somerset County Council. ISBN 0-86183-215-9. Chapter 4: The Somerset Levels and Moors.)The water levels in the moors and levels are controlled by a series of small narrow canals called rhines (in Avonmouth and Gloucestershire), or rhynes (in Somerset) (both pronounced reens), or reens (in Monmouthshire),( along with larger drains, gates and pumping stations.( The rhynes are often used as field boundary ditches instead of hedges.(Williams, Michael (1970). The Draining of the Somerset Levels. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0-521-07486-X. Page 187.) Some parts are allowed to flood in winter. The area is mainly used for grazing but some peat extraction is carried out.() Northern uplands This is the area between the River Avon to the north and the Axe valley. The north of Somerset is dominated by the tableland of the Hills, an of Outstanding Natural Beauty, stretching from Frome in the east to Crook Peak in the west, with outliers of Hill and Down as well as Holm in the Bristol Channel. The highest point is Black down at .() There is an escarpment facing south to the Levels and Moors while the dip slope to the north is broken up.(Image:Beaconbatchmay2005.jpg|altTyre tracks run through flat grassland toward a large mound on the distant horizon.|thumb|left|A view of Black Down from near Charterhouse Wireless Station in the HillsTo the north of Bath are Landsdown, Langridge and Solsbury hills. These are outliers of the Cotswolds. Bath is noted for its thermal waters (48 C) that are rich in calcium and sulphates.()The Red Sandstone is a series of red Sandstone, marls and conglomerates. It rises as an anticline in the Mendips and appears in the Gorge and at Portishead. limestone, of maritime origin, covers the sandstone and appears in the Avon Gorge and at Weston-super-Mare where it contains volcanic rocks.() There are outlying hills at Worlebury, Middle Hope, the Failand Ridge, Broadfields Down, Portishead Down and Wrington Hill.The main geological component of the Mendips is limestone and represent the remnants of a much higher range of hills that existed hundreds of millions years ago.( This has allowed the formation of features such as Gorge, Gorge and Combe.( There are a wide variety of of the Mendip Hills and swallett holes caused by dissolution of the rock by water. Further east there are silurian volcanos, Carboniferous limestone outcrops, variscan tectonics, Permo-Triassic conglomerates, sediment-filled fissures, a classic unconformity, Jurassic clays and limestones, Cretaceous Greensand and chalk topped with Tertiary remnants including Sarsen Stones. These sediments have yielded a fairly rich fossil fauna of brachiopods and trilobites indicating that they were deposited in a shallow marine sea into which the lavas were extruded. The rocks are quarried at Hill near St Michael for aggregate.()measures appear in the Radstock district, and surrounding coalfield (largely concealed by Triassic and newer rocks).() There are two series of coal-bearing sandstones and shales separated by Pennant sandstone. Locally the beds are folded and faulted. There were mines in the Radstock and Nailsea areas but these have closed. This was one of the first areas in the world to undergo systematic geological study and mapping by John Strachey and William Smith in the 18th century.()() They observed the rock layers, or strata, which led Smith to the creation of a testable hypothesis, which he termed The Principle of Faunal Succession.(As recounted in Simon Winchester, The Map that Changed the World (New York: HarperCollins, 2001), pp. 59-91.)The Mendips were mined for lead, silver, coal, ochre, earth and zinc but this has finished.()(() They were also quarried for stone, notably at Bath and Doulting.( Today the Mendips are a major source of aggregates.() Southern uplands altTriangular shaped building made of corrugated iron and stone.|thumb|Ham Hill summit and war memorial seen from Stoke-sub-HamdonTo the south of Somerset there is an upland with a series of rolling valleys and scarps, from Penselwood in the east to the Hills, another designated Area of Outstanding Natural Beauty, in the west.() This is a geologically complex area of clays, limstone and marl.() The honey-coloured limestone at Ham Hill (also known as Hamdon Hill) is particularly important to geologists because of the assemblages of fossils which it contains, the sedimentary features which it displays and the way it relates to other rocks of equivalent age in the close vicinity.() It has been quarried since Roman times at least.()The Blackdowns are on the south-west border of Somerset, extending into Devon. They are composed of Greensand.( The scarp faces north and is steep and wooded, with a south facing dip slope. There is an open plateau, which is not as high as the Mendips.(The Hills are a  long broad ridge from the coast near Watchet in the north to near Taunton in the south. They reach  high at Neck and are separated from Exmoor and the Brendons by a valley. The Quantocks and the Brendon Hills at the eastern end of Exmoor are formed by thick sequences of slates and sandstones of Devonian age that were deposited by large deltas that built out into a shallow sea.()altGently sloping rock slab beach. In the distance are cliffs showing lines of striation.|thumb|left|Beach at Quantocks Head. The wave cut platform at low tide. The short cliff shows the rock strataThe Quantock Hills are largely formed by rocks of the Devonian Period, which consist of sediments originally laid down under a shallow sea and slowly compressed into solid rock. In the higher north western areas older Devonian rocks, known as Hangman Grits,() predominate, and can be seen in the exposed rock at Quantoxhead quarry, which were worked for road building.() Further south there are newer Middle and Devonian rocks, known as Ilfracombe beds and Morte Slates. These include sandstone and limestone, which have been quarried near Aisholt. At Great Holwell, south of Aisholt, there is a limestone cave, which is the only one in the Devonian limestone of North Devon and West Somerset.( The lower fringes around the hills are composed of younger rocks of the Triassic period,() these are known as Red Sandstone rocks which represent the deposits of large river systems that crossed a desert plain,( and often contain irregular masses or veins of gypsum, which was worked on the foreshore at Watchet.( The scarp is to the west with a dip slope to the east. The west side is cut by combes with broad valleys on the east. The hill tops are open heathland with woods on the slopes.(Several areas have outcrops of slates and between Audries and Kilve, younger rocks of the Jurassic Period can be found. This area falls within the Blue Anchor to Lilstock of Special Scientific Interest (SSSI) and is considered to be of international geological importance.() At Kilve are the remains of a red brick retort, built in 1924, when it was discovered that the shale found in the cliffs was rich in oil.() At Anchor the coloured alabaster found in the cliffs gave rise to the name of the colour Watchet Blue.() Exmoor Image:SnowyExmoor.jpg|altRounded hills, some wooded, and a river valley are covered in snow.|thumb|Exmoor in winterExmoor is a dissected plateau of Devonian sedimentary rock, rising to  at Beacon. It extends into Devon but the majority of the area is in Somerset. Much of the area is a Park.() The landscape is one of rounded hills, with hogs-back cliffs at the coast due to geological movements. Because of high rainfall there are boggy areas and the part by the Chains is a Conservation Review site recognised as being nationally important for its south-western lowland heath communities and for transitions from semi-natural woodland through upland heath to blanket mire. The Chains provides palynological record of a mid to late Flandrian vegetation history on Exmoor. The pollen sequence in the peat is calibrated by radiocarbon dating.() The Glenthorne area demonstrates the Trentishoe Formation of the Hangman Sandstone Group. The Hangman Sandstone represents the Devonian sequence of North Devon and Somerset.() These unusual freshwater deposits in the Hangman Grits, were mainly formed in desert conditions.()As this area of Britain was not subject to glaciation, the plateau remains as a remarkably old landform.()()Quartz and iron mineralisation can be detected in outcrops and subsoil.( The underlying rocks are covered by moors are supported by wet, acid soil.() The highest point on Exmoor is Beacon; at  it is also the highest point in Somerset.(Exmoor has  of coastline, including the highest cliffs in England, which reach a height of  at Culbone Hill.() However, the crest of this coastal ridge of hills is more than  from the sea. If a cliff is defined as having a slope greater than 60 degrees, the highest cliff on mainland Britain is Great Hangman near Martin at  high, with a cliff face of .() Its sister cliff is the  Little Hangman,() which marks the edge of Exmoor.Exmoors woodlands sometimes reach the shoreline,() especially between Porlock and The Foreland, where they form the single longest stretch of coastal woodland in England and Wales.() The Coastal Heaths have been recognised as a of Special Scientific Interest due to the diversity of plant species present.()Image:LowerEastLynRiver.jpg|altSmall stream gushes over rocks, surrounded by woodlands.|thumb|left|The Lyn RiverThe high ground forms the catchment area for numerous rivers and streams. There are about  of named rivers on Exmoor.() The Exe, from which Exmoor takes its name,()() rises at Head near the village of Simonsbath, close to the Channel coast, but flows more or less directly due south, so that most of its length lies in Devon. The river and the Valley are both designated as biological sites of Special Scientific Interest. Another tributary, the Haddeo, flows from the Lake.The action of streams has cut combes through the hills down to the sea, which are now wooded, although much of Exmoor is open heathland. There is an outlier of Exmoor at North Hill near Minehead. Iron working was formerly carried out, probably from the Roman period onward.()Because Exmoor was a forest, i.e. a hunting reserve, it was unpopulated in Medieval times. The first house on the moor was only built at Simonsbath in 1654.() It was not until the 19th century that farms were built around the moor.The Hills are to the east of Exmoor and are an outlier of it. They are separated from Exmoor by the valley of the Aville.( They have the same undulating landscape. The Brendons reach a height of  at Hill.() ore mining() was carried out from Roman times up to the early 20th century.( See also * Somerset* of the UK* of Somerset* of England References  External links * The Aggregate Landscape of Somerset: Predicting the Archaeological Resource
3413703
Durg
Durg is a city located in Chhattisgarh state, Central India. It is located just east of the River (Shivnath River) and is part of the Durg-Bhilai urban agglomeration. The city is an agricultural market and is heavily engaged in milling rice and pigeon peas. Durg gained importance as an industrial centre after the establishment of a large steel plant at Bhilai. Industries include brass working and bell-metal working, oil pressing, mining,  and weaving. It is the headquarters of District, the third largest district of Chattisgarh.GeographyForest Cover is 9.01% i.e. 730 square kilometers.Durg District is a populous District of Chhattisgarh. It occupies the southwestern part of the Chhattisgarh plain and possesses belts of hilly country in the south, southwest and northwest, bestowed with mineral resources and forests. The National Highway No. 6 (Mumbai - Nagpur - Calcutta) is the major highway of the district and the train route is the main line of the South Eastern Railway midway between Mumbai-Calcutta. Nearest airport from the District Headquarter Durg is at Raipur about 60 km.Geographical Informations are as followed:-Latitude & Longitude: Between- 2023 and 2202 N & 8046 and 8158 E*Height above mean sea level: 317.00 M*Geographical Area: 8537 km2*Forest Area: 764.46 km2 (8.95% of Geographical Area)Population Details are as followed:Population: 2,810,436*Male Population:1417893 (As per Census 2001)*Female Population:1392543)(As per Census 2001)*Scheduled Caste Population:359511 (12.79%)*Scheduled Tribe Population:348801 (12.41%)Sex Ratio(females per 1000 males): 982*Growth (19912001):16.88*Literacy Rate:75.62*Literacy Rate (Male):86.43*Literacy Rate (Female):64.64*Bhilai Nagar (Municipal Cooperation) Population: 5,56,366*Durg (Municipal Cooperation) Population: 2,32,517PhysiographyThe District occupies the southwestern part of the Upper Sheonath-Mahanadi valley and the bordering hills in the south and southwest. Physiographically, the District can be divided into two divisions, viz. the C.G. plain and the Southern plateau. The Chhattisgarh plain occupies the largest area in the District.RiversThe general slope of the district comes under Mahanadi river slope and is towards the north and north east and locally in some places towards east. The main rivers of Mahanadi are Sheonath, Kharun, Tandula, Kharkhara and Aamner. Sheonath is the main river of the district which originates from Panabaras Hill (625 M) and flows towards north-east. This river is the main tributary of Mahanadi River. The total length of the Sheonath river is 345 km. The length of Sheonath river in Durg district is 120 km. The main tributary of Sheonath river is Tandula river. This river originates from hills situated in the north of Bhanupratappur (District- Kanker). After covering a distance of 34 km this river joins Sukhanala. This river joins Sheonath river in the south-west of Durg at a distance of approximately 13 km. The total length of this river is 96.6 km. A dam is constructed during the period 1905 to 1921 at the joining point of Sukhanala and Tandula river.Kharun river originates from Petechua in the south-east of the district and after flowing 80 km joins Sheonath river near Somnath in the north. Sheonath river flows nearer to the western border of the district whereas river Kharun forms the eastern border of the district. The length of Kharun river is 120 km. The area around Kharun river is very fertile.Kharkhara river originates from hills situated in Dalli Rajahara in the south-west of the District. This river joins Sheonath river after covering a distance of 90 km towards north-east. To fulfill the water requirement of Bhilai Steel Plant and Industry, in 1965-66, Kharkhara Dam was constructed. This is situated at Village Petechua at Balod Tehsil.ClimateDurg generally has a dry tropical weather which is moderate but on a warmer side in summer season. The peak temperatures are usually reached in May/June and can be as high as 45C. The onset of monsoon is usually from July and the season extends up to September, with monsoon peaking during July and August. Maximum, Average & Minimum Rain fall Of District Durg are 1477.2 mm, 1071.16 mm and 781.5 mm per year respectively.HistoryIn ancient times Durg was part of Dakshina or Southern Kosala. In the epic Ramayana, King Dasharatha Of Uttara Kosala married Kosalaya, the princess of Dakshnia Kosala. The Chinese traveller Huien Tsang visited Southern Kosala in the 4th Century A.D. He mentions that he found an Asokan tope in the Capital city. It is therefore apparent that the District was included in Ashokas Empire. lso in the 5th century AD, we get an authentic reference to this tract, in the famous Allahabad Pillar Inscription of Samudra Gupta. He claims that two kingdom Kosala and Mahakantara, succumbed to his southern expedition.However, the first specific reference with regard to the word Durg comes around the 8th century A.D. through two stone inscriptions; which were found in Durg and later deposited in the Raipur Museum. The First inscription mentions the name of a king Shiva Deva. The 2nd inscription associates the name of Sivapura (the capital of Shivadeva) with that of Shiva Durga, indicating thereby that during Shivadevas reign the town and the fort were separate. The present name Durg is evidently a contraction of the old shivadurga, which he built. The river on whose banks stands the present town is also called Shiva River. With the coming of the Kalachuri dynasty of Tripuri in A.D. 1182, Durg came under their kingdom. From then on it remained under the Kalachuries, till 1742 A. D. when the Marathas deposed them.In 1877, after the Marathas lost the IIIrd Anglo- Maratha War, the tract of Chhattisgarh passed into British hands. Caption Edmonds was the First British Officer posted in Chhattisgarh as Collector and Magistrate to carry on the administration. For the purpose of Administration Durg was attached to Bhandara District (now in Maharashtra) but in 1857 it was separated and made into a tehsil of Raipur district to which it remained attached till 1906.In 1906 Durg was created as a separate district. The Collectorate building was built in the year 1907. Interestingly, cement was not used in the construction of the collectorate building, instead a mixture of limestone, gum, sand and fruit pulp was used as the binding agent. Today even though 100 years have gone by, the collectorate building stands strong as it might have been built yesterday. Soon after,  of land from Kasaridih Village, was acquired by the government to build official residences. It is on this land that we find todays Civil Lines, Pt. Ravishankar Shukla Stadium, Chaupati, Company Garden, New Bus Stand, Polytecnic College and the Law College. The First Collector Of Durg was Shri S. M. Chitnabees. It is in his memory that the road from Kucheri to the Railway Station has been named Chitnabees Road. During the freedom struggle, Durg was a hot bed of nationalist activities. Almost all the prominent leaders including Mahatma Gandhi, Pt. Jawahalal Nehru and Dr. Rajendra Prasad visited Durg during the freedom struggle. Freedom fighters like Shri Ram Prasad Deshmukh & his son Shri Laxman Singh Deshmukh from village Khamtarai (Distt. Durg) participated in struggle for freedom & sent to jail many times by Britishers.Later on in mid nineties Shri Ramchandra Deshmukh played an important role to bring Chhattisgarh on cultural map of India. He directed plays like Chadaini Gonda, Dewar Dera & Kari.DemographicsAs of 2001 India census,() Durg had a population of 231,182. Males constitute 51% of the population and females 49%. Durg has an average literacy rate of 72%, higher than the national average of 59.5%: male literacy is 79% and, female literacy is 65%. In Durg, 13% of the population is under 6 years of age.CultureThe people of Durg also have a great tendency towards adopting new trends and life styles. Durg thus is multicultural for people from all over India have come and settled in this region.The people of this region are very fond of colors. The dresses they wear are very colorful. Women wear sarees with Kardhani. In rural areas women wear mala made of one rupee coins. Though this has gone out of trend these days. The people of this region are also known for creating humour out of language. Comical plays are very popular and are worth watching.Durg is rich in its cultural heritage. Durg has its own dance styles, cuisine, music. Pandwani the musical narration of the epic Mahabharata, Raut Nacha (performed  basically by Yadav caste, this folk dance has bagged many awards at state level) and the Panthi and Soowa dance styles.Bai, the Pandwani artist was awarded Padmashree for her contribution to this dance style.PoetsSri Surendra Dubey is one of the several poets belonging to Durg. His poetry has been critically acclaimed not only in India but also around the world in countries like United States of America, England, France etc. Currently he resides in Bhilai.ReferencesOfficial web site of Durg District - http://durg.gov.in/Stations in Chhattisgarhbn:ca:Durgde:Durges:Durgfa:hi:bpy:it:Durgpam:Durgnew:pnb:sv:Durgvi:Durgwar:Durg
3418371
Dibrugarh
Dibrugarh (), is the headquarters of district, Assam, India. Dibrugarh is the third largest city in Assam after Guwahati and Silchar .Dibrugarh is one of the most important cities of Assam situated on the banks of the River, about  north east of Guwahati. It is the gateway to the three tea producing districts of Tinsukia, Dibrugarh, and Sibsagar. These three areas account for approximately 50% of Indias Assam tea crop and this gives Dibrugarh its rightly earned sobriquet as the Tea City of India. Oil and Timber are the other two big industries in and around Dibrugarh.In 1950, the Medog earthquake measuring over 8.6 on the Richter Scale, changed the course of the River, and this caused the destruction of more than three quarters of the town. It has since then been rebuilt over the years, but the River nearby is, as it always has been, a constant reminder to its people that live in its shadow, of its turbulence and all encompassing journey to the sea.Demographics India census(), Dibrugarh had a population of 1,00,523. Males constitute 54% of the population and females 46%.  Dibrugarh has an average literacy rate of 81%, higher than the national average of 59.5%: male literacy is 82% and, female literacy is 80%. In Dibrugarh, 9% of the population is under 6 years of age.EconomyEconomic Activities in the district is dominated by two major industries, oil & natural gas and tea production. It was in Digboi that first time oil well was dug during the British era. Duliajan, Hugrijan and Moran are the key locations for oil and gas industry in the district. Duliajan also happens to be the headquarter of the Public Sector Undertaking India Limited.Apart from this Dibrugarh district boasts of the highest amount of tea produced in India. There are several tea gardens dating back to the British era.Apart from this Dibrugarh is also famous for wood & wood works, plywood factories in Margherita, cane and bamboo furniture, etc. Cottage industries specializing in production of silk (Muga Silk), phulam gamosa (A traditional piece of cloth, used as ornate head-scarf as well as traditional towel), chador (the famous traditional pure silk dress of Assam State of India) (Chador pronounced as Saador) are also in vogue. BCPL The Assam Gas Cracker Project also known as BRAHMAPUTRA CRACKER AND POLYMER LIMITED was proposed as a part of implementation of Assam Accord signed by Government of India on 15th August, 1985. The Assam Gas Cracker Project has been approved by Cabinet Committee on Economic Affairs in its meeting held on 18th April, 2006 under an equity arrangement of GAIL (70%), OIL (10%), NRL (10%) and Govt. of Assam (10%) with a project cost of Rs. 5460.61 crores in which capital subsidy is Rs.2138 Crores. The project schedule for completion of the project is 60 months.However the commissioning of the project has been pushed to December 2013 and the cost has escalated to Rs 9,285 crore.   The site selected for Assam Gas Cracker Project is at Lepetkata, 15 km from Dibrugarh town on NH37 along river Sessa in Assam. A Joint Venture agreement has been signed on 18.10.2006 and the company Brahmaputra Cracker and Polymer Limited was registered on 08.01.2007. Dr. Manmohan Singh, Honble Prime Minister of India laid the foundation stone of this project on 9th April, 2007. (http://assamgovt.nic.in/gas_cracker.asp)(http://www.thehindubusinessline.com/companies/article2060007.ece)TransportMohanbari Airport, which is located around 15km from the city, is one of the busiest airport in the  northeast. It is connected to the rest of India by airlines such as India,Indigo, and Airways.  There are direct flight services to cities like Kolkata, Guwahati, and conecting flights to New Delhi.  AAI is planning to make Mohanbari Airport an air hub in the northeastern region along with Guwahati and Agartala.(http://www.assamtribune.com/scripts/detailsnew.asp?idaug1011/state05)Dibrugarh is shown as one of the easternmost Railway Station on the map of the Indian Railways and is connected to some important Indian cities (Bangalore, Chennai, Kolkata , Delhi etc.) through a direct broad gauge rail network.  The Rajdhani-Link Express (An extension of Rajdhani Express) also connects it to Delhi. There are long-distance luxury buses plying between important destinations withinin Assam and other neighbouring states, popularly known as Day-Super and Night-Super, depending on the time of operation.Important trains that run from Dibrugarh are Rajdhani Link Express, Express, Mail, Egmore Express, Yeshvantpur Express etc.Until the 1990s, transportation within the town was largely by buses and rickshaws. Later on rickshaws, locally known as Vikram, were introduced for intra-city transportation.Dibrugarh also has a developed waterway transportation system. Ferry services link Dibrugarh with many a places in Assam and Pradesh.EducationDibrugarh is one of the educational hubs of Upper Assam. With Kanoi College, Dibru College, University, Dibrugarh Govt. Girls H.S. and M.P. School, Medical College,St. Marys Convent School, Dibrugarh Govt. Boys HS School, Brook Academy and numerous other institutions, it is a major contributor to the education infrastructure of Assam.A new engineering college, known as Dibrugarh University Institute of Engineering and Technology (DUIET), has been established under Dibrugarh University to promote engineering and technology in Upper Assam.Dibrugarh University Institute of Engineering & Technology offers its students a B.Tech degree in one of the following departments : Computer Science & Engineering Electronics & Communication Engineering Mechanical Engineering Petroleum Engineering(www.duiet.org) The John Berry White Medical School, established in 1900, was the first center for formal medical education in the northeastern region of India. This institution was upgraded to a medical college on 3, 1947.Regional Medical Research Centre, NE Region is one of the six regional centres of Indian Council of Medical Research (ICMR). It covers the most remote and less developed eight states of the north-eastern region of India and is responsible for carrying out Biomedical Research in the region. It was established in 1982 and runs with intramural grant from ICMR and extramural adhoc projects from different funding agencies.(rmrcne.org.in)Dibrugarh Polytechnic is located on the outskirt of the city in Lahoal. It offers courses in Civil Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mining Engineering, Tea Technology, Information Technology, Electronics & Telecommunications, and Engineering.An Industrial Training Institute (ITI) is located on western outskirt of the city in Borbaruah.Schools*Kendra Vidyalaya, Dibrugarh*Little Flower school, K C Gogoi Path, Dibrugarh*Don Bosco school, Convoy Rd, Dibruagrh*Swarupananda Vidyapith, Borbari, Dibrugarh*Naliapool Bengali High School, Naliapool, Dibrugarh*Victoria Girls School, Dibrugarh*Bengali High School, Dibrugarh*St. Marys school, K C Gogoi Path, Dibrugarh*St. Xaviers school, Dibrugarh*Brahmaputra Valley Cadet Academy, Dibrugarh*Sampoorna Kendra Viyalaya, Dibrugarh.*Govt. Boys school, Milan Nagar, Dibrugarh*Govt. Girls School, Amolapatty Chariali, Dibrugarh*Victoria Girls school, Phool Bagan, Dibrugarh*Prashanti Divine Valley school, Dibrugarh*Peace Cottage School, Sheuspur, Dibrugarh*Model School, Dibrugarh*Salt Brook School, Amlapatty Chariali, Dibrugarh*Niranjan High school, Dibrugarh*Jatiya Bidyalaya, Dibrugarh*Shishu Niketan, Dibrugarh*Nirmali Girls High School, Dibrugarh*Kendriya Vidyalaya, Dinjan*Jawahar Navodaya Vidyalaya, Bamunbari*Kendriya Vidyalaya, Dibrugarh*Oil Valley School, Convoy Rd, Dibrugarh*Shree Agrasen Academy,J halukpara, DibrugarhColleges*D.H.S.K. College*D.H.S.K. Commerce College*Dibru College*City College*Gurukul College*Aniruddha Deva College*D H S K Law College*R K B Law College*C K Hazarika B Ed College*Gyan Vigyan Academy*N E I P CPoliticsDibrugarh is part of (Lok Sabha constituency).() Bogibeel Project Upcoming Projects* 1. Asian Development Bank sponsored Solid waste management project in lahoal.()* 2. Asian Development Bank sponsored Dibrugarh drainage development project.(http://www.igovernment.in/site/adb-aid-improve-civic-amenities-assam-towns)* 3. Construction of CISF township.(http://www.business-standard.com/india/news/bcpl-project-progressschedule/334541/)* 4. Construction of BCPL township.(http://www.gail.nic.in/gailnewsite/mediacenter/pressrelease/pressrelease-sep-15-08.html)* 5. Proposed ITBP battalion(http://www.assamtribune.com/scripts/detailsnew.asp?idaug1011/state05)See also* University* Medical College* (Lok Sabha constituency) References External links* Government website* Dibrugarh University,Dibrugarh-786 004, Assam, India* Aniruddha Deva College* GURUKUL, The House of Mentorsas:ca:Dibrugarhes:Dibrugarhfr:Dibrugarhbpy:it:Dibrugarhpam:Dibrugarhnew:pl:Dibrugarhru:sv:Dibrugarhvi:Dibrugarhwar:Dibrugarh
3424352
Fourmile_Canyon
Fourmile Canyon or Four Mile Canyon is the name of two canyons in the state of Colorado, States. Fourmile Canyon at , near the towns of Victor and Canon City, is part of the Belt Byway.  Two others are near Boulder.  One forks from Canyon and hosts a tributary of Creek, and the other exits the plains near Lee Hill Road. Fourmile Canyon in Boulder Fourmile Canyon, at , runs from near the mouth of Boulder Canyon up to the abandoned mining community of Street, Colorado.  It was host to the first narrow-gauge railroad to connect Union Pacifics standard-gauge network to the mines and mountain communities near Ward, and was the entryway to the Trail tourist route that wound through the mountains between Nederland and Ward.  The Fourmile narrow gauge track was active from about the 1860s through the early 1900s.Fourmile Creek, which flows through this Fourmile Canyon, is easily confused with Fourmile Canyon Creek, which enters the plains near Lee Hill Road a few miles to the north east at . The canyon name is sometimes spelled as Four Mile.() Fourmile Canyon Fire  motive      A wildfire started burning in the canyon forest at 10:00 a.m. Monday, September 6, 2010. Houses were destroyed and the fire was out of control.  Very low humidity and winds enabled 20 to  high flames to spread quickly.  Residents were evacuated and all roads into the fire zone were closed.  At Mountain Metropolitan Airport in Broomfield, two aircraft tankers each with 2,000 gallons of fire retardant took off at 5:20 p.m.  Winds eased in the late afternoon, making it possible for the airplanes to drop the retardant on the periphery of the fire zone in an attempt to contain the flames.  Smoke was visible across the entire Range northwest of Boulder.Day Two  Tuesday, September 7, 2010: 200 firefighters from more than 35 agencies had responded. The fire was estimated to cover more than 7,135 acres (a threefold increase since the previous day) and remained zero percent contained. Colorados governor, Ritter, declared a state of emergency and dedicated $5 million to help the effort. More than 92 homes had been destroyed by the end of the second night. Nine of the destroyed homes belonged to firefighters who were fighting the fire. 3,500 people had been evacuated. An accident involving a propane tank was reported to have started the fire, but that was later determined to be a misinterpretation.Day Three  Wednesday, September 8, 2010: Earlier in the day 20 people in the area were reported missing; by night fall the number had fallen to 5. The number of firefighters increased to 300. An approximate number of the area affected was realized, showing . The number of homes destroyed went up to 150, officially making it the worst wildfire in Colorado history and was still zero percent contained.()()Day Four  Thursday, September 9, 2010: number of firefighters grows to 430. All persons who were reported missing had been accounted for. The fire was reported 40% contained. At 10 a.m. some residents of the affected area were allowed to return to their homes, but were forced to move back out at 2 p.m. due to high winds, which could fuel the fire. The number of homes burned was at 169. The northwest section of the city of Boulder was put on standby to be evacuated.Day Five  Friday, September 10, 2010:  The fire was  and 56% contained.  1,100 firefighters continued to fight the blaze.()Day Eleven  Thursday, September 16, 2010:  100% containment was achieved.The Boulder County Sheriffs Office has lifted evacuation orders on all subdivisions within the fire perimeter. The fire area is open to residents only. Utilities and public works continue to repair damage to infrastructure. Residents are reminded to use caution within the fire area due to the heavy fire and utility traffic in the fire area.On this day the fire was declared Inactive by the incident commander, Jim Thomas.  A total of 6,181 sq. acres (approximately 10 square miles) were burned.  The reason for the decrease in acreage burned is a result of better GPS mapping of the fire.Insurance claims for the fire totaled an estimated $217 million, making it the most expensive wildfire in Colorado history.() References  External links * www.inciweb.org  wildfire updates
3430680
St_Ive
St Ive ( eve) () is a village and civil parish in south-east Cornwall, Kingdom. St Ive should not be confused with St Ives, the well-known seaside town in the west of Cornwall. The village is split into four parts: St Ive Church End, St Ive Cross, St Ive Keason and St Ive Parkfield.History and geographyThe parish used to be a large rural area of rolling landscape with wooded valleys and the population was sparse with the largest village being St Ive itself, sited on the A390. The hamlet of Woolston lies to the northwest of St Ive. The demography of the parish was radically altered with the mid-Victorian mining boom centred around Hill. South Caradon Mine situated just over the parish border was at one time the largest and most prosperous copper mine in the world.Trelawny Hobhouse, politician and sociologist, and his sister Hobhouse, the social activist, were both born in St Ive.Parish ChurchThe parish church is probably dedicated to Saint Ive, a supposedly Persian bishop whose body was found in 1001 at St Ives in Cambridgeshire.() The building is mainly 14th century and similar to the church of South Hill, though more elaborate in detail. The consecration of the church in 1338 is recorded in the diocesan register. The south aisle, south porch and the top of the tower were added either in the 15th or early 16th century: (the tower has 12 pinnacles). The pulpit is dated 1700 but is in the Jacobean style. A monument to J. Lyne, d. 1791, is by Robert Isbell; another monument to a member of the Wrey family was moved to Tavistock in 1924.(Pevsner, N. (1970) Cornwall; 2nd ed. Penguin Books; p. 179)Notable residents* Hobhouse, (9 April 1860  8 June 1926), Welfare campaigner, who is primarily remembered for bringing to the attention of the British public, and working to change, the appalling conditions inside the British concentration camps in South Africa built for Boer women and children during the Second Boer War. References (External links* St Ive Parish History* Cornwall Record Office Online Catalogue for St Ive* St Ive Methodist ChurchIveIveIve
3434107
Kouroussa
footnotes                Kouroussa (var. Kurussa) is a town located in northwestern Guinea, and is the capital of Prefecture. In 2008 it had an estimated population 10,165.(World Gazetteer, Retrieved on June 16, 2008) A trade center and river port from at least the time of the Empire, Kouroussa has long relied upon its position near the upstream limit of navigation of the River to make it an important crossroads for people and goods moving between the Guinea coast and the states of the western Soudan and Niger River valley. The town and surrounding area is a center of Malinke culture, and is known for its Djembe drumming tradition.HistoryKouroussa represented the southern end of the Manden: the Mand heartland of the Empire.  Kouroussas position as a river port has made it an historic center for regional trade, much like its larger neighbor Kankan. Much of the Djallonke population of the area migrated from the west when the Fula people conquered the Fouta Djallon in the 13th - 16th centuries. With the collapse of the empire, southern Manden confederations and states continued to exist, including in the area around Kouroussa. In the 17th century the Fama Da Monzon Diarra of the Empire made Kouroussa the southern reach of his state.  By the 18th century the Fula Muslim Fouta Djallon state led by the of Timbo provided pressure from the south and west, while the growing Kong state (in modern dIvoire) became powerful to the south and east.  The Mand state around Kouroussa, called in some periods Hamana and in others Koumara, continued as an important trade center and small regional power, squeezed between these forces.(Jan Jansen. THE REPRESENTATION OF STATUS IN MANDE: DID THE MALIEMPIRE STILL EXIST IN THE NINETEENTH CENTURY? History in Africa 23 (1996), 87-109 Note: Jansen argues for a reappraisal of Mand dating which pushes remnants of the Mali Empire into the 19th century.  The more traditional dates are accepted in Charlotte A Quinn. Mandingo kingdoms of the Senegambia: Traditionalism, Islam, and European expansion.  Longman (1972). ISBN 0582645476) Colonialism The first known European visitor to the town was the Frenchman Cailli, who passed through the area in the 1820s. By the arrival of Europeans, Kouroussa was a major trade stop between the River valley and the coast, with the so called Leprince overland route running from the coast via Kinda, Timbo, and Kouroussa.(New International Yearbook: A Compendium of the Worlds Progress, Dood, Mead, & co, New York (1915) p. 274)In the late 19th century French forces appeared in the region just to the north, establishing bases at Kayes, Mali, Bafoulab and eventually at Bamako. Countering the French expansion was the Fula Jihad state of which exploded out of neighboring Dinguiray to conquer both the Mand states surrounding Kouroussa to the northwest and the Bambara to the northeast. To the south, the Wassoulou conquest state of Ture appeared, sending his well armed forces against Kouroussa, its neighbors, and the French alike, while the Fouta Djallon state raided the area periodically. The French officer Olivier, attempting to convince the Almamate to sign a protectorate, passed through Kouroussa in the 1880s, and at the beginning of the 1890s, French military under Archinard established garrison posts at Kankan and Kouroussa, commanded from a larger post just downstream at Siguiri.(Auguste-Louis-Charles Gatelet. Histoire de la conqute du Soudan franais (1878-1899). Berger-Levrault, Paris (1901). pp. 146, 184-87) In 1893-1894, Commandant Briquelot set up a post at Kouroussa, as it lay along the main line for French fighting with the forces of Samori to the south. From here French forces raided areas controlled by Samori, even launching raids from here into the British territory of Leone.(Gatelet, 189-191) By 1895, even while fighting with Samori continued, the French had set up a school to train local workers to identify, collect, and prepare wild rubber for French industrial purposes. Kouroussa became a regional center of rubber requisitions (often instituted as a tax in labour), which peaked in the second decade of the 20th century.(Gatelet, p. 494. For the colonial era wild rubber collections, see: Emily Lynn Osborn. Rubber Fever, Commerce And French Colonial Rule In Upper Guine, 18901913. The Journal of African History (2004), 45: 445-465) Kouroussa was administered as part of the Siguiri Cercle, which also included Kankan.(Gatelet, op cit., 506, 509)The French, after annexing the Fouta Djallon in the 1890s, added the region to the colony of Upper Guinea, later a part of West Africa, until Guineas independence in 1959. During the colonial period the town was made a main trans-shipment point for commodities coming from Soudan (todays Mali) due to the construction of the Guinea-Niger railway, which met the river at Kouroussa in 1910, and from which rainy season ship transport could reach Bamako.(William Basil Morgan, John Charles Pugh. West Africa. Methuen, 1969. pp. 271, 587, 593.) As well as a collection center for wild rubber, the French encouraged the collection gold sifted from streams and dug by local small scale mines. The French also attempted to promote local farming of groundnuts and cotton. There remains a monument to Ren-Auguste Cailli in Kouroussa, erected by the French.Contemporary historyIn 2001, Kouroussa was one of several places which was particularly hard hit by flooding, and became a center for thousands of internally displaced people from the surrounding area.( GUINEA: Up to 70,000 affected by floods, 21 September 2001 (IRIN)) In 2005, Kouroussa was rocked by major protests against the government, particularly aimed at Kouroussa Prefect Andre Haba who was accused of embezzling local mining revenue. The town was reported at the time to be a center of the opposition of the Guinean People (RPG)( GUINEA: Two hurt in anti-corruption protest 9 September 2005 (IRIN))(West African Seasons, Tuesday, April 11, 2006.  Personal account of the 2006 tensions from Peace Corps volunteer Hilary Heuler, based in Kouroussa)PopulationWith an estimated population of just over 10,000, Kouroussa functions more as a services and transport center for the surrounding agricultural region than as a metropolitan center in its own right.  CultureThe majority of the surrounding population comes from the Malinke and Djallonke ethnic groups, who speak related languages and follow the Muslim religion. Kouroussa and the surrounding region is the centre of the Hamana-Malinke Mande sub-group -- Hamana being the name for the region, while the Malinke are the major Mande speaking ethnic group of the upper Niger valley. There are also sizable minority communities of Fula and Dyula, the latter traditionally forming trade communities in towns like Kouroussa.The writer and intellectual Laye (192880) grew up in Kouroussa, and his memoir, LEnfant noir (The Black Child), is in part about his youth in the town.(G. D. Killam, Ruth Rowe. The Companion to African Literatures. Dover (2000). p. 57)Kouroussa and surrounding towns maintain the pre-colonial Mande ceremonial kingship of Hamana, with the most recent holder of the office King of Kouroussa King Sayon Keita I.(The Sanimuso Foundation, Artisanal Mining Association, 2006.)Kouroussa is about 50 km SW of the Mandingo cultural site Hamana.Traditional musicHamana-Malinke are especially known for their unique musical traditions, especially their polyphonic Djemb drumming traditions, with a number of well known drum mastersincluding Konate, Daouda Kourouma, and Skou Konatcoming from the town.( Mgbalu: Les Sages, les Matres, Website retrieved 2008-09-03)(World Music Central:Famoudou Konat, 2008.)  Djemb groups in Kouroussa are known for the inclusion of the bass dununba drum and the long kenken bell.(Serge Blanc. The Djembe: The Dunun, 1997, retrieve 2008-09-03.) Economy  Transport With its position near the upstream limit of navigation on the Niger River, Kouroussa is an important center of transport and trade. The Guinea Railway crosses the River at this town, where there is also a river port.(UNESCO: readings of Niger at Kouroussa, 1945-1979.)  The town also lies at a junction in Guineas N1 highway, which is a major transport route between Conakry, Kankan, and (via the N7 and N32) neighboring Mali.(geonames.org: Kouroussa.)  The gauge Niger - Conakry  rail line runs 588 km to the capital of Guinea, with a branch of 74 kilometers running from Kouroussa to Kankan.  It was built by the French, using African labor, in the first two decades of the 20th century.( New International Yearbook: A Compendium of the Worlds Progress, Dood, Mead, & co, New York (1915) p. 274)AgricultureThe Savanna climate in the region around Kouroussa support a wide range of subsistence and cash crop farming, producing rice,(listing for FAO Rice Agriculture development centre, Kouroussa.) groundnuts, onions and  millet for sale, as well as supporting larger scale cotton farming and cattle ranching by both locals and semi-nomadic people whose largest local center is in the nearby Djallon highlands.MiningMajor mining companies are engaged in ongoing exploration drilling in a series(afdevinfo: Kouroussa Exploration Area) of government granted mining concessions(The Kouroussa Project: Gold corporation.) near the town.(Cassidy Gold Set to Resume Drilling at Kouroussa Business Wire,  Jan 18, 2005) The Kouroussa area also has a long history as a center of small scale gold mining, which continues in so called Artisanal Mining(The Sanimuso Foundation, Artisanal Mining Association, 2006.)  Recent criticism has surfaced around the working conditions, pay, and the widespread use of child labour in these small gold mines, and the method which middlemen, many based in Kouroussa, purchase and transport gold.  Gold collected in Kouroussa is sold onwith almost no regulation or oversightto larger merchant houses in Bamako, Conakry, and eventually to smelters in Europe.(Kids working in African gold mines. AP/RUKMINI CALLIMACHI AND BRADLEY S. KLAPPER  Aug 10, 2008.)  Large scale Titanium mining has also been proposed in the Kouroussa area, with both Dredging of Heavy Mineral Sands from rivers and streams and dry pit mines proposed as of 2007.(Guinee Titanium, date 2007, retrieved 2008-08-03.)Notable people*Laye -writer See also * in Guinea* stations in Guinea References * Britannica Online: Kouroussa.* MSN Map - elevation  362mfr:Kouroussako:pl:Kouroussa
3438628
List_of_Spanish_words_of_Basque/Iberian_origin
This is a list of Spanish words which are supposed to be of Basque, Iberian origin, or coming from some other pre-roman language in the Iberian Peninsula. Some of these words existed in Latin as loanwords from other languages. Some of these words have alternate etymologies and may also appear on a list of Spanish words from a different language.List*abarca sandal  (cf. Basque abarka). Probably from Basque abar branch (shoe made of branches). The word was loaned in Mozarabic and even in Arab pargha/bargha and from here to Spanish alpargata (Trask 2008, 74).*abertzale / aberzale Basque patriot, Basque nationalist (cf. Basque abertzale). Recent loanword as it is a Basque neologism from the XIXth century.* agur goodbye (from Basque agur with the same meaning) (DRAE).*aizcolari (cf. Basque aizkolari). Recent loanword.*alud avalanche (of snow): It is considered by Corominas and the DRAE to be a pre-roman word, sister of Basque counterparts, especially Basque lurte avalanche/ landslide (also in Aragonese lurte(But the DRAE includes lurte as a Spanish word used in Huesca)), which seems related with lur ground and maybe elur (variants elhur / edur/ erur) snow (cf. Basque elhur-auso avalanche).*angula elver. From Basque angula (Basque version of Lat. anguilla (DRAE)*aquelarre witches sabbath  (cf. Basque akelarre goat field, fr. larre field and aker billy goat)*ardite money of little value  (fr. Gasc ardit, fr. Basque ardt). Uncertain. A usual explanation is that it is an Gascon adaptation of the name of an English coin farthing / farthingte  (Monlau, Coromines).*aro big metal or wooden ring. Maybe from a pre-roman Indo-European word *aros circle / wheel (BDELC).*arroyo stream  (cf. LL arrugia, a kind of mining system, Pliny Naturalis Historia XXXIII,70)*artiga. soil already without wild plants broken to cultivate (artigar is to break the soil to farm). Pre-roman word according to the DRAE. Coromines has speculated with two possibilities of pre-roman origin: 1) as a Celtic or Indo-European word akin to Welsh aredig (cultivating) or to High German art (cultivated land). This comparison was already suggested by Hubschmid who related the term with Indo-European verbs such as Latin arare (to plough) (See Llorente p.131);  2) a word of pre-Celtic and even pre-Basque substratum (See the abstract in Moiss  Selfa SastreToponimia del Valle Medio del sera (Huesca). Estudio lingstico y cartografa Doctoral dissertation, Universitat de Lleida, 2000, page 145.)*ascua embers  (cf. Basque askuo, askua, fr. hauts cinder)*azcona hand-thrown weapon used in past times According to the DRAE of unknown origin, suggesting a possible Basque origin.*balsa pool. Pre-roman, probably Iberian (BDELC). (In Basque it is a Spanish loanword).*barda cover put over the walls of the corrals. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin (also in language). (BDELC)*barraca cabin. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin. Loaned to Spanish from Catalan (the same origin for French baraque).*barranca/barranco. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin.*barro clay, mud. According to the DRAE, pre-roman origin, maybe Celtic (cfr. Gaulish barros thicket, Mid. Irish broch litter)*bata (modern loanword from Basque)*becerro yearling calf  (< OSp bezerro bull; cf. Basque bei cow + zekor bullock). According to Coromines (BDELC, 71) derived from Spanish Latin ibex/ibicis, probably through *ibicirru.*berrueco.*bizarro galant, spirited  (cf. Basque bizar beard)*boina beret . Modern (XIXth century) loanword from Basque. For the Basque word Coromines and Pascual (Trask 2008, 146) propose it came from Romance, Old Castilian or Old Aragonese (cf. LL abonnis cap, related with Sp. bonete).*bruces, caer de headlong, to fall. Uncertain. According to Coromines the original was de buzos / de buces, which may be related with bozo (cf. bozal), which may come from Lat. bocca (through an hypothetical Romance *bucciu).*cachorro puppy  (cf. Basque txakur whelp)*calabaza pumpkin. Pre-roman, probably Iberian according to Corominas, who relates this term with galpago and caparazn.*calimotxo a type of punch (drink). Recent loanword*cama bed. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin. Attested in Spanish Latin in the VII c. (BDELC ,101).*caparazn. shell. Probably of pre-roman origin. Coromines relates it with galpago (tortoise) explaining that it comes from a metathesis of carapazn, quoting the Sp. carapacho carapace; and with calabaza pumpkin (Catalan carabassa).*carapacho. See caparazn*carrasca. kermes oak. Allegedly from a pre-roman root *karr- (BDELC).*carpetovetnico. Adj. usually despective terribly Spanish against any non core Spanish influence. Modern derivation from the name of the pre-roman tribes carpetani and vetones.*caspa dandruff. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin.*cazurro. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin.*cencerro cowbell  (cf. Basque zinzerri animal bell)*chabola   (cf. Basque txabola< Fr gele; DRAE)*chacol, type of basque wine. Recent loanword*chamorro close-cropped Unknown alleged pre-roman origin with Basque look.*chaparro dwarf oak  (cf. Basque txapar)*chaparrn. (Probably neither a pre-roman word, nor a Basque loanword, but according to the DRAE it is an onomatopoeia; while Coromines believes that even Basque zaparr is an onomatopoeia).*chapela, type of basque cap. Recent loanword (The Basque word is of Romance origin from Med. Latincapella).*charco puddle. Of unknown alleged pre-roman origin. As it is first attested in the South, Coromines (BDELC, 171) proposed that it comes from Latin circus through a Romance language. So it could be of Latin non pre-roman origin.*charrn rogue, scamp (cf. Basque txar bad)*charro crude  (cf. Basque txar bad, faulty)*chasco. Dubious. Coromines concludes that it is an onomatopoeia.*chatarra scrap  (cf. Basque txatar old iron)*chiquito*chirimbolo circular slice (cf. Basque txirimbol)*chirimiri drizzle.*chistera. Basque txistera(and this one from Latin cistella, little basket) fish basket / top hat.*churre thick grease  (cf. Basque txur miserly, economical)*cococha cods chin (Basque kokotxa)*colmena. beehive. Probably pre-roman, maybe related to Celtic kolmos straw (BDELC).*conejo rabbit  (< Lat cuniculus; probably Celtic origin *cun-icos (X. Ballester and R. Quinn Cuniculus - Rabbit: A Celtic Etimology, World Rabbit Science 10, 2002, pp. 125-129 ) cf. Basque untxi rabbit, from earlier *kuntxi)*ertzaina, basque policeman. Recent loanword*ertzaintza, basque police. Recent loanword*farra party / spree. Basque parr (variant farr) laugh (BDELC).*gabarra  (cf. Basque kabarra, fr. Latin carabus, fr. Gk krabos)*galpago tortoise. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin. Maybe related with Sp. caparazn which probably is a metathesis of carapazn.*gamarra (from Basque gamarra) halter*ganza (Basque gantzua) picklock*garma scree, steep mountain slope*garrapata tick  (cf. Basque gapar, kapar briar)*garza. heron. Unknown probably pre-roman origin. It may be connected with Celtic words, but Corominas suspects that may be pre-Celtic.*gazapo young rabbit*gordo fat (gurdus is explained by Quintilian (Institutio Oratoria 1,5,57) as a Hispanic word, used for stolidus stupid).*guijarro pebble  (cf. Basque gisuarri limestone). But it is related with guija little stone which in Old Spanish (1495) appears as aguija and Corominas suggest that came from Latin petra aquilea (acute stone).*gusano, gusarapo maggot, caterpillar . Unknown alleged pre-roman origin (Maybe cf. Basque zizain worm < Medieval Basque *zizani)*ikastola, Basque language school. Recent loanword*izquierda left  (cf. Basque ezker)*jorgun sorcerer (from Basque sorgin witch)*laya spade  (from Basque laia)*legaa rheum  (cf. Basque lakaia cord, roughness, knob on a tree, formerly strand)*lurte avalanche (Spanish word used in Huesca, taken from Aragonese lurte which comes from Basque lurte).*madroo strawberry tree (DRAE: maybe from pr-roman word *motoroneu < * morotonu)*manteca lard. Unknown alleged pre-roman origin. Corminas suggests an Indo-European origin.*maraa thicket*mochil (from Basque mutil boy; diminutive mutxil)* mochila (from mochil)*murdago*narria sledge  (cf. Basque nar, narra towing, sled)*nava marshy valley, plain  (cf. Basque naba)*rdago Mus card game expression pronounced when you win (cf. Basque or dago there it is)*pramo moor (of Indo-European origin) (This word is known in the native lexicon of the Celtiberian region in Roman times in names and adjectives: PARAMI (CIL II 266), and the town Segontia Paramica. The word could belong to a Hispanic Celtic language which preserved the phoneme /p/ or to another Western Indo-European language as Lusitanian (X. Ballester Pramo o del problema de la */P/ en celtoide, Studi celtici 3, 2004, 45-56).)*parra vine, trellis. But according to the Occitan form parran Corominas proposes a Gothic origin for the Occitan word and probably for the Spanish word parrar (hence non pre-roman)  (BDELC).*parranda spree/ binge. Probably related with Basque parr laugh (BDELC, entry farra)*pelotari, player of Pelota. Recent loanword*perro dog (alleged pre-roman origin, but unknown)*pestaa eyelash  (cf. Basque pizta rheum, piztule eyelash)*pitarra, pitaa rheum  (cf. Basque pitar rheum)*pizarra slate; problematic. Many attempts to explain as of Basque origin, but as Trask points the related Basque word seems better explained as a foreign loanword in Basque (cf. Basque pizar fragment). Alternative attempts (Coromines BDELC 435) point to a reinterpretation of lapitz-arri  (Basque lapits slate from Latin lapis, plus Basque arri stone) segmented as la-pitzarri according to the Spanish article la.*rebeco ibex.(old variants: rebezo and robezo XV c.).  Pre-roman, maybe related, as metathesis, with becerro (BDELC).*sapo toad*sarna scabies. Alleged pre-roman origin, usually related to Basque sarra rust. Late Hispanic Latin (VII th, Saint Isidore Origines 4. 8. 68), but as serna attested in Priscianus (Constantinople, IVth a.C).  A Celtic explanation is afforded by Trumper (Notte sulle malaltie suine e degli animali in genere e sulle voci albanesi per maiale et sim) who, after studying the variants of the word in the Latin medical treatises, proposes a Celtiberian origin from an Indo-European root *STERH-, comparing with Welsh sarn  mess and sarnaf to wreck (page 4, footnote 13).*sarro tooth plaque. Coromines (BDELC) considers it to be of pre-roman origin, related with Basque sarra rust and Spanish sarna, but DRAE derives it from Latin saburra grid / sand.*silo. According to Cormines, probably from Celtic silon seed. From here to stock of grain, and then maybe also the Basque word (cf. Basque zilo, zulo dugout, cave or shelter for keeping grain)*sima. chasm. Unknown, alleged pre-roman origin. (Coromines considers to be dubious the comparison with some Indo-European words with meanings as frontier or cord).*socarrar to scorch  (cf. Basque (dial. and arch.) sukarr, sukarra flames, fire, fr. su fire and karr, karra flame*soca-tira, game of Tug of war. Recent loanword*tarugo wooden peg. Pre-roman. Probably from an Hispanic Celtic language (*tarucon) and related with Gaulish tarinca peg (BDELC).*toca headdress. Pre-roman origin from a word *tauca.*urraca magpie (BDELC p. 564), but Covarrubias derived it from Lat. furax (thievish) (See F. Diez Etymologisches Wrterbuch der romanischen Sprachen Bonn 1869, p. 189)*vega river-plain, water meadow. In old documents attested as vayca (Trask 1997, 420). Related with Basque ibai river maybe with the relational suffix -ko (BDELC). According to Trask this explanation is problematic.*zamarra/chamarra  (cf. Basque zamar fleece)*zanca bird leg, slim leg, zanco stilt  (cf. Basque zango leg). The word exists also in Italian and Coromines proposes a non pre-roman origin: from late Latin zanca (a kind of shoe), which perhaps originated in Old Persian zanga leg (BDELC, 590).*zarrio excessively adorned  (cf. Basque txar bad, faulty) (or of Arabic origin)*zarza bramble  Basque sasi, early Basque (Oihenart) arzi (zarzi) (Trask 1997, 421).*zatico/zatillo piece of bread  (cf. Basque zati)*zorra fox ; unclear, maybe related to Basque zuhur prudent (Trask 1997, 421). According to DRAE from Portuguese zorro idler.*zulo hole (cf. Basque zulo). Recent loanword*zurdo left-handed. Probably a pre-roman word related to the Basque word (Coromines) (cf. Basque zur stingy, miserly, zurrun inflexible, hard)*zurrn sack  (cf. Basque zorro)See also*history of Spanish*of Spanish words of Celtic origin*of English words of Spanish origin Notes  References*Corominas, Juan.  Breve diccionario etimolgico de la lengua castellana, 2nd ed.  Madrid:  Editorial Gredos, S.A., 1967. (BDELC)*Entwistle, William, J.  The Spanish language: Together with Portuguese, Catalan and Basque, 1962.*Gmez de Silva, Guida.  Elseviers Concise Spanish Etymological Dictionary.  New York:  Elsevier, 1985.*Llorente Maldonado de Guevara, Antonio Las Palabras pirenaicas de origen prerromano, de J. Hubschmid, y su importancia para la lingstica peninsular, Archivo de Filologa Aragonesa, 8-9, pp. 127157, 1958.* Monlau y Roca, Pedro Felipe. Diccionario etimolgico de la lengua castellana Madrid, 1856.*Oroz Arizcuren, Franciso Javier. Sobre palabras preromanas en escritores latinos in La Hispania prerromana : actas del VI Coloquio sobre lenguas y culturas prerromanas de la Pennsula Ibrica : (Coimbra, 13-15 de octubre de 1994) coord.  1996, ISBN 84-7481-830-3 , p. 207-216.*Real Academia Espaola. Diccionario de la lengua espaola (22nd edition). Madrid 2001. (DRAE)* Robert Lawrence Trask. The History of Basque Routledge, 1997. ISBN 978-0415131162.* Robert Lawrence Trask. Etymological dictionary of Basque edited for web publication by Max W. Wheeler, University of Sussex 2008.External links* List of words of Basque origin in the de la Real Academia Espaola.
3444795
Hemsworth_Rural_District
 DensityLastYear         Hemsworth was, from 1894 to 1974,  a district in the Riding of Yorkshire, England.CreationThe district was formed by the Government Act 1894 as successor to the Hemsworth Rural Sanitary District. A directly-elected rural district council (RDC) replaced the previous rural sanitary authority, which had consisted of the law guardians for the area.()Boundary changesThe district underwent two major boundary changes over its existence. Firstly, in 1921 Hemsworth became a separate district. Secondly, the Government Act 1929 obliged county councils to conduct a review of all districts within their jurisdiction. West Riding County Council made an order in 1938 that saw it exchange territory with neighbouring rural districts.(Civil parishesThe rural district consisted of a number of parishes:(Coat of armsHemsworth Rural District Council was granted armorial bearings by the of Arms by patent dated 12 October 1954. They were blazoned as follows:Sable on a Mount in base an Oak Tree proper fructed Or on a Chief Gules a Cross couped Gold between two Roses Argent barbed and seeded also proper; and for a Crest: Out of a Circlet Azure charged with a Crescent Argent between two Mullets of six points Or a Bulls Head Sable armed Gold.()The shield had a black field for the local coal-mining industry. Upon this was placed an oak tree on a grassy mount for the rural areas of the district. In particular it represented the Old Adam oak on Brierley Common. The chief or upper third of the shield was red, and bore a gold cross between two white roses. The roses were the symbols of Yorkshire, while the cross represented the ancient wapentake of Osgoldcross. A gold cross also featured in the arms of Priory.The crest on top of a helm and mantling was a black bulls head from the arms of Holgate, of York, who endowed a hospital in Hemsworth. The bulls head rose from a blue circlet a silver crescent between two gold stars. These represented School, and came from the arms of the Governors of the Hospital who had owned the building prior to it becoming a school.The Latin motto adopted by the council was Constanter et Recte or Steadfastly and Justly. This was adapted from that of the Warde-Aldam family.()AbolitionThe district was abolished in 1974 by the Government Act 1972, which reorganised council areas throughout England and Wales.The area it administered was split three ways:()*Billingley, Brierley, Great Houghton,  Little Houghton, and Shafton going to the Borough of Barnsley in Yorkshire; *Kirk Smeaton, Little Smeaton and Walden Stubbs going to the district of Selby in Yorkshire, *Ackworth, Badsworth, Havercroft with Cold Hiendley, Hessle and Hill Top, Huntwick with Foulby and Nostell, North Elmsall, Ryhill, South Elmsall, South Hiendley, South Kirkby, Thorpe Audlin, Upton and West Hardwick passed to the Metropolitan Borough of Wakefield in Yorkshire.References*Hemsworth RD at Vision of Britain*Government Act 1972
3452112
Sten_Lindroth
Sten Hjalmar Lindroth (28 December 1914, Lund &ndash; 1 September 1980) was a Swedish historian of learning and science.Lindroth was born in the university town of Lund in Southern Sweden, but grew up and went to school in Gothenburg after his father Lindroth had been appointed to the Chair of Nordic languages at University. After finishing school in Gothenburg at Gteborgs hgre latinlroverk, he matriculated at University in 1933 and eventually became a student of Nordstrm, holder of the Emilia and Gustaf Carlberg Chair of the of ideas and learning, the first of its kind at Uppsala. Lindroth eventually completed a monumental, 500-page dissertation on the history of paracelsianism in Sweden until the middle of the 17th century, defended in 1943. During his student years he was also active in the Juvenalorden and the liberal student society Verdandi, for he which he also served as president.He spent the next decade on a history of the mining and copper production at Kopparberget and a biography of the physicist and inventor Polhem, and several shorter publications on various scientific-historical topics. In 1957 he succeeded Nordstrm as Carlberg Professor. His later publications included a book on the early history of the Swedish Academy of Sciences (1967), of which he became a member in 1966, a history of Swedish learning from the Middle Ages until the Gustavian period (the fourth and last volume was left unfinished but completed and edited by his former student Eriksson) and an overview of the history of Uppsala University (1976), published on the occasion of the 500th anniversary of the university.Sten Lindroth was elected a Member of the Academy in 1968.References*Gunnar Eriksson, Lindroth, Sten Hjalmar, biografiskt lexikon, vol. 23, p. 581-587.Lindroth
3457615
Aaron_Dunn
Aaron Dunn, one of the pioneers of the northwest was a prominent citizen of Deadwood.  He was a native of the province of Ontario, Canada; having been born on the banks of the Clair River, a few miles from the city of Detroit, Michigan, on the February 16, 1851. Family HistoryHis father, Aaron Dunn, was a native of England, and as a young man in his thirties, moved to the America and took up residence in York, then later moved to Canada, where he was engaged in the lumber business until 1856, when he moved to Minnesota.  There he became a pioneer of County, where he was engaged in lumbering and farming until 1870, when he repeated his pioneer experiences to a certain extent by coming to what is now the state of Dakota.  He moved to the city of Falls, where he passed the remainder of his life.  He died in 1885. His wife, whose maiden name was Isabella Carnathan, was born in the north of Ireland, and her death occurred in 1870. They were the parents of twelve children, Aaron having been the fourth child.LifeAaron Dunn passed his boyhood days under the conditions of the epoch in Minnesota, and his early educational advantages were somewhat limited.  He started forth by himself when only ten years of age. At that time, he started for the river district of Minnesota, but the Indians were a source of constant menace at the time and the adventurous lad decided it would be best not to attempt to personally annihilate them, and accordingly turned around and went to the states in 1862.  This was the same year that the Minnesota massacre occurred. WarAarons brother, James C., was at the time a member of Company B, Minnesota Volunteer Infantry, and at the first outbreak of the Indians at Ferry, forty-eight of his company engaged in the conflict, and of the number only twenty returned, seven of them being wounded while twenty-seven were killed, the other to complete the number engaged being the captain of the company, who was drowned while crossing the river. During the Civil War Aaron was in various southern states, from Missouri to Tennessee. He was too young to enlist in the service, but as a troy performed his part in forwarding the cause. He drove an ambulance for some time, carried dispatches and was employed in the department, and thus witnessed a number of engagements. In 1863 he was at Girardeau, Missouri, at the time of the battle there, and he continued in the south until the end of the war.Travels and ProspectingThen he returned to the north and remained for a few months.  He then went to Colorado, where he was employed for a time, then going to Mexico. In 1866 he made his way to Montana, making the trip via the Cutoff and Forts Kearney and Smith. At Springs, on the dry fork of the River.  The party of which he was a member had a conflict with the Indians, losing seven men, while afterward the party had several other conflicts with the band, another member being killed. They arrived in Bozeman in the latter part of September, and thence Mr. Dunn proceeded to Virginia City, where he passed the winter. In the spring of 1867 he started forth on a prospecting tour, making his way into the now famous Coeur dAlene district of Idaho and there meeting with fair success. He then went to Montana, where he took charge of the mill of the Silver Mining Company, which he placed under successful operation, while it had previously proved a failure. While under his charge eight and one-half tons of silver represented the product of the mill. He remained with this position for a period of eighteen months and then moved to Rochester,  in County, Montana, where he leased mines and operated the same for the ensuing two years, with good success. He then went to Trapper City, where he operated the Trapper mine for one winter, after which he went to the city Butte, where he was offered a quarter interest and a salary of ten dollars a day to sink a shaft to a depth of one hundred feet in the Hattie Harvey mine. He accepted the proposition, sunk the shaft to the stipulated depth and then ran a level from the bottom a distance of one hundred feet, when he struck an immense body of ore running twenty-eight per cent. It was copper, but as thirty per cent was the lowest that would at that time justify working, owing to the enormous charges for freight, the development did not proceed till some time later. It should be stated that this mine is now one of the most valuable portions of the great property of the & Montana Mining Company, Limited. Leaving Butte, Mr. Dunn started for the Hills, in the summer of 1876. Upon reaching Fort Benton, then the head of navigation on the Missouri river, he found that he had arrived a few hours too late to secure the last boat for the season, and in company with one companion he purchased a skiff, in which they floated four hundred and fifty miles down the river, traveling most at night and seeing Indians almost daily, this being shortly after the great massacre. At Carroll, Montana, they found a steamboat, on which they took passage to Bismarck, from which point Aaron and his party came through with ox teams to the Black Hills, arriving in Deadwood in October, 1876, and having managed to avoid attack from the Indians while en route. He passed a month in mining in Gulch and then joined the stampede to Wolf Mountain, but the prospects there turned out a failure and he returned in a few weeks to Deadwood.Black Hills Stamp MillIn January 1877, Mr. Dunn secured employment in the first stamp mill erected and placed in operation in the Black Hills, the same being owned by E. Pinney and Robert Lawton, and being located on two cement claims, called the Alpha and Omega. This mill was started in operation the last day of December 1876, and though there has been no little dispute as to the matter of the first mill to be put in operation, Mr. Dunn gives the assurance that this one is unmistakably entitled to the distinction. The pulverizer had been started previously and run a short time, but was not a stamp mill. Mr. Dunn did the amalgamating in the stamp mill mentioned for the ensuing seven months, and he then engaged in prospecting and in speculating in mining properties, while for a time he ran the Standby mill, at Rochford, and was also identified with the operation of several other mills, at varying intervals. Other Mining PropertiesSince 1877 he was interested in mining properties in Gulch, about two and one-half miles distant, by road, from Deadwood, and there was the principal owner in nineteen full claims. Up to the time of the writing of Robinson in 1904, about forty thousand dollars had been expended in the improvement and developing of these properties, while about three thousand tons of ore had been shipped to the smelter, the returns being from eight to twenty-three dollars a ton, while the ground is acknowledged to be rich. He also has interests in properties near Custer, where he has passed some time in prospecting, and there he had found a belt five miles long and three wide, carrying all classes of silvanite and telluride ore, while he predicted that the same district will equal the famous Creek district, in Colorado, in which latter he also has some interests.SummaryMr. Dunn had made a careful study of mining, milling, etc., and is known as one of the best amalgamators in the Hills. In 1885 he looked over mining properties in Scotia, Vermont and Carolina for Boston capitalists and in 1890-1991 performed for them a similar service in Colorado and Idaho. In his latter years he devoted practically his entire attention to the developing of his several properties, and was one of the prominent and popular mining men of the state. In 1902 Mr. Dunn made a trip to his old home in Minnesota, that being his first visit there in forty one years.In politics he gave his allegiance to the Republican party.References* 
3462357
Innocent_Until_Caught_2:_Presumed_Guilty
Innocent Until Caught 2: Guilty is a graphical sci-fi game, originally released in 1995 and published by Psygnosis. It is the sequel to Until Caught. Plot The games two main characters are Agent Ysanne Andropath and Jack T. Ladd. Ysanne, who works for the Federation Police and pilots the space ship Relentless, is a tough feminist redhead, while Jack is a notorious thief and womanizer. The game starts with Ysanne capturing Jack for his crimes, when the player gets to choose one of the characters to play the game as. The locations and evolving plot are largely the same both ways, but the player can experience two sides of the story, and will be solving different puzzles.After being jailed aboard the Relentless, Jack escapes his cell and destroys the ships hyperdrive, forcing the duo to land on a mining planet for fuel. It turns out that there is no one on the planet, and they have to figure out what has happened. The clues lead to another planet, and an alien invasion. As the unwilling team goes from planet to planet, they try to locate the source of the alien invasion and eventually stop it. Technical Details The game features a simple set of six actions the player can take. Inventory object graphics are shown in an inventory box at the bottom of the screen. Guilty uses rendered flight scenes for the spacecraft landing and taking off. The CD version of the game adds full speech for the two protagonists. External links *Until Caught 2: Presumed Guilty
3468359
Wagnerite
:This page is about a mineral. For the term used for followers of the philosophy of Romantic composer Wagner, or for fans of his compositions, see Wagnerism.Wagnerite is a mineral, a combined phosphate and fluoride of iron and magnesium, with the formula (MgFe)2PO4F.  It occurs in pegmatite associated with other minerals.  It is named after F.M. von Wagner (1768-1851), a German mining official.References*Mindat*Webmineralit:Wagnerite
3475035
Petauke
footnotes           Petauke is a town and seat of District located in the Eastern Province of Zambia.Petauke is 400 km from the capital city Lusaka, roughly halfway between Lusaka and the Malawi border. The main spoken language of the 14,000 residents is Nsenga. Like the Tonga of southern province, the Nsenga do not know exactly where they came from, although it has been accepted that they were earliest migrants from great Luba-Lunda, probably came following the escarpment together with the Zulu, Shona and other southern African peoples. Unfortunately, this fact is challenged on account of language. Luba groups mostly settled in northern Zambia and part of central Zambia whereas the Lunda groups settled in North western and western Zambia. These groups have similarities in their languages if not they are dialects. But for the nsenga it is unique, actually, it was until the Ngoni marauders settled among them because they were loosely organised. Eventually, the Ngoni lost their language.Most telecommunication is by two radio stations; the most popular station is Radio Explorers, 88.3fm, which covers up to 120 km; it is mostly used by chiefs to disseminate their information. The District now has the reception of the three major cellular providers in the country- Celtel now Zain, Cell Z and Mtn.The town is situated in an agricultural area; farmers produce maize, cotton, sunflower, groundnut, soya beans and many other crops. Industries include milling cotton, three breweries, of which Brother Willys mafuta beer and Ngambazi beer of Nyankuwa Brewery are the most popular. . The region around Petauke contains copper, amethyst, and gold.However, the minerals in the region are low grade and no serious mining investment has been made in the region. In the early 17th century, gold was mined and that contributed to high rate of slave trade. mostly, the Swahili speaking peoples invaded the area.The town is near the North and South Luangwa National Parks. Accommodation* Nyika Motel* Willys motel* Chimwemwe Lodge, the worst (and most expensive) accommodation in Petauke  External links * MSN Mapbg:de:Petaukees:Petaukemrj:pl:Petaukept:PetaukeZambia
3479688
Colonial_navies_of_Australia
thumb|250px|An artists impression of the ironclad HMVS Cerberus (left) and the training ship HMVS Nelson (right). The Victorian naval force was considered the most powerful of all the colonial naval forces.Before Federation in 1901 five of the six separate colonies maintained their own naval forces for defence. The colonial navies were supported by the ships of the Royal Navys Station which was established in 1859. The separate colonies maintained control over their respective navies until 1 March 1901, when the Naval Force was created.New South WalesNew South Wales Naval BrigadeNew South Wales Naval Artillery VolunteersAs Sydney was the major base for the Navy in Australia, the New South Wales Government had no incentive to create their own naval force. This sense of security ended with the outbreak of the War and in 1854 the government asked for tenders for the construction of a gunboat to assist in the defence of Sydney. The vessel was named Spitfire and was the first naval vessel completed by an Australian colonial government. Although modified from an existing boat(The Maitland & Hunter River General Advertiser, 11 August 1855), Spitfire was nevertheless the first warship to be constructed in Australia. Spitfire remained in service with the New South Wales colonial navy until 1859 when she was given to Queensland.thumb|left|The torpedo boat Avernus in Sydney HarbourAfter the construction of Spitfire (launched 4 April 1855) the New South Wales Government took no further steps in developing a naval force until a naval brigade of 120 men was formed in 1863. There was strong support for the naval brigade and in 1864 it consisted of five companies, four in Sydney and one in Newcastle, with an overall strength of 200 men. The naval brigade headquarters was established at Macquarie, where the Opera House today stands. Since Spitfire was sold to Queensland in 1859, the naval brigade had no ships of their own. This problem was not rectified until the late 1870s, when the government ordered the construction of two second class torpedo boats, Avernus and Acheron; these vessels were constructed in Sydney. In 1882, HMS Wolverine was acquired from the Royal Navy.HMS Wolverine was paid off in 1893 and the total number of vessels used by the Navy decreased over time as any perceived threat diminished. The naval brigade continued to grow, however, and reached a total strength of 614 men at Federation.Queenslandthumb|HMQS Paluma in 1889Queensland Maritime Defence ForceOne of the many outcomes of the reports was the formation of the Queensland Maritime Defence Force in 1883. Its purpose was to assist in the defence of Queenslands extensive coastline. To equip the new force the colonial government purchased two gunboats and a torpedo boat whilst port facilities and headquarters were established at Kangaroo Point, Brisbane. The gunboats Paluma and Gayundah were ordered from the shipyards of Mitchell and Company and featured a shallow draft capable of operating in the many bays and estuaries along the coast. Gayundah served as a training ship and conducted the first ship to shore radio transmissions in Australia whilst Paluma was lent to the Navy to carry out survey work on the Barrier Reef and along the Australian east coast. The torpedo boat Mosquito was ordered from Thornycroft of Chiswick. Mosquito was never commissioned but simply placed into service when required.From this beginning further vessels were acquired to give Queensland the second largest fleet in the colonies behind Victoria. Five government hopper barges were modified to act as Auxiliary Gunboats. These ships were built by Walkers in Maryborough and at 450 tons they appear to have been the largest warships built in the Australian colonies before federation. The ships had already been ordered for the Queensland Department of Harbours and Rivers when the decision was taken to convert them to also serve a military purpose. This resulted in the fitting of a 5-inch gun and the relocation of the boilers below the waterline. The torpedo launch Midge, mining tender Miner and patrol vessel Otter made up the rest of the Queensland vessels. The Queensland Government also established naval brigades in the major ports along the Queensland coast.The depression of the 1890s ruled out any further thoughts of expansion and greatly curtailed operations. Most of the vessels were placed in reserve only to be reactivated for annual training at Easter. Despite this, most went on to have long careers in both naval and private hands past War II. The wrecks of many can still be seen around Bay today.The Queensland Maritime Defence Force was not without controversy and difficulties. In October 1888, after a disagreement with the Queensland Government over conditions of service, Captain H.T. Wright R.N. commanding officer of Gayundah, was ordered to hand over to his second-in-command. Wrights response was to place his subordinate under arrest. He then coaled and provisioned the ship and threatened to sail her to Sydney. The Queensland Government ordered a police squad to relieve Captain Wright of his command. During the incident Captain Wright enquired from his gunner as to the best line of fire for his guns in order to hit Parliament House. The situation was eventually resolved. Of interest is the fact that, as Captain Wright had insisted, although Gayundah was the property of the Queensland government, it had, by Admiralty Warrant been accepted into Royal Navy service and thus as her captain he was only answerable to Rear-Admiral Fairfax the commander-in-chief of the Station.The Brisbane flood ripped Paluma from her moorings and left her well above the high water mark in the nearby City Botanical Gardens. Fortunately as locals considered how to return one of the colonys most powerful and most expensive assets to the River another major flood just two weeks later refloated the gunboat and she was pulled clear.Whilst these incidents may have been a source of mirth for those in the southern colonies it is important to note that Queensland officers went on to provide the backbone of the Naval Forces. In 1904, when a permanent Naval Board was established, it was Captain Creswell of Queensland and previously South Australia who was appointed as the Director of the Commonwealth Naval Forces and First Naval Member. At this time, 49% of the new forces officers had served with the Queensland Maritime Defence Force.The Queensland Marine Defence Force was the only Australian colonial navy not to be involved in a foreign conflict.South AustraliaSouth Australian Naval Servicethumb|left|Protector in 1900In the 1880s Australia began initial steps towards the establishment of a naval force. Sir William Jervois, then governor of Australia, was the strongest advocate for a colonial navy. September 1884 saw the arrival of the 920 tonne ship Protector, at the time the most advanced ship in any of the colonial navies.Protector was transferred to the Commonwealth in 1901, she also served in China during the Rebellion. The South Australian government also created a naval brigade to support the Protector. In 1905 the South Australian government negotiated the purchase of TB 191 from Tasmania, this ship was purchased as a torpedo boat and would allow the navy to use its torpedoes which had been purchased many years earlier.Tasmaniathumb|TB 191During the mid 1830s, the colony of Diemens Land constructed and operated the armed schooner Eliza. The vessel was built at Port Arthur and was operated by the Convict Marine Service, carrying out anti-piracy patrols as well as helping to maintain the security of the penal settlement. In 1883, Tasmania purchased the second-class torpedo boat TB 191.(Gillett (1977) refers to this vessel as TB 1 not TB 191.) The ship arrived in Hobart on 1 May 1884 and remained in Tasmania until it was transferred to Australia in 1905.VictoriaVictorian Naval ForcesThe Colony of Victoria commenced construction of its first armed vessel in 1853(U.S. Gazette 10 December 1853), HMCS Victoria which was launched on 30 June 1855 and arrived in Victoria on 31 May 1856. Victoria carried out a large variety of tasks during its life, including taking part in the Wars, assisting in the search for and Wills, delivering the first trout eggs to Tasmania, as well as numerous surveying and rescue tasks.In 1859 the first Naval Brigade was formed. The Brigade was re-organised in 1863 as a half-militia, re-formed in 1871 as the Victorian Naval Reserve as a full militia and re-formed again in 1885 as the Victorian Naval Brigade.The Victorian Naval Forces comprised the permanent force known as the Victorian Navy, and a 300-strong Victorian Naval Brigade consisting of the Williamstown Division and the Sandridge (Port Melbourne) Division. Combined the Victorian Navy and the Victorian Naval Brigade were known as the Victorian Naval Forces.Following the success of Victoria, the Victorian colonial government ordered an ironclad ship, HMVS Cerberus and was gifted the composite steam-sail warship, HMS Nelson.In 1884 several more warships were purchased by Victoria, these included the first-class torpedo boat Childers and second-class torpedo boats Lonsdale, and Nepean and the third-class gunboats Victoria and Albert. In 1886 the turnabout torpedo boat Gordon was acquired.  In 1892, the first-class torpedo boat, Countess of Hopetoun arrived in Victoria.To supplement the ships of the permanent force a number of government vessels were modified so as to serve as gunboats or torpedo boats. The hopper barges Batman and Fawkner were modified so as to mount a six-inch breech-loading gun at the bow of each ship. Two machine guns were also fitted. Strengthening of the bow, the fitting of a magazine, shell room, crew quarters and some armour protection for the crew added two more gunboats to the fleet. A compressor fitted to Fawkner meant that the torpedo boats could be serviced at sea. The tug boat Gannet and steamer Lady Loch were likewise modified.The Harbour Trust boats Commissioner and Customs No. 1 had two sets of torpedo dropping gear fitted to each boat thereby adding two more torpedo boats to the fleet. In 1885 the government steamers Lion and Spray were fitted with six-pounder Armstrong guns.  Spray was later fitted with two sets of torpedo dropping gear.Supporting the Victorian Naval Forces were the fortifications located at the entrance to Phillip Bay and other sites around the bay. In the years leading up to Federation the Victorian Naval Forces were considered the most powerful of all the colonial naval forces.Western AustraliaAustralia did not operate a colonial navy in the years before federation. Since Western Australia did not achieve self-government until 1890, the colony was forbidden from operating its own naval vessels under the Naval Defence Act of 1865. However, in 1879 a militia unit, known as the Naval Artillery was formed to assist in the defence of Fremantle Harbour. The naval artillery unit was made up of ex-Navy men and merchant seamen of good character.The unit was equipped with two brass 6-pounder field guns; these guns had no limbers, restricting their movement. These guns hindered the primary function of the naval artillery, which was to provide a mobile shore battery for the defence of Fremantle Harbour. In 1889 these guns were replaced by two 9-pounder guns, complete with limbers and wagons. The Fremantle Naval Artillery was eventually disbanded and reformed as the Fremantle Artillery Volunteers.Royal Navy in Australialeft|thumb|Ships of the Royal Navys squadron on the Australia Station moored in Sydney in 1880In the years that followed the settlement of Australia in 1788 the Navy did not maintain a permanent force in the new colony. The new Port Jackson colony was placed under the protection of the Indies Station, vessels were detached occasionally to visit the new colony. From 1821 the Royal Navy maintained a permanent man-of-war in the colony. Over the next 20 years the vessels based on Port Jackson included the rates Alligator, Caroline, Conway, Imogene, and Rattlesnake, and the sloops Hyacinth, Pelorus and Zebra.On 25 March 1859 Captain William Loring of Iris was authorised to hoist a commodores blue pennant and to assume command as senior officer of Her Majestys Ships on the Station, this new command was independent of the commander-in-chief in India.Commonwealth Naval Forcesbattlecruiser HMAS AustraliaThe colonies maintained control over their respective navies until 1 March 1901, when the Commonwealth Naval Force was created. Initially, like the colonial forces that proceeded it, this new force also lacked blue-water capable ships, and its creation did not lead to an immediate change in Australian naval policy. In 1909, Prime Minister Deakin, while attending the Imperial Conference in London, sought the British Governments agreement to end the subsidy system and develop an Australian navy. The Admiralty rejected these approaches, suggesting instead that a small fleet of destroyers and submarines would be sufficient. Deakin was unimpressed and had previously invited the American White Fleet to visit Australia in 1908. This visit had fired public enthusiasm for a modern navy and in part led to the order of two 700-ton River-class destroyers. The surge in German naval construction prompted the Admiralty to change their position in 1909(Dennis et al 2008, pp. 466470.) and the Australian Navy was subsequently formed in 1911. On 4 October 1913, the new fleet steamed through Heads, consisting of the battlecruiser HMAS Australia, three light cruisers, and three destroyers, while several other ships were still under construction. And as a consequence the navy entered the First World War as a formidable force.(Macdougall 1991, p. 23.)See also*of Queensland Maritime Defence Force ships*of Royal Australian Navy shipsNotes;Citations;FootnotesReferences***
3487956
The_Hills_Have_Eyes_(2006_film)
 followed_by     Hills Have Eyes 2The Hills Have Eyes is a 2006 film and remake of Cravens 1977 film of the same name. Written by filmmaking partners Aja and Grgory Levasseur of the French horror film Tension, and directed by Aja, the film follows a family who becomes the target of a group of murderous mutants after their car breaks down in the desert. The film was released theatrically in the States and Kingdom on March 10, 2006. It earned $15.5 million in its opening weekend in the U.S.,(IMDb Box Office - The Hills Have Eyes) where it was originally rated NC-17 for strong gruesome violence, but was later edited down to an R-rating. An unrated DVD version was released on June 20, 2006. A sequel, Hills Have Eyes 2, was released in theaters March 23, 2007.PlotThe film begins with three men testing for radioactivity in the New Mexico desert. Suddenly a bloody man jumps into one of the men view, begging for help. Pluto (Bailey Smith), a mutant disfigured by nuclear testing impales one of the men with a pick axe and violently bangs him on the ground. The other two men are then quickly slaughtered and all four are chained to the back of a truck, which is driven away. At a gas station the old attendant wakes and goes outside shouting for Ruby he travels away from the gas station then returns seeing a holdall near the door he says he wont do it anymore (although the audience does not know what it is that he does) he goes inside then seconds later retrieves the bag whilst someone (unknown although at a best guess it is Ruby) watches. He looks through the bag which contains jewellery and wallets and other such items. He then hears a car honking outside.Ethel Carter (Quinlan) and her husband, Big Bob Carter (Levine), a retired police detective, are traveling from Cleveland, Ohio to San Diego, California on their silver wedding anniversary. Also present is their daughter Brenda (de Ravin), son Bobby (Byrd), eldest daughter Lynn (Shaw), her husband Doug Bukowski (Stanford), their baby daughter Catherine (Maisie Camilleri Preziosi), and the German Shepherds, Beauty and Beast. While Big Bob talks to the gas station manager, we see a mutant grab Bobbys red sweatshirt out of the car and run off. Bobby and Brenda head away from the building and Bobby goes into a nearby outhouse. He is urinating when he sees someone watching him through the window. It was the mutant who stole his red sweatshirt from the car. After believing one of the family has seen the contents of the holdall, the attendant tells Bob of a shortcut through the hills which is actually the secret trap. After driving a few miles along the shortcut, the tires are punctured by a hidden spike belt and the trucks wheels burst, causing the truck to crash into a nearby ditch. Bob walks back to the gas station for a tow truck, and Doug walks the opposite way to get help. Meanwhile, the remaining members of the family are being watched by someone through a pair of binoculars. Beauty runs off into the hills and Bobby chases after her, eventually finding her gutted corpse. Frightened and distraught, Bobby runs off, but slips and falls, knocking himself unconscious. A young female mutant named Ruby (Laura Ortiz), who had stolen his sweatshirt, comes across him and is intrigued by him, while her brother Goggle (Buzzington) chews over the dead dog. Later, Bob finally makes it to the station and finds the hysterical gas station attendant (Tom Bower), who commits suicide by shooting himself in the head. In fear, Bob tries to flee from the scene in a car. But he gets attacked by the mutant leader, Papa Jupiter (Drago), and gets carried off into the mining caves nearby by Jupiter, along with Jupiters eldest son, Lizard (Joy), and Pluto.When Bobby awakes, he returns to the trailer and does not tell his family of Beautys demise. Lynn tells him that they tried the CB and heard heavy breathing. Beast breaks free of his chain and runs into the hills where he finds whats left of Beauty. Doug returns from the road he traveled, a dead end which ended in a bomb crater filled with cars, with a fishing pole, a baseball bat, and a teddy bear. Bobby is worried about his father who has not yet returned; Doug promises Bobby they will search for Bob if he does not return by midnight. As they try to sleep, Pluto sneaks into the trailer, finds Brenda, and attempts to rape her. Outside the trailer, Bobby wakes up Lynn and Doug, telling them about the people in the hills, and of Beautys death. Inside Pluto holds Brenda down and prevents her from screaming. The others are about to discover Pluto when suddenly, an explosion in the distance draws their attention. Discovering that Bob has been tied to a tree and set on fire, Doug runs into the trailer to fetch a fire extinguisher as Lizard slips inside unnoticed. As everyone unknowingly leaves the helpless Brenda alone with the two violent men, Lizard notices Plutos unsuccessful efforts to rape Brenda. Furious, he throws Pluto off and does it himself. Pluto then sees Catherine in her crib and observes her as Lizard continues to rape Brenda. Doug manages to put out the fire, and unties Bob, already dead, while Lynn returns to the trailer to see why Brenda is screaming and is greeted by Lizard, holding baby Catherine and Big Bobs gun while Pluto is holding Brenda. After Lynn hits him with a frying pan, Lizard disarms her and threatens Catherine with the gun. He forces open Lynns blouse and sucks the milk from her breasts. Ethel enters with a large flat rock, attempting to pulverize Lizard, but Pluto calls out to warn him. Lizard, spotting her, shoots her in the stomach. Lynn then uses a screwdriver and stabs Lizard, who then shoots her in the head. Pluto and Lizard flee the trailer, holding Brenda and Catherine hostage. When Lizard hears Doug and Bobby approaching, he tries to shoot Brenda, but the gun is out of bullets. He promises Brenda that he will be back for her before fleeing with Pluto, who still has the baby.Doug and Bobby return to the trailer, discover the bodies, and realize that Catherine has been taken. Goggle, the mutant who killed Beauty, watches the trailer through binoculars, but he is attacked by Beast. His fate is still uncertain. The next morning, Doug goes off in pursuit of their attackers; Beast leads Doug through a tunnel that contains the graves of miners. Once out of the tunnel, Doug finds an abandoned nuclear testing village and enters the house where Catherine is kept, but is knocked unconscious by Big Mama (Ivana Turchetto), who he thought was busy watching television. He then awakes in an icebox where the mutants keep the bodies of their victims. He panics and bangs on the plastic cover, eventually knocking it loose. He returns to his task of finding Catherine, only to encounter Big Brain (Askew), who tells him the story of the mutants, who were mutated by the fallout from the nuclear tests, and then getting attacked by Pluto who breaks through a door. After a fierce struggle, during which Doug loses the ring finger and pinkie on his left hand, he is able to trick him by pretending to cry. Pluto laughs and gets momentarily distracted, giving Doug time to slam a screwdriver through his foot and the floor, pinning him down. He then takes a small American flag and shoves it through the back of Plutos throat, and finally finishes him by slamming the blade of his own axe into his head.Doug then surprises the mutant Cyst (Nicotero) outside the house and uses Plutos axe to kill him, chopping his knee open and knocking him over the hood of a car, where he is axed in the back and is finally killed when Doug swings the pick end into his eye. Doug takes his shotgun and heads off. Big Brain tells Lizard to kill Catherine, but is killed by Beast. Lizard takes a cleaver and prepares to kill Catherine, but finds that instead of Catherine, it is a pig. Ruby has taken Catherine and run into the hills; Lizard realizes this and begins to chase her, enraged by her deceit. Doug sees Ruby on the hill and chases her as well. At the trailer, Ethels body is stolen and dragged into the hills, and Bobby finds Papa Jupiter eating Ethels heart. Jupiter pursues Bobby to the trailer, where Brenda releases gas from the propane tanks as Bobby runs inside, attaching a strip of matches to the sliding door behind him. Bobby binds Papa Jupiters hand to the window. After he and Brenda escape, Jupiter breaks free of the bungee cord, and opens the sliding door, which strikes the matches and ignites the gas inside the trailer, causing it to explode.In the hills, Ruby is about to return Catherine to Doug when Lizard attacks. Doug brutally beats him in a fit of rage and then shoots Lizard in the chest, neck, and finally the shoulder. Ruby gives Catherine back to Doug, who does not notice Lizard stand up, having survived. Ruby throws herself at Lizard, plunging them over a cliff, stopping Lizard from shooting Doug and Catherine and sacrificing herself in the process. Bobby and Brenda walk through the ruins of their trailer and find Papa Jupiter still alive, though impaled. Brenda kills Papa Jupiter with a pickaxe to the head. Brenda then spots Doug with Catherine and Beast, and the four are reunited. As they celebrate their apparent victory, a pair of anonymous binoculars watches from the hills.Cast* Stanford as Doug Bukowski* Quinlan as Ethel Carter* Shaw as Lynn Carter-Bukowski* de Ravin as Brenda Carter* Byrd as Bobby Carter* Tom Bower as Gas Station Attendant* Drago as Papa Jupiter* Joy as Lizard* Levine as Big Bob Carter* Askew as Big Brain* Buzzington as Goggle* Bailey Smith as Pluto* Laura Ortiz as Ruby* Maisie Camilleri Preziosi as Baby Catherine* Nicotero as Cyst* Ivanna Truchetto as Big MamaProductionCraven, director and writer of the original The Hills Have Eyes, began the idea of remaking the film when he saw the success of other horror remakes such as The Texas Chainsaw Massacre and The Amityville Horror. The search then began for filmmakers to helm the project. Marianne Maddalena, Cravens long time producing partner, came across Aja and his art director/collaborator Grgory Levasseur who had previously made the French slasher film Tension. After showing the film to Craven and the rest of the production crew, they were impressed with the pair. Craven comments that they demonstrated a multi-faceted understanding of what isprofoundly terrifying and After viewing the film and then meeting the film makers, I knewI wanted to work with them.() Aja and Levasseur then began to re-write the story in what is the pairs first American production. Director Aja and art director Grgory Levasseur chose not to film in the originals filming location of California and instead scouted many locations for filming including Namibia, Africa, Mexico, and Mexico. The two settled on Ouarzazate in Morocco, which was also known as the gateway to the Sahara Desert.( The film, is set in Mexico, and strongly implies that a large number of atmospheric nuclear weapon tests were performed in that state. In fact, the only atmospheric nuclear detonation in New Mexico was the test, the first test of a nuclear device conducted on July 16, 1945. The United States carried out most of its atmospheric nuclear weapons tests at the Test Site and in the Islands at the lagoons of Bikini and Eniwetok, between 1946 and 1962. The theatrical poster shows Vinessa Shaws character laying down with a mutant hand on her face.EffectsPrior to filming, Aja and Levasseur had already conceived an idea for the mutants appearance. We based all our descriptions and directions on real documents, pictures and footage that we found on the effects of nuclear fallout in Chernobyl and Hiroshima, explains Aja. In addition, Aja and Levasseur spend extensive time with local residents living in the filming location of Palmdale to further grasp an accurate depiction of what the mutants would look like. Aja stated Our biggest form of inspiration for the look of the mutant creatures came when we went to a Pogues concert in Chicago  and observed the people around us. The Hills Have Eyes utilized the K.N.B. EFX Group Inc. who had done previous work on films such as The Chronicles of Narnia (for which an Award was nominated) and Sin City.K.N.B. spent over six months designing the mutants, first using 3D designer tools, such as ZBrush, allowing them to use a computer to generate their sculptures. After prosthetics were made, they could be fitted to the actors before filming. Robert Joy, who plays the mutant Lizard, explained, Every day, these amazing artists took more than three hours to transform me into something that could only be found in a nightmare.(K.N.B. artist Nicotero was also made a cameo as Cyst, the mutant with the halo head-gear.Jamison Goei and his team, who had done previous work on Hellseeker and Resurrection, had done over 130 visual effects for the film. A large part of that was digitally constructing the testing village, which in actuality was only one built street with others digitally added. The team also warped the mutants faces slightly, which is shown mostly in the character of Ruby.Papa Jupiter displays no deformities. However, as shown in The Making Of, Papa Jupiter appears to have a large twin attached to his upper left torso. The young children of the film had their deformities added by CGI, with the exception of Ruby, who had a combination of CGI and makeup.CastingThe casting process began with the selection of The Silence of the Lambss Levine as the character Big Bob. Levine was also a fan of the film Haute Tension. Afterwards, Quinlan was cast as Ethel in her first role starring in a horror film (despite appearing in Zone: The Movie and Event Horizon). Next, Stanford was cast as Doug Bukowski who undergoes the most radical transformation of anyone in the Carter family( Stanford even asked not to see any of the mutants in make-up before his characters battle in the testing village so, that way, hed be truly frightened. When casting Lynn, Dougs wife, Aja wanted to cast Shaw whom he had wanted to work with since seeing her in Kubricks 1999 film Wide Shut. Shaw was hesitant to play the role, but after watching Tension, she agreed, explaining: There was such an odd combination of beauty and terror, it felt almost like an art film. So, after meeting with Alex and Greg, I decided to do it.( For the role of Brenda, the filmmakers sought a young actress who had relatively little exposure and found it in de Ravin who was beginning her rise in the television series Lost. After de Ravin, Byrd was cast as Bobby. Byrd had previous genre experience starring in Salems Lot.Aja then had the six actors arrive in the filming location of Morocco early to bond together.When casting for the mutants, associate producer Cody Zwieg explained: We needed to find actors who could not only perform the stunt work, handle the extensive makeup and perform in that makeup, but who truly could embody the fierce, primal nature of the mutants way of life.( To play the role of Pluto, Aja looked to Bailey Smith, who had been in Nightmare on Elm Street 5: The Dream Child. For Lizard, the filmmakers cast Joy, who had made previous genre films such as 3-D and A. Romeros of the Dead. Ezra Buzzington, impressed with the filmmakers, agreed to play the role of Goggle and even watched a documentary about human cultures engaging in cannibalism. To play the mutant leader, Billy Drago was cast. Drago had previously had a role in De Palmas The Untouchables and other horror features. The most difficult mutant to cast was Ruby, who was a touch of sweetness to the madness of the mutants.( Laura Ortiz was ultimately cast, making her film debut.ReleaseBox officeThe Hills Have Eyes was a commercial success, playing in total 2,521 theaters and taking in its opening weekend $15,708,512.() The film grossed $41,778,863 in the States Box Office() and $69,770,032 worldwide.(Critical receptionCritical reception was mixed with an average critic Rotten rating of 49% on Tomatoes and a critical consensus stating Faster paced for todays audiences, this Hills remake ratchets up the gore for the hardcore horror fans, but will turn away casual audiences.() Washington Post said: this remake of the alleged 1977 Wes Craven classic has one very disturbing quality: Its too damned good.() Some have gone on to refer to the film as torture porn.() Disgusting, however, was scathing of those who referred to it as such, saying some may call it Torture porn - these people are idiots.() Ebert also gave a negative review, mentioning that the characters in the film are not familiar with horror movie, and went on to cite that the film should have focused more on the characters rather than the violence, saying The Hills Have Eyes finds an intriguing setting in typical fake towns built by the government ... But its mutants are simply engines of destruction. There is a misshapen creature who coordinates attacks with a walkie-talkie; I would have liked to know more about him, but no luck.()SoundtrackThe soundtrack score was composed by Tomandandy.;Track listing - US Edition(http://www.amazon.com/dp/samples/B000EGDCKK):Tracks 10-29 are all original music composed by tomandandy# Leave the Broken Hearts - Finalist# Blue Eyes Woman - Go# Highway Kind - Moot Davis# Summers Gonna Be My Girl - Go# More and More - Pierce# The Walls - Vault# In the Valley of the Sun - Buddy Stuart# Daisy - on Fire# California Dreamin - Mamas and the Papas# Forbidden Zone# Gas Haven# Out House# Praying# Beauty# Ravens# Daddy Daddy# Beast Finds Beauty# Trailer# Aftermath# Ethels Death# Next Morning# Mine# Village Test# Breakfast Time# Play with Us# The Quest I# The Quest II# Sacrifice# Its Over?# Ryan Slaying Snow Wolf Pt. I# Ryan Slaying Snow Wolf Pt. II# Ryans E-dating GuideReferencesExternal links* * * * * * Interview with director Alexandre Aja at www.sci-fi-online.commaj oiHills Have Eyes (2006)Hills Have Eyes  Hgel der blutigen AugenHills Have Eyes (pelcula de 2006)colline a des yeux (film, 2006)colline hanno gli occhi (film 2006)Hills Have Eyes (2006)ja:maj oczy (film 2006)Hills Have Eyes   (, 2006)Hills Have Eyes (vuoden 2006 elokuva)Hills Have EyesGzleri  (, 2006)
3491552
Crime_analysis
Crime analyysis is a law enforcement function that involves systematic analysis for identifying and analyzing patterns and trends in crime and disorder.  Information on patterns can help law enforcement agencies deploy resources in a more effective manner, and assist detectives in identifying and apprehending suspects.  Crime analysis also plays a role in devising solutions to crime problems, and formulating crime prevention strategies. Quantitative science data analysis methods are part of the crime analysis process, though qualitative methods such as examining police report narratives also play a role.()FunctionsCrime analysis can occur at various levels, including tactical, operational, and strategic.  Crime analysts study crime reports, arrests reports, and police calls for service to identify emerging patterns, series, and trends as quickly as possible. They analyze these phenomena for all relevant factors, sometimes predict or forecast future occurrences, and issue bulletins, reports, and alerts to their agencies. They then work with their police agencies to develop effective strategies and tactics to address crime and disorder. Other duties of crime analysts may include preparing statistics, data queries, or maps on demand; analyzing beat and shift configurations; preparing information for community or court presentations; answering questions from the public and the press; and providing data and information support for a police departments CompStat process.  Sociodemographics, along with spatial and temporal information, are all aspects that crime analysts look at to understand whats going on in their jurisdiction.()  Crime analysis employs mining, mapping, statistics, research methods, desktop publishing, charting, presentation skills, critical thinking, and a solid understanding of criminal behavior. In this sense, a crime analyst serves as a combination of an information systems specialist, a statistician, a researcher, a criminologist, a journalist, and a planner for a local police department.Profession Crime analysts are employed at all levels of law enforcement, often as civilian professionals while other agencies appoint sworn police officers to a crime analysis position.  In the States, mostcrime analysts are employed by municipal or county police departments.  In countries other than the United States, crime analysis is often called intelligence analysis or criminal intelligence analysis, but in the U.S., this term is generally understood to apply to a different law enforcement discipline.  Many medium and large local law enforcement agencies have dedicated crime analysis units, while many smaller jurisdictions (e.g. townships) may have a police force that consists of just a few police officers who do not specialize in crime analysis or any other specific aspect of law enforcement.  As a profession, crime analysis has existed since at least the 1960s (though some of its most essential functions were probably performed even in ancient times). The earliest known reference is in Wilsons 1963 edition of Police Administration. At first only present in very large municipal agencies, the profession got a boost in the 1970s under funding supplied by the Enforcement Assistance Administration (LEAA). It was during this decade that the first standardized manuals of the profession began to appear. After suffering a dearth of funding in the 1980s, the crime analysis scene changed dramatically in the 1990s with the computer revolution, the existence of new funding under the Department of Justices COPS Office, the rise of several professional associations and federally-funded training programs, and the new emphasis within police departments on policing and policing.A common misconception about a crime analysts job, is that they go out to scenes to investigate;  That is the job of a criminalist, to collect forensic evidence, or detective who investigates crimes.Crime Analysis in the United KingdomCrime (and criminal intelligence) analysis in the United Kingdom is governed by the National Intelligence Model, an Association of Chief Police Officers (ACPO) code of practice that establishes a common approach to the business.  This was rolled out in 2000 by the National Criminal Intelligence Service (NCIS, now part of the Serious Organised Crime Service (SOCA)) and adopted by ACPO, becoming a requirement for UK police forces, with a number of minimum standards assessed during inspection by Her Majestys Inspectorate of Constabulary (HMIC). There are varying roles available in law enforcement within the UK, from police forces to the Serious Organised Crime Agency to Her Majestys Customs and Revenue (HMCR) to related roles in private companies such as insurance and telecoms providers.  There is an increasing role for analysis within what is referred to as partners within the police, including council authorities.  This has particularly been the case since the Crime and Disorder Act (CDA) Review and the subsequent Crime and Disorder (Formulation and Implementation of Strategy) Regulations 2007, which included a requirement for the annual provision of a partnership Strategic Assessment, including analysis in relation to problems of crime and disorder and substance misuse.Analysts support policing through the provision and support of four key Intelligence Products, these being the Strategic Assessment, the Tactical Assessment, the Problem Profile and the Subject Profile (formerly referred to as the Target Profile) and ten analytical tools & techniques.  The key skills of an analyst within UK law enforcement must to be identify patterns and trends, make inferences in relation to these patterns, provide recommendations to support action and provide products and briefings that deliver this information and interpretation clearly and in an appropriate format for the audience.ReferencesFurther reading* Chevalier, Dennis Howard (2003) An objective guideline for profiling violent serial sex offenders, Kennedy University TXu001065637 / 2002-07-05* Osborne, Deborah and Susan Wernicke (2003) Introduction to Crime Analysis: Basic Resources for Criminal Justice Practice. Haworth Press. ISBN 0-7890-1868-3 External links *International Association of Crime Analysts*Massachusetts Association of Crime Analysts*California Crime and Intelligence Analysts Association*Northwest Regional Crime Analyst Network*Guidance on the UK National Intelligence Model 2005*Practice Advice on Tasking and Co-ordination*UK Home Office Partnership Mini Site*UK National Policing Improvement Agencykryminalna
3499564
Hao_Zhao
Hao Zhao, style name Bodao (), was a military general of the state of Wei during the Kingdoms period of Chinese history. His single most important victory over the much larger Han army led by Liang during the of Chencang made him a celebrity overnight, but he soon died of illness before he could further his exploits.BiographyEarly careerHao Zhao was born in an obscure family in Taiyuan, and joined the army at a young age. Described as masculine and strong, the physically adept Hao Zhao was soon assigned the post of a commander to a group of militia under the Dynastys chancellor, Cao. He gained several deeds during his tenure as a captain, and was granted the lowest ranking of generalship for his diligent effort. Some time later, he was dispatched to Hexi and stayed there for roughly ten years. During his tenure, he had been successful on suppressing some local uprisings, and was feared by both the residents and foreign tribes alike.((). History of Wei. Huan.)As a local defenderBefore the regent of Shu, Liang, launched his second northern campaign against the rival state of Wei, Zhen of Wei correctly predicted Zhuges route of advancement. Cao Zhen recommended Hao Zhao to build fortifications for Chencang, and assured the young emperor Rui of the defense against probable invasions from Shu. However, Hao Zhao was only assigned 1,000 men for his task.After his failure in the first expedition on Mount Qi, Zhuge Liang indeed changed his target to Chencang as Cao Zhen foresaw. Thoroughly prepared, Zhuge Liang brought with him a selection of siege weapons and 100,000 troops. Although a few officers including Yan recommended an alternate route, Zhuge Liang was determined to march through Chencang in order to establish a foothold. When they reached the fortress-city, the defense was apparently not completed as Cao Zhen had not sent additional forces to move in.Having completed the encirclement, Zhuge Liang sent Xiang, a friend of Hao Zhao, to convince Hao to betray Wei. The first time they spoke, Hao Zhao would hear none of it, saying The law of Wei is what you practiced; the nature of me is what you know. I have received so much from my country and I cant let down on my family. You ought to say no more, Ill only die defending this city. Go express my gratitude to Zhuge Liang, then ask him to attack!((). Brief History of Wei.) Jin Xiang told Zhuge Liang what Hao Zhao said, and again Zhuge sent Jin to soften Hao. Our armies are enormous while you only have a tiny force, what good is it to perish for a futile effort? said Jin. This time, however, Hao Zhao fitted an arrow and replied What I said earlier remains solid. As I know you, my arrow doesnt.((). Brief History of Wei.) Upon hearing this, the attack began.SiegeThe odds were drastically against Hao Zhao - he only had 1,000 men at the time, while the Shu army numbered 100,000.((). Records of Shanxi (). ) Zhuge Liangs first attempt was to carry out an escalade tactic through the use of siege ladders, but Hao Zhao countered with fire arrows, burning the platforms and parched the men upon them. While the ladders were still aflame, the enemies battering rams designed to breach the city gate had arrived, and Hao Zhao hurriedly chained some great stones and rolled them down, smashing the rams. The quick response and skillful leadership of Hao Zhao greatly shocked Zhuge Liang, as the latter never expected such a determined resistance before. Zhuge Liang then drew back and rethought on his tactic, and he decided to create more possible attack points. So, the besiegers started to fill the moats and prepared their towers. With the moats and entrenchments removed, the engines moved upon the walls while foot-soldiers climbed the walls like ants. However, Zhuge Liang was outwitted by Hao Zhao that when he laid his hand on the entrenchment, Hao had already seen through his intention and started building interior walls inside the original walls.(() Brief History of Wei.) As long as the siege towers could not pass the first walls, the soldiers on top of the towers who did overcome the outer walls could not climb the second inner walls. Suffering another defeat, Zhuge Liang attempted an architectural approach. He asked his soldiers to dig tunnels beneath the city, but his method was actually different to the more common mining tactic, which is to excavate beneath the foundations of the walls, and then deliberately collapsing or exploding the tunnel - it is recorded that he wanted to create some underground passages for his armies to enter the city directly.((). Brief History of Wei.) That is a much perilous approach, because defenders can counter-tunnel to cut into the attackers works and topple them prematurely, killing anyone affected by the collapse, and that is just what Hao Zhao did.The struggle had been continuing non-stop for 20-odd days and nights, with Zhuge Liang becoming increasingly aggressive.(() Brief History of Wei.) News came of Wei reinforcements being led by Shuang, and Zhuge Liang was forced to retreat when his army was unable to stop the former from reaching Chencang. Wang Shuang was killed when he attempted a pursuit.DeathAn imperial decree was passed down to grant Hao Zhao a title of marquis, and he was summoned to the imperial capital by the emperor Cao Rui, who was so eager to meet this new hero of his country and once commented to his trusted aide, Sun Zi (, not to be confused with Tzu), your county has produced such a fiery general, what worries should I have?((). Brief History of Wei.) The emperor intended to assign great tasks to Hao Zhao, but the latter became seriously ill and stayed in Luoyang to receive medication. As the sick man collapsed, he gave his final words to his son Kai as thus:When the emperor knew Hao Zhao would not recover, he was so saddened that he lost appetite and ordered certain higher officials to reduce meals. Yi protested that for the emperor to worry about Hao Zhao, who was from a lower origin, to such a degree was beyond the rituals suggested.(( ). Brief History of Wei.)See also*of people of the Three KingdomsNotesReferencesPrimary source:*Huan. History of Wei*Shou. of Three Kingdoms, Chapter 3, Biography of Emperor Ming.*Chen Shou. Records of Three Kingdoms, Chapter 9, Biography of Zhen.ZhaoZhaoko:Zhaoja:Zhaozh:
3506942
Office_of_Surface_Mining,_Reclamation,_and_Enforcement
#redirect of Surface Mining
3509794
Tunnel_and_Reservoir_Plan
The Tunnel and Reservoir Plan (abbreviated TARP and more commonly known as the Deep Tunnel Project or the Chicago Deep Tunnel) is a large engineering project that aims to reduce flooding in the metropolitan Chicago area, and to reduce the harmful effects of flushing raw sewage into Michigan by diverting storm water and sewage into temporary holding reservoirs.  The megaproject is one of the largest engineering projects ever undertaken in terms of scope, cost and timeframe.  Commissioned in the mid-1970s, the project is managed by the Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago.  Completion of the system is not anticipated until 2029,() but substantial portions of the system have already opened and are currently operational. Across 30 years of construction, over $3 billion has been spent on the project.()History1800sThe Deep Tunnel Project is the latest in a series of civil engineering projects dating back to 1834. Many of the problems experienced by the city of Chicago are directly related to its topography and the fact that the city is largely built upon a marsh. Michigan was ineffective in carrying sewage away from the city, and in the event of a rainstorm, the water pumps that provided drinking water to Chicagoans became contaminated with sewage. Though no epidemics were caused by this system (see 1885 cholera epidemic myth), it soon became clear that the sewage system needed to be diverted to flow away from Lake Michigan in order to handle an increasing populations sanitation needs.Begun in 1836, and completed in 1848, the and Michigan Canal was built, diverting some sewage water from the Chicago River. In 1900, to improve general health standards, the flow of the main branch of the Chicago River was reversed to drain water from Michigan, as opposed to having the river flow into Lake Michigan. This further improved the sanitation of Lake Michigan, and helped to prevent further cholera epidemics.1900sThe construction of the and Ship Canal (18921900), enlargements to the Shore Channel (19071910), the construction of the Channel (19111922) and the construction of locks at the mouth of the Chicago River (19331938) brought further improvements to the sanitary issues of the time. These projects blocked further amounts of sewage from draining into Lake Michigan. The projects also brought fresh lake water to inland waterways to further dilute sewage that was already in the waterways.Surrounding farmland also engaged in flood control projects. The Farm Drainage Act of 1879 established districts. These districts were generally named for the basin they drainedfor example, the Fox River Drainage District. After War II, suburban communities began to realize the benefits of separating stormwater from sewage water and began to construct separate sewer and storm drainage lines.  The primary benefit of wastestream separation is that storm water requires less treatment than sewage before being returned to the environment.Flood damage grew markedly after 1938, when surrounding drainage areas were lost to development and human activity. Serious flooding has occurred in the Chicago metropolitan area in the years 1849, 1855, 1885, 1938, 1952, 1954, 1957, 1961, 1973, 1979, 1986, 1987, 1996, 2007 and 2008but most record-setting crests have been set after 1948.In the 1960s, the concept of Deep Tunnel was studied and recommended as a solution to continuing flooding issues. The Deep Tunnel system would be built as a network of 109.4 miles (176 km) of tunnels of varying width.Current statusAs of October 2005, substantial drilling and blasting for the underground tunnels was complete. Reservoirs are scheduled to become operational and hold and process sewage, notably in McCook (2013 and 2019) and Thornton (2014). Currently, water travels to the Thornton Transitional Reservoir, which will be abandoned in 2014. Water is also stored and held in the tunnels themselves while sewage treatment plants release treated water into the Calumet and Des Plaines Rivers.Mining work was completed on the Little Calumet leg of the Deep Tunnel System, and final connections were scheduled for completion on March 1, 2006. The Little Calumet leg is  in length. Operation of the Little Calumet leg will mark the total completion of all  of tunnel included under Phase I of the TARP project, and the culmination of 30 years of tunnel construction.EffectsSevere weather events as recent as the early 1990s have forced water management agencies to pump excess wastewater into the lake and river in order to prevent flooding.  These incidents have been reduced as more of the Deep Tunnel system has become operational.  Long considered an open sewer, the Chicago River now hosts more than 50 species of fish and increased wildlife along its shores. Riverfront property has begun to be classified more as an asset than a liability, and substantial development is occurring along many portions. Canoeing is once again allowed on the waterway, but swimming is still prohibited due to high pollution levels.On October 3, 1986, a heavy thunderstorm drenched the southern portion of the Deep Tunnel area with several inches of rain in a short period of time. While the Deep Tunnel system performed satisfactorily by absorbing excess water, water within the system itself rushed past the north side of Chicago and near the Bah Temple in Wilmette. Geysers of over  were reported in both locations for up to an hour as the water was redistributed more evenly through the system. A  geyser erupted downtown at the corner of Jefferson and Monroe.() A system of watertight bulkheads has since been installed to prevent the event from occurring again.During the Flood of 1992, the water from the River that leaked into the then-forgotten underground freight tunnel system was eventually drained into the Deep Tunnel network, which itself was still under construction.Sources* Horan, D. (2005). Deep Tunnel, Deep Ties. Chicago Tribune, March 14, 2005. Retrieved December 23, 2005.* American Underground Associations Featured Project. American Underground Construction Association, August 1999. Retrieved December 23, 2005.* Deep Tunnel Project. City of South Holland Website. Retrieved December 23, 2005.* Schmidt, E. (2004). Chicagos Tunnel, Reservoir Plan. McGraw-Hill Construction, August 2004. Retrieved December 23, 2005.* Tunnel and Reservoir Plan (TARP). The Metropolitan Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago, August 6, 1999. Retrieved December 23, 2005.* Jones, S. and Waller, J. (2004). Chicago Public Library - Down the Drain. Chicago Public Library website, August 2004. Retrieved December 23, 2005.ReferencesExternal links* Set of photos of the Morrison Knudsen segment of the tunnel* Metropolitan Water Reclamation District of Greater Chicago* Video of TARP on YouTube* Video of TARP on YouTube* Article and Map in the Encyclopedia of Chicago
3516494
Shakhtyorsk
dateMay 2010Shakhtyorsk (; , Tro) is a town in District of Oblast, Russia, located on the western coast of Sakhalin Island,  north-west of Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk.  Population: HistoryThe town was founded after 1905 as Tro, in the region then known as the Prefecture of Japan.  After the Soviet Union gained control over the southern part of Sakhalin Island in August 1945, the town became part of Oblast.It was granted town status and given its present name in 1947.  The name derives from the Russian word Shakhtyor for miner, referring to the coal production in the surrounding area.Economy and infrastructureThe towns economy relies mainly on black coal mining, which supports a power station.Referencesar:az:axtyorsk,  de:Schachtjorskfa:fr:Chakhtiorskit:achtrskarz:ja:no:Sjakhtjorsk( )tl:Shakhtyorskwar:Shakhtyorskdiq:Shakhtyorskzh:
3520190
P._K._van_der_Byl
 footnotes           Pieter Kenyon Fleming-Voltelyn van der Byl, ID (11 November 1923 &ndash; 15 November 1999) was a African-born Rhodesian politician who served as the countrys Minister from 1974 to 1979 as a member of the Front. A close associate of Prime Minister Smith, van der Byl opposed attempts to compromise with the British authorities and domestic opposition on the issue of majority rule throughout most his time in government. However, in the late 1970s he supported the moves which led to majority rule and internationally recognised independence for Zimbabwe. After a high-flying international education, van der Byl moved to the colony of Rhodesia in 1950 to manage family farms. He went into politics in the early 1960s through his involvement with farming trade bodies, and became a government minister responsible for propaganda. One of the leading agitators for the Declaration of Independence, van der Byl was afterwards responsible for introducing press censorship. He was unsuccessful in his attempt to persuade international opinion to recognise Rhodesia as a new nation, but was popular among the members of his own party.Promoted to the cabinet in 1968, van der Byl became a spokesman for the Rhodesian government and crafted a public image as a die-hard supporter of continued white minority rule. In 1974 he was made Minister of Foreign Affairs and Defence at a time when Rhodesias one ally, South Africa, was supplying military aid. His extreme views and brusque manner made him a surprising choice for a diplomat (a Times profile in November 1976 described him as a man calculated to give offence(David Spanier, Rhodesias Foreign Minister a man calculated to give offence, The Times, Thursday 4 November 1976, page 7)). After offending the South African government, van der Byl was removed from the Defence Ministry.In the late 1970s van der Byl was willing to endorse the Smith governments negotiations with moderate African nationalist leaders and rejected attempts by international missions to broker an agreement. He served in the internal settlement government in 1979. After the creation of Zimbabwe, van der Byl remained involved in politics and close to Ian Smith, and he loudly attacked former Smith supporters who had gone over to support Mugabe. He retired to South Africa when the Mugabe government abolished seats reserved for whites in Parliament.Family and early lifeVan der Byl was born in Town, Cape, Africa, the son of Pieter Voltelyn Graeme van der Byl, a member of Smuts South African cabinet during the Second World War, and wife Joy Fleming. Like his father, van der Byl was educated at the College in Rondebosch(Rhodesian Personalities: Pieter Kenyon Fleming-Voltelyn van der Byl) but his studies were interrupted by war in 1941.(van der Vat, Pieter van der Byl: Rich, white aristocrat behind Rhodesias bid to stop black rule (obituary), Guardian, November 30, 1999, p. 22) He served with the South African Army during the Second World War( and was briefly attached to the British 7th Queens Own Hussars;( he saw active service in the Middle East, Italy and Austria. After being demobilised, van der Byl studied law at College, Cambridge(List of Members of Cambridge University) where his aristocratic manner stood out. P. K. was always elegantly dressed and coiffured, and acquired the nickname the Piccadilly Dutchman. He obtained a Third-class degree in his Part II Law examinations in 1947,(Historical Register of Cambridge University, supplement 19411950 (Cambridge University Press, 1952), p. 208) and went on from Cambridge to study at the University Graduate School of Business Administration from 1947 to 1948 (although he did not obtain a degree at the latter).(Harvard Alumni Directory 1986, p. 1256. Van der Byl is counted in the Class of 1949.) He also studied at the of Witwatersrand in South Africa.(Rhodesians at war: The main players)One of the most conspicuous features of van der Byl was his manner of speech: although his ancestry was Cape Dutch and his early life was in Cape Town, South Africa, he had what were described (by the pro-Rhodesian Chris Whitehead) as what he thought was an aristocratic English nasal drawl and imperial English mannerisms.(PK, Chris Whitehead Rhodesian personalities) Whitehead was of the opinion that van der Byl had adopted this accent, in common with others who heard him.(See, e.g., Hills, Rebel People, George Allen and Unwin, 1978, page 204: Van der Byl has a flow of mannered phrases which he delivers in a flawed Guards officer accent. This Rhodesian newspaper cartoon shows another reaction.) This personal characteristic was intensely irritating to many people including South African government ministers, but van der Byls aristocratic mannerisms appeared uncontentious to many Rhodesian whites. They believed that his nasal drawl was the product of his time as an officer in the Hussars and his Cambridge education: William Higham described him as a popular Minister of Defence who, despite his British upper crust accent &ndash; undoubtedly honed during his swashbuckling career as an officer in the hussars  hailed from a noble Cape family.(William Higham Players)Move to RhodesiaVan der Byl moved to Rhodesia in 1950 in order to manage some of his familys tobacco farming interests, hoping to make his own fortune.( He welcomed the move as it allowed him to indulge his hobby of game hunting: in that year in Angola he set a world record for the biggest elephant shot, a record which stood for many years.(Pieter van der Byl (obituary), The Times, January 10, 2000, p. 19)In 1957 van der Byl was made a Director of the United Dominions Corporation (Rhodesia) Ltd, having already become an active member of the Rhodesia Tobacco Association. In 1956, he was elected by the members of the SelousGadzema district to represent them on the Tobacco Association council. He was also Deputy Chair of the Selous Farmers Association in 1957. His first involvement in government was in 1960 when the Rhodesia Tobacco Association made him one of their representatives on the National Native Labour Commission, on which he served for two years. In 1961, he also represented the Rhodesia Tobacco Association on the council of the Rhodesian National Farmers Union.(Whos Who of Southern Africa 1971, Rhodesia, Central and East Africa Section, Combined Publishers (Pty.) Ltd, Johannesburg 1971, p. 1286154) He was recognised as a leading spokesman for Rhodesian tobacco farmers.(Dominion Party politician Field had also led the Rhodesia Tobacco Association, and van der Byl agreed with him on politics in general. He joined the Front when it was set up under Fields leadership. At the 1962 general election, van der Byl was elected comfortably to the Rhodesia House of Assembly for the Hartley constituency, a rural area to the south-west of Salisbury.(Source Book of Parliamentary Elections and Referenda in Southern Rhodesia 18981962 ed. by F.M.G. Willson (Department of Government, University College of Rhodesia and Nyasaland, Salisbury, 1963), p. 197)Political careerMinisterial officeIn 1963, Field appointed van der Byl as a junior government whip,( and on 16 March 1964 he was made Parliamentary Secretary to the Ministry of Justice with responsibility for the Information Service.(Holders of Administrative and Ministerial Office 18941964 and Members of the Legislative Council 18991923 and the Legislative Assembly 19241964 by F.M.G. Willson and G.C. Passmore, University College of Rhodesia and Nyasaland, 1965.) Although the van der Byl family were identified as strongly Liberal in South African politics, he became identified with the right wing of the party and helped to depose Field from the premiership in early April 1964, when Field failed to persuade the British government to grant Southern Rhodesia its independence. The new Prime Minister, Smith, appointed him Deputy Minister for Information.( At this time, van der Byls chief adviser was a South African called Ivor Benson, who strongly believed in an international communist conspiracy which was plotting to overthrow white rule in Rhodesia.(Robert Blake, A History of Rhodesia, Eyre Methuen, 1977, p. 367)Speaking in the Legislative Assembly on 12 August 1964 he attacked proposals for greater independence for broadcasters by referring to what he perceived to be the social effect in Britain::To suggest that the BBC, forming opinion in the minds of the people of England, has been an influence for good in any way, when you consider the criminality of large areas of London; when you consider the and Rockers, and all those other things; when you consider the total moral underminings which have been taking place in England, much to all our distress, in the last fifteen to twenty years, the Hon. Member can hardly bring that up as an argument in favour of the freedom of broadcasting.(Southern Rhodesia Legislative Assembly Hansard, August 12, 1964, col. 694)By the end of 1964, van der Byl and his Ministry had control of broadcasting in Rhodesia.( Speaking in Parliament he described the aims of his Department as not merely to disseminate information from an interesting point of view but to play its part in fighting the propaganda battle on behalf of the country. He defined propaganda as simply the propagation of the faith and the belief in any particular ideology or thing, and also stated that the Department would seek the resuscitation of the determination of the European to survive and fight for his rights.(Southern Rhodesia Legislative Assembly Hansard, July 27, 1965, col. 1418)1965 electionIn May 1965 the Rhodesian Front government went to the country in a general election with van der Byl one of the leading campaigners. Discussion of unilaterally declaring independence had already begun. Van der Byl argued that only a small fraction of Rhodesian business opposed it; however, his campaign speeches typically included an argument against business involvement in politics. He cited Johannesburg mining interests support for the Progressive Party in South Africa, big business support for the Nazi Party in Germany, and the Bolshevik revolution in Russia being financed by United States big business.(Larry W. Bowman, Politics in Rhodesia: White Power in an African State, Harvard University Press, 1973, p. 80, citing Rhodesia Herald, April 30, 1965 and May 5, 1965)The Rhodesian Front won a landslide victory, winning every single one of the 50 constituencies which had predominantly European voters. At the Rhodesian Front Congress of August 1965, party members strongly attacked the press for failing to support the government. A demand for it to be made compulsory for all political articles to be signed by the author met with van der Byls approval.(Rhodesia: The Road to Rebellion by James Barber (Oxford University Press, 1967), p. 283)UDIWithin the government van der Byl was one of the loudest voices urging Ian Smith to proceed to a Declaration of Independence. He angrily denounced the threat of sanctions from Britain, saying on 4 May 1965 that economic destruction of Rhodesia would mean total economic destruction of Zambia, formerly Northern Rhodesia. This statement was interpreted as a military threat by David Butler, the Leader of the Opposition.(New warning by Smith on independence, The Times, Wednesday May 5, 1965, p. 9) He was charged with the task of selling the UDI project both to Rhodesian whites and to world opinion. In September 1965 it was announced that he would tour the United Kingdom to promote Rhodesian independence. According to Steel, he claimed then that France and the United States would lead the international recognition of the UDI government.(David Steel, I told you so from the start, The Times, Thursday March 6, 1980, p. 16) He was appointed as Deputy Minister of Information on 22 October(Rhodesia Government Gazette, vol. 43 (1965)) and as such van der Byl was present but did not sign the Unilateral Declaration of Independence Document on 11 November 1965.right|thumb|The signing of the Unilateral Declaration of Independence. Van der Byl appears, obscured, in a light-coloured suit at the top right of the picture.Van der Byl was greeted by a speech strongly critical of the Rhodesian government from the of Canterbury, Ramsey, who supported the use of armed force to bring the Rhodesians in line with United Kingdom policy on decolonization. He responded by comparing the speech to the tragic connivance at the destruction of Czechoslovakia in exchange for the useless appeasement at Munich in 1938.(Speech deplored by Minister, The Times, Thursday October 28, 1965, p. 12) Van der Byls response used the phrase kith and kin to refer to the ethnic links between the white Rhodesians and the people of the United Kingdom, by then. He saw no contradiction between signing a letter declaring constant loyalty to the Queen and declaring independence a few days later;( the Rhodesian Government was careful at the time of UDI to state its continued loyalty to the British Crown, although it later declared a Republic.Despite his belief in propaganda, van der Byl was outraged when the BBC subsequently set up a radio station at Francistown in Botswana which broadcast for 27 months criticising UDI and urging the Rhodesians to revoke it. He was later to claim the station was inciting violence,(Letter from P.K. van der Byl to The Times published on Wednesday, January 25, 1978, p. 17) although this was denied by those who had been regular listeners.(Letter from H.C. Norwood to The Times published on Monday, February 20, 1978, p. 15) On 26 January 1966, two months after the declaration of independence, van der Byl was willing to be quoted saying that Rhodesian Army troops would follow a scorched earth policy should the United Kingdom send in troops, comparing their position to that of the Red Army when Nazi forces invaded the Union in 1941. He was highly critical of Wilson, describing him as a highly dangerous, uninformed and conceited little man.(Scorched Earth in Rhodesia if Britain sends troops, The Times, Thursday, January 27, 1966, p. 10)CensorshipInternally, his policy was enforced through Ministry control of TV and radio and through censorship of newspapers. From 31 December 1965, the Ministry of Information expanded its brief and was renamed the Ministry of Information, Immigration and Tourism, which meant that it was also responsible for deciding whether to grant or revoke permits to visit Rhodesia. Several foreign journalists were expelled: John Worrall, correspondent for Guardian, went in January 1969. The Rhodesia Herald, then in opposition to both the Rhodesian Front and UDI, frequently appeared with large white spaces on its news pages where censored stories had been placed. Stories and editorials personally critical of van der Byl were immediately removed. Censorship was tightened still further on 8 February 1966 when it was made illegal to indicate where material had been removed. The censor was also given the power to alter existing material or to move it around the newspaper. Dr Palley, the lone white opposition MP, described the powers as censorship gone mad, and insisted that there would no longer be any guarantee that anything published in the newspapers was authentic. Van der Byl responded by saying that the new measures were a reflection on the newspapers which had made such powers necessary.(Drastic powers for the Rhodesian Censor, The Times, Wednesday, February 9, 1966, p. 10) In 1967 van der Byl was reported by Malcolm Smith, the former editor of the Herald, as remarking that a high degree of self-censorship was required, and support for the government was essential.(Malcolm Smith, How censorship has affected the Rhodesian press, The Times, Tuesday, November 7, 1967, p. 11)The Herald (and the Bulawayo Chronicle) defied the restrictions, boldly printing blank spaces which identified removed material. Van der Byl personally visited the newspaper offices on the day the new regulations came in to warn the staff that if the paper was printed as proposed, they would publish at your peril. However the papers continued to appear with identifiable censorship in defiance of the government, and in 1968 the regulations were scrapped.DeportationShortly after UDI, 46 academics working at University College, a racially non-segregated institution, in Rhodesia wrote to Times in London, denouncing the move. Officers of the British South Africa Police visited many of those who had signed to search their houses. Shortly afterwards, the residence permit of one of the academics came up for renewal, which would normally be automatic. In fact, it was revoked and the academic was deported. Van der Byl was the responsible minister and all but admitted that the reason was his opposition to UDI.(Christopher Hill, The crisis facing Rhodesias non-racial university, The Times, Monday, August 8, 1966, p. 9)Van der Byls strategy seemed to work at home, with many Rhodesians remaining unaware until the end just how much was their countrys vulnerability and isolation. The Times was later to describe him as a skilled propagandist who believed his own propaganda.( When sanctions on Rhodesia were confirmed in January 1967, van der Byl compared their situation with Spain following World War II, saying that the isolation of Spain had not stopped it from becoming one of the most advanced and economically successful countries in Europe. However, the reality of the situation must have been brought home to van der Byl in April 1966 when he made informal approaches to see if he might visit Britain for social reasons during a tour of Europe. The Commonwealth Relations Office replied that he would not be recognised as enjoying any form of recognition or immunity.(Rebuff to a Rhodesian Minister, The Times, Tuesday, May 3, 1966, p. 1) Other European governments refused to recognise his passport and expelled him from the country.(Hansard, December 5, 1966, vol. 737, col. 1065)Wider role in politicsOn 13 September 1968 he was promoted to be the full Minister of Information, Immigration and Tourism. Van der Byls aristocratic background, military experience and academic credentials combined to give him an almost iconic status within the Rhodesian Front. Many were impressed by his exploits as a big-game hunter, which began when he shot his first lion in a garden in Northern Rhodesia at the age of 15.( He was also known to be a of the arts in public and a womaniser in private. Many in the Rhodesian Front believed him to be a 19th century-style connoisseur, a man of culture and an aristocrat-statesman in the words of Michael Hartnack, a South African journalist.(Michael Hartnack, White seal, Black messiah, Dispatch online, Tuesday, November 6, 2001) Hartnack went on to observe Poseurs are an incipient hazard in any unsophisticated society. Within the somewhat claustrophobic confines of white Rhodesian society outside the RF, van der Byl was achieving some degree of respect.In politics he assumed the position of hard-line opponent of any form of compromise with domestic opponents or the international community. He made little secret of his willingness to succeed Ian Smith as Prime Minister if Smith showed even the least whiff of surrender, and did his best to discourage attempts to get the Rhodesians to compromise. When Muzorewa had his passport withdrawn in September 1972 after returning from a successful visit to London, the government did not attempt to counter the rumour that it action was taken following van der Byls personal order.(Bishop Muzorewa has his passport taken away, The Times, Monday, September 11, 1972, p. 5)In April 1972 van der Byl sparked a row over the agreement which Rhodesia and the United Kingdom had made in November 1971. Under this agreement, Rhodesia had agreed to certain concessions to African nationalism in return for the prospect of recognition of its independence; however, implementation of the agreement was to be delayed until the Commission reported on whether the settlement proposals would be approved by the people of Rhodesia. Van der Byl insisted that Rhodesia would not implement any part of the agreement unless Rhodesias independence was first acknowledged, regardless of the answer from the Pearce Commission. When the Pearce Commission reported that the European population of Rhodesia were in support but the African population were opposed, the agreement was ditched. Many outside and inside Rhodesia had hoped that the government would implement some of the agreement even if Pearce reported against it.(Tougher Rhodesian line on settlement proposals, The Times, Monday, April 10, 1972, p. 5)His derision of working class British Labour politicians also caused problems. When, in January 1966, three visiting Labour MPs were manhandled, kicked and punched while attempting to address 400 supporters of the Rhodesian Front, van der Byl blamed the three for refusing an offer from his Ministry to coordinate the visit, and pointed out that they were breaking the law which required government permission for any political meeting of more than 12 people.(British M.P.s manhandled by Mr. Smiths supporters, The Times, Thursday, January 13, 1966, p. 10. See also BBC News online On this day.)The propaganda circulated by his Ministry (typically including references to happy, smiling natives) was considered laughable. Visiting British journalist Worsthorne, who knew van der Byl socially, reported seeing a copy of Kampf on his coffee table.(Interview for Centre for Contemporary British History witness seminars) His propaganda strategy became increasingly unsuccessful abroad, where van der Byl alienated many of the foreign journalists and politicians that he came into contact with. Hastings, then reporting for the Standard, described him as appalling and said that he and Smith would have seemed ludicrous figures, had they not possessed the power of life and death over millions of people; van der Byl had him deported.(Max Hastings, Going to the Wars, Macmillan, 2000, p. 186, 189) While still popular with the Rhodesian Front members, he was criticised at the 1972 Party Congress for his lack of success in improving Rhodesias image around the world; however, he retained the confidence of Ian Smith and was kept on in a government reshuffle on 24 May 1973. That winter saw him promote a new Broadcasting Bill to transfer control of the monopoly Rhodesian Broadcasting Corporation. Savory, then the lone white opposition MP, criticised the Bill for the composition of the proposed board, which was dominated by strong supporters of the Rhodesian Front. Van der Byl insisted, somewhat unsuccessfully to foreign observers, that the government was not trying to take over broadcasting.(Sect members accused of evading conscription, The Times, Thursday, December 6, 1973, p. 7)Minister of DefenceVan der Byl was appointed Minister of Foreign Affairs and Defence on 2 August 1974. These were two distinct portfolios, the first of which (Foreign Affairs) did not amount to much in a state which lacked any form of international recognition. The Defence portfolio, at a time when Rhodesia was drifting into civil war, was an important post; although his previous political experience had been largely in the area of public relations, he was now charged with responsibilities which were central to the survival of Rhodesia.  He promoted aggressive measures against the insurgents, and in so doing, he also sought to raise his own political profile. Clad in immaculately tailored battledress, he would fly by helicopter to a beleaguered army outpost; wearing dark glasses and sporting a swagger stick, he would then deliver a rousing speech for the benefit of the troops and the TV cameras  before returning to Salisbury in time for dinner. He drew heavily on Churchills oratory style for some of his inspiring speeches.((OurStory posting :account of a PK tour of inspection, 1974) As Minister of Defence, van der Byl was known to join army counter-insurgency operations while armed with a hunting rifle (with the words Id like to bag one of these chaps ...), and would regularly visit army positions and entertain the troops with his own generous supply of scotch whisky and fine wines. Such behaviour endeared him to many in Rhodesia: he was far more popular with the troops than his predecessor as Minister of Defence, Howman. However, this popularity did not extend to senior members of the South African and Rhodesian governments.Rhodesias strategic position underwent a fundamental change in June 1975 when the Portuguese government suddenly withdrew from Mozambique which bordered Rhodesia on the east. Mozambique now came under the control of a Soviet-allied government which was supportive of black nationalist forces in both South Africa and Rhodesia. This created a delicate situation since Rhodesias main road and rail links to the outside world were via the Mozambican ports of Beira and Maputo. Initially, the new Mozambican government allowed the Rhodesians continued use of these links. This was so even while ZANU guerrillas were allowed to base themselves in Tete province adjoining north eastern Rhodesia.  There were rumours in February 1976 that Soviet tanks were being unloaded in Mozambique to help in the war. Unluckily for van der Byl, the British Foreign Office minister was Ennals, one of those who had received rough treatment in 1966. Ennals announced that in the event of a racial war breaking out in Rhodesia, there would be no British help. Van der Byl responded by claiming this indicated Britain accepting Rhodesias independence.(Rhodesia says any Soviet interference would be naked aggression, The Times, Tuesday, February 17, 1976, p. 6) He attacked Abel Muzorewa for supporting President Machel, saying that being a good churchman and a Bishop there is a very strong possibility he might be a communist.(Nicholas Ashford, Rhodesia admits 1,000 guerillas are operating inside border, The Times, Saturday, March 6, 1976, p. 4)Following the example of Mozambique, the Zambian and Botswana governments permitted guerrillas to establish bases from which they could threaten and infiltrate Rhodesia. Van der Byl told a newspaper reporter that this had to be expected.(Michael Knipe, Rebels open third front against Rhodesia, The Times, Friday, June 11, 1976, p. 7) As infiltration grew, he declared at the beginning of July that the Rhodesian Army would not hesitate to bomb and destroy villages that harboured guerillas.(Michael Knipe, Smith Cabinet rejects plan to open white farm areas to blacks, The Times, Saturday, July 3, 1976. Page 5)In 1975 and 1976, the South African government conducted delicate negotiations with neighbouring states: the South Africans wanted to encourage those states to maintain economic relations with South Africa and Rhodesia while limiting the activities of the ANC, ZANU and ZAPU. However, increasingly aggressive actions by the Rhodesian army outside its own borders resulted in the failure of this conciliatory approach.A cross-border army raid inside Mozambique in August 1976 (dubbed the Nyadzonya Raid) killed over 1,000 people, with van der Byl insisting that the government had irrefutable proof that the raid had targeted a guerrilla training camp. He was unwilling to disclose the nature of the proof.(Michael Knipe, Rhodesians ask UN to investigate camp raid, The Times, Wednesday, August 25, 1976. Page 1) The raid produced a high body count and a major haul of intelligence and captured arms. But many of the people killed appeared to be camp followers or innocent civilians. International opinion generally condemned the raid as a massacre.(Nyadzonya Raid Youtube) Although cross-border raids into Mozambique had been approved by the Rhodesian cabinet, the depth and severity of the August incursion was greater than had been intended. Van der Byl had sanctioned the incursion largely on his own initiative. Although a tactical success, the incursion caused a final break with Zambia and Mozambique. The South African government was greatly displeased that its earlier diplomatic efforts were compromised and made this clear to Ian Smith. Smith appeared to consider this the final straw as far as van der Byls defence portfolio was concerned.(The Past is Another Country, Martin Meredith, p280)Foreign affairsVan der Byl took over at a time when South Africa was putting increasing pressure on the Rhodesians to make an agreement on majority rule. In March 1975, he had to fly urgently to Cape Town to explain why the Rhodesian government had detained Rev. Sithole of the African National Union, who was improbably accused of plotting to murder his colleagues.  The South Africans were extremely displeased with this action and suspected that the real reason was that the Rhodesians objected to Sithole and preferred to negotiate with Nkomo.(Michael Knipe, Sithole arrest linked with death list, The Times, Friday, March 7, 1975, p. 8) Van der Byl was unsuccessful in reassuring the South Africans and Ian Smith was forced to follow him.thumb|Victoria Falls Bridge where the August 1975 negotiations took placeGradually the South Africans grew unwilling to help Rhodesia. The remaining 200 South African policemen transferred to help in the guerilla war were removed suddenly in August 1975, a move which appeared to precede even more disengagement. Van der Byl responded in a speech on 8 August which asserted that The terrorists who are trained and equipped outside our border and who invade our country with the willing help of other governments are here for a much wider purpose than the overthrow of Rhodesia. They are here to represent a force which sees Rhodesia as just one more stepping stone to victory over South Africa because they see South Africa as a vital key to the security of America, Europe and the rest of the western world.(Relations under strain at Pretoria meeting, The Times, Saturday, August 9, 1975, p. 1)When the Rhodesian government held talks with the African National Council on the railway bridge across the Falls in August 1975 (the train in which the talks took place was strategically in the middle of the bridge so that the ANC were in Zambia while the Rhodesians remained in Rhodesia), van der Byl was not a member of the Rhodesian delegation. This was a curious omission given his position. He did however participate in talks with Joshua Nkomo that December.Van der Byls habit of referring to the African population as munts (he asserted that Rhodesia is able to handle the munts(Chilly reception awaits Rhodesian leader after television remark, The Times, Monday, October 20, 1975, p. 4)) led to extreme unpopularity with the South African government, and he did not attend talks with South African Prime Minister Vorster in October 1975. This was interpreted as being connected to a personal dislike. When, on 26 August 1976, the South African government announced the withdrawal of all its military helicopter crews from Rhodesia, van der Byl was outspoken in his criticism and Vorster was reported to have refused to have anything to do with that dreadful man van der Byl.( Smith decided that he clearly ... had no option(The Great Betrayal: The Memoirs of Ian Douglas Smith (Blake, 1997), p. 197) and on 9 September 1976 executed a sudden cabinet reshuffle that ended van der Byls tenure as Defence Minister. Smith claimed the South African dislike of van der Byl was partly motivated by the memory of his father, who had been in opposition to the National Party.(The Memoirs of Ian Douglas Smith, op cit)Contribution to diplomacyAs the prominence of the issue of Rhodesia increased in the late 1970s, attention on van der Byl increased. Reporters noted his impressively quotable lines at press conferences (such as his explanation for why the Rhodesian government did not usually give the names of guerrillas which it had hanged: Its an academic question, because they are normally dead(). While negotiating with the Patriotic Front put together by ZANU and ZAPU at the Rhodesia conference in November 1976, he described ZANU leader Robert Mugabe as this bloodthirsty Marxist puppet and the Patriotic Front proposals as almost a parody, a music hall caricature of communist invective.(Alan McGregor, Black majority in new Rhodesia Cabinet is sought in Geneva, The Times, Wednesday, December 1, 1976, p. 8) At this conference, which was jointly organized by the United Kingdom and United States, van der Byl rejected the idea of an interim British presence in Rhodesia during a transition to majority rule, which was identified as one of the few ways of persuading the Patriotic Front to endorse a settlement.(British presence idea rebuffed by Mr Smith, The Times, Saturday, December 4, 1976, p. 4) Ultimately, on 7 January 1977 he announced the rejection of any agreement that the conference might come to.(Rhodesia rejects all proposals, The Times, Saturday, January 8, 1977, p. 1)Later that month, van der Byl was finding pressure put on him by more moderate voices within Rhodesia and hinted that the government might amend the Land Tenure Act which restricted the amount of land which Africans could own. He also remarked that Bishop Abel Muzorewa can be said to represent the African in this country,(Michael Knipe, Mr Richard warns Salisbury not to reject peace plan, The Times, Friday, January 21, 1977, p. 6) which indicated the direction in which the Smith government was hoping to travel: an accommodation with moderate voices within Rhodesia was likely to be a better end than a capitulation to the Patriotic Front. Van der Byl was prepared to support this strategy and did not go along with the 12 Rhodesian Front MPs who formed the Action Party in early 1977 claiming that the Front had not adhered to party principles.Although van der Byl was now prepared to say that he supported the transition to majority rule, he was quick to put restrictions on it when interviewed in April 1977. He insisted that majority rule would only be possible on a very qualified franchise--thats what the whole thing is about, and also said that any settlement must be endorsed by a two-thirds majority of the existing Legislative Assembly (which was largely elected by white Rhodesians).(Michael Knipe, Mr Van der Byl demands guerrillas scale down war before Rhodesia settlement, The Times, Monday, April 25, 1977, p. 5) Over the summer of 1977 he continued to warn that insistence on capitulation to the Patriotic Front would produce a white backlash and put negotiations back.(Warning of white backlash, The Times, Wednesday, June 29, 1977, p. 6)However, the Rhodesian government was forced to put its internal settlement negotiations on hold during a joint US-UK initiative in late 1977. Van der Byls public comments seemed to be aimed at ensuring this mission did not succeed, as he insisted that it had no chance of negotiating a ceasefire, described the Carter administration as mindless, and the joint mission as being Anglo-American-Russian.(Nicholas Ashford, Rhodesian doubts on Carver mission, The Times, Wednesday, November 2, 1977; p. 8) When a plan was published, he described it as totally outrageous and involving the imposition of unconditional surrender on an undefeated people who are not enemies.(Lord Carver denies he was given brush off by leaders in Africa, The Times, Friday, November 11, 1977, p. 8)Internal settlementThe mission did fail and the internal settlement talks were resurrected, resulting in a deal on 4 March 1978. A transitional joint Council of Ministers was set up, with van der Byl having to work with Dr Elliott Gabellah as his co-Minister of Foreign Affairs. The Patriotic Front took no notice of this accord and the guerrilla war continued; Richard Cecil, a close family friend working as a photo-journalist, was killed by guerrillas on 20 April 1978(Rory Peck Trust :list of journalists killed in war) after van der Byl had ensured he had full access to military areas denied to other reporters.(Lord Richard Cecil (obituary), The Times, Saturday, April 22, 1978, p. 16)In May van der Byl greeted news of massacres in Zaire as a blessing in disguise because they might ensure that warnings about Soviet penetration in Africa were heeded.(Kolwezi a blessing in disguise, The Times, Monday, May 29, 1978, p. 5) He denounced the British government the following month for refusing to recognise that a massacre of Elim missionaries was perpetrated by the Patriotic Front.(Frederick Cleary, Call from Salisbury for Owen explanation, The Times, Wednesday, June 28, 1978, p. 8) As the date for the full implementation of the internal settlement grew nearer, van der Byls profile decreased, but he remained active in politics: he was elected unopposed for the whites-only Gatooma/Hartley seat to the Zimbabwe-Rhodesia House of Assembly. He handed over power to his African successor on 1 June 1979, and became instead Minister of Transport and Power and Minister of Posts in the new government.Lancaster HouseWhen the wheels came off the wagon (as he put it)( at Lancaster House in 1979, van der Byl greeted the event with amused detachment. He was not a member of any delegation at the conference and did not attend. The weekend after the agreement, he called on the Rhodesian Front to revitalise itself as the only true representative of Europeans in Rhodesia,(Nicholas Ashford, Future looks doubtful for Smith party, The Times, Saturday, November 17, 1979, p. 5) and he ascribed the result of the conference to a succession of perfidious British governments.(David Spanier, Ceasefire accord sought this week, The Times, Monday, November 19, 1979, p. 5) According to Ian Smiths memoirs, van der Byl organised a meeting between Ian Smith and Lieutenant-General Walls, Commander of the Rhodesian Army, shortly before the first Zimbabwean elections in February 1980, where they agreed a strategy to prevent Robert Mugabe winning.(The Memoirs of Ian Douglas Smith, op cit, p. 336) They met again on 26 February the day before polling began in the Common Roll election. The consensus at this meeting was that Abel Muzorewas interim government would win enough seats, when put together with the 20 seats reserved for whites which were all Rhodesian Front, to deny Mugabe victory. However, the early election results in March dented this confidence.Smith asked Walls for details of his plan (Operation Quartz)(Operation Quartz - Rhodesia 1980) for using force to prevent ZANU-PF taking power by force if it lost the election. Walls insisted that ZANU-PF would not win the election. When it did happen, both Smith and van der Byl believed that the Army should step in to prevent Mugabe taking over. Walls took the view that it was already too late, and while the others wished for some move, they were forced to concede to this view.(In ZimbabweVan der Byl had been elected unopposed to the new House of Assembly for Gatooma/Hartley and remained a close associate of Smith, becoming Vice President of the Republican Front (later renamed the Alliance of Zimbabwe). At the 1985 general election the boundaries for the White Roll seats were altered and van der Byl fought in Mount Pleasant, opposing Chris Andersen.(Jan Raath, Time stands still for Smith as whites face up to reality, The Times, Thursday, June 27, 1985, p. 5) Andersen had broken with the Rhodesian Front to sit as an Independent and became Minister of State for the Public Service in Robert Mugabes government. Van der Byl lost the election heavily,(Jan Raath, Smith wins battle in Bulawayo, The Times, Friday, June 28, 1985, p. 5) polling only 544 votes to 1,017 for Andersen and 466 for a third candidate. The Conservative Alliance of Zimbabwe still controlled the election of ten white Senators and Smith agreed to elect van der Byl to one of the Senate seats.Parliamentary seats reserved for whites were abolished in 1987. Van der Byl made his last speech in Parliament on 10 September, in which he praised Robert Mugabe for the absolute courtesy he had shown since independence. He noted that he was the last surviving member of the 1965 government remaining in Parliament, and declared he hoped I would have been cherished .. as a sort of national monument, and not flung into the political wilderness. His speech loudly denounced the former Republican Front and Conservative Alliance of Zimbabwe members who had gone over to the government, describing them as dreadful souls screaming in agony. The government minister Dr Zvobgo responded with a poorly-written poem referring to the number of rebels killed fighting troops under van der Byls command.(Jan Raath, Zimbabwe prize-fighters don kid gloves, The Times, Saturday, September 12, 1987, p. 7)Marriage, issue and retirementVan der Byl was married on 31 August 1979 to HSH Charlotte Maria Benedikte Eleonore Adelheid et omnes sancti Prinzessin von und zu Liechtenstein, a woman thirty years his junior.(www.thepeerage.com, accessed March 20, 2006) The couple had three sons: Pieter Vincenz (born 31 December 1980); Valerian (born 7 July 1982); and Casimir (born 27 July 1990).In 1983 van der Byl had inherited from his mother a property described as the magnificent estate .. near Caledon in the Western Cape, and following the end of his political career had no need to keep a home in Zimbabwe. He left as a rich man, with an attractive young wife, and enjoyed his retirement. He frequently visited London where he was a good friend of Viscount Cranborne, who put him up for membership of the Turf Club.(Paul Vallely and John Rentoul, A Lordly plot to save their place, Independent, December 4, 1996, p. 16) Both were members of Club and were often seen there when van der Byl was in town.(Pinochet revisited, Standard, January 18, 1999. Page 13)Four days after his 76th birthday, van der Byl died at Fairfield, in Western Cape. In his obituary,( van der Vat wrote The arrival of majority rule in South Africa made no difference, and he died a very wealthy man.ReferencesExternal links* Princely House of Liechtenstein
3528344
Soulless_(Angel)
Soulless is episode 11 of season 4 in the television show Angel. Written by Craft and Sarah Fain and directed by actor Astin, it was originally broadcast on February 5, 2003 on the WB network.  In Soulless, Angels soul has been locked away in an office safe so that his ego Angelus can be interrogated about the Beast. After taunting Wesley, Gunn, and Fred about their faults and revealing damaging secrets he, as Angel, knew, Cordelia strikes a deal with Angelus so that he will share information about the Beast.PlotAt the Hotel, the gang carefully put Angels contained soul away in the safe, discussing the great risk they all face in dealing with Angelus. Meanwhile, an unchained Angelus sits alone in the basement cage. Wesley cautiously approaches the cage and starts up a discussion with Angelus. Angelus plays games with Wesley, avoiding the important information about The Beast in favor of taunting Wesley about his romantic interest in Fred while the rest of the gang watch the conversation from the lobby via video feed. Angelus continues to be difficult, raising issues of Wesleys failure with Faith and Connor. Connor returns to receive strange looks in the aftermath of Angeluss news, but misinterprets the looks as everyone thinking hes still connected to the Beast.Gunn and Fred bring Angelus a glass of blood and Angelus happily takes advantage of the opportunity to taunt the couple about the sounds Angel could hear coming from Freds room at night. Fred pushes a cart towards the cage and Angelus takes the glass, but also shoves the cart into Fred and grabs her when she falls towards the cage. Gunn moves in to rescue Fred, but its Wesley who shoots Angelus with tranquilizer darts, freeing Fred and knocking Angelus out cold. In Wesleys office, Fred thanks him for saving her, but the conversation takes a turn for the romantic as Wesley kisses Fred. Gunn walks in and, after realizing what just happened between them, he gets furious. The two men begin to fight until Gunn accidentally hits Fred when she tries to stop them. Angelus is pleased with the discord he has created.Connor approaches Angelus, who tells Connor that his mother Darla and his adoptive father Holtz were eager to get away from Connor. Connor calmly replies that he knows that Angelus is his real father. Angelus thinks he can take advantage of this and encourages Connor to approach, but Cordelia interrupts and sends Connor away. She then turns off the video camera and offers herself in exchange for all of Angeluss information on the Beast. Angelus is reluctant to take her offer, but later Cordelia informs the gang that Angelus is willing to talk, although she refuses to tell them what she did to get Angelus to talk. Wesley goes downstairs and begins to ask questions. Angelus explains that in 1789, the Beast tried to bribe Angelus into helping him kill three priestesses who were attempting to banish the Beast. Angelus refused to help, and then the priestesses appeared and banished the Beast. Gunn finds that the women live nearby. Wesley, Cordelia and Connor find the priestesses and their families have already been murdered by the Beast. After seeing a Daddys Birthday reminder on the familys calendar, Connor runs outside to be sick. Cordelia chases after him and she tries to talk to him, but some vampires interrupt the moment, sending the gang into battle mode. Connor disposes of one and Wesley gets the car for them to escape in. They return to the hotel and everyone realizes that without useful information from Angelus, they need to turn him back into Angel. Cordelia goes downstairs and, despite Angeluss enthusiasm to have her, Cordelia tells him the deal is off since they didnt get to save the world and that theyre putting his soul back. Angelus doesnt seem too worried about that, as hes confident hell get to see the apocalypse come to life. Cordelia returns to the office only to find bad news: the container holding Angels soul is gone.ProductionSoulless was the directorial debut of actor Astin, who played Gamgee in Jacksons The Lord of the Rings. After Astin told writer/director and close friend Petrie about his fervent desire to be directing episodic television, he shadowed producers Greenwalt and Minear for several weeks to get a feel for the series before he was given this episode to direct. Television sort of mandates that you keep moving, Astin says, but you dont want to stop. Angelus has so many layers and so many different shades and qualities, you want to keep exploring them and mining them and pulling them out. Its such a rich, meaty character for him to do. Hes good at evil. Its a little creepy.()Cultural referencesAngelus refers to the Ancient Greek tragedy Rex when he tells Connor, I mean, when you think about it, the first woman you boned is the closest thing youve ever had to a mother. Doing your mom and trying to kill your dad. There should be a play. He also refers to Fred and Gunn as Othello and Desdemona, and the line Bodies, bodies everywhere, and not a drop to drink, is a reference to a similar line in Rime of the Ancient Mariner.  Angeluss reference to the foul rag-and-bone shop of the heart comes from the Butler Yeats poem The Circus Animals Desertion, and that animalistic element is also present in his choice of music in his cage at the beginning, The Teddy Bears Picnic, a song which, later in the lyric, promises good things to the good, but also speaks of watching them (the bears) and catch them unawares.ReferencesExternal links* * me
3534965
Gordon_R._Parker
Gordon R. Parker is a executive notable for leading the Gold Fields unit of Toronto-based Iamgold corporation.() He was chairman of Mining Corporation()() which was a firm involved with exploring, acquiring, and managing gold metals. Parker is a director at corporations including Caterpillar; Fields Limited and Dodge Corporation. Mr. Parker has been a director of Caterpillar since 1995. In 1988, when Parker was chairman and chief executive officer of Newmont Corporation, he was 52 years old.()References
3539981
Fireproofing
Image:Fireproofing.jpg|thumb|250px|Spray gypsum based plaster fireproofing being installed.Image:Promat signum tray cladding 1.jpg|thumb|right|integrity fireproofing of trays, using silicate boards.Fireproofing, a fire protection measure, refers to the act of making materials or structures more resistant to fire, or to those materials themselves, or the act of applying such materials. Applying a certification listed fireproofing system to certain structures allows these to have a rating. The term fireproof does not necessarily mean that an item cannot ever burn: It relates to measured performance under specific conditions of testing and evaluation.  Fireproofing does not allow treated items to be entirely unaffected by any fire, as conventional materials are not immune to the effects of fire at a sufficient intensity and/or duration.Markets* Commercial construction* Residential construction* Industrial construction* Marine (ships)* construction* Aerodynamics* Tunnel concrete walls and ceilings or linings* Under and above ground mining operationsApplications* steel to keep below critical temperature ca. 540 C* Electrical circuits to keep critical electrical circuits below 140 C so they stay operational* petroleum gas containers to prevent a BLEVE (boiling liquid expanding vapour explosion)* Vessel skirts and pipe bridges in an refinery or plant to keep the steel below critical temperature ca. 540* Concrete linings of traffic tunnelsHistoryAsbestos was one material historically used for fireproofing, either on its own, or together with binders such as cement, either in sprayed form or in pressed sheets, or as additives to a variety of materials and products, including fabrics for protective clothing and building materials. Because the material has proven to cause cancer in the long run, a large removal and replacement business has been established.Endothermic materials have also been used to a large extent and are still in use today, such as gypsum, concrete and other cementitious products. More highly evolved versions of these are used in aerodynamics, ballistic missiles (ICBMs) and re-entry vehicles, such as the shuttles.The use of these older materials has been standardised in old systems, such as those listed in BS476, DIN4102 and the Building Code of Canada.Alternative fireproofing methodsAmong the conventional materials, purpose-designed spray fireproofing plasters have become abundantly available the world over. The inorganic methods include:* Gypsum plasters* Cementitious plasters* Fibrous plastersThe industry considers gypsum-based plasters to be cementitious, even though these contain no cement, or calcium alumina cement. Cementitious plasters that contain Portland cement have been traditionally lightened by the use of inorganic lightweight aggregates, such as vermiculite and perlite.Gypsum plasters have been lightened by using chemical additives to create bubbles that displace solids, thus reducing the bulk density. Also, lightweight polystyrene beads have been mixed into the plasters at the factory in an effort to reduce the density, which generally results in a more effective insulation at a lower cost. The resulting plaster has qualified to the A2 combustibility rating as per DIN4102. Fibrous plasters, containing either wool, or ceramic fibres tend to simply entrain more air, thus displacing the heavy fibres. On-site cost reduction efforts, at times purposely contravening the requirements of the listing, can further enhance such displacement of solids. This has resulted in architects specifying the use of on-site testing of proper densities to ensure the products installed meet the certification listings employed for each installed configuration, because excessively light inorganic fireproofing does not provide adequate protection and are thus in violation of the listings.File:Unitherm2.jpg|thumb|250px|Intumescent spray fireproofing product has expanded.Proprietary boards and sheets, made of gypsum, silicate, vermiculite, perlite, mechanically bonded composite boards made of punched sheet-metal and cellulose reinforced concrete have all been used to clad items for increased fire-resistance.FraudThe following examples of fraud are preventable when documentation is required and checked to ensure that all installed configurations fall within the tolerances of active certification listings.* Entraining too much air in inorganic systems, thus reducing densities, saves on materials and labour.* Spraying inorganic spray fireproofing materials over through-penetrations and building joints that should be firestopped, not fireproofed. This practice negates fire-separation integrity. Firestops must precede spray fireproofing.thumb|300px|Firestopped through-penetrations of structural beams. The installation is incomplete, as the beams are not yet treated with fireproofing. If left as-is, they will collapse, resulting in openings in the fire separation wall.*Substitution of intumescent and/or endothermic fireproofing coatings with less expensive paints that physically resemble the fire protection products, sometimes involving re-use of packaging and de-canting of contents.*The American and Canadian nuclear industries have, historically, not insisted on and approval use and compliance, on the basis of the use of accredited certification laboratories. This has allowed the use of Thermo-Lag 330-1, for which the basis of testing has been proven to be faulty, resulting in millions of dollars of remedial work. The Thermo-Lag scandal came to light as a result of disclosures by American whistleblower W. Brown, who reported the deficiencies in testing to the Regulatory Commission. Presently, certification of fireproofing and firestopping remains optional for systems installed in power plants both in Canada and the States.Work stagingSpray fireproofing products have not been qualified to the thousands of firestop configurations, so they cannot be installed in conformance of a certification listing. Therefore, firestopping must precede fireproofing. Both need one another. If the structural steel is left without fireproofing, it can damage fire barriers and a building can collapse. If the barriers are not firestopped properly, fire and smoke can spread from one compartment to another.Traffic tunnel fireproofingTraffic tunnels may be traversed by vehicles carrying flammable goods, such as petrol, petroleum gas and other hydrocarbons, which are known to cause a very rapid temperature rise and high ultimate temperatures in case of a fire (see the hydrocarbon curves in rating). Where hydrocarbon transports are permitted in tunnel construction and operations, accidental fires may occur, resulting in the need for fireproofing of traffic tunnels with concrete linings. Traffic tunnels are not ordinarily equipped with fire suppression means, such as sprinkler systems. It is very difficult to control hydrocarbon fires by fire protection means, and it is expensive to equip an entire tunnel along its whole length for the eventuality of a hydrocarbon fire or a BLEVE.Concrete exposed to hydrocarbon firesConcrete, by itself, cannot withstand hydrocarbon fires. In the tunnel that connects Kingdom and France, an intense fire broke out and reduced the concrete lining in the undersea tunnel down to about 50 mm. In ordinary building fires, concrete typically achieves excellent fire-resistance ratings, unless it is too wet, which can cause it to crack and explode. For unprotected concrete, the sudden endothermic reaction of the hydrates and unbound humidity inside the concrete causes such pressure as to spall off the concrete, which then winds up in small pieces on the floor of the tunnel. This is the reason why laboratories insert humidity probes into all concrete slabs that undergo fire testing even in accordance with the less severe building elements curve (DIN4102, ASTM E119, BS476, or ULC-S101). The need for fireproofing was demonstrated, among other protection measures, in the European Eureka Fire Tunnel Research Project, which resulted in building codes for the trade to avoid the effects of such fires upon traffic tunnels. Cementitious spray fireproofing must be certification listed and applied in the field as per that listing, using a hydrocarbon fire test curve such as the one that is also used in UL1709.(http://ulstandardsinfonet.ul.com/scopes/1709.html)Fireproof VaultsThe traditional method for constructing fireproof vaults to protect important paper documents has been to use concrete or masonry blocks as the primary building material. In the event of a fire, the chemically bound water within the concrete or masonry blocks will be forced into the vault chamber as steam. The steam will soak the paper documents to keep them from burning. This steam will also help keep the temperature inside the vault chamber below the critical 350-degree Fahrenheit (176.7-degrees Celsius) threshold, which is the point at which information on paper documents is destroyed. The paper can later be remediated with a freeze drying process, if the fire is extinguished before internal temperatures exceed 350-degrees F.  An alternate less expensive and time-consuming process is using dry insulating material.This traditional vault construction method is sufficient for paper documents, but the steam generated by concrete/masonry structures will destroy contents that are more sensitive to heat and moisture. For example, information on microfilm is destroyed at 150-degrees F. (65.5-degrees C. a.k.a. Class 150) and magnetic media (such as data tapes) lose data above 125-degrees F. (51.7-degrees C. a.k.a. Class 125). Fireproof vaults built to meet the more stringent Class 125 requirement are called data-rated vaults.All components of fireproof vaults must meet the fire protection rating of the vault itself, including  doors, HVAC penetrations and cable penetrations(National Fire Protection Association 232 Protection of Records)See also* Asbestos* Fire* protection* fire protection* Compartmentalisation* rating* and approval use and compliance* W. Brown* Plaster* tray* certification* integrity* Firestop* Intumescent* Endothermic* silicate* Hydrates* Construction* tunnel* petroleum gas* BLEVEReferencesExternal links* NFPA Standardsfr:Ignifugationanyagokapija:uk:
3545693
Bougainville__Our_Island_Our_Fight
Bougainville  Our Island Our Fight is a 1998 film. It was produced and directed by Coles-Janess.The film focuses on an indigenous people who fight against a multinational mining company and government forces. The guerrillas hold the belief that they are fighting to defend their independence and the local environment on the island of Bougainville. This film is notable for its unique subject matter, as most Western media has not reported upon the Bougainville conflict.SynopsisThe Island of Bougainville is located in the Solomon Islands, but is politically considered a territory of New Guinea. For the last ten years the people of this Island have fought a guerrilla war with salvaged and recovered War II weaponry against government forces supplied with more modern equipment. The government has instituted a complete economic blockade of the island in addition to an extended campaign of aerial bombardment and violence against its civilian population.Bougainville - Our Island, Our Fight depicts the world of Bougainville residents as they leave their traditional coastal society to take refuge from a dangerous military conflict. An explanation of the conflicts causes reveals that the installation of an open cut mine at Panguna had initially offered promise of economic prosperity for the region. Bougainville residents eventually determined that the mine project entailed significant ecological damage and social exploitation. Through interviews staged above the now-derelict mine, Bougainvillians speak about their initial recognition of the consequences of this mine, the poisoning of their water supply and the degradation of farmlands and jungle habitat. Later scenes show the difficulties which Bougainville residents face due to the naval blockade of their island. The blockade prevents them from receiving medical and humanitarian aid, leading to declining health and appearance of leprosy (though some supplies are smuggled from the Islands).The film violated the Papua New Guinea government blockade. It was made at great personal risk to its director, Coles-Janess who had to be smuggled onto and off the island. It includes the first and only television interview with the BRA President Ona and the defecting Papua New Guinea officer, BRA General Sam Kouna.In the many international film festivals in which it has featured, it has provoked a strong response amongst audiences as diverse as Turkey, the States, Brazil, and Tunisia It has also been used as a resource by International, the Nations, the Army and the Parliament.Festivals and awardsAwards List* Winner Gold Award- The 32nd Houston International Film Festival-USA* Winner Gold Documentary- The Flagstaff International Film Festival- USA* Winner Best Achievement in a Video Production - St. Kilda Film Festival- AUSTRALIA* Winner Golden Plaque, Video documentary- The Chicago International Film Festival-USA* Winner Best Documentary- The Bathurst Film Festival- AUSTRALIA* Winner Best Documentary- New York Independent Film and Video Festival-USA* Winner Peoples Choice- The Best of Bathurst 98- AUSTRALIA* Official Selection - Taiwan International Documentary Festival- TAIWAN* Official Selection - Elektrozine Ibiza 99-SPAIN* Official Selection - Antalya Golden Orange International Film Festival- TURKEY* Selected Wild Spaces- The Sydney International Environmental Film Festival- AUSTRALIA* Official Selection - The Hawaiian 19th International Film Festival-USAFestival List* Banff Television Festival-CANADA* Official Selection - South Pacific Peoples Foundation- CANADA* Official Selection - Festival Internacional De Cinema-BRAZIL* The Rhode Island International Film festival-USA* International Film Festival-TANZANIA* Festival International Du Film de Kelibia-TUNISIA* The 10th One World Film Festival- CANADA* John Hopkins Film Festival-USA* The Kansas City Film Festival-USAPress Coverage* A powerful film about the ongoing civil war.The Bulletin - Tom Gilling* Wayne Coles-Janess takes the viewers into the world of the Bougainville Revolutionary Army.The Sydney Morning Herald - David Jenkins* a powerful image of a war,The Canberra Times - Karen Hobson* Eye opening doco,The Herald Sun - Sydney* Wayne Coles-Janess has produced a telling exposeThe Courier Mail Brisbane* Watch this documentary for disturbing cultural, political and personal perspectivesAriel MagazineSee also* the Shadow of the Palms* the Border of Hopetown* at the End of the Rainbow* Coconut Revolution* Coles-JanessExternal links* ipso-facto Productions* In The Shadow of the Palms* * MySpace - FactoTV* MySpace - In The Shadow of The Palms* Artists Without Frontiers* Media rights
3550079
Blas_Mara_de_la_Garza_Falcn
Image:Falcon.JPG|thumb|right|The Friendship Monument. Garza Falcon in Christi, Texas.Blas Mara de la Garza Falcn (or Blas Mara Villarreal de la Garza Falcn; 1712&ndash;1767) was a Spanish settler of Tamaulipas and Texas. Biography Capt. Blas Mara Villarreal de la Garza Falcn, colonizer of South Texas and Tamaulipas and the first settler of County, Texas, was born in Real de las Salinas, Len, Mexico, in 1712 to Gen. Blas de la Garza Falcn, twice governor of Coahuila, and de Villarreal. His five brothers and six sisters spent their childhood at the hacienda Pesquera Chica near Monterrey. He probably received his education in Monterrey. By 1734 he was a captain at Presidio de San Gregorio de Cerralvo in Nuevo Len. On January 4, 1731, Garza Falcn married Catarina Gmez de Castro, daughter of Capt. Antonio Gmez de Castro and Nicolasa Baes de Trevio, at the mining town of Boca de Leones, present-day Villaldama, Nuevo Len. One daughter, Mara Gertrudis de la Garza Falcn, and two sons, Juan Jos and Jos Antonio de la Garza Falcn, were born to this marriage. After the death of Catarina, Garza Falcn married Josefa de los Santos Coy, daughter of Nicols de los Santos Coy, alcalde of Cerralvo, and Ana Mara Guerra. No children were born to this marriage.In 1747 Jos de Escandn, colonizer of Nuevo Santander, chose Garza Falcn to explore the south bank of the Grande. Garza Falcn led a contingent of fifty men from the presidio of Cerralvo to the mouth of the river. Escandns plan, as implemented by Garza Falcn, was to establish seven settlements along the river-Revilla, Camargo, Mier, Dolores, Reynosa, Laredo, and Vedoya. On March 5, 1749, Garza Falcn arranged for forty families from Nuevo Len to settle at Camargo on the banks of the Rio Grande. He founded the villa of Camargo, a presidio for the military squadron, and a mission, San Agustn de Laredo, for the Indians. Escandn named him captain and chief justice of Camargo, the first settlement founded on the Rio Grande. In 1752 Garza Falcn established a ranch, Carnestolendas, now the site of Grande City, Texas, on the north side of the river.After two unsuccessful attempts to settle and colonize land near the Nueces River, Escandn gave the assignment to Garza Falcn. By 1766 Garza Falcn had established a ranching outpost named Santa Petronila five leagues from the Nueces River in what is now Nueces County, Texas. He took his family and employees there and started a ranching enterprise that served as a camp for the Spanish soldiers from Presidio Nuestra Seora de Loreto who explored the vicinity while patrolling in 1767. The ranch, eight miles east of the Nueces River, served as an outpost and way station.In 1767 Garza Falcn returned to Camargo, where he died and was buried in his private chapel, Nuestra Seora de Guadalupe. After his death the land grants were distributed to the settlers; his family received land extending from the Rio Grande to the Nueces River in South Texas.(TSHA Online - Texas State Historical Association)References
3558023
Emanuel_Weiss
Image:Louis Capone and Emanuel Weiss.jpg|right|250px|thumb|Smiling convicted killers Emanuel Weiss  and Louis Capone (left), surrounded by detectives, ride the York Central railroad up the river to the Sing prison death house on December 3, 1941, the day after receiving their sentences.Emanuel Mandy Weiss (June 11, 1906 &ndash; March 4, 1944) was a New York crime figure who was involved in trafficking and worked for the criminal organization known as Inc. during the 1930s and up to the time of his arrest in 1941. He used several fake names like Hoffman and Kline.Starting as an enforcer for the labor rackets run by Louis Lepke Buchalter, Weiss rose to become one of the organizations most dependable hired assassins, taking part in a number of high-profile contract killings for the Crime Syndicate. One of his best-known murders occurred on October 23, 1935. That night, he and another hired killer, Charlie the Bug Workman, walked into the Palace Chophouse in New Jersey, and fatally shot mob boss Schultz and three of Schultzs associates. Immediately after the shootings, Weiss, fearing the imminent arrival of police, fled the scene and jumped into the waiting getaway car. He ordered their getaway driver, Piggy Schechter, to drive off without Workman, who was still finishing off Schultz in the restaurants restroom. As a result of his being left behind, Workman was forced to travel back to New York alone, on foot.The next day, Workman filed a complaint to the board of Murder, Inc. that he had been abandoned by Weiss and Piggy at the murder scene, an offense punishable by death. Weiss defended himself by arguing that Workman had returned to the mens room not for the purpose of making sure the job had been completed (as Workman claimed), but simply for the purpose  of stealing Schultzs money and other belongings. Therefore, argued Weiss, the job was already done and Workman had chosen to remain at the scene strictly for selfish personal reasons, thereby jeopardizing their escape and increasing their risk of capture. The board decided it had to make an example of somebody, and that Piggy was more expendable than Weiss. Despite his protestations that he was only following Weisss orders, the hapless Piggy was tortured and killed by the mob, while Weiss escaped punishment. See Ron Ross, Bummy Davis vs. Murder, Inc.: The Rise and Fall of the Jewish Mafia and an Ill-Fated Prizefighter, pp. 16470 (New York: St. Martins, 2003) Another of Weisss most notorious hits occurred September 13, 1936 when he, along with Ferraco and Harry Pittsburgh Phil Strauss, murdered Brownsville, Brooklyn candy store owner Joseph Rosen. Buchalter had ordered the murder in order to prevent Rosen, whom Buchalter had earlier forced out of the garment trucking business, from making good on a threat to expose Buchalter and his rackets to prosecutor E. Dewey. Previously unpublished crime scene photos of the Rosen candy store murder appear in a book titled New York City Gangland.(www.NYCGangland.com) This crime eventually proved to be the undoing of Buchalter, Weiss, and Capone, a Buchalter lieutenant who helped to set up and carry out the murder.  The Rosen murder went unsolved for nearly four years. Since the police knew of no connections between Rosen and the mob, and, moreover, knew of no enemies Rosen may have had, police had no leads at first. Police finally learned of the mob link to the slaying in 1940, when Abe Kid Twist Reles, a fellow Murder, Inc. enforcer, turned informant for Brooklyn district attorney ODwyer. Reles implicated Weiss and  colleagues in this murder and helped police clear up numerous other unsolved murders as mob hits. Fleeing to Kansas City, Weiss posed as a mining company executive but was eventually arrested and returned to New York, where he was formally charged with Rosens murder. In late 1941, Buchalter, Weiss and Capone stood trial by jury, in the Brooklyn courtroom of Judge Taylor, for the first-degree murder of Rosen. The information provided by Reles and other mob turncoats, such as Allie Tick-Tock Tannenbaum and Max Rubin, resulted in a guilty verdict and sentence of death for each of the three defendants. On Saturday night, March 4, 1944, Weiss, Capone and Buchalter died in the chair at Sing for the Rosen murder. Weisss last words before his execution were: Im here on a framed-up case, and Governor Dewey knows it. Give my love to my family, and everything.Emanuel Weiss was put to death at Sing Sing on Saturday, March 4, 1944. Weiss was portrayed by Bernard in the movie Inc.Buried at Mount Hebron Cemetery, Flushing NYSee also* of individuals executed in New York* punishment in the United StatesReferencesExternal links* The Last Days of Lepke Buchalter by Allan May* Emanuel Mendy Weiss at Find-A-GraveWeiss
3565656
Johnsons_Shut-Ins_State_Park
Johnsons Shut-Ins State Park is a Missouri state park on the East Fork Black River consisting of  in Reynolds County.  The park is jointly administered with adjoining Sauk Mountain State Park, and together the two parks cover  in the Francois Mountains region of the Missouri Ozarks.The term shut-in refers to a place where the rivers breadth is limited by hard rock that is resistant to erosion.  In these shut-ins the river cascades in many rivulets over and around igneous rocks worn smooth over many eons.  It is used by park visitors as a natural park when the water is not so high as to be dangerous.GeologyOne and a half billion years ago, hot ash and gases spewed into the air, then cooled, forming rock. Later, shallow seas covered the rock, depositing rock. The area was uplifted and erosion exposed the rock. Waters of the East Fork Black River became confined, or shut-in, to a narrow channel. Water-borne sand and gravel cut deeply even into this erosion-resistant rock, carving potholes, chutes and canyon-like gorges.History and descriptionthumb|left|The Johnson family cemetery is on the grounds of the parkMost of the park, including the shut-ins and two miles of river frontage, was assembled over the course of 17 years and donated to the state in 1955 by Joseph Desloge (18891971), a St. Louis civic leader and conservationist from a prominent lead mining family. The family has continued over the years to donate funds for park improvements.A one-fourth mile walkway takes visitors to an observation deck overlooking the shut-ins. Camping, hiking and swimming are popular pastimes, with rock climbing allowed by permit from Sept. 2 through the Thursday before Memorial Day weekend. Basic and electric campsites are available, along with a park store. All campsites are reservable. Total capacity in the day-use area is 100 vehicles. Pets are not allowed in the park.An extension to the park provides an auto tour that passes by the ongoing recovery effort, as well as the recovered endangered fens area, terminating at a shaded overlook of the flood path accessible from the park entrance. From this one can walk a path through the boulder field created by the flood. The boulder field contains many examples of the minerals and rocks that make up the Francois Mountains of Ozarks.A popular section of the Ozark trail crosses the park.DisastersIn late 2005 the park was devastated by a catastrophic flood caused by the failure of the Sauk pumped storage plant reservoir atop a neighboring mountain.  Part of the damage was the eradication of the parks campground, but being a weeknight in December, the campground was unoccupied; the only people at the park were the parks superintendent and his family; the family survived, sustaining some injuries.  The park was closed because of the extent of the damage it received.The park partly reopened in the summer of 2006 for limited day use, but due to dangerous conditions, swimming in the river and exploring the rock formations was prohibited.  In 2009 the river and shut-ins were reopened for recreation in the water.  A new campground is expected to open April 30, 2010.()  Park restoration and improvements are funded with $52 million of a $180 million settlement to the state from AmerenUE, the owner and operator of the failed reservoir.()Some areas of forest in the park and the surrounding region were severely damaged by the May 2009 derecho windstorm.  Straight-line wind speeds in this part of Reynolds County reached 60 to 70 mi/h (97 to 113 km/h) with microbursts estimated up to 100 mi/h (161 km/h).()Notes and references External links * Johnsons Shut-Ins State Park
3571894
Siege_of_Paris_(885886)
The Siege of Paris of 885 to 886 was a Viking siege of Paris, then capital of the kingdom of the West Franks.  It was, in hindsight, the most important event of the reign of the Emperor the Fat and a turning point in the fortunes of the Carolingian dynasty and the history of France.  The siege is the subject of an eyewitness account in the poem Bella Parisiacae urbis of Cernuus. BackgroundThe Vikings (especially the Danes in the Isles and other Norsemen in continental Europe), were the primary menace affecting European rulers in the late ninth century, the middle of the Age.  They had carved out a Danelaw in England and were the ruling Rus from Ladoga and Novgorod.  Their depredations had come as far as the Mediterranean, they harassed Christian and Muslim alike, in the coastal plains and navigable rivers of France, Spain, and Italy.  The worst hit areas in the vast Empire were in the Countries and the adjacent regions in Gaul and Germania, areas where many navigable rivers offered access. In 845, the Vikings rowed up the Seine and attacked Paris.  This they did again thrice more in the 860s, each time leaving only when the acquisition of loot or bribes was acceptable to them. In 864, by the of Pistres, bridges were ordered built across the Seine at not only Ptres, but Paris, where two were built: one on each side of the de la Cit. These would serve admirably in the siege of 885. The chief ruler in the region around Paris (the le-de-France) was the duke of Francia (also count of Paris), who controlled the lands between the Seine and Loire.  Originally this was the Strong, margrave of Neustria and dominicus for the Valley.  He began fortifying the ancient capital and fought the Norsemen continuously until his death in battle against them at Brissarthe.  His son, Odo, succeeded him and continued the fortification of Paris.Meanwhile, West Francia (the kernel of modern France) suffered under a series of short-reigning kings until Charles the Fat, already of Germany and Italy, became king.  Hopes were raised with this reunification of Charlemagnes empire, but a year after Charles succession (884), the Vikings launched the most massive attack on Paris yet again.The SiegeSigfred, leader of the Danes, had demanded a bribe from Charles, but had been refused.  He promptly led 700 ships up the Seine carrying more than 30,000 men, a number which is highly questionable. Even an army of one tenth of this strength would have been exceptionally large, compared to the average strength of contemporary armies.  Paris at this time was a town on an island.  Its strategic importance came from the ability to block ships passage with its two low-lying foot bridges, one of wood and one of stone.  Not even the shallow Viking ships could pass Paris because of the bridges.  Odo prepared for the arrival of the Vikings by fortifying the bridgehead with two towers guarding each bridge. He was low on men, having no more than 200 men-at-arms available to him.  He did have the aid of his brother, Robert, two counts, a marquis, and Joscelin, abbot of Saint-Germain-des-Prs.  The Vikings arrived on 25 November 885 and began by asking for tribute.  This denied, they settled in for a siege.  On 26 November, the Danes attacked the northeast tower with ballistae, mangonels, and catapults peppering the tower with arrows and stones.  They were repulsed by a mixture of hot wax and pitch, however.  That day, all Viking attacks were repulsed and during the night, the Parisians constructed another storey on the tower.On 27 November, the Viking attack included mining, rams, and fire this time, but to no avail.  On this day, the Abbot Joscelin valiantly entered the thick of the fray with a bow and an axe.  He planted a cross on the outer defences and exhorted the people, his flock.  His brother, Ebles, too, joined the fighting.  For two months, the Vikings dug in, making trenches and provisioning themselves off the land.  In January 886, they tried to fill the river shallows with debris, plant matter, and dead animal and human (executed prisoner) bodies so as to get around the tower with their infantry, but no success met them, again.   This they continued for the next two days, but on the third day they set three ships alight and guided them towards the wooden bridge.  The burning ships sank before they could set the bridge on fire, but the wooden construction was nonetheless weakened.  On 6 February, rains caused the river (filled with debris from the Viking attempts of weeks earlier) to overflow and the bridge supports gave way.  The bridge gone, the northeast tower was now isolated with only twelve defenders inside.  The Vikings asked the twelve to surrender, but they refused, and were all subsequently killed.The Vikings left a force behind, but mostly went ahead, beyond Paris, to pillage Mans and Chartres.  At this time, Odo successfully slipped some men through Norse lines to go to Italy and plead with Charles to come to their aid.  Count of Saxony, Charles chief man in Germany, marched to Paris.  The besieged then sallied forth and took many supplies.  The morale of the besiegers was low and Sigfred asked for sixty pounds of silver.  He left the siege in April.  Rollo, the other leader, and his men stayed behind.In May, disease began to spread in the Parisian ranks and Joscelin, the great morale-booster and fighting churchman, died.  Odo himself then slipped through Viking-controlled territory to petition Charles for support: Charles consented.  Odo fought his way back into Paris.  Charles and Henry of Saxony marched northward.  Sadly for the besieged, Henry died en route.  In summer, the Danes made a final attempt to take the city, but were repulsed.  The huge imperial army arrived in October and scattered the Vikings.  Charles encircled Rollo and his army and set up a camp at Montmartre.  However, Charles had no intention of fighting.  He sent the defenders down the Seine to ravage Burgundy, which was in revolt.  When the Vikings withdrew from France next spring, he gave them 700 pounds of silver as promised.AftermathThe Parisians and Odo refused to let the Vikings down the Seine, and the invaders had to drag their boats overland to the Marne. When Charles died in 888, the French elected Odo as their king. Odos brother was later elected king as well. Throughout the next century the Robertians, descendants of Robert the Strong, fought the Carolingians for the French throne. Their duchy (France) gave its name to the kingdom (later France) and the Carolingian Empire was never again reassembled.Further reading** (885-886)Pariz (885-886)von Paris (885886)de Pars (885 d.C. a 886 d.C.)de Paris (885-887)di Parigi (885-886)  (885-886)Parya przez Wikingw (885886)av Paris 885-886
3578185
Waikaka_Branch
The Waikaka Branch was a line railway of the South Line that ran through agricultural and gold-mining country in Southland, Zealand.  It was constructed in 1907 and 1908, and was operated by the Zealand Railways Department until its closure in 1962.ConstructionThe Waikaka Branch was the last of the minor branches of northern Southland to be authorised,(Geoffrey B. Churchman and Tony Hurst, The Railways of New Zealand: A Journey Through History (Auckland: HarperCollins, 1991), 213.) though proposals had existed for decades beforehand.  Poor transportation access was causing farm values to depreciate while wagoning costs were prohibitive, and settlers petitioned the government for a railway line to improve their economic prospects.  The town of Kelso had already been linked to the Dunedin-Invercargill portion of the Main South Line at Waipahi by the Branch, but a prominent proposal supported another link, this time from Kelso via the Waikaka Valley to Gore on the Main South Line.  In 1878, this line was approved by the government and an official survey of the route was anticipated in early 1880,(Mataura, Otago Witness 1474 (14 February 1880): 10.) but governmental inaction meant that the proposal lapsed and by 1886, residents of the Waikaka Valley had lost hope that a railway would be built.(Kelso, Otago Witness 1816 (10 September 1886): 16.)  The prospect of a railway was not seriously revived until 1897 when a community financing initiative in the Island was approved to construct a line from Paeroa to Waihi (later part of the Coast Main Trunk Railway).(David Leitch and Brian Scott, Exploring New Zealands Ghost Railways, revised edition (Wellington: Grantham House, 1998 1995), 109.)  Pressure paid off in 1904 when a branch line to the village of Waikaka was included in the governments Railways Authorisation Act, but official procrastination meant construction did not commence.  The through line from Gore to Kelso still had support; in February 1905, Southland business interests urged the government to begin construction of the Gore-Kelso line and to link the Tapanui Branch with the Branch, as trade that they felt should rightfully benefit Southland was instead benefitting Otago due to superior railway access to Dunedin.(Southland Railways, Otago Witness 2658 (22 February 1905): 15.)  No significant action was taken to achieve this proposal, but later in 1905, a company was established by local residents to advance half the construction costs of the approved branch to the government, and this led to the passage of the Waikaka Branch Railway Act.(  When the promised money eventuated, construction of the line commenced on 18 April 1907, with the first sod turned by the Acting Prime Minister, Ward.(Gore - Waikaka Railway, Hawera and Normanby Star 53(9318) April 1907: 7.)  The branch left the Main South Line just east of Gore at a locality called McNab.  Locals under supervision rather than contractors or engineers built the line twenty-one kilometres up the valley to Waikaka, and it was completed in late 1908.  On 26 November 1908, the line was handed over to the Railways Department and the official opening was held the following day.(StationsThe following stations were on the Waikaka Branch (in brackets is the distance from the junction in McNab):(New Zealand Railway and Tramway Atlas, fourth edition, edited by John Yonge (Essex: Quail Map Company, 1993), 29.)*Howe (2.54 km) - also called Howes.*Willowbank (7.16 km)*Maitland (11.79 km)*Fleming (14.83 km)*Pullar (16.6 km)*Waikaka (20.82 km) - a small locomotive depot was located at the station.OperationThe branch was a typical New Zealand rural branch servicing farms.  No towns or major industries existed at any point along the line.  Branches such as this were useful to open up internal New Zealand to commercial farming, and the Waikaka Branch provided local farmers with invaluable access to markets before the development of modern road transportation.  A daily service carrying both passengers and freight, known as a train, operated from the terminus to Gore and return.(  The valley of the branch directly paralleled the Pomahaka Valley that was followed by the Branch, and they were sufficiently close that locomotive crews on one branch claimed that they could see the smoke from the locomotive of a train in the other valley.(On 9 February 1931, regular passenger services were cancelled due to poor patronage and the locomotive depot in Waikaka was closed in an attempt to improve the branchs finances as it had been losing money for a few years.  These measures temporarily improved its prospects and trains operated from Gore to Waikaka and return, but by 1950, although revenue had doubled, so had expenses.  Improvements in quality and access to road transportation meant that the use of the railway by farmers decreased - by 1950, the train ran only thrice weekly, and not much later, this level of service was further reduced to twice weekly.(  These services were augmented by highly infrequent excursions, the most notable of which was chartered by the Waikaka Valley Presbyterian Church on 26 March 1962 to convey almost 800 passengers in 12 carriages and 2 vans to Racecourse station on the Branch for a picnic near Wyndham.  The motive power used on the service was typical of the latter decades of the branch: an A class locomotive on the service out of Waikaka, and an AB class locomotive on the return working.(The Waikaka Excursion, Yarn 99 (May 1962).)The line would have been a candidate for closure sometime in the early 1950s like other similar branches in New Zealand, but due to the lack of bridges or tunnels, it was ideal for carrying large, heavy items for the construction of the Dam.  This freight sustained the line into the 1960s, but upon completion of the dam, there was not sufficient traffic to justify the branchs continued existence and it was closed on 9 September 1962.(The branch todayTraces of the branch lines existence remain evident today.  In Willowbank, a preserved windmill, wooden water tank, and a Historic Places plaque can be found at the site of the former yard.  Stockyards and loading chutes can be found preserved in Fleming.  The former railbed is well defined through the countryside for some of its length, and structures of obvious railway origin can be found in Waikaka, such as former Railways Department housing provided for staff based in Waikaka when its locomotive depot was operational.(Leitch and Scott, Exploring New Zealands Ghost Railways, 110.)ReferencesExternal links* Brians Place - The Waikaka Branch (includes photos from Willowbank)
3581993
German_cruiser_Knigsberg
{|Ship notes|}Knigsberg was a cruiser of the  in the German Reichsmarine and Kriegsmarine.  Her sisterships were Kln and Karlsruhe. After a number of foreign visits in the 1930s, the ship operated along the Spanish coast from November 1936 to January 1937 during the Civil War. Her design and construction rendered her poorly suited to raiding or deep-water operations, and when war broke out in September 1939 she was assigned to duty as a torpedo training ship in the Baltic and subsequently used for mining operations in the Sea (Operation Westwall). The Knigsberg later was sunk by British dive bombers while anchored Bergen, Norway.NorwayIn early April 1940, Knigsberg participated in Gruppe 3 of the invasion of Norway (Operation Weserbung), transporting troops from Wilhelmshaven to Bergen, Norway, together with her sistership Kln, the artillery training ship Bremse and the torpedo boats Wolf and Leopard.  Knigsberg and Bremse were minorally damaged by Norwegian artillery batteries at Fort on 9 April 1940. The Knigsberg suffered a mechanical failure attributed to the ships unreliable machinery causing them to remain in port while the other ships returned to Germany.(Smith(1982) p. 198)  SinkingOn April 9, 1940 16 Skua dive bombers of the British Air Arm (7 of Naval Air Squadron and 9 of Naval Air Squadron, launched from Hatston, Orkney). The Knigsberg had only two inch thick armor protection at its water line and quarter of an inch maximum deck armor making it an ideal dive bomber target.(Smith(1982) p. 198)  The skuas attack comprised three groups of nine-six-one with a lone aircraft losing contact during the outward flight and successfully navigating to the Knigsberg. At 7:20 the dive bombers began their attack on the Knigsberg with the crew of the light cruiser being caught off guard.(Smith(1982) p. 203)  It wasnt until the half of the dive bombers completed their dive. Only one large anti-air  gun was reported as being manned with shells being fired once every five second from the aft of the ship with lighter anti-air weapons firing from the shore and adjacent ships firing even later in the attack.(Smith(1982) p. 203) Two hits were claimed amidship and a third being scored on the forecastle. The ship started sinking by the bow with flames reaching nearly 100 ft in the air. The stern later rose into the air exposing her screws causing her to roll over and sinking in Bergen harbor 50 minutes after the initial attack The Knigsberg fate was witnessed and reported by Americans aboard the Flying Fish  also in harbor during the attack.(Smith(1982) p. 204) thumb|left|Knigsberg under attack at BergenAftermath of SinkingThe wreck was raised on 17 July 1942, and after being righted in March 1943 was used as a pier for U-boats. The wreck capsized again on 22 September 1944, and was broken up after the end of World War II in Bergen.See also*of shipwrecks in 1940ReferencesBibliographySmith, Peter C. (1982). Dive Bomber!,Mechanicsburg Pennsylvania: Stackpool Books. ISBN 9780811734547.* German Naval History -  Light Cruiser Knigsberg(1927)(1927)(incrociatore)(knnycirkl)(kruiser)(3)(1927)Knigsberg(1929)(1927)  (1927)(tu tun dng c)
3587074
Botequim
Boteco (bo-tech-ko), or Botequim (bo-tech-kym) / Butiquim (boo-tee-kym) are terms derived from the Portuguese of Portugal botica, (cognate with Castilian Spanish bodega) which derives from the Greek Apotheke, which means storage, grocery store or where goods were sold by retail.(Dicionrio Brasileiro da lngua portuguesa: Encyclopaedia Britannica do Brasil, 7 ed., 1982).In Portugal the boteco was a warehouse or store where groceries and offal were sold and the same meaning belongs to the Spanish bodega.In Brazil, the boteco (buteco), or botequim, was traditionally known as a place where alcoholic beverages were sold, serving as a meeting place for bohemians, who looked for a good drink, cheap snacks and a chat without obligation.Brazilian citiesIn de Janeiro, the little botequins are also known as caipirinha or p-sujo (dirty-foot). In Belo Horizonte, nationally known as the Brazilian capital of the boteco, there are about 12,000 establishments, more botecos per capita than any other city in the world.(New York Times - Travel: about Belo Horizontes botecos)Also in Horizonte is used often the term boteco-copo-sujo (dirty-cup-pub) which is an offshoot of the genre boteco for definition of the level of slovenliness of the establishment, in allusion to its appearance, as though welcoming, most no prizes for their apparent aspects such as cleaning or air. Among the delicacies of the most unique boteco, we can cite the traditional liver with onions (figado acebolado), spicy chorizo (chourio apimentado) or the fried eggplant (gil frito), accompanied by beer, the chopp, the famous caipirinha or the cachaa.There is even a well-known competition between the crowded bars of Belo Horizonte to select which has the best and most traditional pub food. This festival is called di Buteco and was created in 1999 by gourmet Eduardo Maya.(Official site of Comida di Butecos party.)The Mercado Central (Central Market place) in Belo Horizonte crowds several examples of traditional pubs of mining capital, with famous tira-gosto (snacks) (so called delicacies of foodstuff derived from the establishment)(Central Market botecos)Common terms and expressions*cerveja (sare-VAY-zha): beer*cerveja gelada (sare-VAY-zha zhe-LA-da): cold beer*garrafa (ga-HAHF-ah): bottle*chopp (SHO-pee): draft beer (from German Schopp)*caipirinha (kye-pee-REE-N-a): typical drink, a blend of lime, cachaa, sugar and ice*cachaa (ca-SHA-ssa): typical drink of sugarcane fermented and distilled*tira-gosto (Teer-a-go-sto): snacks*Mais uma!: Ill have another!*Desce mais uma rodada: One more round*Saideira (sah-ee-DARE-a): One last round, one for the road (cf. sada  exit, departure; cognate with Spanish salida)ReferencesExternal links*- New York Times news about the Belo Horizontes boteco*- Oficial site of the Comida di Buteco championship*- Belo Horizonte: Central Market Place*- Rio de Janeiro: The Botequim  BootsnAll.compt:Boteco
3595488
P._A._Yeomans
Percival Alfred Yeomans (1904 - 1984) was an Australian inventor known for the Keyline system for the development of land and increasing the fertility of that land. As a mining engineer and gold assayer, Yeomans had developed a keen sense of hydrology and equipment design. Upon his brother-in-laws death in a grass fire, Percival Alfred Yeomans assumed management of a large tract of land he later named Nevallan in South Wales. Here he developed improved methods and equipment for cultivation. His designs won him The Prince Philip Design Award in 1974.His Keyline principles or concepts (Keyline Design) have been adopted by farm owners in almost every country in the world. Yeomans Keyline concepts are now part of the curriculum of many agriculture courses in colleges and universities across the world. His ideas have also been a key factor in the development of permaculture design. P.A. Yeomans wrote four books; The Keyline Plan, The Challenge of Landscape, Water For Every Farm and The City Forest.See also* design External links * The Keyline Plan by P. A. Yeomans* The Challenge of Landscape by P. A. Yeomans* The City Forest by P. A. YeomansReferences* Yeomans, P. A., The Keyline Plan (1954) Online version* Yeomans, P. A., The Challenge of Landscape : the development and practice of keyline, Keyline Pub. Pty., Sydney, (1958). Online version* Yeomans, P. A., The City Forest : The Keyline Plan for the Human Environment Revolution, Keyline Pub. Pty., Sydney, (1971). Online version* Yeomans, P. A., Water for Every Farm: A practical irrigation plan for every Australian property, K.G. Murray Publishing Company, Pty, Ltd, Sydney, N.S.W., Australia (1973) ISBN 0-646-12954-6/ISBN 0-909325-29-4.
3602167
Henties_Bay
population_density_blank1_sq_mi Henties Bay (English, literally: Hentys Bay. Afrikaans: Hentiesbaai, German: Hentiesbucht) is a coastal town in Region, Namibia. It is located 70 km north of Swakopmund and is an important holiday settlement. 70 kilometres to the north of the town is the seal colony of Cross. The town has 3,300 inhabitants and owns  of land.( The mayor of Henties Bay is Gisela Cramer.()HistoryDias sailed along the Atlantic coast in 1488. Near the area of todays Henties Bay he discovered such an abundance of fish that he named this coastline Praai das Sadhinas, Coast of Fish. The fresh water source was first discovered by Schutztruppe soldiers in 1886. In 1920, a minerals prospector stayed overnight. After tasting the water he was said to be healed from an affliction.()The namesake of the town is major Hendrik Henty Stefanus van der Merwe who discovered the place in 1929 while looking for water. He had been hunting a rhinoceros in the arid hinterland of the Namibian coast near the Brandberg in order to collect a reward from a museum in Pennsylvania that was in search of a rhino skeleton. After shooting the rhino and scraping meat from the bones, water resources of the expedition diminished and forced the party to load the decomposing carcass and search for water.()()They chose to head into the direction of the Atlantic coast and reached it close to Cross. From there van der Merwe and his fellows searched southwards for the mouth of River. A few miles south of the mouth they discovered a deep sand valley with reed grass growing in it, advertising the presence of fresh water. Van der Merwe liked the place and after delivering the bones and collecting his reward, returned the following Christmas to build a wooden hut in the riverbed. The place became known as Henty se baai (Hentys Bay) and developed into a holiday hideout,( mainly because of the abundance of fish at this spot.(In 1951 the SouthWest Africa Administration mandated to Africa, proclaimed erven in the Omaruru riverbed that were available for rent, but the erection of permanent structures was not allowed. The first shop was established during that time. A light house was erected to guide ships along the dangerous Namibian coast. In the 1960s mining holes were dug after diamonds had been found in the area on a few occasions. A few years later mining was abandoned due to lack of success. In 1966 it was decided that the riverbed must not be settled in, and property north and south of it was sold. A hotel was built one year later, and the town began to develop.(Environment and tourismThe town is predominantly a tourist destination for anglers and 4x4 enthusiasts. Its property market has expanded significantly since the late 1990s, particularly for upmarket holiday accommodation.(Henties Bay is situated in the West Coast Recreation Area but there are few restrictions, particularly for driving off-road on the beach and across the plains. This lures tourists into the area but puts a burden on the sensitive environment. Specifically in danger are the lichen fields which take decades to recover from tracks cut through them, and the Tern which is endemic to the Coast and threatened by habitat loss.()PoliticsHenties Bay is home to the Association of Henties Bay, a local political party which contests local elections. In the 2010 local election, the party received the most votes (approximately 44%), while SWAPO finished in 2nd place with approximately 37%. The Rally for Democracy and Progress, which was the party of opposition  in the National Assembly following the 2009 general election, also contested the election and received 4%.(Swapo Dominates Local Polls Namibian, 1 December 2010) From 2004-10, the local authority of Henties Bay included 3 members of the Civic Association, 3 SWAPO members and 1 member of the UDF.(New mayor to heal rift in Henties community Namibian, 4 June 2004)Town council corruption affairIn November 2009, three town councillors, the town human resources manager and the town CEO were arrested on corruption charges stemming from the hiring of friends of the officials as general labourers in 2007.()Referencesaf:HentiesbaaiBayBayBay
3607937
Malaysia
footnotes                a. Lumpur is the capital city and is home to the legislative branch of the Federal government. Putrajaya is the primary seat of the federal government where the executive and judicial branches are located.b. The current terminology as per government policy is Bahasa Malaysia (literally Malaysian language)() but legislation continues to refer to the official language as Bahasa Melayu (literally Malay language).c. Under the National Language Act 1967: The script of the national language shall be the Rumi Latin script: provided that this shall not prohibit the use of the Malay script, more commonly known as the script, of the national language.(National Language Act 1967)d. English may continue to be used for some official purposes under the National Language Act 1967.e. Singapore became an independent country on 9 August 1965.(United Nations Member States)Malaysia (  or  ) is a federal monarchy in Asia. It consists of thirteen states and three federal territories and has a total landmass of  separated by the China Sea into two regions, Malaysia and Malaysian Borneo. Land borders are shared with Thailand, Indonesia, and Brunei, and maritime borders exist with Singapore, Vietnam, and the Philippines. The capital city is Lumpur, while Putrajaya is the seat of the federal government. In 2010 the population exceeded 27.5 million.Malaysia has its origins in the Malay Kingdoms present in the area which, from the 18th century, became subject to the Empire. The first British territories were known as the Settlements, with the other states forming protectorates. The states on Peninsular Malaysia, then known as Malaya, was first unified as the Union in 1946. Malaya was restructured as the of Malaya in 1948, and achieved independence on 31 August 1957. Malaya united with Sabah, Sarawak, and Singapore on 16 September 1963, with si being added to give the new country the name Malaysia. However, less than two years later in 1965, Singapore was expelled from the federation. Since independence, Malaysia has had one of the best economic records in Asia, with GDP growing an average 6.5% for almost 50 years. The economy has traditionally been fuelled by its natural resources, but is expanding in the sectors of science, tourism, commerce and tourism.The head of state is the di-Pertuan Agong, an elected monarch chosen from the hereditary rulers of the nine states every five years. The head of government is the Prime Minister. The government system is closely modelled on the Westminster parliamentary system and the legal system is based on English Common Law. The country is multi-ethnic and multi-cultural, factors that influence its culture and play a large role in politics. Islam is the state religion, although freedom of religion is protected by a secular constitution.Malaysia contains the southernmost point of continental Eurasia, Piai, and is located near the equator and has a tropical climate. It has a biodiverse range of flora and fauna, and is considered a megadiverse country. It is a founding member of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations and the of Islamic Cooperation, and a member of Economic Cooperation, the of Nations, and the Movement.EtymologyFile:LA2-NSRW-1-0148 malaysia.jpg|thumb|left|altEnglish Map of Southeast Asia, MALAYSIA typeset horizontally so that the letters run across the northernmost corner of Borneo and pass just south of the Philippines.|Malaysia used as a label for the Archipelago on a 1914 map from a United States atlas.The word Melayu is thought to derive from the Sanskrit term Malaiur or Malayadvipa which can be translated as land of mountains, the word used by ancient Indian traders when referring to the Peninsula.()()()()() Other theories propose it originates from the Tamil word Malai, meaning mountain.() The term was later used as the name of the Kingdom, which existed between the 7th and the 13th centuries on Sumatra.()Following his 1826 expedition in Oceania, French navigator Dumont dUrville invented the terms Malaysia, Micronesia and Melanesia, distinguishing these Pacific cultures and island groups from the already existing term Polynesia. In 1831, he proposed these terms to The de Gographie. Dumont dUrville described Malaysia as an area commonly known as the Indies.() In 1850, the English ethnologist George Samuel Windsor Earl, writing in the Journal of the Indian Archipelago and Eastern Asia, proposed naming the islands of Southeast Asia as Melayunesia or Indunesia, favouring the former.()In 1957, the of Malaya was declared as an independent federation of the Malay states on the Malay Peninsula.() The name Malaysia was adopted in 1963 when the existing states of the Federation of Malaya, plus Singapore, North Borneo and Sarawak formed a new federation,( with si being added to Malaya in honour of the three joining states.( Prior to that, the name itself had been used to refer to the whole Malay Archipelago.() Politicians in the Philippines once contemplated naming their state Malaysia, but in 1963 Malaysia adopted the name first.(Sakai, Manako. Reviving Malay Connections in Southeast Asia.) At the time of the 1963 federation, other names were considered: among them was Langkasuka, after the historic kingdom located at the upper section of the Malay Peninsula in the first millennium of the common era.()HistoryEvidence of human habitation in Malaysia dates back 40,000 years,() with the first inhabitants thought to be Negritos.() Traders and settlers from India and China arrived as early as the 1st century AD, establishing trading ports and towns in the 2nd and 3rd centuries. This resulted in strong Indian and Chinese influence on the local cultures, and the people of the Malay Peninsula adopted the religions of Hinduism and Buddhism. Sanskrit inscriptions appear as early as the 4th or 5th century.() The Kingdom of Langkasuka arose around the 2nd century in the northern area of the Malay Peninsula, lasting until about the 15th century.( Between the 7th and the 13th century, much of the south of the Malay Peninsula was under the Srivijaya empire. After the fall of Srivijaya, the Majapahit empire had influence over most of Peninsular Malaysia and the Malay Archipelago.( In the early 15th century, Parameswara, a prince of the former Srivijayan empire, founded the Sultanate, commonly considered the first independent state in the peninsula.() Parameswara became a Muslim, and due to this the conversion of Malays to Islam accelerated in the 15th century.( Malacca was an important commercial centre during this time, attracting trade from around the region.(File:A Famosa Fortress, Melaka.jpg|thumb|left|240px|altStained ruin of a stone building, showing a central arch, flanked by two columns, with a stone relief above the arch, also flanked by two columns, and a second free-standing arch perched on the very top of the ruin.|Famosa fortress in Malacca was built by the Portuguese in the 16th century.In 1511 Malacca was conquered by Portugal,( after which it was taken by the Dutch in 1641.( In 1786 the Empire set foot in Malaya, when the Sultan of Kedah leased Penang to the British India Company. The British obtained Singapore in 1819,() and in 1824 took control of Malacca following the Anglo-Dutch Treaty. By 1826 the British directly controlled Penang, Malacca, Singapore, and the island of Labuan, which they established as the crown colony of the Settlements. By the 20th century, the states of Pahang, Selangor, Perak, and Sembilan, known together as the Malay States, had British Residents appointed to advise the Malay rulers, whom the rulers were bound by treaty to defer to.() The remaining five states in the peninsula, known as the Malay States, while not directly under British rule, also accepted British advisers around the turn of the 20th century. Development on the Peninsula and Borneo were generally separate until the 19th century.() Sabah was governed as the crown colony of British North Borneo after it was leased from the of Sulu in 1878.() In 1842, Sarawak was ceded by the of Brunei to Brooke, whose successors ruled as the Rajahs over an independent kingdom until 1946, when it became a British colony.()In the Second World War the Japanese army invaded and subsequently occupied Malaya, Sabah, Sarawak, and Singapore for over three years. During this time, ethnic tensions were raised and nationalism grew.() Popular support for independence increased after Malaya was reconquered by Allied Forces.() Post-war British plans to unite the administration of Malaya under a single crown colony called the Union met with strong opposition from the Malays, who opposed the weakening of the Malay rulers and the granting of citizenship to the ethnic Chinese. The Malayan Union, established in 1946 and consisting of all the British possessions in the Malay Peninsula with the exception of Singapore, was quickly dissolved and replaced by the of Malaya, which restored the autonomy of the rulers of the Malay states under British protection.() During this time, rebels under the leadership of the Communist Party launched guerrilla operations designed to force the British out of Malaya. The Emergency lasted from 1948 to 1960, and involved a long anti-insurgency campaign by Commonwealth troops in Malaya.() In 1963 Malaya, along with the then British crown colonies of Sabah, Sarawak, and Singapore, federated to form Malaysia. The proposed date of federation was 31 August 1963, however, the date was delayed until 16 September 1963 due to opposition from Indonesias Sukarno and the United Peoples Party.()File:Dataran Merdeka.jpg|thumb|240px|altAn ornate fountain at left with steps leading up to a wall with some of Malaysias state flags on it.|Square in Kuala Lumpur, where Independence Day is celebrated on 31 August each year.Independence brought heightened tensions including a conflict with Indonesia over the formation of Malaysia, Singapores eventual exit in 1965,()() and racial strife which caused the 13 May race riots in 1969.() After the riots, the controversial New Economic Policy was launched by Prime Minister Abdul Razak, trying to increase the share of the economy held by the bumiputra. The country has since maintained a delicate ethno-political balance, with a system of government that has attempted to combine overall economic development with political and economic policies that promote equitable participation of all races.()Under Prime Minister bin Mohamad there was a period of rapid economic growth and urbanisation beginning in the 1980s. This period saw a shift from an agriculture-based economy to one based on manufacturing and industry. The physical landscape of the country changed with the emergence of numerous mega-projects, such as the Towers, the North-South Expressway, the Multimedia Super Corridor, and the new federal administrative capital of Putrajaya.() In the late 1990s, the Asian financial crisis almost caused the collapse of the currency and the stock and property markets.() Political unrest was caused by the dismissal of the deputy prime minister Dato Seri Ibrahim.() In November 2007 two anti-government rallies occurred, precipitated by allegations of corruption and discrepancies in the election system that heavily favoured the ruling political party, National Front, which had been in power since Malaya achieved independence.()GovernanceFile:MalaysianParliament.jpg|thumb|left|200px|altA photo showing the Malaysian Parliament building along with 2 white arches in diagonal position front of the building.|The Houses of Parliament is the building where the Malaysian Parliament assembles.Malaysia is a federal constitutional monarchy. The system of government is closely modelled on that of the Westminster parliamentary system, a legacy of British colonial rule.() The head of state is the di-Pertuan Agong, commonly referred to as the king. The Yang di-Pertuan Agong is elected to a five-year term by and from among the nine hereditary rulers of the states; the other four states, which have titular Governors, do not participate in the selection. By informal agreement the position is systematically rotated among the nine,( and has been held by Zainal Abidin of Terengganu since 2007.() The Yang di-Pertuan Agongs role has been mostly ceremonial since changes to the constitution in 1994.()Legislative power is divided between federal and state legislatures. The bicameral federal parliament consists of the house, the House of Representatives and the house, the Senate.() The 222-member House of Representatives is elected for a maximum term of five years from single-member constituencies, which are determined based on population. All 70 senators sit for three-year terms; 26 are elected by the 13 state assemblies, and the remaining 44 are appointed by the Yang di-Pertuan Agong upon the Prime Ministers recommendation.( The parliament follows a multi-party system and the government is elected through a first-past-the-post system. Since independence Malaysia has been governed by a multi-party coalition known as the Nasional.()Each state has a unicameral Legislative Assembly whose members are elected from single-member constituencies. State governments are led by Chief Ministers,( who are state assembly members from the majority party in the assembly. In each of the states with a hereditary ruler, the Chief Minister is required to be a Malay, appointed by the ruler upon the recommendation of the Prime Minister.() Parliamentary elections are held at least once every five years, the most recent of which took place in March 2008.( Registered voters of age 21 and above may vote for the members of the House of Representatives and, in most of the states, for the state legislative chamber. Voting is not mandatory.() Except for elections in Sarawak, all state elections are held concurrently with the federal election.(File:Dato Sri Mohd Najib Tun Razak.JPG|thumb|right|160px|altan official photo of current prime minister Najib Tun Razak.|Razak, Prime Minister since 2009.Executive power is vested in the Cabinet, led by the Prime Minister. The prime minister must be a member of the house of representatives, in the opinion of the Yang di-Pertuan Agong, commands a majority in parliament. The cabinet is chosen from members of both houses of Parliament.( The Prime Minister is both the head of cabinet and the head of government.( The incumbent, Razak, appointed in 2009, and is the sixth prime minister since independence.()Malaysias legal system is based on English Common Law.( Although the judiciary is theoretically independent, supporters of the government hold many judicial positions.() The highest court in the judicial system is the Federal Court, followed by the Court of Appeal and two high courts, one for Peninsular Malaysia and one for East Malaysia. Malaysia also has a special court to hear cases brought by or against Royalty.() Separate from the civil courts are the Courts, which decide on cases which involve Malaysian Muslims() and run parallel to the normal court system.() The Internal Security Act allows detention without trial, and the penalty is in use for crimes such as trafficking.()Race is a significant force in politics, and many of the political parties are ethnically based.( Actions such as the New Economic Policy( and the Development Policy which superseded it, were implemented to advance the standing of the bumiputra, who are considered the original inhabitants of Malaysia, over non-bumiputra such as Malaysian Chinese and Malaysian Indians.() These policies provide preferential treatment to Malays over non-Malays in employment, education, scholarships, business, and access to cheaper housing and assisted savings. However, it has generated greater interethnic resentment.() Debate exists over whether the country should be secular or Islamic.() Some state governments controlled by the Pan-Malaysian Islamic Party, including that of Terengganu, have passed Islamic laws, but these have not gone into effect due to opposition from the federal government.()Foreign relations and militaryFile:Royal Malaysian Air Force 005 crop.jpg|thumb|left|200px|altThe Royal Malaysian Air Forces Sukhoi Su-30MKM Flankers and Aermacchi MB-339s military aircraft at the Langkawi Airport.|The RMAF MiG-29N/UB & Aermacchi MB-339Malaysias foreign policy is officially based on the principle of neutrality and maintaining peaceful relations with all countries, regardless of their political system. It seeks to further develop relations with other countries in the region and portray itself as a progressive Islamic nation.() The government attaches a high priority to the security and stability of Asia, and has tried to strengthen relations with other Islamic states.() A strong tenet of Malaysias policy is national sovereignty and the right of a country to control its domestic affairs.(A founding member of the Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)() and the Organisation of the Islamic Conference (OIC, now the of Islamic Cooperation),() the country participates in many international organisations such as the Nations,() the Economic Cooperation,() the 8 Countries,() and the Movement (NAM).() It has chaired ASEAN, the OIC, and the NAM in the past.( A former British colony, it is also a member of the of Nations.() Kuala Lumpur was the site of the first Asia Summit in 2005.(The policy towards territorial disputes by the government is one of pragmatism, with the government solving disputes in a number of ways, such as bringing the case to the Court of Justice.() The Islands are disputed by many states in the area, although tensions have eased since the 2002 Declaration on the Conduct of Parties in the South China Sea. Brunei and Malaysia in 2008 announced an end to claims of each others land, and to resolve issues related to their maritime borders. The Philippines has a dormant claim to Sabah. Singapores land reclamation has caused tensions, and maritime border disputes exist with Indonesia.()File:Scorpene Tunku Abdul Rahman.jpg|thumb|altA Scorpne class submarine at dock, half out of the water. People on top are mooring it, and a boat can be seen in the background|Malaysian Navys first class submarineMalaysia has never recognised Israel and has no diplomatic ties with it.() It has remained a strong supporter of the of Palestine,() and has called for Israel to be taken to the Criminal Court over the flotilla raid.() Malaysian peacekeeping forces are present in Lebanon() and have contributed to many other UN peacekeeping missions.(Malaysian defence requirements are assigned to the Armed Forces (Angkatan Tentera Malaysia  ATM). The armed forces has three branches, the Malaysian Navy (Tentera Laut Diraja Malaysia  TLDM), the Army (Tentera Darat Malaysia  TD), and the Malaysian Air Force (Tentera Udara Diraja Malaysia  TUDM). There is no conscription, and the required age for voluntary military service is 18. The military uses 1.9 per cent of the countrys GDP, and hires 1.23 per cent of Malaysias manpower.()The Power Defence Arrangements is a regional security initiative which has been in place for almost 40 years. It involves joint military exercises held among Malaysia, Singapore, Australia, Zealand, and the United Kingdom.() Joint exercises and war games have been held with Indonesia for years.() Malaysia and the Philippines have agreed to host joint security force exercises in order to secure their maritime border and tackle issues such as illegal immigration.() There are fears that unrest in the Muslim areas of the southern Philippines() and southern Thailand() could spill over into Malaysia.SubdivisionsMalaysia is made up of 13 states and three federal territories. These are divided between two regions, with 11 states and two federal territories on Malaysia and the other two states and one federal territory in Malaysia. As Malaysia is a federation, the governance of the states is divided between the federal and the state governments, while the Federal government has direct administration of the federal territories.()The 13 states are based on historical Malay Kingdoms, and 9 of the 13 states, known as the states, retain their royal families. The di-Pertuan Agong is elected by and from the nine rulers to serve a five-year term.( Each state has a unicameral legislature known as the Legislative Assembly. The states of East Malaysia (Sabah and Sarawak) have separate immigration policies and controls, and a unique residency status.() For citizens of one of these states or Peninsular Malaysia, the other areas of Malaysia are considered foreign countries under immigration laws.() Each state is further divided into districts, which are then divided into mukim. In Sabah and Sarawak districts are grouped into Divisions.()The federal parliament is permitted to legislate on issues of land, the Islamic religion and local government, in order to provide for a uniform law among different states, or on the request of the state assembly concerned. The law in question must also be passed by the state assembly as well, except in the case of certain land law-related subjects. Non-Islamic issues that fall under the purview of the state may also be legislated at the federal level for the purpose of conforming with Malaysian treaty obligations.()GeographyFile:Kota kinabalu peak.jpg|thumb|altA view from Lows peak, with a smaller peak to the right of the photo, with forested mountains in the background|A view from Lows peak, the highest peak of Kinabalu. Malaysia is the 66th largest country by total land area, with a land area of . It has land borders with Thailand in West Malaysia, and Indonesia and Brunei in East Malaysia.() It is linked to Singapore by a narrow causeway, and also has maritime boundaries with Vietnam() and the Philippines.() The land borders are defined in large part by geological features such as the River, Golok River and the Pagalayan Canal, whilst some of the maritime boundaries are the subject of ongoing contention.( Brunei forms what is almost an enclave in Malaysia,() with the state of Sarawak dividing it into two parts. Malaysia is the only country with territory on both the Asian mainland and the Malay archipelago,( and Piai, located in the southern state of Johor, is the southernmost tip of continental Asia.() The of Malacca, lying between Sumatra and Peninsular Malaysia, is one of the most important thoroughfares in global commerce, carrying 40 per cent of the worlds trade.()The two parts of Malaysia, separated from each other by the China Sea, share a largely similar landscape in that both West (Peninsula) and Malaysia feature coastal plains rising to hills and mountains.( Peninsular Malaysia, containing 40 per cent of Malaysias land area,( extends  from north to south, and its maximum width is .() It is divided between its east and west coasts by the Mountains,() part of a series of mountain ranges running down the centre of the peninsula.( These mountains are heavily forested,( and mainly composed of granite and other igneous rocks. Much of it has been eroded, creating a karst landscape.( The range is the origin of some of Peninsular Malaysias river systems.() The coastal plains surrounding the peninsula reach a maximum width of , and the peninsulas coastline is nearly  long, although harbours are only available on the western side.(File:View from Bukit Terisek.jpg|thumb|left|altA view over the top of the Taman Negara rainforest|Negara National ParkEast Malaysia, on the island of Borneo, has a coastline of .( It is divided between coastal regions, hills and valleys, and a mountainous interior.( The Range extends northwards from Sarawak,( dividing the state of Sabah. It is the location of Kinabalu.() Mount Kinabalu, at , is the tallest mountain in Malaysia and is protected as National Park, a UNESCO Heritage Site.() The highest mountain ranges form the border between Malaysia and Indonesia. Sarawak contains the Caves, the largest cave system in the world.(Around these two halves of Malaysia are numerous islands, the largest of which is Labuan.() The local climate is equatorial and characterised by the annual southwest (April to October) and northeast (October to February) monsoons.( The temperature is moderated by the presence of the surrounding oceans.( Humidity is usually high, and the average annual rainfall is .( The climates of the Peninsula and the East differ, as the climate on the peninsula is directly affected by wind from the mainland, as opposed to the more maritime weather of the East. Local climates can be divided into three regions, highland, lowland, and coastal. change is likely to affect sea levels and rainfall, increasing flood risks and leading to droughts.(BiodiversityFile:Proboscis Monkey in Borneo.jpg|thumb|altA male proboscis monkey sitting on a branch|monkey in BorneoMalaysia is a megadiverse country with a high number of species and high levels of endemism.() It is estimated to contain 20 per cent of the worlds animal species.() There are about 210 mammal species in the country.( High levels of endemism are found on the diverse forests of Borneos mountains, as species are isolated from each other by lowland forest.() Over 620 species of birds have been recorded in Peninsular Malaysia,( with many endemic to the mountains there. A high number of endemic bird species are also found in Malaysian Borneo.( 250 reptile species have been recorded in the country, with about 150 species of snakes( and 80 species of lizards.( There are about 150 species of frogs,( and thousands of insect species.( Malaysias economic zone is 1.5 times larger than its land area,() and some of its waters are in the Triangle, a biodiversity hotspot.() The waters around island are the most biodiverse in the world.( Bordering East Malaysia, the Sea is a biodiversity hotspot, with around 600 coral species and 1200 fish species.()About two thirds of Malaysia is covered in forest,( with some forests believed to be 130 million years old.() It is composed of a variety of types, although they are mainly dipterocarp forests.() Lowland forest occurs below ,( and formerly East Malaysia was covered in such rainforest,( which is supported by its hot wet climate.( There are around 14,500 species of flowering plants and trees.( Besides rainforests, there are over  of mangroves in Malaysia,( and a large amount of peat forest. At higher altitudes, oaks, chestnuts, and rhododendrons replace dipterocarps.( There are an estimated 8,500 species of plants in Peninsular Malaysia, with another 15,000 in the East.()  The forests of East Malaysia are estimated to be the habitat of around 2,000 tree species, and are one of the most biodiverse areas in the world, with 240 different species of trees every hectare.( These forests host many members of the Rafflesia genus, the largest flowers in the world,( with a maximum diameter of .(File:Rafflesia 80 cm.jpg|thumb|left|altRed flower made of 5 petals surrounding a depressed centre, on the forest floor surrounded by dead leaves and small green plants|Some species of Rafflesia can grow up to  in diameter, making them the largest flowers in the world.Logging, along with cultivation practices has devastated tree cover, causing severe environmental degradation in the country. Over 80 per cent of Sarawaks rainforest has been cleared.( Floods in East Malaysia have been worsened by the loss of trees, and over 60 per cent of the Peninsulars forest have been cleared.( With current rates of deforestation, the forests are predicted to be extinct by 2020.( Deforestation is a major problem for fauna, as the forest is cut to make room for plantations.() Most remaining forest is found inside national parks.( Habitat destruction has proved a threat for marine life.( Illegal fishing is another major threat,( with fishing methods such as fishing and poisoning depleting marine ecosystems.() turtle numbers have dropped 98 per cent since the 1950s.() Hunting has also been an issue for some animals,( with overconsumption and the use of animal parts for profit endangering many animals, from marine life( to tigers.( Marine life is also detrimentally affected by uncontrolled tourism.()The Malaysian government aims to balance economic growth with environmental protection, but has been accused of favouring big business over the environment.( Some state governments are now trying to counter the environmental impact and pollution created by deforestation;( and the federal government is trying to cut logging by 10 per cent each year. 28 national parks have been established; 23 in East Malaysia and seven in the Peninsular.( Tourism has been limited in biodiverse areas such as Sipadan island.(  Animal trafficking is a large issue, and the Malaysian government is holding talks with the governments of Brunei and Indonesia to standardise anti-trafficking laws.()EconomyFile:KL Outing 022b.jpg|thumb|180px|The Twin TowersMalaysia is a relatively open state-oriented and newly industrialised economy.()() The state plays a significant but declining role in guiding economic activity through macroeconomic plans. Malaysia has had one of the best economic records in Asia, with GDP growing an average 6.5 per cent annually from 1957 to 2005.( In 2010 the GDP per capita (PPP) was $414.400;&nbspbillion, the 3rd largest economy in ASEAN and 29th largest economy in the world.()In the 1970s, the predominantly mining and agricultural-based Malaysian economy began a transition towards a more multi-sector economy. Since the 1980s the industrial sector has led Malaysias growth.() High levels of investment played a significant role in this.( The Malaysian economy recovered from the Asian Financial Crisis sooner than neighbouring countries, and has since recovered to the levels of the pre-crisis era with a GDP per capita of $14,800.()() Inequalities exist between different ethnic groups, with a major issue being that the Chinese minority accounts for 70 per cent of the countrys market capitalisation, even though it only makes up about one-third of it.()International trade, facilitated by the adjacent of Malacca shipping route, and manufacturing are key sectors of the countrys economy.()()() Malaysia is an exporter of natural and agricultural resources, the most valuable exported resource being petroleum.( At one time, it was the largest producer of tin,() rubber and oil in the world. Manufacturing has a large influence in the countrys economy,() although Malaysias economic structure has been moving away from it.()File:Oilpalm malaysia.jpg|thumb|left|altA dirt track with rows of palm trees on either side|palm plantations make Malaysia one of the largest producers of palm oil in the world.()In an effort to diversify the economy and make Malaysias economy less dependent on exported goods, the government has pushed to increase in Malaysia. As a result, tourism has become Malaysias third largest source of income from foreign exchange, although it is threatened by the negative effects of the growing industrial economy, with large amounts of air and water pollution along with deforestation affecting tourism.() The country has developed into a centre of banking, and is the country with the highest numbers of female workers in that industry.() Knowledge-based services are also expanding.(Science policies in Malaysia are regulated by the Ministry of Science, Technology, and Innovation. The country is one of the worlds largest exporters of semiconductor devices, electrical goods, and information and communication technology products.( Malaysia began developing its own its own space programme in 2002,()() and in 2006 Russia agreed to transport one Malaysian to the Space Station as part of a multi-billion dollar purchase of 18 Russian Sukhoi Su-30MKM fighter jets by the Malaysian Air Force.() In an effort to create a self-reliant defensive ability and support national development, Malaysia privatised some of its military facilities in the 1970s. This has created a defence industry, which in 1999 was brought under the Defence Industry Council. The government continues to try and promote this sector and its competitiveness, actively marketing the defence industry.()DemographicsAs of the 2010 census, the population of Malaysia was 28,334,135,( making it the 43rd most populated country. The population of Malaysia consists of many ethnic groups. Malays make up 50.4 per cent of the population, while other bumiputra make up another 11 per cent.( According to constitutional definition, Malays are Muslims who practice Malay customs and culture. They play a dominant role politically. Bumiputra status is also accorded to certain non-Malay peoples, including ethnic Thais, Khmers, Chams and the natives of Sabah and Sarawak. Non-Malay bumiputra make up more than half of Sarawaks population and over two thirds of Sabahs population.( There also exist aboriginal groups in much smaller numbers on the peninsula, where they are collectively known as Asli.() Laws over who gets bumiputra status vary between states.()Other minorities who lack bumiputra status make up a large amount of the population. 23.7 per cent of the population are of Chinese descent, while those of Indian descent comprise 7.1 per cent of the population.( The Chinese have historically been dominant in the business and commerce community, and form the majority of the population of Penang. Indians began migrating to Malaysia in the early 19th century.() The majority of the Indian community are Tamils.() Many Europeans and Middle Easterners assimilated through inter-marriage into the Christian and Muslim communities respectively. Most Eurasian Malaysians trace their ancestry to British, Dutch or Portuguese colonists.citizenship is not automatically granted to those born in Malaysia, but is granted to a child born of two Malaysian parents outside Malaysia. Dual citizenship is not permitted.() Citizenship in the states of Sabah and Sarawak in Malaysian Borneo are distinct from citizenship in Peninsular Malaysia for immigration purposes. Every citizen is issued a biometric smart chip identity card known as MyKad at the age of 12, and must carry the card at all times.()The mortality rate in 2009 was 6 deaths per 1000 births, and life expectancy at birth in 2009 was 75 years.() With the aim of developing Malaysia into a medical tourism destination, 5 per cent of the government social sector development budget is spent on health care.() The population distribution between the two halves of the country is highly uneven. It is concentrated on Peninsular Malaysia() where 20 million of approximately 28 million Malaysians live.( 70 per cent of the population is urban.( Lumpur is the capital( and the largest city in Malaysia,() as well as its main commercial and financial centre.() Putrajaya is the seat of government,() as many executive and judicial branches of the federal government were moved there to ease growing congestion within Kuala Lumpur.()Due to the rise in labour intensive industries,() the country is estimated to have over 3 million migrant workers; about 10 per cent of the population.() Sabah-based NGOs estimate that out of the 3 million that make up the population of Sabah, 2 million are illegal immigrants.() Malaysia hosts a population of refugees and asylum seekers numbering approximately 171,500. Of this population, approximately 79,000 are from Burma, 72,400 from the Philippines, and 17,700 from Indonesia. Malaysian officials are reported to have turned deportees directly over to human smugglers in 2007, and Malaysia employs RELA, a volunteer militia with a history of controversies, to enforce its immigration law.()ReligionFile:Around-Kota-Bharu-(19).jpg|thumb|altThe wooden Kampung Laut mosque with its minaret and an onion-shaped dome on its tiled roof.|Laut Mosque in Kota Bharu is one of the oldest mosques in Malaysia, dating to early 18th century.The Malaysian constitution guarantees of religion while making Islam the state religion.( According to the Population and Housing Census 2010 figures, ethnicity and religious beliefs correlate highly. Approximately 61.3% of the population are practicing Islam. 19.8% Buddhism; 9.2% Christianity; 6.3% Hinduism; and 1.3% practice Confucianism, Taoism and other traditional Chinese religions.(), 0.7% declared no religion and the remaining 1.4% practised other religions or did not provide any information.()All ethnic Malays are considered Muslim by law of the Constitution.() Statistics from the 2010 Census indicate that 83.6% of the Chinese population identify as Buddhist, with significant numbers of adherents following Taoism (3.4%) and Christianity (11.1%), along with small Hui-Muslim populations in areas like Penang.The majority of the Indian population follow Hinduism (86.2%), with a significant minority identifying as Christians (6.0%), Muslims (4.1%). Christianity is the predominant religion of the non-Malay bumiputra community (46.5%) with an additional 40.4% identifying as Muslims.()Muslims are obliged to follow the decisions of Syariah courts in matters concerning their religion. The Islamic judges are expected to follow the Shafi`i legal school of Islam, which is the main madhhab of Malaysia.() The jurisdiction of Shariah courts is limited only to Muslims in matters such as marriage, inheritance, divorce, apostasy, conversion, and custody among others. No other criminal or civil offences are under the jurisdiction of the Shariah courts, which have a similar hierarchy to the Civil Courts. Despite being the supreme courts of the land, the Civil Courts (including the Federal Court) do not hear matters related to Islamic practices.()LanguageThe official language of Malaysia is Bahasa Malaysia,( a standardised form of the language.() Historically English was the de facto administrative language, with Malay becoming predominant after the 1969 race riots.() English remains an active language, and serves as the medium of instruction for maths and sciences in all public schools.()() English, also known as Malaysian Standard English (MySE), is a form of English derived from English. Malaysian English sees wide use in business, along with Manglish, which is a colloquial form of English with heavy Malay, Chinese, and Tamil influences. The government discourages the misuse of Malay and has instituted fines for public signs that mix Malay and English.()()Many other languages are used in Malaysia, which contains speakers of 137 living languages.() Peninsular Malaysia contains speakers of 41 of these languages.() The native tribes of East Malaysia have their own languages which are related to, but easily distinguishable from, Malay. The Iban is the main tribal language in Sarawak while languages are spoken by the natives in Sabah.() Chinese Malaysians predominately speak Chinese dialects from the southern provinces of China. The more common dialects in the country are Cantonese, Mandarin, Hokkien, Hakka, Hainanese, and Fuzhou. Tamil is used predominantly by Tamils, who form a majority of Malaysian Indians. Other south Asian languages are also widely spoken in Malaysia, as well as Thai(A small number of Malaysians have Caucasian ancestry and speak languages, such as the Portuguese based Malaccan Creoles,() and the Spanish based language.()EducationFile:Nottinghamunimalaysia.JPG|thumb|left|200px|University of Nottingham campus at Semenyih, SelangorThe education system features a non-compulsory kindergarten education followed by six years of compulsory primary education,( and five years of optional secondary education.() Schools in the primary education system are divided into two categories: national primary schools and vernacular schools.() Vernacular schools use either Chinese or Tamil as the medium of instruction, whereas national primary schools use Bahasa Malaysia as the medium of instruction for all subjects except English, Science and Mathematics. Before progressing to the secondary level of education, pupils in Year Six are required to sit for the Primary School Achievement Test.()Secondary education is conducted in secondary schools for five years. National secondary schools also use Bahasa Malaysia as the language of instruction except in mathematics, science, and language classes. At the end of Form Three, students are evaluated in the Lower Secondary Assessment, although this is set to be abolished by 2016. In the final year of secondary education, students sit for the Malaysian Certificate of Education examination. The government has decided to abandon the use of English in teaching maths and science and revert to Bahasa Malaysia, starting in 2012.() Before the introduction of the matriculation system, students aiming to enter public universities had to complete an additional 18 months of secondary schooling in Form Six and sit the Malaysian Higher School Certificate.() Since the introduction of the matriculation programme as an alternative in 1999, students who completed the 12-month programme in matriculation colleges can enroll in local universities. However, in the matriculation system, only 10 per cent of places are open to non-bumiputra students.()CultureFile:MURTABAK 1 0031.jpg|thumb|180px|upright|altA cook making Murtabak, a type of pancake, in an outdoor stall. He is pictured leaning over his custom-made flattened wok filled with pieces of murtabak.|A cook making murtabak, a type of pancake mixed with eggs, small pieces of meat and onions, in Kuala Lumpur.Malaysia is a multi-ethnic, multicultural and multilingual society.  The original culture of the area stemmed from indigenous tribes that lived there, along with the Malays who later moved there. Substantial influence exists from Chinese and Indian culture, dating back to when foreign trade began in the area. Other cultures that heavily influenced the culture of Malaysia include Persian, Arabic, and British culture. Due to the political structure of the government, coupled with the social contract theory, there has been minimal assimilation of ethnic minorities.()In 1971, the government created a National Cultural Policy. This policy defined Malaysian culture, stating that it must be based on the culture of the indigenous peoples of Malaysia, it may incorporate suitable elements from other cultures, and that Islam must play a part in Malaysian culture.() It also promoted the Malay language above others.() This government intervention into culture has caused resentment among non-Malays who feel their cultural freedom was lessened. Both Chinese and Indian associations have submitted memorandums to the government, accusing it of formulating an undemocratic culture policy.(Some cultural disputes exist between Malaysia and neighbouring countries, notably Indonesia. The two countries share a similar cultural heritage, sharing many traditions and items. However, disputes have arisen over things ranging from culinary dishes to Malaysias national anthem. Strong feelings exist in Indonesia about protecting their national heritage.() The Malaysian government and the Indonesian government have met to defuse some of the tensions resulting from the overlaps in culture.() Feelings are not as strong in Malaysia, where most recognise that many cultural values are shared.(Fine artsTraditional Malaysian art was mainly centred around the areas of carving, weaving, and silversmithing.() Traditional art ranges from handwoven baskets from rural areas to the silverwork of the Malay courts. Common artworks included ornamental kris, nut sets, and woven batik and songket fabrics. Indigenous East Malaysians are known for their wooden masks.( Each ethnic group have distinct performing arts, with little overlap between them. However, Malay art does show some North Indian influence due to the historical influence of India.()File:Batik malay 2.JPG|thumb|left|altTwo rows of hanging patterned cloths|batikTraditional Malay music and performing arts appear to have originated in the Kelantan-Pattani region with influences from India, China, Thailand and Indonesia. The music is based around percussion instruments,( the most important of which is the gendang (drum). There are at least 14 types of traditional drums.() Drums and other traditional percussion instruments and are often made from natural materials.( Music is traditionally used for storytelling, celebrating life-cycle events, and occasions such as a harvest.( It was once used as a form of long-distance communication.( In Malaysia, gong-based musical ensemble such as agung and kulintang are commonly used in ceremonies such as funerals and weddings.() These ensembles are also common in neighbouring regions such as in the southern Philippines, Kalimantan in Indonesia, and Brunei.( Johor state on the south of Peninsular Malaysia has an apparent Arab and Persian influence in art performances like Zapin and Hamdolok, musical instruments like Gambus and Samrah.(Folk dance with religious origin, 14 April 2005, Peggy Loh, Travel Times, New Straits Times)Malaysia has a strong oral tradition that has existed since before the arrival of writing, and continues today. Each of the Malay Sultanates created their own literary tradition, influenced by pre-existing oral stories and by the stories that came with Islam.( The first Malay literature was in the Arabic script. The earliest known Malay writing is on the Terengganu stone, made in 1303.( Chinese and Indian literature became common as the numbers of speakers increased in Malaysia, and locally produced works based in languages from those areas began to be produced in the 19th century.() English has also become a common literary language.( In 1971, the government took the step of defining the literature of different languages. Literature written in Malay was called the national literature of Malaysia, literature in other bumiputra languages was called regional literature, while literature in other languages was called sectional literature.( Malay poetry is highly developed, and uses many forms. The Hikayat form is popular, and the pantun has spread from Malay to other languages.(CuisineFile:RayaHajiFood.PNG|thumb|right|200px|alt4 Malay dishes on a table.|(clockwise from bottom left): beef soup, ketupat (compressed rice cubes), beef rendang and sayur lodehMalaysias cuisine reflects the multi-ethnic makeup of its population.() Many cultures from within the country and from surrounding regions have greatly influenced the cuisine. Much of the influence comes from the Malay, Chinese, Indian, Thai, Javanese, and Sumatran cultures,( largely due to the country being part of the ancient route.() The cuisine is very similar to that of Singapore and Brunei,() and also bears resemblance to Filipino cuisine.( The different states have varied dishes,( and often the food in Malaysia is different from the original dishes.(Sometimes food not found in its original culture is assimilated into another; for example, Chinese restaurants in Malaysia often serve Malay dishes.() Food from one culture is sometimes also cooked using styles taken from another culture,( This means that although much of Malaysian food can be traced back to a certain culture, they have their own identity.( Rice is popular in many dishes. Chili is commonly found in local cuisine, although this does not necessarily make them spicy.(Holidays and festivalsFile:Ke Lok Si Illuminations 01.JPG|thumb|left|altTemple at night illuminated with light from decorations|South-East Asias Largest Temple- Lok Si in Penang being illuminated in preparation for the Lunar New Year.Malaysians observe a number of holidays and festivities throughout the year. Some are federally gazetted holidays and some are observed by individual states. Other festivals are observed by particular ethnic or religion groups, and the main holiday of each major group have been declared a public holiday. The most observed national holiday is Merdeka (Independence Day) on 31 August, commemorating the independence of the of Malaya in 1957.( Day on 16 September commemorates federation in 1963.() Other notable national holidays are Day (1 May), and the Kings birthday (first week of June).(holidays are prominent as Islam is the state religion; Hari Raya Puasa (also called Hari Raya Aidilfitri, Malay for al-Fitr), Raya Haji (also called Hari Raya Aidiladha, the translation of ul-Adha), Maulidur Rasul (birthday of the Prophet), and others being observed.( Chinese celebrate festivals such as New Year and others relating to traditional Chinese beliefs. Hindus in Malaysia celebrate Deepavali, the festival of lights,( while Thaipusam is a religious rite which sees pilgrims from all over the country converge at the Caves.() Malaysias Christian community celebrates most of the holidays observed by Christians elsewhere, most notably Christmas and Easter. East Malaysians also celebrate a harvest festival known as Gawai.() Despite most of the festivals being identified with a particular ethnic or religious group, celebrations are participated by all Malaysians in a custom known as open house.()SportsPopular sports in Malaysia include soccer, badminton, hockey, bowling, tennis, squash, arts, riding, sailing, and boarding.( Badminton matches attract thousands of spectators, and Malaysia, along with Indonesia and China, has consistently held the Cup since 1948.() The Malaysian Lawn Bowls Federation (PLBM) was registered in 1997.() Squash was brought to the country by members of the British army, with the first competition being held in 1939. The Squash Racquets Association of Malaysia was created on 25 June 1972.()  Malaysia has proposed a Southeast Asian football league.() The mens national field hockey team ranked 15th in the world as of August 2010.() The 3rd World Cup was hosted at Stadium in Kuala Lumpur, as well as the 10th cup.() The country also has its own One trackthe International Circuit. It runs for , and held its first Grand Prix in 1999.()The Federation of Malaya Olympic Council was formed in 1953, and received recognition by the IOC in 1954. It first participated in the 1956 Melbourne Olympic Games. The council was renamed the Council of Malaysia in 1964, and has participated in all but one Olympic games since its inception. The largest number of athletes ever sent to the Olympics was 57 to the Munich Olympic Games.() Malaysian athletes have won a total of four Olympic medals, all of which are in badminton.() The country has competed at the Games since 1950 as Malaya, and 1966 as Malaysia, and the games were hosted in Kuala Lumpur in 1998.()()MediaMalaysias main newspapers are owned by the government and political parties in the ruling coalition,() although some major opposition parties also have their own.( A divide exists between the media in the two halves of the country. Peninsular-based media gives low priority to news from the East, and often treats the eastern states as colonies of the Peninsula.( The media has been blamed for increasing tension between Indonesia and Malaysia, and giving Malaysians a bad image of Indonesians.() Besides Malay newspapers, there are large circulation of English, Chinese, and Tamil dailies in the country.(There is very little of the press, leading to very little government accountability.() The government has previously tried to crack down on opposition papers before elections when they were unsure of their political situation.() In 2007, a government agency issued a directive to all private television and radio stations to refrain from broadcasting speeches made by opposition leaders,() a move condemned by politicians from the opposition Action Party.() Sabah, where only one tabloid is not independent of government control, has the freest press in Malaysia.() Legislation such as the Presses and Publications Act have also been cited as curtailing freedom of expression.()Infrastructuredual highway with greenery on either side|The North-South ExpresswayThe infrastructure of Malaysia is one of the most developed in Asia.() Its telecommunications network is second only to Singapores in Southeast Asia, with 4.7 million fixed-line subscribers and more than 30 million cellular subscribers()() The country has seven international ports, the major one being the Klang. There are 200 parks along with specialised parks such as Park Malaysia and Hi-Tech Park.( Fresh water is available to over 95 per cent of the population. During the colonial period, development was mainly concentrated in economically powerful cities and in areas forming security concerns. Although rural areas have been the focus of great development, they still lag behind areas such as the West Coast of Peninsular Malaysia.() The telecommunication network, although strong in urban areas, is less available to the rural population.(Malaysias road network covers  and includes  of expressways.( The longest highway of the country, the North-South Expressway, extends over  between the Thai border and Singapore. The road systems in Sabah and Sarawak are less developed and of lower quality in comparison to that of Malaysia.() Malaysia has 118 airports, of which 38 are paved. The countrys official airline is Airlines, providing international and domestic air service alongside two other carriers. The railway system is state-run, and covers a total of .( Relatively inexpensive elevated Light Rail Transit systems are used in some cities, such as Kuala Lumpur.() The Rail Express is a railway service that connects Kuala Lumpur to Bangkok, and is intended to eventually stretch from Singapore to China.(Traditionally, energy production in Malaysia has been based around oil and natural gas.() The country currently has 13 GW of electrical generation capacity.() However, the country only has 33 years of natural gas reserves, and 19 years of oil reserves, while the demand for energy is increasing. In response, the government is expanding into renewable energy sources.( Currently 16 per cent of electricity generation is hydroelectric, the remaining 84 per cent being thermal.( The oil and gas industry is currently dominated by state owned Petronas,() and the energy sector as a whole is regulated by the Commission of Malaysia, a statutory commission that governs the energy in the peninsula and Sabah, under the terms of the Electricity Commission Act of 2001.()See also*of Malaysia*rankings of Malaysia*Maritime Enforcement Agency*Malaysian Custom*Malaysian Police*2020ReferencesExternal links; Government* myGovernment portal  Malaysian government portal* Office of the Prime Minister of Malaysia* Department of Statistics Malaysia* Chief of State and cabinet members; General information* Malaysia at Britannica* * Malaysia from UCB Libraries GovPubs* * ; Travel* The official e-tourism portal for Ministry of Tourism, Malaysia* * Malaysia tourism boardlist  list  list  ace:Malaysiaaf:Maleisials:Malaysiaam:ar:an:Malaisiafrp:Malsieas:ast:Malasiaaz:Malayziyabn:bjn:Malaysiazh-min-nan:M-li-se-amap-bms:Malaysiabe:be-x-old:bcl:Malasyabo:bs:Malezijabr:Malaysiabg:ca:Malisiacv:ceb:Malaysiacs:Malajsiecy:Malaysiada:Malaysiade:Malaysiadv:nv:Malzhadsb:Malayzijadz:et:Malaisiael:es:Malasiaeo:Malajzioext:Malsiaeu:Malaysiafa:hif:Malaysiafr:Malaisiefy:MaleizjeMhalaeisiaValaysiagag:Malayziyagd:Malaidhsia- Malaysiagan:gu:hak:M-li-s-ko:haw:Malaisiahy:hi:hsb:Malajzijahr:Malezijaio:Malaiziailo:Malaysiabpy:id:Malaysiaia:Malaysiaie:Malaysiaos:is:Malasait:Malesiahe:jv:Malaysiakn:pam:Malaysiaka:ks:kk:kw:Malaysirw:Malesiyaky:sw:Malaysiakv:ht:Maleziku:Malezyalo:la:Malaesialv:Malaizijalb:Malaysialt:Malaizijalij:Malaysiali:Maleisijbo:mejguelmo:Malaysiahu:Malajziamk:mi:Marhiaml:mt:Malajami:Marhiamr:arz:ms:Malaysiamn:my:nah:Malasiana:Maraidjanl:Maleisine:ja:pih:Melasyano:Malaysiann:Malaysianov:Malaysiaoc:Malisiamhr:uz:Malayziyapa:pnb:pap:Malaysiakm:pms:Malaysiands:Malaysiapl:Malezjapt:Malsiakbd:crh:Malayziyaro:Malaeziaqu:Malasyaru:sah:se:Malesiasa:sg:Malezisco:Malaysiesq:Malajziascn:Malesiasimple:Malaysiass:IMaleshiyask:Malajziasl:Malezijaszl:Malezyjoso:Malaysiyackb:sr:sh:Malezijasu:Malaysiafi:Malesiasv:Malaysiatl:Malasyata:tt:te:tet:Malziath:tg:tr:Malezyaudm:bug:Malaysiauk:ur:ug:za:Majlaizsihyavi:Malaysiavo:Malaysiynfiu-vro:Malaisiazh-classical:war:Malaysiawo:Maleesiwuu:yi:yo:Malaysiazh-yue:diq:Malzyabat-smg:Malaizjzh:
3614213
Milirrpum_v_Nabalco_Pty_Ltd
Milirrpum v Nabalco Pty Ltd, (1971) 17 FLR 141 (the Gove land rights case), was the first litigation on title in Australia. The decision of Justice Blackburn  ruled against the claimants on a number of issues of law and fact, rejecting the doctrine of title in favor of nullius.Although Milirrpum was not appealed beyond the Court of the Northern Territory, it was overruled by the Court of Australia two decades later in v Queensland (No 2) (1992).Blackburn, in a confidential memorandum to the government and opposition, opined that a system of Aboriginal land rights was morally right and socially expedient.(National Archives of Australia, confidential memorandum provided to government and opposition by Justice Blackburn urging the establishment of a statutory system of land rights, 1972, released 31 Dec 2001) The judgement concludes: I cannot help being specially conscious that for the plaintiffs it is a matter in which their personal feelings are involved.((1971) 71 FLR 141 at 293.)BackgroundIn December 1968, the Yolngu people living in Yirrkala, who were the traditional owners of the Peninsula in Land, obtained writs in the Court of the Northern Territory against the Nabalco Corporation, which had secured a twelve-year bauxite mining lease from the Federal Government. Their goal was to establish in law their rightful claim to their homelands. The Yolngu people claimed they enjoyed legal and sovereign rights over their land and sought declarations to occupy the land free from interference pursuant to their title rights.The Yolngu people had petitioned the House of Representatives in August 1963 with a bark petition after the government sold part of the Land reserve on 13 March of that year to a bauxite mining company. The government had not consulted the traditional owners at the time.Yolngu applicants asserted before the Court that since time immemorial, they held a communal native title that had not been validly extinguished, or acquired under the Lands Acquisition Act 1955 (Cwth), and should be recognized as an enforceable proprietary right. The lengthy legal battle culminated in 1971.(Foley, Gary Teaching the whites a lesson in Staining the wattle  (ed) Very Burgmann and Jenny Lee Ringwood; Penguin, 1988 p203) RulingJustice Blackburn found that the Yolngu people could not prevent mining on their lands. He categorically held that native title was not part of the law of Australia and went on to add that even had it existed, any native title rights were extinguished.Blackburn rejected the claim on the bases that:*A doctrine of common law title had no place in a settled colony except under express statutory provisions (i.e. the recognition doctrine).*Under the recognition doctrine, pre-existing interests were not recognised unless they were rights of private property and, while the community possessed a legal system, it was not proved that under that legal system, the claimant clans possessed such rights.*The clans relationship to land was therefore not a right  in connection with the land under the Lands Acquisition Act.*On the balance of probabilities, the applicants had not shown that their ancestors, in 1788 had the same links to the same areas of land that they were now claiming.Blackburn examined comparative Commonwealth, Canadian, New Zealand and US jurisprudence. He accepted that the applicants had established that under traditional law any given part of the land could be attributed  to a particular clan, but held that this did not amount to a proprietary interest.  He also found that the evidence did not establish the landholding model asserted. Blackburn acknowledged for the first time in an Australian higher court the existence of a system of law. He also recognised the validity of the use of evidence to establish rights, normally inadmissible, but a vital precondition for a successful land rights case, and he also acknowledged the claimants ritual and economic use of the land.AftermathMilirrpum led to the establishment of Woodward Royal Commission and the eventual recognition of Aboriginal Land rights in the Territory. In 1975, shortly before he was dismissed, Prime Minister Whitlam drew up the Land Rights Act 1976 which was later passed (in a slightly diluted form) by the conservative Government on 9 December 1976.The court interpreter for the case was  Yunupingu, the son of a Gumatj clan leader, Munggurrawuy, who was one of the Yirrkala plaintiffs. Galarrwuy had earlier helped his father draft the bark petitions. He later became chairman of the Land Council and in 1978 became of the Year for his work on rights.References
3616717
Sago_Mine_disaster
The Sago Mine disaster was a mine explosion on January 2, 2006, in the Sago Mine in West Virginia, USA near the Upshur County seat of Buckhannon. The blast and ensuing aftermath trapped 13 miners for nearly two days with only one miner surviving. It was the worst mining disaster in the United States since the Walter Resources Mine Disaster in Alabama on September 23, 2001,(Jim Walter Resources Mine Disaster archive at United Mine Rescue Association webpage accessed November 12, 2008)(Aram Roston, Fire in the Hole, Mother Jones, September/October 2002, accessed November 12, 2008.) killed 13 people, and the worst disaster in West Virginia since the 1968 Mine Disaster that killed 78 people.The disaster received extensive news coverage in the media worldwide.(Matthew Davis, US mining safety under scrutiny) After mining officials released incorrect information, many media outlets, including the York Times reported that 12 survivors had been found alive, when, in fact, only one of the thirteen trapped miners survived.(James Dao, 12 Miners Found Alive 41 Hours After Explosion)BackgroundMine ownershipAnker West Virginia Mining is listed as the permittee for the Sago Mine. Testifying before MSHA on March 23, 2006, Vice President Sam Kitts described the corporate structure as follows, Sago is part of Wolf Run Mining Company, which is a subsidiary of Hunter Ridge Mining Company. Hunter Ridge is a subsidiary of ICG, Inc.() Coal Group, Inc.(International Coal Group, Inc) was formed in May 2004 by investor Ross, who led a group that bought many of Horizon Natural Resources assets in a bankruptcy auction. The company produces coal from 12 mining complexes in Northern and Central Appalachia (Kentucky, Maryland, and West Virginia) and from one complex in the Illinois basin.Ross, originally operating as Newcoal LLC with four other investors, expressed interest in buying Horizons nonunion properties, but not its six union operations. According to the Associated Press, Horizon was then allowed to sever its union contracts, including pension benefits, by bankruptcy court.() In March 2005, ICG agreed to buy Anker Coal Group, Inc.(ICG Reports 3rd Quarter Results)Prior inspection historyIn 2005, the mine was cited by the federal Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) 208 times for violating regulations, up from 68 in 2004. Of those, 96 were considered S&S (significant / serious and substantial).(Go here and use 4608791 for the mine ID number.)The Gazette said Sago mine has history of roof falls. MSHA found 52 violations from April to June, of which 31 were serious and substantial (S&S). From early July to late September, MSHA found 70 violations, 42 of which were S&S. MSHA inspections from early October to late December resulted in 46 citations and three orders, 18 of which were S&S. Violations include failure to follow the approved roof control and mine ventilation plans and problems concerning emergency escapeways and required pre-shift safety examinations. The Gazette article explained that S&S violations are those that MSHA believes are likely to cause an accident that would seriously injure a miner. Originally MSHA reported on its website that none of the violations were considered immediate risk of injury and that all but three violations, related to shoring up the roof, were corrected by the time of the accident. But the current posting says, Of the 208 citations, orders and safeguards issued in 2005, several involved significant violations that were the result of high negligence and MSHA ordered that mining cease in the affected area until the unsafe condition was addressed.(Sago Mine Accident - General Questions and Answers (Posted January 21, 2006) Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) U.S. Department of Labor) However, fewer than half of the overall citations against Sago Mine in 2005 were for significant and substantial violationsand all but eight of the overall citations have been corrected by the operator. The eight remaining issues were being abated by the operator in compliance with the abatement provisions of the Mine Act. Mining operations at the Sago Mine more than doubled between 2004 and 2005, and the injury rate was significantly above the national average. This prompted MSHA to dramatically increaseby 84%its on-site inspection and enforcement presence. As a result, MSHA also took significantly more enforcement actions208 in totalagainst Sago Mine in 2005, requiring the operator to quickly correct health and safety violations in accordance with federal Mine Act standards.( Davitt McAteer, MSHA chief during the Clinton administration told The Gazette, The numbers dont sound good....are sufficiently high that it should tip off management that there is something amiss here. For a small operation, that is a significant number of violations. McAteer said the roof fall frequency suggests that the roof is bad and that the support system is not meeting the needs of the roof.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+Mine+Disaster/2006010212?pt0) Additionally, West Virginias Office of Miners Health, Safety and Training issued 144 citations over that year, up from 74 the previous year.On January 3, 2006, Bruce Watzman of the Mining Association, interviewed by Tom Foreman for Cooper 360, was asked whether any of the violations leaps out at you as endangering miners lives? Watzman explained that they could be paperwork errors or reporting errors. A lot of violations, but many of which were not significant to really impact miner safety.() By contrast, a report in Science Monitor on January 6, 2006, quotes McAteer as saying Sago raises red flags for mine oversight ... If you have a widespread practice of S&S violations over an extended period of time like we have here, it suggests that youve got much more serious problems than just paperwork violations.(Sago raises red flags for mine oversight | csmonitor.com) Relying on MSHA records, Ellen Smith, the editor of Mine Safety and Health News, comments on her publications website in an article, Sago Mine Facts, Sagos accident rate was 17.04 for 2005, with 16 miners and contractors injured on the job. Sagos accident rate was 15.90 in 2004 when the national average was 5.66. Compare this accident rate to another small mine in West Virginia, Kingston Mining No. 1 Mine, which had an accident rate of 1.21 in 2005.(http://www.minesafety.com/pages/sagominefacts.html)ExplosionDescription and early theories of causeThe explosion occurred at approximately 6:30 a.m. ET at the beginning of the first shift after the mine reopened after the New Years holiday weekend. An examination conducted at 5:50 am by a mine fire boss had cleared the mine for use. Two carts of miners were making their way into the mine to begin work.(Ken Ward, Jr. and Scott Finn 13 miners trapped: Rescue effort underway after Upshur mine blast)Early reports noted that there was a thunderstorm in the area at the time and suggested a lightning strike near the mine entrance may have ignited methane, but no one reported seeing such a strike. Sensors from the U.S. National Lightning Detection Network indicated at least two cloud-to-ground lightning strikes near the mine. Another early theory was that lightning struck a methane well that had previously been drilled from the surface to an area behind the seals. Methane wells are used to extract methane from seams and sometimes from sealed areas when methane levels are high.Storm systems are accompanied by low atmospheric pressure, which causes more methane to escape from coal seams and sealed areas. In winter the air is drier and less dense and creates a drier mine environment. Such conditions have been known to contribute to past mine fires and explosions. Other factors affecting methane liberation include whether the mine ventilation system is exhausting (negative pressure) or blowing (positive pressure), and the operating pressures of the fans.Fourteen men on the second cart escaped the initial explosion. The 12 trapped miners were on the first cart, which apparently passed the point where the explosion occurred. The foreman on the second cart, whose brother was among those trapped, the mine superintendent and three others entered the mine to rescue the trapped miners. They reached  into the mine before quality detectors indicated there was too much monoxide to proceed. In addition, repairs they had made to ventilation controls raised fears that increased fresh air to the interior of the mine may cause a second explosion.RescueIt was reported that the early hours after the blast were chaotic and the mining company did not call a specialized mine rescue crew until 8:04 a.m.  more than 90 minutes after the blast. The company notified the Federal Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) at 8:30. The company said it started its calls at 7:40. MSHA records two calls at 8:10 to personnel who were out of town due to the holiday. MSHA arrived on site at approximately 10:30 am. The first rescue crew arrived ten minutes later.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+Mine+Disaster/2006011415)High levels of monoxide (CO) and methane gas in the mine atmosphere made it necessary for rescuers to wait 12 hours after the explosion to begin to reach the miners. Tests taken through holes drilled from the surface showed that the air near where the miners were last known to be stationed contained 1,300 parts per million of CO. More than 200 parts per million is considered unsafe.(http://money.aol.com/news/articles?idn20060103140209990009&cid1222) However, each miner had a Self-Contained Self-Rescuer (SCSR) device that provided one hour of breathable air. Emergency supplies were stored in drums (205 L drums) within the mine.Even after the gases abated, rescue teams had to proceed with caution, continually testing for hazards such as water seeps, explosive gas concentrations, and unsafe roof conditions. This limited their rate of progress to  an hour. They checked in every , and then disconnected their telephones until the next checkpoint in order to avoid the possibility of a spark creating another explosion. MSHA had deployed a 1,300-lb. (520 kg) robot into the mine as well, but pulled it out after it became mired  from the mine entrance.After more than nine hours of searching, rescue teams pulled out of the mine at about 3:40 a.m. Tuesday, January 3. Through an agency spokeswoman, Bob Friend of MSHA said the teams were withdrawn when they discovered that the mines atmospheric monitoring system was still running. Due to the air quality in the mine, power to the system could have caused another explosion according to safety experts. Also, a borehole being drilled to check the mines air quality was nearing the mine roof. The bit and steel being used was not equipped to use water, which meant the bit was hot and could ignite an explosive mixture of methane, Friend told a reporter from the West Virginia Gazette. Rescue teams returned to the mine 6:22 a.m.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/News/2006011415)Locating the trapped minersThe 13 trapped miners were about  inside the mine at approximately  below ground. Five four-man teams tried to make their way through the entries, which were  high. By 12:40 p.m. on January 3, they had reached  into the mine. It was believed that the trapped miners were somewhere between  from the entrance.Two  holes were drilled from the surface into areas where the miners were believed to be; microphones and cameras lowered into them for ten-minute periods did not find any signs of life. Air quality tests performed through the first hole on the morning of January 3 indicated that carbon monoxide (CO) levels in that part of the mine were at 1,300 parts per million. Officials called this very discouraging. A third hole encountered groundwater and could not be drilled all the way down. However, the miners were trained to find a safe part of the mine and barricade themselves into it in the event of an explosion or collapse. Experts expected that a third hole, if successful, could expand the opening and provide a better way of rescuing the miners than proceeding into the mine. Miners are required to carry a SCSR that provides a one-hour supply of oxygen for evacuation. The first hint of the miners status came around 5:00 p.m. on January 3 when it was reported that a body had been found. Because of the location of the body, those familiar with the miners and their jobs believed it was the boss, Terry Helms. Hours later, just before midnight, rumours spread quickly that 12 of the 13 miners had been found alive.() Thirty minutes later, the rescue team told company officials that the original report was incorrect.In the early morning of January 4, 41 hours after the incident began, 12 of the miners were found dead. Randal L. McCloy, Jr. was found alive, but in critical condition. The remaining miners were found at the working face of the second left portion of the mine, some  from the mine entrance, behind a rough barricade structure, as described by Hatfield.() This is the same area where drillings indicated high carbon monoxide levels.About three hours after the reports, company CEO Hatfield confirmed that McCloy was the only survivor. This was the first official report from the company since the victims were found.() Soon after the first reports of survivors, ambulances and the hospital room were on standby. Hatfield said that carbon monoxide levels in the area where the miners were found was in the range of 300400 ppm when the rescue team arrived. This is near the safe threshold level to support life for 15 minutes. He said that carbon monoxide poisoning was the likely cause of death.Our intentions are to do the right thing and protect our people the best we can, Hatfield said. Federal and state mining officials will conduct a thorough investigation of the accident with full company support.Sole survivors account of explosionThe only survivor, Randal McCloy Jr., wrote a letter to the families of the victims, which was published in the Gazette on April 28, 2006. McCloy wrote that three weeks before the explosion, he and Junior Toler found, while drilling a bolt hole, a gas pocket, which detectors confirmed the presence of methane. We immediately shut down the roof bolter, and the incident was reported up the line to our superiors. I noticed the following day that the gas leak had been plugged with glue normally used to secure the bolts.He remembered that on January 2, 2006, just after exiting the mantrip, the mine filled quickly with fumes and thick smoke and that breathing conditions were nearly unbearable.... At least four of the rescuers emergency oxygen packs were not functioning. I shared my rescuer with Jerry Groves, while Toler, Jesse Jones and Tom Anderson sought help from others. There were not enough rescuers to go around. Because of the bad air, they had to abandon our escape attempt and return to the coal rib, where we hung a curtain to try to protect ourselves. The curtain created an enclosed area of about 35 feet.They attempted to signal our location to the surface by beating on the mine bolts and plates. We found a sledgehammer, and for a long time we took turns pounding away. We had to take off the rescuers in order to hammer as hard as we could. This effort caused us to breathe much harder. We never heard a responsive blast or shot from the surface.After becoming exhausted, they stopped trying to signal. The air behind the curtain grew worse, so I tried to lie as low as possible and take shallow breaths... I could tell that it was gassy. According to McCloy, Toler and Anderson tried to find a way out. The heavy smoke and fumes caused them to quickly return. There was just so much gas. At that point the miners, despite their fears, began to accept our fate. Toler led us all in the Prayer. We prayed a little longer, then someone suggested that we each write letters to our loved ones.McCloy became very dizzy and lightheaded. Some drifted off into what appeared to be a deep sleep, and one person sitting near me collapsed and fell off his bucket, not moving. It was clear that there was nothing I could do to help him. The last person I remember speaking to was Jackie Weaver, who reassured me that if it were our time to go, then Gods will would be fulfilled. As my trapped co-workers lost consciousness one by one, the room grew still and I continued to sit and wait, unable to do much else. I have no idea how much time went by before I also passed out from the gas and smoke, awaiting rescue.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+Mine+Disaster/2006042748)On January 5, notes written by some of the deceased miners were submitted to family members.Early response of government officialsWest Virginia Governor Manchin arrived at the Sago site on January 2. Congresswoman Moore Capito was also among the officials that joined the family members at the scene. The Mine Safety and Health Administration had approximately 25 people on the scene at any given time, according to the Agencys Web site.Mine closureOn March 11, 2006, Press reported that federal inspectors had approved the Sago mine for reopening the previous day.(Vicki Smith Mine reopens except for site of fatal blast, Associated Press March 11, 2006)On March 16, 2006, Voice reported that the mine reopened March 15, 2006. He  criticized, So, not knowing what caused the explosion, or whether the mine remains vulnerable to that kind of accident, the mine owners started operations again as the federal and state safety officials stood by.(March 16, 2006, Voice, James Ridgeway, Few Answers as Sago Mine Reopens) ICG closed the mine on March 19, 2007.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+%3CBR%3EMine+Disaster/2007032118) On December 12, 2008, they announced on their website they would be closing it permanently.Investigation by the West Virginia governmentWV Governor Manchin announced on January 9 that he had appointed J. Davitt McAtteer, assistant secretary for the U.S. Mine Safety and Health Administration during the Clinton administration to oversee a state probe of the disaster.( Mine safety probe: Ex MSHA chief to oversee investigation, Ken Ward Jr., The Charleston Gazette, January 10, 2006) The Charleston Gazette named the committee to the Sago probe as including former miner Caputo, D-Marion; Eustace Frederick, D-Mercer; and Bill Hamilton, R-Upshur; and Sens. Jeff Kessler, D-Marshall; Shirley Love, D-Fayette; and Don Caruth, R-Mercer.( 6 legislators named to Sago probe, Scott Finn, Charleston Gazette, January 12, 2006)On March 1, 2006, Governor Manchin announced the March 14, 2006, hearing had been rescheduled for May 2, delayed at the request of several family members of miners who died in the disaster. McAteer said the complex investigation warranted a careful and thorough investigation only with all the facts.(news release entitled Public Hearings On Sago Mine Tragedy Set for May 2, March 1, 2006) McAteer would moderate the joint federal-state hearing to be held on the campus of West Virginia Wesleyan College in Buckhannon, to include a panel of Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA), the West Virginia Office of Miners Health, Safety & Training (WVMHST), state, labor and industry officials. Manchin said, Im confident that Mays public hearings will be very useful in providing crucial information to the families of these fallen miners. McAteer said MSHA and the state Office of Miners Health, Safety and Training have agreed to publish transcripts of the so far secret interviews in the federal investigation before the May 2 hearing.The commission released its preliminary report on the Sago disaster on July 19, 2006.(Wheeling Jesuit University - Life, Leadership, Service)Investigation by the U.S. Department of LaborOn January 4, 2006, U.S. Secretary of Labor L. Chao, announced that the Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) would launch a full investigation to determine the cause, and to take the necessary steps to ensure that this never happens again.(http://www.dol.gov/opa/media/press/opa/OPA20060004.htm OPA News Release: Statement of U.S. Secretary of Labor Elaine L. Chao On the West Virginia Mine Incident 01/04/2006) The MSHA issued its own release announcing an independent eight-member team that would conduct the investigation including the cause of the explosion, compliance with regulations and the handling of information on the trapped miners condition. The team would examine the site, interview mine personnel and others with information, review records and plans, inspect any equipment involved and issue any citations for violations. The MHSA site reiterated its team will be headed up by a senior MSHA safety professional who has not been part of the initial inspection and enforcement efforts.(http://www.msha.gov/sagomine/SagoQA01052006.asp) On January 9, 2006, David G. Dye, acting assistant Secretary of Labor for Mine Safety and Health, announced that MSHA joins Governor Manchin and the State of West Virginia in announcing that we will conduct a joint investigation into the Sago Mine disaster, which will include a joint public hearing. West Virginia has its own mine safety inspection and enforcement agency, and we want to coordinate closely to ensure that our investigation is thorough and complete...Our full investigative report will also be made available to the families and the public.(Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) - News Release: 01/09/2006 - MSHA Announces Joint Investigation and a Public Hearing in Sago Mine Accident Investigation)It was announced that Richard A. Gates, MSHA district manager in Alabama, would head the team of technical experts. Others would be ventilation experts John Urosek and Richard Stoltz, ventilation supervisor Dennis Swentosky; electrical supervisor Robert Bates, field office supervisor Joseph ODonnell, engineer Clete Stephan, and special investigator Gary Harris.(http://www.dol.gov/opa/media/press/msha/MSHA20060018.htm MSHA News Release: Federal Mine Safety Agency Launches Accident Investigation 01/04/2006) UMWA participationOn January 18, 2006, mine owner International Coal Group (ICG) issued a press release objecting to UMWA participation in the investigation, accusing the union of attempting to manipulate a provision of the federal regulations, and seeking to interfere with the investigation in order to exploit the tragedy for its own purposes.() UMWA International President Cecil Roberts responded denying manipulation, saying instead that it was fulfilling its responsibility under the MSHA regulations. It counteraccused ICG of attempting to get the identities of the miners who designated the UMWA as their representative. It questioned why they needed to know that, and what they would do with that information.(http://www.umwa.org/pressreleases/pressmain.shtml)MSHA filed a motion in federal court to allow UMWA participation and according to Associated Press writer Vicki Smith in her January 26, 2006, story, Judge says Union can be part of Mine Probe, U.S. District Judge Robert E. Maxwell ordered ICG to allow UMW officials from entering the mine, saying Theres no question that the public interest is best served by a complete and thorough investigation into the occurrence of the problems at the Sago Mine....There is a strong public interest in allowing miners to play a role in this investigation, as it is their health and safety that is at issue.( ) On January 27, 2006, ICG stated its intention to appeal.()MSHA Freedom of Information Act Disclosure PolicyThe Sago Mine Disaster brought public attention to criticism of the of Information Act (FOIA) policy first raised by Ellen Smith, editor of Mine Safety and Health News in her July 16, 2004, editorial, Assault on Freedom of Information: The Public Has A Right to Know How Decisions Are Made.(http://www.minesafety.com/pages/editorialjuly1604.html)She reported complaints from the UMWA for over a year, from mine operators and by her paper that they could no longer get information from MSHA though the FOIA. She stated that the previous week, Ed Clair, the U.S. Labor Departments Associate Solicitor for Mine Safety and Health, disclosed that, without public comment or input, MSHA secretly changed its long-standing policy of routinely releasing inspector notes under the Freedom of Information Act. The prior policy had been in effect since the Mine Act of 1977.She continued, Now, the public will no longer be able to get MSHA inspector notes from a mine inspection, unless the operator or miner is willing to go through legal proceedings and the discovery process. Under this new policy, the press is certainly excluded from these notes, miners may be as well, and it certainly hampers an operators ability to resolve many MSHA enforcement disputes without litigation.On January 11, 2006, Representative Henry A. Waxman (D-CA) asked Labor Secretary Chao to reverse MSHAs 2004 decision to exclude mine safety inspectors notes in FOIA responses, citing how the agencys secrecy policy limited disclosure about safety violations at the Sago mine for years before the recent disaster.(Labor Department Policy Suppressing Mine Inspection Reports Impedes Reform:: Committee on Oversight and Government Reform:: United States House of Representatives)On January 20, 2006, Education and the Workforce Committee Chairman Boehner (R-OH), Workforce Protections Subcommittee Chairman Charlie Norwood (R-GA) and Shelley Moore Capito (R-WV), sent a letter to Chao, also requesting a reversal.According to a news release by Boehner, on January 30, 2006, Acting Assistant Secretary for Mine Health and Safety David G. Dye wrote, I have recently concluded that, given MSHAs unique statutory framework, inspector notes should generally be released once a citation has been issued (or an inspection is closed without citations), rather than withholding the notes until all litigation is concluded. The policy will be effectiveimmediately.(Labor Department Makes FOIA Policy Change Regarding Mine Investigations)Transcripts of interviewsTranscripts of 70 closed-door interviews of Sago miners, mine managers, mine rescue team members and state and federal mine safety inspectors, conducted over the period from January 17, 2006, to April 5, 2006, are available at both the Charleston Gazette(http://www.wvgazette.com/static/sago/) and the West Virginia Office of Miners Health, Safety and Training(Sago Mine Accident Report) websites. As of April 28, MSHA had not posted the interviews on its site.Transcripts were made public only after The Gazette filed a Freedom of Information Act request for the documents and posted the documents to its website on April 16, 2006. At first, state officials released a limited number of the transcripts, but then made others widely available after the Gazette obtained them and posted them on the Internet, reported Gazette reporter Ken Ward, Jr. in his April 22, 2006, story, Details of ICGs inquiry into Sago disaster sought.During his interview with government investigators on March 23, 2006, ICG Vice President Sam Kitts repeatedly refused to discuss the companys investigation. His Lexington, Kentucky attorney, Maraco M. Rajkovich,who also represented several other ICG employees during the interviews, said ICG had not authorized Kitts to answer questions about the investigation. Rajkovich said he did not know who was authorized to answer such questions.(MSHA publishes details of public hearingIn an April 13, 2006, Federal Register notice, MSHA said state and federal officials would question witnesses at the Sago public hearing. A representative of the Sago victims families will be able to submit questions for witnesses.(WAIS Document Retrieval)ICG refuses to release recordsIn that same April 22, 2006, Gazette story, Details of ICGs inquiry into Sago disaster sought, staff writer Ken Ward, Jr., reported that investigators from MSHA and the West Virginia Office of Miners Health, Safety and Training were negotiating with International Coal Group (ICG) to release companys internal investigation, as well as testimony, for a Manchin administration public hearing on the Sago disaster scheduled to start May 2, 2006, at West Virginia Wesleyan College in Buckhannon.We certainly want to see what they have, said Bob Friend, acting deputy assistant secretary of labor for the U.S. Mine Safety and Health Administration.Office of the Solicitor, Division of Mine Safety and HealthAttorneys James Crawford, Tim Williams and Bob Wilson will assist in the investigation according to MSHAs January 4, 2006, release available on the website.(Investigation by the U.S. SenateOn January 9, 2006, on his congressional website, the Senate Appropriations Committee: Labor, Heath Human Services and Education Subcommittees ranking Democrat, West Virginia Senator Byrd, announced a January 19, 2006, hearing, crediting Senator Specter (R-PA), and Iowa Senator Harkin, ranking Democrat on the subcommittee, for their help in its scheduling.The families of the Sago miners deserve to know what happened in that mine, Byrd said. Just as importantly, miners and their families across this country want to know that steps are being taken to prevent others from ever experiencing such pain.(Senator Byrd - Virtual Newsroom)He added, The investigation at the Upshur County mine will tell us what caused that deadly explosion. But one conclusion is already evident: its time for the decisions affecting Americas miners to be made with their best interests at heart. That should be the legacy of the Sago miners::In Congress, there are tough questions to be asked of the federal Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA). Is enforcement of coal mining regulations tough enough? Are the regulations on the books today current enough to handle the challenges posed by 21st century coal mining? Are mine hazards being minimized? These and other issues demand scrutiny, and the miners families deserve the answers.On January 13, on its website, the committee issued a notice of the subcommittee meeting. Federal witnesses would be Acting Assistant Secretary of Labor for Mine Safety and Health David Dye, Deputy Assistant Secretary for Mine Safety and Health Bob Friend, Coal Mine Safety and Health Administrator Ray McKinney and Mine Safety and Health Associate Solicitor, Edward Claire. Industry witnesses will be International Coal Group (ICG) President and CEO Ben Hatfield, West Virginia Coal Association Senior Vice President Chris Hamilton and National Mining Association Vice President for Safety and Health Bruce Watzman. West Virginia witness will be investigation leader Davitt McAteer. Labor witness will be UMWA International President Cecil Roberts.(http://appropriations.senate.gov/releases/record.cfm?id250428)On January 18, 2006, on its website, the committee rescheduled the hearing for January 23, 2006. The witness list remained the same.(The Republican members of the subcommittee were Arlen Specter (Chairman) (PA), Thad Cochran (MS), Judd Gregg (NH), Larry Craig (ID), Kay Bailey Hutchison (TX), Ted Stevens (AK), Mike DeWine (OH) and Richard Shelby (AL). The Democratic members were Tom Harkin (Ranking Member) (IA), Daniel Inouye (HI), Harry Reid (NV), Senator Herb Kohl (WI), Patty Murray (WA), Mary Landrieu (LA), Richard Durbin (IL).The written versions of testimony from the hearings were posted on the Appropriations Committee website.* Ben Hatfield of ICG* Bruce Watzman of the National Mining Association* Cecil Roberts of the UMWA* Chris Hamilton of the West Virginia Coal Association* David Dye of MSHA* Davitt McAteer of the West Virginias Governors investigationSecond investigation by the U.S. SenateIn a January 10, 2006, letter found on his website, Senator Rockefeller (D-WV) wrote Senate Health, Education, Labor, and Pensions (HELP) Committee chairman Enzi (R-WY) and ranking Democrat, M. Kennedy (MA). Also signing the letter were coal state senators Byrd (D-WV), Santorum (R-PA), Sarbanes (D-MD), Richard Durbin (D-IL), Shelby (R-AL), Bayh (D-IN), Obama (D-IL), Bunning (R-KY), Salazar (D-CO), McConnell (R-KY), and Lugar (R-IN). In a press release about the letter, Rockefeller stated,We need to know why the administration thinks that it can carry out a policy where it is committing fewer and fewer resources to meet an industry that has more and more needs.We need congressional hearings not only so that we can determine what happened at Sago, but, more broadly, about the state of mine safety across West Virginia and across the country.()Enzi held a confirmation hearing January 31, 2006, for Bushs nominee to head the Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA), Stickler. He announced he had written a January 5, 2006, letter to Labor Secretary Elaine L. Chao requesting regular and comprehensive briefings on the progress and preliminary findings of the MSHA investigation. and enforcement efforts at the Sago mine.Enzi held an oversight hearing March 2, 2006, into safety procedures and enforcement measures related to the disaster.(Welcome - U.S. Senate Committee on Health, Education, Labor and Pensions)Investigation by the U.S. House of RepresentativesOn January 4, 2006, Representatives George Miller (D-CA) and Owens (D-NY) wrote a letter posted on Millers website to House Education and Workforce Committee: Workforce Protections Subcommittee Chairman Boehner (R-OH) asking for a hearing, saying Congress had abdicated its oversight responsibilities on worker safety issues, while the Bush administration filled worker safety agencies with industry insiders.On January 5, 2006, Representative Moore Capito (R-WV) wrote Chairman Boehner requesting him to schedule a hearing at the earliest possible date and posted the letter on her congressional website.(http://capito.house.gov/press_office/detail-page.aspx?id125&whichonepr)The chairman, along with subcommittee member Norwood (R-GA), issued a statement posted on the committees website, We expect MSHA to produce a thorough account of the events that occurred before, during, and after this tragedy, and the Committee will closely monitor this investigation to ensure its timely completion. Following a full accounting of the facts, the Committee will examine the results of the investigation and determine what appropriate steps may be necessary to ensure a similar tragedy never happens again.(Press Release - Joint Statement from Boehner, Norwood on the Federal Investigation into the Sago Mine Tragedy)Findings to date on possible causesLightning strike and seismic activityWeatherbug, a Germantown, MD-headquartered weather tracking system reported on January 6, 2006, that, the evidence suggests that the lightning strike could have caused the explosion due to the correlation between the timing and location of the lightning strike and seismic activity.The companys equipment detected 100 lightning strikes in the region within 40 minutes of the explosion. A single, powerful lightning strike registered at or near the mouth of the Sago mine at 6:26:36 a.m. This strike held a particularly strong positive charge of 35 kAmps. (A typical strike is 22 to 25 kAmps and relatively rare positive strikes tend to be especially destructive.)Dr. Martin Chapman, PhD, a Virginia Tech research assistant professor, found that two independent sensors recorded a minor seismic event, possibly from the explosion, 2 seconds later at 6:26:38 a.m.(WeatherBug Your Weather Just Got Better)Use of foam rather than concrete sealsIn his January 13, 2006, story in the Charleston Gazette, Sago blast area was recently sealed Ken Ward, Jr., reported that state officials approved the use of Omega blocks, a dense foam product, to seal the mine, rather than the required concrete blocks. Deputy director of the West Virginia Office of Miners Health, Safety and Training told the state board of that group that, the seals, made with foam, could withhold pressures of five pounds per square inch.U.S. Mine Safety and Health Administration rules seals to be built using solid concrete blocks or alternate materials that will withstand 20 pounds per square inch of pressure.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+Mine+Disaster/2006011229)The National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health in its report, Protecting Coal Miners from Gob Explosions through Explosion-Resistant Mine Ventilation Seals (19932005) reported that without reliable seal designs, miners lives could be in jeopardy from the consequences of an underground explosion.NIOSH also noted that in an explosion caused by lightning in a sealed area of the Gary 50 Mine,  thick pumped cement seals tested by NIOSH and approved by MSHA, effectively contained the explosion, thereby sparing the miners working nearby.(NIOSH Mining Program: Intermediate Outcome related to Preventing and Mitigating Mine Fires and Explosions - Protecting Coal Miners from Gob Explosions through Explosion-Resistant Mine Ventilation Seals (19932005) | CDC/NIOSH)Proximity with active gas and oil wellsIn the January 13, 2006,Charleston Gazette story Gas wells near mine, staff writersPaul J. Nyden and Ken Ward Jr. report that according to just released state mine permit records, at least four natural gas wells were in close proximity to the mine. One appeared to be adjacent to the sealed area where the explosion is believed to have occurred.(http://wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+Mine+Disaster/2006011237)Sparks from restarting machinery after holidayOn January 3, 2006, Jeselyn King and Betheny Holstein, writing for the Wheeling Intelligencer had written a story Explosions Cause Remains Unknown. Former MSHA official Davitt McAteer said restarting operations after a holiday weekend may have caused sparks to ignite an excess buildup of methane gas and coal dust in the mine.(News Story - Wheeling Jesuit University)Media coverageNews of the Sago mine explosion first broke widely to television viewers on the cable news channel CNN. At approximately 11:41 a.m. on January 2, during Live Today, anchor Kagan, announced, This just in, news out of West Virginia, an underground explosion at a coal mine there.()Hundreds of media, reporters, camera crews, satellite trucks and photographers descended on the small community, taking over yards and setting up camp outside the Sago Baptist Church and at the mines coal processing plant. Officials had turned a small second-story room there into a make-shift briefing room for the media.CNN with Cooper, News with Rivera and MSNBC with Cosby all broadcast live from Sago throughout the night of January 3 and early morning of January 4 as the story continually changed.Shortly before rumors started spreading that the miners were found alive Tuesday night (and then reversed Wednesday morning), a reporter there posted a description of the scene on his blog, My West Virginia (now defunct):Sago Road, where the mine is, follows the Buckhannon River and a set of railroad tracks. When you arrive just outside the Sago Baptist church, where relatives and friends of the miners have gathered, you see cars. Everywhere, lining the roads, in peoples yards, there are cars as far as you can see. Then, you see satellite trucks and TV crews and reporters and photographers. Theyre also everywhere and you can tell our presence, just under 24 hours at the time, is taking a toll on the small town and the little area weve taken over.Miscommunication and wrong reportsAbout 11:50 p.m. on January 3, news services including the Press and Reuters reported that 12 of the 13 miners had survived, attributing the reports of survivors to the family members. CNN.com and other websites sported headlines including We Got 12 Alive! as well as Believe in Miracles: 12 Miners Found Alive.(12 Miners Found Alive 41 Hours After Explosion, NewYork Times, January 4, 2006)Governor Manchin, who was in the church with the families when the first incorrect reports began to come in, was soon seen outside the church celebrating a miracle. The governor later said that his staff never confirmed that there were survivors, but was euphoric along with the families at what seemed to be remarkable news.Congresswoman Capito appeared on CNN about 1:00 a.m. and said 12 miners had been brought out alive.At about 2:45 a.m., Lynette Roby, a resident of Sago, and her two young children told CNN correspondent Cooper that Hatfield had just told family members in the church that a miscommunication had taken place and only one of the 13 miners had been found alive. The family members reportedly began to shout and call mine officials liars and at least one person in the church had lunged at mine officials.Weeks later, CNNs Kaye told an audience at West Virginia University that she had been listening to Coopers interview from outside the Sago Baptist Church.I heard this unfolding on our air and I must have said something out loud because there was a print photographer standing beside me and he said, Did you just say what I think you said? and I said, I think theres only one alive, the CNHI News Service quoted Kaye as saying.Then one of our producers was screaming in my ear, Get confirmation. Get confirmation, Kaye said.(CNHI News Service Media discuss coverage of the Sago Mine explosion)Hatfield confirmed the miscommunication at a press conference shortly thereafter. Initial information indicated that the miscommunication occurred between the rescue team in the mine and the command center at the surface. According to Hatfield, several personnel at the center were able to simultaneously hear the communications directly from the rescue team. Because of the state regulatory officials on site, both company and state officials, including representatives from the governors office, were present at the command center. Hatfield estimated that 1520 minutes elapsed before they learned that there was in fact a miscommunication.Bad informationThe CEO said he did not know how the reports of 12 survivors spread, and noted that ICG never officially made that statement, calling it bad information that spread like wildfire. He said that the information could have been spread through stray cell phone communication. I have no idea who made that announcement, he said, but it was not an announcement that International Coal Group had authorized.Asked by reporters why the company allowed rumors to circulate for several hours, Hatfield said officials had been trying to clarify and verify information before putting family members on an even worse emotional roller coaster. However, Fox correspondent Hemmer said he was ashamed of how the media repeatedly reported the existence of survivors even as reporters and producers themselves were growing to understand that, in his words, something didnt add up.Hemmer noted that the coal company, which had been quite punctual in its dealings with the media throughout the rescue attempt, had not given any information to corroborate the allegations that 12 miners had been rescued, and that the always-available Manchin was nowhere to be found, yet the cable news channels continued to report the story anyway until doctors in a hospital many miles away stated that they had had no contact with emergency service personnel about any of the miners except for McCloy.Speaking on MSNBCs in the Morning program, Lisa Daniels speculated that erroneous reports about survivors on local radio stations were heard by mine officials, causing them to question the accuracy of their own information stating that 12 of the 13 were dead, which in turn delayed an official announcement. 12 died and one survived.Wrong headlinesMany Wednesday morning newspapers in the United States erroneously reported on their front pages that 12 miners were found alive.() USA Today ran a headline in their East Coast edition that read Alive! Miners beat odds. The printed New York Times attributed its information to the family members, but the Timess website initially displayed a headline that expressed the live rescue as fact. Others, such as the Washington Post, were unclear in their attributions.In a published report on the website of the newspaper trade journal & Publisher, the editor of Inter-Mountain, a local afternoon daily based in West Virginia, blamed the national medias inaccurate reporting on a lack of knowledge of local culture. We get a lot of people here who sometimes believe they have an inside story because they hear it on a police scanner or listen to a conversation, Linda Skidmore said. We know to be cautious of those situations.(null)Media criticism of MSHASome made broader criticisms of how mine safety is handled by the federal government in the aftermath of the disaster; supporters of the Bush administration strongly questioned this criticism.For instance, critics suggested that the severity of the accidents aftermath was related in part to inadequate safety standards endorsed by the MSHA under Lauriski, a mining industry executive appointed to head the agency by W. Bush. On January 6, 2006, Scott Lilly, a columnist for the for American Progress wrote about Lauriski in his article,  MSHA and the Sago Mine Disaster: How Many Brownies are there in this Administration?.(The page you requested has moved) Such criticism was not new; an August 9, 2004, story in the New York Times by Christopher Drew and Richard A. Oppel, Jr., Friends in the White House Come to Coals Aid had summed up Lauriskis record.(Friends in the White House Come to Coals Aid, N.Y. Times, August 9, 2004) Other problems cited included the rejection of a proposed clarification of an existing standard, Escapeways and Refuges, by Lauriskis administration, which requires that a mine shall have two or more separate, properly maintained escapeways to the surface....(Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) - Code of Federal Regulations - 30 CFR 57.11050)A January 5 editorial in New York Times() explicitly linked the safety conditions at the mine to the effects of an industry with pervasive political clout and patronage inroads in government regulatory agencies. It noted that political figures from both parties have long defended and profited from ties to the coal industry, and asserted that the Bush administrations cramming of important posts in the Department of the Interior with biased operatives created doubts about mine safety, singling out Steven Griles, a former mining lobbyist and onetime deputy secretary of the Interior who, The Times alleged devoted four years to rolling back mine regulations. Federal responsibility for enforcing the Federal Safety and Health Act of 1977, which governs the activities of the MSHA, was transferred from the Department of the Interior to the Department of Labor in 1978.(History of Mine Safety and Health Legislation)A second editorial in the Times, on January 6() discussed budget cuts to the MSHA and the Bush administrations ... appointment of a raft of political appointees directly from energy corporations to critical regulatory posts in the context of the disaster, suggesting that the Sago 12 might have survived if government had lived up to its responsibilities.Other commentators, including Scott Shields, a blogger for MyDD,(MyDD:: How Bush Failed the Sago 13) Drum, a blogger for Washington Monthly,(The Washington Monthly) and Sullivan(http://www.andrewsullivan.com/index.php?dish_incarchives/2006_01_01_dish_archive.html#113639674057603002) also linked the presence of Republican-appointed coal mining executives in the MSHA to the tragedy.Spadaro, a former director of the National Mine Health and Safety Academy who was fired after participating as a whistleblower in a prior case involving the MSHA,() made similar statements, referring to the current Bush administrations reluctance to take the strong enforcement action thats sometimes necessary in an appearance on the show & Colmes. Spadaro was criticized as extreme left-wing for his statements by host Hannity.(Crooks and Liars)The MSHA, on a Questions and Answers page( regarding the incident, has strongly disputed many of these criticisms. In particular, the administration noted that the Sago mine was not an accident waiting to happen as the MSHA had never cited the mine for violations that would lead to immediate risk of injury. It noted also that it had exercised its right to shut down various parts of the mine, eighteen times in 2005, until safety problems were corrected.Most relevant to the criticisms discussed in this section, the MSHA explicitly disputed the suggestion that MSHA has grown too soft on mine operators and has not been aggressive enough in enforcing the Mine Act. It noted that between 2000 and 2005, the number of citations it had issued had increased by 4%, and the number of coal-mine specific citations had increased by 18%.Dennis ODell, of the Mine Workers of America union, disputed this response, suggesting that the fines MSHA handed to companies for these violations were too small to force action. A Ridder investigative report, published on January 7 and containing reference to the official MSHA response, concluded that Since the Bush administration took office in 2001, it has been more lenient toward mining companies facing serious safety violations, issuing fewer and smaller major fines and collecting less than half of the money that violators owed.(billingsgazette.com)Evaluation of media coverageWest Virginia UniversityOn February 13, 2006, The West Virginia University Perley Isaac Reed School of Journalism convened a panel of six journalists for a forum entitled Searching for a Miracle: Media Coverage of the Sago Mine Disaster. According to the Schools website, the forum covered the challenges faced by journalists covering the story, the lessons they learned and the role that 24-hour news coverage may have played in one of the biggest media faux pas of the century.(West Virginia University | Page Not Found)Moderator Kelly McBride, Ethics Group Leader for Floridas Institute(Poynter Online - Kelly McBride) was quoted by the Charleston Gazettes February 14, 2006, story,Forum at WVU examines media coverage of Sago Mine disaster by Ry Rivard, as saying, There were real people involved in this story. Real people who didnt deserve to become the epicenter of a news event....Journalism is supposed to be a service to communities.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+Mine+Disaster/200602141)Mark Memmott, a media issues reporter for USA Today said, Out there in the real world the story is that mines arent safe, and why did it take so long for rescuers to get there.... Just because we did this panel doesnt mean we think the media blowing it is the big story.According to Memmott, the New York Times, without directly quoting Joe Thornton, West Virginias deputy secretary for the Department of Military Affairs and Public Safety said Thornton had confirmed rescued miners were being examined at the mine shortly before midnight and would soon be taken to nearby hospitals. Mr. Thornton said he did not know details of their medical condition.Scott Finn, the first Charleston Gazette reporter on the scene, argued that a spokesperson from the state or local government or from the coal company would have lessened confusion. We didnt know who to go for the truth.CBS News producer Mike Solmsen and reporter Sharyn Alfonsi agreed.Also appearing were CNNs Randi Kaye and the New York Daily News Derek Rose.C-SPANs American Perspectives: Katrina Recovery & W.V. Mining Disaster(Link not functioning) aired the forum on February 18, 2006, and has a video of the forum available online as clip 24738.West Virginia Legislation: SB 247After the Sago Mine disaster, the state legislature passed Gov. Joe Manchins SB247 on the January 23, 2006, the same day it was submitted. The bill created a new mine emergency-response system and required coal companies to provide miners with additional emergency air supplies, communications equipment and tracking devices. The governor signed the bill into law on January 27, 2006. Provisions of the law and its history of passage are available on the state legislatures website.(Bill Status)Emergency RulesIn a story in the Charleston Gazette on February 3, 2006, Manchin mine rules contain no deadlines, staff writer Ken Ward Jr. reported on emergency rules filed February 1, 2006, with WV Secretary of State Betty Ireland to implement the law.(http://www.wvgazette.com/section/Series/The+Sago+Mine+Disaster/2006020234)The Manchin administration can put the requirements into effect as soon as Ireland approves them, or in 42 days if she takes no action. The Governor must submit the rules for a public comment period and revise them accordingly. The emergency rules can remain in effect for 15 months. Final rules require legislative approval, which will likely take place in the 2007 session.VictimsOf the thirteen miners, Randal L. McCloy, Jr., 26, was the only survivor from those trapped at the Sago mine. He was removed from the site at approximately 1:30 a.m. on January 4, and transported to St. Josephs Hospital in Buckhannon. After being stabilized there, McCloy was transported by ambulance later that morning to a level 1 center at West Virginia Universitys Ruby Memorial Hospital,  away in Morgantown. He was found to be suffering from monoxide poisoning, a collapsed lung, brain hemorrhaging, edema, muscle injury, faulty liver and heart function.On the evening of January 5, McCloy was transferred to General Hospital in Pittsburgh to receive infusions of oxygen in a chamber to counteract the effects of carbon monoxide. On January 7, he returned to Ruby Memorial Hospital where he remained in a coma. On January 18, doctors reported McCloy was showing signs of gradual awakening.() On January 25, doctors reported McCloy was emerging from the coma, but was still unable to talk.(WVU Healthcare - News and Events::) On January 26, 2006, West Virginia Hospitals announced that McCloy had been transferred from Ruby Memorial to its HealthSouth Mountainview Regional Rehabilitation Hospital in Morgantown, and was under the care of a rehabilitation specialist. He was responsive, could eat, but was still unable to talk.(WVU Health News: ) McCloy recovered almost fully after months of physical therapy, but he stated he still suffered from some vision and hearing impairment as well as weakness on the right side of his body.(Baby Boy For Sago Survivor Randal McCloy)Family members reported that at least four notes were found. Private funerals for the 12 deceased miners were held on January 8 to 10, 2006. A public memorial service was held on January 15 for them at Virginia Wesleyan College in Buckhannon. More than 2,000 attended the service, which was televised live on CNN. Among the speakers were Governor Manchin and author and West Virginia native Hickam. Both of West Virginias U.S. senators, Byrd and Rockefeller, and Capito also attended, but did not speak.Federal Legislation: S.2231Legislative History	On February 1, 2006, Senator Byrd (D-WV) introduced a bill to direct the Secretary of Labor to prescribe additional coal mine safety standards and require additional penalties for habitual violators. The bills was referred to the Committee on Health, Education, Labor, and Pensions. Initial cosponors were Democrats Richard Durbin (IL), Harkin (IA), Kennedy (MA), Obama (IL) and Rockefeller (WV). The status of the bill can be tracked on THOMAS, the of Congresss legislative system.(THOMAS (Library of Congress))ProvisionsSenator Byrds news release on his Senate website outlined some of the provisions of the bill.(Senator Byrd - Virtual Newsroom)The 2006 Congressional Record for the statements made by Senators Byrd, Rockefeller, Reid and Kennedy regarding the introduction of this bill runs from page S447 to S452. It can be found on the Government Printing Office site.(Retrieve Pages)* The bill would mandate equipment to communicate with miners, locate miners, and provide sufficient caches of air.* Rescue teams must be staffed and on site.* Operators must notify the MSHA immediately when there is an accident. Any coal operator who fails to do so will be subject to a $100,000 fine, and/or 12 to 15 years imprisonment* The bill would mandate a rapid notification and response system.* The bill would create a new mandatory minimum penalty of $10,000 for coal operators that show negligence or reckless disregard for the safety standards of the Mine Act.* The bill would nullify an MSHA rule issued in 2004 that authorizes the use of belt entries for ventilation, which may have caused fire in another accident at Alma.* The bill would create a science and technology transfer office in MSHA to pull research and development ideas from other federal agencies for use in the mines.* The bill would create an ombudsman in the Labor Departments Inspector General office for miners to report safety violations.Using belt air for ventilating working sections in and of itself cannot cause a fire, though it can cause air from a belt fire to enter a working section. The belt entry must be ventilated with intake air regardless of whether the intake air is used to ventilate a working section. That regulations allow for using belt air to ventilate working sections could not have had anything to do with the fire, which occurred in an area out by working sections. Regulations require monitoring of belt air for CO or smoke if air ventilating the belt is also used to ventilate working sections and areas where mining equipment is being installed or removed. CO monitoring systems are very sensitive and, if installed correctly and sensors are functioning properly with low level alarms as is required, they provide early warning of a fire to a constantly manned location on the surface and to all affected areas before conditions become too hazardous for escape. It is extremely likely that this accident would have occurred regardless of whether or not the air was used for section ventilation. Many mines had approval to use belt air before the regulations were passed  by petitioning the courts, by providing safeguards such as CO monitoring and stringent sensor calibration schedules, and through investigations conducted by MSHA. Many of these mines have used belt air to ventilate working sections and areas where mining equipment is being installed or removed for years through the petition process. The extra air is often needed to alleviate the explosive hazards of methane. For most mines using belt air to ventilate working sections and equipment installation and removal areas, the inability to use belt air will increase the hazards associated with higher concentrations of methane in the mine atmosphere.Office of Miners Health, Safety and Training (MHST)In the first set of rules, the state Office of MHST will require caches of air supplies to give each miner at least 16 additional devices. Mines with coal seams taller than four feet (1.2 m) must have caches every  in each working section. In smaller mines, there must be caches every . Operators must submit plans for cache locations within 30 days for review and suggestions for change; however there is no deadline for equipping the mines with the caches.Coal operators have no deadline to provide miners with improved rescue gear. It also sets no deadline for new communications equipment or tracking devices.On February 2, 2003, MHST director Conaway said as soon as the equipment becomes available, were expecting them to be in the mines....An operator is going to have to show us that they have it or that its on order....If they cant get them, they are going to have to show us that they have ordered them and that they are trying to get them.According to Ward, Chris Hamilton, vice president of the West Virginia Coal Association, said I know there are several months of backlog right now...There is still some concern on the reliability of the wireless communications and tracking system....A lot of that is still in the prototype stage and not commercially available.This last statement contradicts the finding of a 2003 MSHA report, which called the systems generally effective and said the agency encourages their use.Mine and Industrial Accident Rapid Response SystemThe West Virginia Division of Homeland Security proposes a rule that requests filed under the state Freedom of Information Act shall be held in abeyance until appropriate notification of next of kin of any deceased or victims that are grievously injured. The next of kin will have to give consent for the release of information.Any requests for information about mine accidents reported to the new response system must include the exact dates and times of accidents and the intended use of any information provided.Jimmy Gianato, the states homeland security director, said the language might need to be revised if questions are raised about properly responding to FOIA requests.Federal legislation: H.R. 4695On February 1, 2006, Representative Nick J. Rahall (D-WV) filed companion legislation in the House of Representatives, where it was referred to the House Committee on Education and the Workforce. Cosponsors were Shelley Moore Capito (R-WV) and Alan B. Mollohan (D-WV). Current status is found by searching on the bill number on Thomas, the Library of Congresss legislative information system.( The Congressional Record for Rahalls comments is found on page H127.(Retrieve Pages) His extended comments are found on pages E 46 and 47.(Retrieve Pages)Federal Rule changes for the Mine Safety and Health Act of 1977Emergency Temporary Rules for Mine OperatorsOn March 9, 2006, David G. Dye, acting assistant secretary of labor for mine safety and health, announced that MSHA was invoking a power that had only been invoked twice since its formation in 1978.This...will require the use of proven technologies and techniques to help miners evacuate quickly and safely after a mine accident....We are using the emergency temporary standard to get help into the field as fast as possible.()A copy of the proposed rules was published that date in the Federal Register.()*Self-Contained Self Rescue Devices (SCSRs): Provide additional SCSRs for each miner underground in a storage area to be readily accessible in an emergency.*Lifelines Install lifelines in all primary and alternate escape routes to help guide miners when visibility is poor.*Miner training Quarterly emergency evacuation drills on transferring from one SCSR to another.*Accident Notification Informing MSHA of an accident within 15 minutesMay 22, 2006, Omega Block moratoriumAfter a second mine accident, which resulted in five deaths in which the foam blocks did not withstand an explosion at the Kentucky Darby, LLC Mine No. 1 in Kentucky, David Dye, Acting MSHA director, announced a moratorium on the use of the blocks and a requirement to test for methane build up behind the seals.(Mine Safety and Health Administration (MSHA) - News Releases: 05/22/2006 - MSHA Announces Testing of Alternative Seals and Atmosphere Behind Them, Temporary Moratorium on All Alternative Seal Construction)Writing about the announcement in his May 23, 2006, article, Mine sealer banned, Brian Bowling of the Tribune Review noted that Officials at International Coal Group, which owns the Sago Mine, contend the agencys 20-pounds-per-square-inch standard is inadequate. The Kentucky, company hired a engineer, who determined explosive forces in the West Virginia mine reached as high as 60 to 90 psi.(Mine sealer banned - Pittsburgh Tribune-Review)This assertion was made by the company in its March 14, 2006, news release announcing the reopening of the mine and the findings of its initial study of reasons for the accident.()In popular cultureMusicThe band Choirs song What Would You Say is a song about the Sago Mine Disaster. The following words appear in the song: 13 men felt trapped in a mine in West Virginia,only one made it out alivebut their love lives on in the wordsI can not wait to see you on the other sideCrust punk band Terror Unit also has a song about the disaster called Sago.Claim of divine retributionOn January 15, 2006, members of the Westboro Baptist Church protested the creation of a memorial for the mine disaster victims, claiming the accident was Gods revenge. See also * accident* Mine Rescue (July 2002)* Alma Mine accident (January 19, 2006)References* News; January 3, 2006, Rescuers Break Ground in Miner Mission.* Press; January 5, 2006, The Victims. New York Times.* Barnes, Jonathan; January 5, 2006, West Virginia mine rescue makes slow progress, Reuters.* News and Current Affairs; January 3, 2006, Hopes fade for trapped US miners.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 4, 2006, Last push to save trapped miners.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 4, 2006, Miraculous rescue for US miners.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 4, 2006, Only one US miner reported alive.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 4, 2006, US mine rescue turns to tragedy.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 4, 2006, Fury over US mine rescue fiasco.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 4, 2006, Mine families anger at lies.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 4, 2006, West Virginias devastated community.* BBC News and Current Affairs; January 6, 2006, Crucial hours for mine survivor.* Bowling, Brian and Conti, David; January 2, 2006, Condition of trapped miners in West Virginia unknown. Tribune-Review.* Breed, Allen; January 4, 2006, Families Say 12 W.Va. Miners Found Alive. Associated Press.* The Republican Mine Disaster: Blood on their Hands* CNN.com; January 2, 2006, Rescue teams creep toward trapped coal miners.* CNN.com; January 4, 2006, Family members say 12 miners found alive.* CNN.com; January 4, 2006, Believe in miracles: 12 miners found alive.* CNN.com; January 4, 2006, Grief, anger as all but one miner found dead.* CNN.com; January 4, 2006, Quecreek miracle offered Sago families false hope* CNN.com. January 18, 2006, Doctor: Sago survivor awakening from coma* Dao, James; January 3, 2006, Blast Traps 13 in a Coal Mine in West Virginia. New York Times.* Duke, Armando; January 2, 2006, Explosion at W. VA Coal Mine Traps Workers. AXcessNews.com.* Finn, Scott; January 16, 2006, Theyre West Virginians State celebrates lives of 12 fallen miners. Charleston Gazette.* Freeman, Simon and Agencies; January 4, 2006, Turmoil for miners families after disaster yields sole survivor. Times Online.* Gustafson, Dave; January 4, 2006, Only 1 survives: Family members had thought for 3 hours that 12 were alive. Charleston Gazette.* McLachlan, Justin; January 3, 2006, West Virginia mine explosion, my time there* Mine Safety and Health Administration; March 9, 2006, Emergency Mine Evacuation Federal Register, pp. 1225212271.* Mine Safety and Health Administration; March 9, 2006, MSHA pursues new mine evacuation rules: Special rulemaking action used only twice before. Press release.* Staff Reports; January 4, 2006 Single Miner Survives Explosion. The Record Delta Online (Upshur County, WV publication).* Tyson, Ann Scott and Vedantam, Shankar; January 3, 2006, W. Va. Mine Explosion Traps 13. Post.* Tyson, Ann Scott and Barbash, Fred; January 4, 2006, 12 Found Dead in W.Va. Coal Mine. Washington Post.* Ward, Ken Jr.; January 3, 2006 Sago mine has history of roof falls. The Charleston Gazette.* Yates, Jennifer; January 3, 2006, Company discouraged by air quality where 13 coal miners trapped, Associated Press.* Hate group changes plans, opposition offers tips for community* External links* MSHA page on incident continues to be updated and now contains a PowerPoint Presentation depicting the chronology of events and documents requested under the Freedom of Information Act* MSHA Data Retrieval SystemMine Identification Number (ID) #4608791* Sago Mine Disaster Report, prepared by an independent investigation team commissioned by WV Governor Joe Manchin.* Charleston Gazettes free archive of all articles including those of Ward, Jr., whose reporting is underwritten by an Patterson Foundation fellowship.* Includes links to audio file and pdf transcript of the hearing.* Federal Mine Safety and Health Act of 1977* Center for Disease Control National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health mining safety research portal* United States Mine Rescuers Association page on Sago* United Mine Workers detailed description of coal mining terms* People.com, January 13, 2006. The Miners: The Lives They Lived, an archive of photos and thumbnail sketches of all thirteen miners*CNN.coms January 9, 2006, Profiles: Tallmansville miners* State investigations and Coal industry in elections.
3619196
Caso
 footnotes               Caso (Asturian: Casu) is a municipality in the Spanish of Asturias. It shares a boundary to the North with Piloa; to the East with Ponga; to the South with Len and to the West with Sobrescobio and Laviana.Most of the inhabitants of Caso live in the Naln Valley, on which the largest town is the capital El Campu. The town is divided in two neighbourhoods: LArrobiu and El Barru.The municipalities of Caso and Sobrescobio together constitute the Natural Park, designated by the UNESCO as a Reserve. The Natural Monument of the Cueva Deboyu (the River passes through a cave in the mountain) is also located in Caso. Caso is famous for its landscape, beech forests, wood handcraft and its cheese, that is called casn.In the past, most of Casos people worked in mining and farming. Nowadays, tourism has become one of the more important activities in Caso, but farming is still the most relevant.The Dam of Tanes provides energy and water to the central part of Asturias.AccessThe AS-17 (Avils - Pass of Tarna) road is the easiest form to reach Caso from Oviedo or Gijn. The AS-254 (Campu - LInfiestu) road connects Caso with Piloa and the N-634 road. Caso and Len are connected by the Pass of Tarna. The nearest station is located in de Laviana.Parishes Representative fauna* Bear* Capercaillie* Deer* Wolf* Boar* Chamois* Deer* Eagle* Vulture* Deer* TroutRepresentative flora* Beech* Holly* Oak* Yew* Birch* ChestnutFeasts* 24 June, Saint the Baptist, Campu* 25 July, James the Great, Bueres* 8 August, Harvesters Feast, Caliao* Last weekend of August, Casn Cheeses Contest, Collada de Arnicio (Gobezanes)* 8 October, Cattle Market and Contest, CampuTourist attractions* Museo de la Madera y la Madrea (wood handcraft museum), in Veneros* Taller de la Madera y la Madrea (wood handcraft workshop), in Pendones* Redes Visitor Centre, in Campo de Caso* Arrudos Defile, in Caleao* Deboyu Cave, in Campo de Caso* Mongayu Cascades, in Tarna* Braagallones (shepherds huts in the mountain), in Bezanes* Pandu Quarter (traditional asturian architecture), in Campo de Caso* Santa Maria la Real Church  (16th century), in Tanes* Santa Cruz de la Real Church (Baroque altarpiece), in CaleaoExternal links*Pgina del Ayuntamiento*Federacin Asturiana de Concejos* Official site of the Municipality of Caso * Information about the Redes Natural Park (in English)* Official site of the Redes Natural Park ar:ast:Casuca:Casode:Caso(Asturias)eu:Casofa:ia:Caso(Spagna)pam:Casonl:Casopt:Casoro:Casoru:tr:Caso()vi:Casowar:Caso
3625247
The_Petroleum_Trail_International_Tourist_Trail
Galicia 1900s The Petroleum Trail International Tourist Trail runs from Poland to Ukraine.Sanok County* Zarszyn - glycol and methanol storage for natural gas mining* Strachocina - underground gas storage, structure of the old mine* Sanok - exposition of the 19th century oil industry related structures in Skansen - Open Air Museum* Solna - preserved structure of a mine and pumping jack* Wielopole - buildings of the office, boiler - room, waiting room for minersHistory*1866 - Set up of oil production centres: Witryw-Homcza, odyna, Polana, Brzegi(which?), Zagrz, Rajskie, Wie(which?), Gbokie, Pole, Wielopole(which?), Mokre(which?), Tokarnia, Grabownica(which?). *1928 - Discovery of Strachocina natural gas reservoir. *1924 - 1939 - Galician Petroleum Society Galicja drills on area of Jurowce, Strachocina.*1930s - oil and natural gas are produced among others in: Grabownica(which?), Strachocina, Pole, Wies(which?), Humniska, Wakowa, Ropienka, Polana, Wielopole(which?). *September 1939 - Beskiden Erdl Gewinnungs - Geselschaft, renamed for Karpaten Oil infill drills of reservoirs: Wielopole(which?), Mokre(which?), Grabownica(which?). *October 9th 1944 - Creation of the State Petroleum Office, which form letter Nr15 establish ... the highest organising unit of mining district - Sector Sanok ... *1946 - Beginning of rotary method in drilling. *1953 - Creation of drilling company - Sanok.Old postcardsImage:Wankowa.jpg|View at the Oil Field, Galician Petroleum Society Galicja,1900sImage:Mokre1914.jpg|View at the Oil Field, Mokre, 1914 PolandImage:Galicja1881.jpg|View at the Oil Field,  - Oil wells, pl. szyby naftowe, 1881Image:Galicia1911.jpg|View at the Oil Field, Oil wells 1909Image:Galicja1909.jpg|View at the Oil Field, Oil wells 1911Image:Grabownicastarzenska 30XXw.jpg|View at the Oil Field Grabownica , 1930sSee also* ukasiewicz External links * The Petroleum Trail ( also,  and)*Krlewskie Wolne Miasto Sanok, official website *Bobrka, Krosno district, Polandnaftowy
3632157
List_of_Lexx_episodes
There are four seasons of Lexx totalling 61 episodes, initially televised from 1997 (in Canada) to 2002.__TOC__SummaryThe first season, debuting in Canada on April 18, 1997, consisted of four two-hour TV movies (sometimes screened as eight one-hour episodes), alternatively titled Tales from a Parallel Universe.  However, some episode guides do not list the two-hour movies as a season but list the subsequent seasons as the first through third.The second season consisted of twenty forty-five-minute episodes with an overall arc concerning an evil scientist called Mantrid who proceeds to convert all matter in the light universe (the Zone) into one-armed Mantrid drones.  Mantrid largely succeeds before he is defeated by the Lexx, but not without causing a Crunch that results in sending the Lexx through a singularity to an alternate dark universe (the Zone).The third season comprises 13 episodes in which the Lexx is trapped in orbit around the warring planets Fire and Water, and the crew encounters an enigmatic and cheerful evil being known as Prince, who may be the Devil.  The two planets orbit each other at an extremely close distance, and share a tunnel of atmosphere between them, allowing the inhabitants of Fire to wantonly attack Water for no obvious reason.  Fire is filmed between the dunes of Namibia and the architecture of Berlin.  The rulers of Fire are Prince and Duke, who both reincarnate whenever it suits them. Water appears to have no ruler, and contains a small population of hedonists on floating islands. In the fourth and final season of 24 episodes, the Lexx arrives at Earth in the early 21st century, only to find that Prince (now named Isambard Prince, and somehow head of the ATF) and several other old adversaries have arrived there too. Between them, Prince and the Lexx manage to demolish large chunks of the Earth  including the city of Ottawa (a Canadian metonymical in-joke)  before the climactic final episode, televised on April 26, 2002.Seasons one to three of Lexx were released on VHS and Region 2 DVD in the UK by Contender Limited, although the Season 3 DVDs were initially exclusive to the MVC Entertainment chain of stores and all volumes have since been deleted. Contender failed to obtain the rights to Season 4, which instead went to Pictures (a subsidiary of Atlantis), however they havent released any DVDs. Recently, all four seasons have been released on DVD in multiple regions.All four seasons of Lexx have been released to be watched instantly on Netflix and in the US as of October 17th, 2010. All episodes have also since been released on Hulu which you can watch for free.EpisodesSeason 1 (1997){| classwikitable stylewidth:100%; margin:auto;|-! width20|# !! Title !! width120|Original airdateKai, a poet-warrior transformed into an empty headed assassin by Divine Shadow; and H. Tweedle, a bumbling Class 4 Security Guard.ShortSummaryIn the hopes of extending Kais un-life, Zev decides they should go to the original home of the Brunnen-G. The only thing they find when they get there are holographic messages left by the Poet Man (Curry).ShortSummaryOut of energy, the Lexx is forced to land on a planet to replenish its energy supply. Zev and Stan bury the apparently dead Kai, before they discover a lost outpost seemingly occupied by lunatics led by a manic Hauer.ShortSummaryTo resupply the protoblood that sustains Kais life, the crew of the Lexx travel back to the Cluster but when they arrive they find the planet deserted. The population was killed in The Cleansing, in preparation of the birth of the Gigashadow, the last survivor of the insect wars and sworn enemy of humanity. Guest stars McDowell.|}Season 2 (1998-1999){| classwikitable stylewidth:100%; margin:auto;|-! width20|# !! Title !! width120|Original airdateShortSummaryKai, possessed by Divine Shadow, leads the crew back to the Light Zone to retrieve an insect larva from the remains of the cluster. The crew then goes to meet Mantrid, former Supreme Biovizier for The Divine Order, in order to convince him to extract protoblood from the insect larva. The ageing Mantrid plans to use the insects transference organ to transfer himself into a new machine body. Mantrids besotted assistant transfers Mantrids essence from his dying body to the machine body. The crew flees to Lexx and attempts to destroy it, but Mantrids machine escapes.ShortSummaryKai is awoken incorrectly, and punctures Stans heart. After transferring the Key to Zev, they seek assistance at the MedStat, a large medical space hospital. The threat of the Lexxs power encourages the medical staff to help, but it emerges that they wish to take the Lexx and use it for their own ends. This is the last episode to feature Zev.ShortSummaryThe plant-based organism called Lyekka arrives on the Lexx and uses Stanleys dream image of a high school sweetheart to take form. At the same time, 3 astronauts from the planet Potataho run into the Lexx. Lyekka begins to eat them one at a time, allowing them to live out their wildest fantasies before consuming them. After accidentally destroying the astronauts spaceship Stan offers to take them back to their planet, only to find it destroyed by Drone Arms. First appearance of Xev.ShortSummaryThe crew travel to a space brothel, Luvliner. Negotiations break down when Schlemmi, who manages the brothel and has a fetish for robot heads, finds out that the crew has no money. After a little coercion they are allowed in free of charge, only for Schlemmi to call in a bounty hunter and attempt to take over the Lexx for himself.ShortSummaryTwo planets, Liber and Leester, long ago destroyed each other in a ratings war. The crew discover a small, automated planetoid that is still producing TV programs. Stan is captured on the planet and forced to take part in various shows, and when he consistently fails to amuse the macabre audience he is demoted to increasingly less dignified positions. Eventually, it is discovered that when contestants fail, they are decapitated and their heads are kept alive to be part of the studio audience for all eternity.ShortSummaryStan needs release and returns to an old haunt for pleasure; another space brothel. Unbeknownst to him and the crew however the Reform Planets have been searching for Stanley, whom they call the Arch-Traitor, to put him on trial for the destruction of 100 worlds hostile to His Divine Shadow. The trial seems to be legitimate but the chief prosecutor has her own secret intentions: wanting to torture and execute Stanley.ShortSummaryThe episode follows a crew of sleazy space miners - two sexist men and one large, manly woman - who contract a gender-changing and ultimately fatal virus which they then unwittingly share with the crew of the Lexx. While the disease does not affect the external appearance, it changes the genitals and the voice and works on the mind, making men extremely demure and making women into voracious sexual predators. In this episode Stanley Tweedle finally fulfills his dream of having sex with his crewmate Xev Bellringer, although it is arguably more of a rape and during the encounter their genders are reversed.rednecks, has stowed away on the Lexx. After a night of passion with Sissy Gollean, Tweedle is caught by the jealous Pa Gollean, who plans to kill Stan until Sissy convinces him to let them get married instead. Pa agrees, and then forces Stan to steer the ship to his home planet Vermal so Pa can get revenge on the remaining inhabitants. Whilst on the planet Kai helps Pas adopted son Norb escape his unpleasant parents on his real fathers space ship - The ChargerShortSummaryThe crew of the Lexx get a distress signal from a crashed ship. Stanley Tweedle refuses to go down to investigate, but Lyekka insists that she needs food, and if she doesnt get it shell be forced to eat the crew. Lyekka plans to eat any survivors down on the surface, but Xev understandably has some moral qualms about this. Once inside the crashed ship, they find jars containing still-beating hearts and 790 finds a cyborg body with which he hopes to finally consummate his love of Xev.ShortSummaryA group of restless and none-too-intelligent teens comes aboard the Lexx, and after partying like stink one of them accidentally reprograms Kai to become a psychotic killing machine. Kai then sets to work systematically murdering each of the teens, taking an uncharacteristic delight in violence. After hunting and killing his prey one by one Xev and Stan fear they may have to abandon the Lexx forever only to be saved at the last moment when Kai runs out of Protoblood.ShortSummaryStanley Tweedle isnt interested in exploring, but Xev convinces him to do so, saying that shell have sex with him if she doesnt find somebody to have sex with on the planet first. Stan agrees, and when they venture to the planet they find an order of monks who profess to have no idea what a woman is. It is a repressive and stagnant place, where the monks copy writings out of ancient books without knowing how to read, so that they will not be corrupted by dangerous ideas. Kai asks their leader, Brother Randor, how they procreate without women, but Brother Randor claims ignorance of such matters. Meanwhile, Xev is stirring up trouble by making sexual overtures to various monks.ShortSummaryNorb, the adopted son of Pa Gollean (see ep2.08), runs across a giant Candy House Satellite. Suddenly, its consumed by Mantrid Drones, who then begin to chase Norb. Norb barely escapes by ejecting as his Charger is overrun by drones. Lexx and the crew hear his distress call in space and pick him up. Once inside he acts very differently than when previously encountered and suddenly his body comes apart to reveal 5 Mantrid Drones. In the process, Norb/Drones kill 790, crushing the tiny piece of human brain that enabled him to love Xev. The drones also deliver a message from Mantrid: Let the contest begin. Kai and Xev use Kais protoblood and a protein regenerator to bring 790 back. The Drones begin to eat Lexx and make more drones with his parts. The Lexx must reverse its particle drive to save itself.ShortSummaryWhen Stanley Tweedle becomes gravely ill, the crew of the Lexx take him to the planet Ruuma. There they encounter a ghastly family: the father, Roada, is a scheming sleazeball, the last vestige of the Divine order, left behind on the planet by his brethren after the death of His Shadow; the mother, Hidea, is a shrew; the daughter, Lomea, is a surly goth teen. Ruuma has the power to bring the dead back to a kind of shambling life, and the many corpses of His Divine Shadows earlier bodies reside here, constantly trying to break in and devour the family. It was Roadas job to look after the bodies when the Cluster was still in operation, but now hes losing control of the situation and it seems the family wont survive long. The same forces that animate the corpses has an unusual effect on Kai and after Xev is bitten its up to Lyekka to save the day.ShortSummaryStan is having bad dreams and Xev tells him to do something mighty to feel better. Stan accidentally blows up a robot-manned manganese mining planet, after the robot administrator tells him of the Narco-Lounger, that allows people to enter and control their dreams. Fruitcake, a past customer of the Narco-Lounger tells the owner of Narco-World, Gubby, about Patches in the Sky, created by Mantrids Drones ongoing destruction of the whole universe. The terrible reality of this turns Gubby to drugs. Stan and crew arrive and Stan uses the machine to enter his dreams. Stans dreams turn into nightmares as he dreams of being chased first by the dead robot administrator and then by Giggerota. Xev must enter to save him, while Kai struggles to save them both.ShortSummaryWhen 790 reluctantly reveals that Xev has a built-in expiry date thats only 79 hours away, the Lexx heads to the planet Woz where the only remaining Lusticon, the love-slave transformation device, is. Before they can use it to reset Xevs expiry date, however, Stan and Kai are sucked into a war being waged between the Wozzard and The Dark Lady, each having very different opinions about the morality of the Lusticon.ShortSummaryThe crew learn that the only way to escape Mantrid is to flee to the Dark Zone.  The only remaining portal is at the exact centre of the universe, and Kai warns them that many bizarre and improbable things exist there. A sinister, alien creature captures the Lexx and possesses the ships hapless captain, Stanley Tweedle. The ships robot, 790, attempts to alert the crew that something is wrong with Stan, but by now theyve all gotten so used to 790 abusing Stan that nobody takes 790s warnings about Stan seriously. The Web tells the story in a relatively straightforward manner, while The Net fills in the background material, explaining various plot threads and introducing others.ShortSummaryThe Net fills in the background material, explaining various plot threads and introducing others from the previous episode, The Web.Brigadoon, where a cursed town only appears one day every hundred years.ShortSummaryIn an attempt to fight the Mantrid drones, the crew seek assistance from anyone still alive in the rapidly shrinking universe and conveniently find Brizon, Mantrids teacher, mentor and predecessor in the role of Supreme Bio-Vizier. Brizon is little more than an engineered, animated corpse, who hijacks Xevs liver, and tries to extort sex from her (hopefully using Stans penis). He continues his amusing rivalry with Mantrid. His plan to defeat Mantrid involves capturing a working drone arm and activating a code he had previously installed in Mantrids machines programming. Mantrid plays dead for a little while, and then announces that it was all his devious plan from the start.ShortSummaryIn a last-ditch bid to save the light universe from Mantrids drones, 790 discovers (way too late), that he can create self replicating drones of his own, to fight Mantrid. Kai and 790 hatch a cunning plan to distract Mantrid, long enough for him to make the mistake of moving too many drones around them, thus engulfing them all in a giant black hole, collapsing the light universe, and shooting the Lexx into the Dark Zone. Lyekkas pod is damaged, and she demonstrates yet more inexplicable talents, transforming herself into a Lyekka drone, and pulling Mantrid from his interface. She gets killed in the process, somehow lodging part of herself in Stans mind.|}Season 3 (2000)Season 4 (2001-2002)External links*Lexx at IMDb*Episode List at IMDb*Lexx on Hulu.comder Lexx-EpisodenLexx epizdjainak listja  
3636075
History_of_television
The history of television records the work of numerous engineers and inventors in several countries over many decades. The fundamental principles of television were initially explored using electromechanical methods to scan, transmit and reproduce an image. As electronic camera and display tubes were perfected, electromechanical television gave way to all-electronic television systems in nearly all applications.Electromechanical televisionImage:Nipkow disk.svg|right|200px|thumb|The disk. This schematic shows the circular paths traced by the holes, that may also be square for greater precision. The area of the disk outlined in black shows the region scanned.The beginnings of mechanical television can be traced back to the discovery of the photoconductivity of the element selenium by Smith in 1873, the invention of a scanning disk by Gottlieb Nipkow in 1884 and Logie Bairds demonstration of televised moving images in 1926.As a 23-year-old German university student, Paul Nipkow proposed and patented the first electromechanical television system in 1884.(Shiers, George and May (1997), Early Television: A Bibliographic Guide to 1940. Taylor & Francis, pp. 13, 22. ISBN 9780824077822.) Although he never built a working model of the system, variations of Nipkows spinning-disk image rasterizer for television became exceedingly common, and remained in use until 1939.(Shiers & Shiers, p. 13, 22.) Perskyi had coined the word television in a paper read to the International Electricity Congress at the International World Fair in Paris on August 25, 1900. Perskyis paper reviewed the existing electromechanical technologies, mentioning the work of Nipkow and others.(Tlvision au moyen de llectricit, Congrs Inographs by Telegraph, The New York Times, Sunday Magazine, September 20, 1907, p. 7.) However, it was not until 1907 that developments in amplification tube technology, by DeForest and Korn among others, made the design practical.(Sending Photographs by Telegraph, The New York Times, Sunday Magazine, September 20, 1907, p. 7.) The first demonstration of the instantaneous transmission of still silhouette images was by Georges Rignoux and A. Fournier in Paris in 1909, using a rotating mirror-drum as the scanner and a matrix of 64 selenium cells as the receiver.(Henry de Varigny, La vision  distance, LIllustration, Paris, December 11, 1909, p. 451.)In 1911, Rosing and his student Zworykin created a television system that used a mechanical mirror-drum scanner to transmit, in Zworykins words, very crude images over wires to the Braun tube (ray tube or CRT) in the receiver. Moving images were not possible because, in the scanner, the sensitivity was not enough and the selenium cell was very laggy.(R.W. Burns, Television: An International History of the Formative Years, IET, 1998, p. 119. ISBN 0852969147.)On March 25, 1925, Scottish inventor Logie Baird gave the first public demonstration of televised silhouette images in motion, at Selfridges Department Store in London.(Current Topics and Events, Nature, vol. 115, April 4, 1925, p. 505506, doi:10.1038/115504a0.) AT&Ts Telephone Laboratories transmitted halftone still images of transparencies in May 1925. On June 13 of that year, Francis Jenkins transmitted the silhouette image of a toy windmill in motion, over a distance of five miles from a naval radio station in Maryland to his laboratory in Washington, using a lensed disk scanner with a 48-line resolution.(Radio Shows Far Away Objects in Motion, The New York Times, June 14, 1925, p. 1.)()However, if television is defined as the live transmission of moving images with continuous tonal variation, Baird first achieved this privately on October 2, 1925. But strictly speaking, Baird had not yet achieved moving images on October 2. His scanner worked at only five images per second, below the threshold required to give the illusion of motion, usually defined as at least 12 images per second. By January, he had improved the scan rate to 12.5 images per second. Then on January 26th, 1926 at his laboratory in London, Baird gave what is widely recognised as being the worlds first demonstration of a working television system to members of the Institution and a newspaper reporter. Unlike later electronic systems with several hundred lines of resolution, Bairds vertically scanned image, using a scanning disk embedded with a double spiral of lenses, had only 30 lines, just enough to reproduce a recognizable human face.In 1927, Baird transmitted a signal over  of telephone line between London and Glasgow. In 1928, Bairds company (Baird Television Development Company/Cinema Television) broadcast the first transatlantic television signal, between London and New York, and the first shore-to-ship transmission. He also demonstrated an electromechanical color, infrared (dubbed Noctovision), and stereoscopic television, using additional lenses, disks and filters. In parallel, Baird developed a video disk recording system dubbed Phonovision; a number of the Phonovision recordings, dating back to 1927, still exist.(Restoring Bairds TV Recordings) In 1929, he became involved in the first experimental electromechanical television service in Germany. In November of the same year, Baird and Natan of Path established Frances first television company, Tlvision-Baird-Natan. In 1931, he made the first outdoor remote broadcast, of the Derby.(J. L. Baird, Television in 1932, BBC Annual Report, 1933.) In 1932, he demonstrated wave television. Bairds electromechanical system reached a peak of 240-lines of resolution on BBC television broadcasts in 1936 though the mechanical system did not scan the televised scene directly. On 2 November 1936 the BBC began transmitting the worlds first public regular television (HDTV) service from the Victorian Palace in north London.(http://www.teletronic.co.uk/tvera.htm Teletronic  The Television History Site) It therefore claims to be the birthplace of television broadcasting as we know it today.  Instead a film was shot, rapidly developed and then scanned while the film was still wet. This film system was discontinued within three months in favor of a 405-line all-electronic system developed by Marconi-EMI.(Richard G. Elen, The fools on the hill, Baird: The Birth of Television, 2003, 2009.)E. Ives and Frank Gray of Bell Telephone Laboratories gave a dramatic demonstration of mechanical television on April 7, 1927. The reflected-light television system included both small and large viewing screens. The small receiver had a two-inch-wide by 2.5-inch-high screen. The large receiver had a screen 24 inches wide by 30 inches high. Both sets were capable of reproducing reasonably accurate, monochromatic moving images. Along with the pictures, the sets also received synchronized sound. The system transmitted images over two paths: first, a wire link from Washington to New York City, then a radio link from Whippany, Jersey. Comparing the two transmission methods, viewers noted no difference in quality. Subjects of the telecast included of Commerce Hoover. A scanner beam illuminated these subjects. The scanner that produced the beam had a 50-aperture disk. The disc revolved at a rate of 18 frames per second, capturing one frame about every 56 milliseconds. (Todays systems typically transmit 30 or 60 frames per second, or one frame every 33.3 or 16.7 milliseconds respectively.) Television historian Albert Abramson underscored the significance of the Bell Labs demonstration: It was in fact the best demonstration of a mechanical television system ever made to this time. It would be several years before any other system could even begin to compare with it in picture quality.(Abramson, Albert, The History of Television, 1880 to 1941, McFarland & Co., Inc., 1987, p. 101. ISBN 9780899502847.)Meanwhile in the Union, Theremin had been developing a mirror drum-based television, starting with 16 lines resolution in 1925, then 32 lines and eventually 64 using interlacing in 1926, and as part of his thesis on May 7, 1926 he electrically transmitted and then projected near-simultaneous moving images on a five foot square screen.( By 1927 he achieved an image of 100 lines, a resolution that was not surpassed until 1931 by RCA, with 120 lines.On December 25, 1926, Takayanagi demonstrated a television system with a 40-line resolution that employed a Nipkow disk scanner and CRT display at Hamamatsu Industrial High School in Japan. This protype is still on display at the Takayanagi Memorial Museum in University, Hamamatsu Campus. His research in creating a production model were halted by the US after Japan lost War II.(Kenjiro Takayanagi: The Father of Japanese Television, NHK (Japan Broadcasting Corporation), 2002, retrieved 2009-05-23.)Mechanical scanning systems, though obsolete for the more familiar television systems, nevertheless survive in long wave red cameras because there is no suitable all-electronic pickup device.Electronic televisionIn 1908, Archibald Campbell-Swinton, fellow of the Society (UK), published a letter in the scientific journal Nature in which he described how distant electric vision could be achieved by using a ray tube (or Braun tube, after its inventor, Braun) as both a transmitting and receiving device,()() apparently the first iteration of the electronic television method that would dominate the field until recently. He expanded on his vision in a speech given in London in 1911 and reported in Times(Distant Electric Vision, The Times (London), Nov. 15, 1911, p. 24b.) and the Journal of the Rntgen Society.()(Shiers, George and May (1997), Early television: a bibliographic guide to 1940. New York: Garland, p. 56. Retrieved 2010-06-13.) In a letter to Nature published in October 1926, Campbell-Swinton also announced the results of some not very successful experiments he had conducted with G. M. Minchin and J. C. M. Stanton. They had attempted to generate an electrical signal by projecting an image onto a selenium-coated metal plate that was simultaneously scanned by a cathode ray beam.()() These experiments were conducted before March 1914, when Minchin died,() but they were later repeated by two different teams in 1937, by H. Miller and J. W. Strange from EMI,() and by H. Iams and A. Rose from RCA.() Both teams succeeded in transmitting very faint images with the original Campbell-Swintons selenium-coated plate. Although others had experimented with using a cathode ray tube as a receiver, the concept of using one as a transmitter was novel.(Abramson, Albert, Zworykin, Pioneer of Television, p. 16.) By the late 1920s, when electromechanical television was still being introduced, several inventors were already working separately on versions of all-electronic transmitting tubes, including Farnsworth and Zworykin in the States, and Tihanyi in Hungary.On September 7, 1927, Farnsworths Dissector camera tube transmitted its first image, a simple straight line, at his laboratory at 202 Green Street in Francisco.(Postman, Neil, Philo Farnsworth, The TIME 100: Scientists & Thinkers, TIME.com, 1999-03-29, retrieved 2009-07-28.)(Philo Taylor Farnsworth (1906-1971), The Virtual Museum of the City of San Francisco, retrieved 2009-07-15.) By September 3, 1928, Farnsworth had developed the system sufficiently to hold a demonstration for the press.( In 1929, the system was further improved by elimination of a motor generator, so that his television system now had no mechanical parts.(Abramson, Albert, Zworykin, Pioneer of Television, p. 226.) That year, Farnsworth transmitted the first live human images with his system, including a three and a half-inch image of his wife Elma (Pem) with her eyes closed (possibly due to the bright lighting required).(The Philo T. and Elma G. Farnsworth Papers)Meanwhile, Zworykin was also experimenting with the cathode ray tube to create and show images. While working for Westinghouse Electric Corporation in 1923, he began to develop an electronic camera tube. But in a 1925 demonstration, the image was dim, had low contrast and poor definition, and was stationary.(Abramson, Albert, Zworykin, Pioneer of Television, University of Illinois Press, 1995, p. 51. ISBN 0252021045.) Zworykins imaging tube never got beyond the laboratory stage. But RCA, which acquired the Westinghouse patent, asserted that the patent for Farnsworths 1927 image dissector was written so broadly that it would exclude any other electronic imaging device. Thus RCA, on the basis of Zworykins 1923 patent application, filed a interference suit against Farnsworth. The U.S. Patent Office examiner disagreed in a 1935 decision, finding priority of invention for Farnsworth against Zworykin. Farnsworth claimed that Zworykins 1923 system would be unable to produce an electrical image of the type to challenge his patent. Zworykin received a patent in 1928 for a color transmission version of his 1923 patent application,(Zworykin, Vladimir K., Television System. Patent No. 1691324, U.S. Patent Office. Filed 1925-07-13, issued 1928-11-13. Retrieved 2009-07-28) he also divided his original application in 1931.(Zworykin, Vladimir K., Television System. Patent No. 2022450, U.S. Patent Office. Filed 1923-12-29, issued 1935-11-26. Retrieved 2010-05-10.) Zworykin was unable or unwilling to introduce evidence of a working model of his tube that was based on his 1923 patent application. In September 1939, after losing an appeal in the courts and determined to go forward with the commercial manufacturing of television equipment, RCA agreed to pay Farnsworth US$1 million (the equivalent of $13.8 million in 2006) over a ten-year period, in addition to license payments, to use Farnsworths patents.(Stashower, Daniel, The Boy Genius and the Mogul: The Untold Story of Television, Broadway Books, 2002, p. 243244. ISBN 978-0767907590.)(Everson, George (1949), The Story of Television, The Life of Philo T. Farnsworth New York, NY: W. W. Norton & Co,. ISBN 978-0405060427, 266 pages) Image:Radioskop 1926.png|thumb|200px|right|Drawing from Tihanyis 1926 patent application RadioskopThe problem of low sensitivity to light resulting in low electrical output from transmitting or camera tubes would be solved by Tihanyi beginning in 1924.(Klmn Tihanyi (18971947), IEC Techline, International Electrotechnical Commission (IEC), 2009-07-15.) His solution was a camera tube that accumulated and stored electrical charges (photoelectrons) within the tube throughout each scanning cycle. The device was first described in a patent application he filed in Hungary in March 1926 for a television system he dubbed Radioskop.(Klmn Tihanyis 1926 Patent Application Radioskop, Memory of the World, United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization (UNESCO), 2005, retrieved 2009-01-29.) After further refinements included in a 1928 patent application,( Tihanyi was awarded patents for the camera tube in both France and Great Britain in 1928, and applied for patents in the United States in June of the following year. Although his breakthrough would be incorporated into the design of RCAs iconoscope in 1931, the U.S. patent for Tihanyis transmitting tube would not be granted until May 1939. The patent for his receiving tube had been granted the previous October. Both patents had been purchased by RCA prior to their approval.(United States Patent Office, Patent No. 2,133,123, Oct. 11, 1938.)(United States Patent Office, Patent No. 2,158,259, May 16, 1939.) The idea of charge & storage (with various and very different technological solutions) is still remained(http://www.unesco.org/new/en/communication-and-information/resources/news-and-in-focus-articles/in-focus-articles/2010/spotlight-on-memory-of-the-world-heritage-inventions-and-discoveries-that-changed-our-world) as a basic requirement for all type of modern image sensors until this day.Development continued around the world.  At the Radio Show in August 1931, von Ardenne gave a public demonstration of a television system using a CRT for both transmission and reception. However, Ardenne had not developed a camera tube, using the CRT instead as a scanner to scan slides and film.(Albert Abramson, Zworykin: Pioneer of Television, University of Illinois Press, 1995, p. 111.) Philo Farnsworth gave the worlds first public demonstration of an all-electronic television system, using a live camera, at the Institute of Philadelphia on August 25, 1934, and for ten days afterwards.(New Television System Uses Magnetic Lens, Popular Mechanics, Dec. 1934, p. 838839.)(Burns, R. W. Television: An international history of the formative years. (1998). IEE History of Technology Series, 22. London: IEE, p. 370. ISBN 0-85296-914-7.)In 1933 RCA introduced an improved camera tube that relied on Tihanyis charge storage principle.( ) Dubbed the Iconoscope by Zworykin, the new tube had a light sensitivity of about 75,000 lux, and thus was claimed to be much more sensitive than Farnsworths image dissector. However, Farnsworth had overcome his power problems with his Image Dissector through the invention of a completely unique multipactor device that he began work on in 1930, and demonstrated in 1931.(Abramson, Albert (1987), The History of Television, 1880 to 1941. Jefferson, NC: Albert Abramson. p. 148. ISBN 0-89950-284-9.)(Everson, George (1949), The Story of Television, The Life of Philo T. Farnsworth New York, NY: W. W. Norton & Co,. ISBN 978-0405060427, pages 137-141.)  This small tube could amplify a signal reportedly to the 60th power or better(Everson, George (1949), The Story of Television, The Life of Philo T. Farnsworth New York, NY: W. W. Norton & Co,. ISBN 978-0405060427, page 139.) and showed great promise in all fields of electronics.  A problem with the multipactor, unfortunately, was that it wore out at an unsatisfactory rate.(Everson, George (1949), The Story of Television, The Life of Philo T. Farnsworth New York, NY: W. W. Norton & Co,. ISBN 978-0405060427, page 141.)In Britain the EMI engineering team led by Shoenberg applied in 1932 for a patent for a new device they dubbed the Emitron,()() which formed the heart of the cameras they designed for the BBC. On November 2, 1936, a 405-line broadcasting service employing the Emitron began at studios in Palace, and transmitted from a specially-built mast atop one of the Victorian buildings towers. It alternated for a short time with Bairds mechanical system in adjoining studios, but was more reliable and visibly superior. This was the worlds first regular high-definition television service.(Burns, R. W., Television: An international history of the formative years. (1998). IEE History of Technology Series, 22. London: IEE, p. 576. ISBN 0-85296-914-7.) The original American iconoscope was noisy, had a high ratio of interference to signal, and ultimately gave disappointing results, especially when compared to the high definition mechanical scanning systems then becoming available.()() The EMI team under the supervision of Shoenberg analyzed how the iconoscope (or Emitron) produces an electronic signal and concluded that its real efficiency was only about 5% of the theoretical maximum.()() They solved this problem by developing and patenting in 1934 two new camera tubes dubbed super-Emitron and CPS Emitron.()()() The super-Emitron was between ten and fifteen times more sensitive than the original Emitron and iconoscope tubes and, in some cases,  this ratio was considerably greater.( It was used for an broadcasting by the BBC, for the first time, on Armistice Day 1937, when the general public could watch in a television set how the King lay a wreath at the Cenotaph.() This was the first time that anyone could broadcast a live street scene from cameras installed on the roof of neighbor buildings, because neither Farnsworth nor RCA could do the same before the New York Worlds Fair.Image:Television Antenna.jpg|thumb|antenna on a rooftopOn the other hand, in 1934, Zworykin shared some patent rights with the German licensee company Telefunken.() The image iconoscope (Superikonoskop in Germany) was produced as a results of the collaboration. This tube is essentially identical to the super-Emitron. The production and commercialization of the super-Emitron and image iconoscope in Europe were not affected by the patent war between Zworykin and Farnsworth, because Dieckmann and Hell had priority in Germany for the invention of the image dissector, having submitted a patent application for their Lichtelektrische Bildzerlegerrhre fr Fernseher (Photoelectric Image Dissector Tube for Television) in Germany in 1925,() two years before Farnsworth did the same in the United States.() The image iconoscope (Superikonoskop) became the industrial standard for broadcasting in Europe from 1936 until 1960, when it was replaced by the vidicon and plumbicon tubes. Indeed it was the representative of the European tradition in electronic tubes competing against the American tradition represented by the image orthicon.()() The German company Heimann produced the Superikonoskop for the 1936 Berlin Olympic Games,()() later Heimann also produced and commercialized it from 1940 to 1955,() finally the Dutch company Philips produced and commercialized the image iconoscope and multicon from  1952 to 1958.(()American television broadcasting at the time consisted of a variety of markets in a wide range of sizes, each competing for programming and dominance with separate technology, until deals were made and standards agreed upon in 1941.(Everson, George (1949), The Story of Television, The Life of Philo T. Farnsworth New York, NY: W. W. Norton & Co,. ISBN 978-0405060427, page 248.) RCA, for example, used only Iconoscopes in the New York area, but Farnsworth Image Dissectors in Philadelphia and San Francisco.(Abramson, Albert (1987), The History of Television, 1880 to 1941. Jefferson, NC: Albert Abramson. p. 254. ISBN 0-89950-284-9.) In September 1939, RCA agreed to pay the Farnsworth Television and Radio Corporation royalties over the next ten years for access to Farnsworths patents.(Schatzkin, Paul (2002), The Boy Who Invented Television. Silver Spring, Maryland: Teamcom Books, pp. 187-8. ISBN 1-928791-30-1.) With this historic agreement in place, RCA integrated much of what was best about the Farnsworth Technology into their systems.(In 1941, the United States implemented 525-line television.(Go-Ahead Signal Due for Television, The New York Times, April 25, 1941, p. 7.)(An Auspicious Beginning, The New York Times, August 3, 1941, p. X10.) The worlds first 625-line television standard was designed in the Soviet Union in 1944, and became a national standard in 1946.(On the beginning of broadcast in 625 lines 60 years ago, 625 magazine (in Russian).) The first broadcast in 625-line standard occurred in 1948 in Moscow.(M.I. Krivocheev  an engineers engineer, EBU Technical Review, Spring 1993.) The concept of 625 lines per frame was subsequently implemented in the European CCIR standard.(In the Vanguard of Television Broadcasting.)Color televisionBroadcast television Overview Programming is broadcast by stations, sometimes called channels, as stations are licensed by their governments to broadcast only over assigned channels in the television band. At first, terrestrial broadcasting was the only way television could be widely distributed, and because bandwidth was limited, i.e., there were only a small number of channels available, government regulation was the norm.In the U.S., the Communications Commission (FCC) allowed stations to broadcast advertisements beginning 1941, but required public service programming commitments as a requirement for a license. By contrast, the United Kingdom chose a different route, imposing a license fee on owners of television reception equipment to fund the Broadcasting Corporation (BBC), which had public service as part of its Charter.Practically every country in the world now has at least one broadcast television station. Television has grown up all over the world, enabling nearly every country to share aspects of its culture and society with others. United States File:WNBT first TV schedule.jpg|thumb|WNBT (later WNBC) schedule for first week of commercial TV programming in the United States, July 1941The first regularly scheduled television service in the United States began on July 2, 1928. The Radio Commission authorized C.F. Jenkins to broadcast from experimental station W3XK in Wheaton Maryland, a suburb of D.C. For at least the first eighteen months, 48-line silhouette images from motion picture film were broadcast, although beginning in the summer of 1929 he occasionally broadcast in halftones.(What Television Offers You, Popular Mechanics, November 1928, p. 823.)(The Latest in Television, Popular Mechanics, September 1929, p. 472.)Gernsbacks New York City radio station began a regular, if limited, schedule of television broadcasts on August 14, 1928, using 48-line images. Working with only one transmitter, the station alternated radio broadcasts with silent television images of the stations sign, faces in motion, and wind-up toys in motion.(WRNY to Start Daily Television Broadcasts; Radio Audience Will See Studio Artist, The New York Times, August 13, 1928, p. 13.)(WRNY Has Extended Television Schedule, The New York Times, September 30, 1928, p. 155.) Speaking later that month, Gernsback downplayed the broadcasts, intended for amateur experimenters. In six months we may have television for the public, but so far we have not got it.(Television Drama Shown With Music, The New York Times, August 22, 1928, p. 1.) Gernsback also published Television, the worlds first magazine about the medium. Electrics experimental station in New York, on the air sporadically since January 13, 1928, was able to broadcast reflected-light, 48-line images via shortwave as far as Los Angeles, and by September was making four television broadcasts weekly. It is considered to be the direct predecessor of current television station WRGB. The Queens Messenger, a one-act play broadcast on September 11, 1928, was the worlds first live drama on television.(The Queens Messenger, Early Television Museum.)Radio giant RCA began daily experimental television broadcasts in New York City in March 1929 over station W2XBS. The 60-line transmissions consisted of pictures, signs, and views of persons and objects.(Television Placed on Daily Schedule, The New York Times, March 22, 1929, p. 30.) Experimental broadcasts continued to 1931.(Six Visual Stations on the New York Air, The New York Times, July 19, 1931, p. XX13.)Broadcasting Systems WGBS radio and W2XCR television aired their regular broadcasting debut in New York City on April 26, 1931, with a special demonstration set up in Aeolian Hall at Fifth Avenue and Fifty-fourth Street. Thousands waited to catch a glimpse of the Broadway stars who appeared on the six-inch (15 cm) square image, in an evening event to publicize a weekday programming schedule offering films and live entertainers during the four-hour daily broadcasts. Appearing were boxer Carnera, actors Lawrence, Calhern, Upton and Atwill, WHN announcer Granlund, the Sisters, and a host of others.(Radio Talkies Put On Program Basis, The New York Times, April 27, 1931, p. 26.)CBSs New York City station W2XAB began broadcasting their first regular seven days a week television schedule on July 21, 1931, with a 60-line electromechanical system. The first broadcast included Mayor Walker, Boswell Sisters, Smith, and Gershwin. The service ended in February 1933.(CBS considers it to be an ancestor of WCBS-TV, which first went on the air on July 1, 1941 as one of the first two commercially licensed television stations in the country (the other being the National Broadcasting Companys WNBC).) Don Lee Broadcastings station W6XAO in Los Angeles went on the air in December 1931. Using the UHF spectrum, it broadcast a regular schedule of filmed images every day except Sundays and holidays for several years.(W6XAO later moved to VHF Channel 1 before World War 2, and to Channel 2 in the post-war television realignment. It was commercially licensed in 1947 as KTSL and is the direct ancestor of current station KCBS-TV.)By 1935, low-definition electromechanical television broadcasting had ceased in the United States except for a handful of stations run by public universities that continued to 1939. The Communications Commission (FCC) saw television in the continual flux of development with no consistent technical standards, hence all such stations in the U.S. were granted only experimental and non-commercial licenses, hampering televisions economic development. Just as importantly, Philo Farnsworths August 1934 demonstration of an all-electronic system at the Franklin Institute in Philadelphia pointed out the direction of televisions future.On June 15, 1936, Don Lee Broadcasting began a one month-long demonstration of high definition (240+ line) television in Los Angeles on W6XAO (later KTSL) with a 300-line image from motion picture film. By October, W6XAO was making daily television broadcasts of films. RCA and its subsidiary NBC demonstrated in New York City a 343-line electronic television broadcast, with live and film segments, to its licensees on July 7, 1936, and made its first public demonstration to the press on November 6. Irregularly scheduled broadcasts continued through 1937 and 1938.(Where Is Television Now?, Popular Mechanics, August 1938, p. 178.) Regularly scheduled electronic broadcasts began in April 1938 in New York (to the second week of June, and resuming in August) and Los Angeles.(Telecasts Here and Abroad, The New York Times, Drama-Screen-Radio section, April 24, 1938, p.10.)(Early Birds, Time, June 13, 1938.)(Telecasts to Be Resumed, The New York Times, Drama-Screen-Radio section, Aug. 21, 1938, p. 10.)(Robert L. Pickering, Eight Years of Television in California, California  Magazine of the Pacific, June 1939.) NBC officially began regularly scheduled television broadcasts in New York on April 30, 1939 with a broadcast of the opening of the New York Worlds Fair. By June 1939, regularly scheduled 441-line electronic television broadcasts were available in New York City and Los Angeles, and by November on General Electrics station in Schenectady. From May through December 1939, the New York City NBC station (W2XBS) of General Electric broadcast twenty to fifty-eight hours of programming per month, Wednesday through Sunday of each week. The programming was 33% news, 29% drama, and 17% educational programming, with an estimated 2,000 receiving sets by the end of the year, and an estimated audience of five to eight thousand. A remote truck could cover outdoor events from up to  away from the transmitter, which was  located atop the State Building. Coaxial cable was used to cover events at Square Garden. The coverage area for reliable reception was a radius of 40 to  from the Empire State Building, an area populated by more than 10,000,000 people (Lohr, 1940). The FCC adopted NTSC television engineering standards on May 2, 1941, calling for 525 lines of vertical resolution, 30 frames per second with interlaced scanning, 60 fields per second, and sound carried by modulation. Sets sold since 1939 which were built for slightly lower resolution could still be adjusted to receive the new standard. (Dunlap, p31). The FCC saw television ready for commercial licensing, and the first such licenses were issued to NBC and CBS owned stations in New York on July 1, 1941, followed by Philcos station WPTZ in Philadelphia.  The first advertising to appear on American television occurred on the afternoon of July 1, 1941 when New York NBC station WNBT, now WNBC, broadcast a test pattern modified to look like a clock, with the words Bulova Watch Time in the lower right quadrant.  Picture at: http://www.earlytelevision.org/images/rca_bulova_ad-1.jpg link title   The image appeared just prior to that afternoons telecast of a Brooklyn Dodgers game live from Ebbets Field.   After the U.S. entry into War II, the FCC reduced the required minimum air time for commercial television stations from 15 hours per week to 4 hours. Most TV stations suspended broadcasting. On the few that remained, programs included entertainment such as boxing and plays, events at Madison Square Garden, and illustrated war news as well as training for air raid wardens and first aid providers. In 1942, there were 5,000 sets in operation, but production of new TVs, radios, and other broadcasting equipment for civilian purposes was suspended from April 1942 to August 1945 (Dunlap).File:The Childrens Museum of Indianapolis - Philco Predicta television.jpg|thumb|right|The Philco Predicta, 1958. In the collection of Childrens Museum of IndianapolisBy 1947, when there were 40 million radios in the U.S., there were about 44,000 television sets (with probably 30,000 in  the New York area).() Regular network television broadcasts began on the Television Network in 1946, on NBC in 1947, and on CBS and ABC in 1948. By 1949, the networks stretched from New York to the River, and by 1951 to the West Coast. Commercial television broadcasts began on CBS in 1951 with a color system that was suspended four months later for technical and economic reasons. The television industrys National Television System Committee developed a color television system that was compatible with existing black and white receivers, and commercial color broadcasts reappeared in 1953. Canada The Broadcasting Corporation (CBC) adopted the American NTSC 525-line B/W 60 field per second system as its broadcast standard.  It began television broadcasting in Canada in September 1952.  The first broadcast was on September 6, 1952 from its Montreal, Quebec station CBFT. The premiere broadcast was bilingual, spoken in English and French. Two days later, on September 8, 1952, the Toronto, Ontario station CBLT went on the air. This became the  English-speaking flagship station for the country, while CBFT became the French language flagship after a second English language station was licensed to CBC in Montreal later in the decade. The CBCs first privately owned affiliate television station, CKSO in Sudbury, Ontario, launched in October 1953 (at the time, all private stations were expected to affiliate with the CBC, a condition that was relaxed in 196061 when CTV, Canadas second national English language network, was formed). France The first experiments in television broadcasting began in France in the 1930s, but the French were slow to employ the new technology.In November 1929, Natan established Frances first television company, Tlvision-Baird-Natan. On April 14, 1931, there took place the first transmission with a thirty-line standard by Barthlemy. On December 6, 1931, de France created the Compagnie Gnrale de Tlvision (CGT). In December 1932, Bathlemy carried out an experimental program in black and white (definition: 60 lines) one hour per week, Paris Tlvision, which gradually became daily from early 1933.The first official channel of French television appeared on February 13, 1935, the date of the official inauguration of television in France, which was broadcast in 60 lines from 8:15 to 8:30 pm. The program showed the actress Batrice Bretty in the studio of Radio-PTT Vision at 103 rue de Grenelle in Paris. The broadcast had a range of . On November 10, Mandel, Minister of Posts, inaugurated the first broadcast in 180 lines from the transmitter of the tower. On the 18th, Susy Wincker, the first announcer since the previous June, carried out a demonstration for the press from 5:30 to 7:30 pm. Broadcasts became regular from January 4, 1937 from 11:00 to 11:30 am and 8:00 to 8:30 pm during the week, and from 5:30 to 7:30 pm on Sundays. In July 1938, a decree defined for three years a standard of 455 lines VHF (whereas three standards were used for the experiments: 441 lines for Gramont, 450 lines for the Compagnie des Compteurs and 455 for Thomson). In 1939, there were about only 200 to 300 individual television sets, some of which were also available in a few public places. With the entry of France into War II the same year, broadcasts ceased and the transmitter of the tower was sabotaged. On September 3, 1940, French television was seized by the German occupation forces. A technical agreement was signed by the Compagnie des Compteurs and Telefunken, and a financing agreement for the resuming of the service is signed by German Ministry of Post and Radiodiffusion Nationale (Vichys radio). On May 7, 1943 at 3:00 evening broadcasts. The first broadcast of Paris (Paris Tlvision) was transmitted from rue Cognac-Jay. These regular broadcasts (5 1/4 hours a day) lasted until August 16, 1944. One thousand 441-line sets, most of which were installed in soldiers hospitals, picked up the broadcasts.  These Nazi-controlled television broadcasts from the Eiffel Tower in Paris were able to be received on the south coast of England by R.A.F. and BBC engineers http://www.earlytelevision.org/raf.html link title, who photographed the station identification image direct from the screen http://www.earlytelevision.org/images/parisnazitransmitter.jpg link title In 1944, Barthlemy developed an 819-line television standard. During the years of occupation, Barthlemy reached 1015 and even 1042 lines. On October 1, 1944, television service resumed after the of Paris. The broadcasts were transmitted from the Cognacq-Jay studios. In October 1945, after repairs, the transmitter of the Tower was back in service. On November 20, 1948, Mitterrand decreed a broadcast standard of 819 lines; broadcasting began at the end of 1949 in this definition. France was the only European country to adopt it (others will choose 625 lines). Germany Electromechanical broadcasts began in Germany in 1929, but were without sound until 1934. Network electronic service started on March 22, 1935, on lines using telecine transmission of film, film system, or cameras using the Nipkow Disk. Transmissions using cameras based on the iconoscope began on January 15, 1936. The Berlin Summer Olympic Games were televised, using both all-electronic iconoscope-based cameras and intermediate film cameras, to Berlin and Hamburg in August 1936. Twenty-eight public television rooms were opened for anybody who did not own a television set. The Germans had a 441-line system on the air in February 1937, and during War II brought it to France, where they broadcast from the Tower.The American Armed Forces Radio Network at the end of World War II, wishing to provide US TV programming to the occupation forces in Germany, used US TV receivers made to operate at 525 lines and 60 fields. US broadcast equipment was modified; they changed the vertical frequency to 50 Hz in accordance to the European mains frequency standard to avoid power line wiggles, changed the horizontal frequency from 15,750 Hz to 15,625 Hz a 0.5 microsecond change in the length of a line. With this signal, US TV receivers with only an adjustment to the vertical hold control had a 625 line ( 576 visual lines + 49 lines of non-visual synch and burst data), 50 field scan, which became the German standard. This AFN system, however, was not the later PAL standard native to Germany, as the displays themselves were not capable of displaying any more than the standard NTSC 486 visual lines, which effectively were even only 243 visible lines due to display-internal deinterlacing by means of alternatively discarding one field and applying line doubling on the result. Additionally, it still took until the 1960s for the PAL-specific YUV color system to be invented by Bruch, with PAL operating at 576 visual lines. United Kingdom The first British television broadcast was made by Baird Televisions electromechanical system over the BBC radio transmitter in September 1929. Baird provided a limited amount of programming five days a week by 1930. During this time, Southampton earned the distinction of broadcasting the first-ever live television interview, which featured Peggy ONeil, an actress and singer from New York.(Hawley, Chris, Peggy ONeil sang her way from the Hydraulics to stardom, The Hydraulics blog, January 15, 2009.)  On August 22, 1932, BBC launched its own regular service using Bairds 30-line electromechanical system, continuing until September 11, 1935. On November 2, 1936 the BBC began broadcasting a dual-system service, alternating between Marconi-EMIs 405-line standard and Bairds improved 240-line standard, from Palace in London, making the BBC Television Service (now One) the worlds first regular high-definition television service. The government, on advice from a special advisory committee, decided that Marconi-EMIs electronic system gave the superior picture, and the Baird system was dropped in February 1937. TV broadcasts in London were on the air an average of four hours daily from 1936 to 1939. There were 12,000 to 15,000 receivers. Some sets in restaurants or bars might have 100 viewers for sport events (Dunlap, p56).The outbreak of the World War caused the BBC service to be suspended on September 1, 1939, resuming from Alexandra Palace on June 7, 1946. At the end of 1947 there were 54,000 licensed television receivers, compared with 44,000 television sets in the United States at that time.(The first transatlantic television signal was sent in 1928 from London to New York() by the Baird Television Development Company/Cinema Television, although this signal was not broadcast to the public. The first live satellite signal to Britain from the United States was broadcast via the Telstar satellite on July 23, 1962.The first live broadcast from the European continent was made on August 27, 1950. Soviet Union (USSR) The Union began offering 30-line electromechanical test broadcasts in Moscow on October 31, 1931, and a commercially manufactured television set in 1932. The first experimental transmissions of electronic television took place in Moscow on March 9, 1937, using equipment manufactured and installed by RCA. Regular broadcasting began on December 31, 1938. It was quickly realized that 343 lines of resolution offered by this format would have become insufficient in the long run, thus a specification for 441-line format was developed in 1940, superseded by a 625-line standard in 1944. This format was ultimately accepted as a national standard.The experimental transmissions in 625-line format started in Moscow from November 4, 1948. Regular broadcasting began on June 16, 1949. Details for this standard were formalized in 1955 specification called GOST 7845-55, basic parameters for black-and-white television broadcast. In particular, frame size was set to 625 lines, frame rate to 25 frames/s interlaced, and video bandwidth to 6 MHz. These basic parameters were accepted by most countries having 50 Hz mains frequency and became the foundation of television systems presently known as PAL and SECAM.Starting from 1951 broadcasting in the 625-line standard was introduced in other major cities of the Soviet Union.Color television broadcast started in 1974, using SECAM color system.( Japan In 1979, the Japanese state broadcaster NHK first developed consumer high-definition television with a 5:3 display aspect ratio.() The system, known as Hi-Vision or MUSE after its sub-Nyquist sampling encoding for encoding the signal, required about twice the bandwidth of the existing NTSC system but provided about four times the resolution (1080i/1125 lines). Satellite test broadcasts started in 1989, with regular testing starting in 1991 and regular broadcasting of BS-9ch commenced on 25 November 1994, which featured commercial and NHK programming.Sony first demonstrated an wideband high-definition television system HDTV capable video camera, monitor and tape recorder (VTR) in April of 1981 at an international meeting of television engineers in Algiers. The HDVS range was launched in April 1984, with the HDC-100 camera, HDV-100 video recorder and HDS-100 switcher all working in the 1125-line video format with video and a 5:3 aspect ratio. Technological innovations The first national television broadcast in the U.S. took place on September 4, 1951 when President Harry Trumans speech at the Japanese Peace Treaty Conference in Francisco, California was transmitted over AT&Ts transcontinental cable and radio relay system to broadcast stations in local markets.(Truman to Be Televised In First National Hook-Up,  The New York Times, September 4, 1951, p. 2.)(Television Highlights, The Washington Post, September 4, 1951, p. B13.)(Coast to Coast Television (CBS advertisement), The Wall Street Journal, September 4, 1951, p. 9.) The first live coast-to-coast commercial television broadcast in the U.S. took place on November 18, 1951 during the premiere of CBSs It Now, which showed a split-screen view of the Bridge in New York City and the Gate Bridge in San Francisco. In 1958, the CBC completed the longest television network in the world, from Nova Scotia to British Columbia. Reportedly, the first continuous live broadcast of a breaking news story in the world was conducted by the CBC during the Mining Disaster, which began on October 23 of that year.The development of cable and television in the 1970s allowed for more channels and encouraged businessmen to target programming toward specific audiences. It also enabled the rise of television channels, such as Home Box Office (HBO) and Showtime in the U.S., and Sky Television in the U.K.Television setsIn televisions electromechanical era, commercially made television sets were sold from 1928 to 1934 in the United Kingdom,(Early British Television: Baird, Television History: The First 75 Years.) United States, and the Soviet Union.(Pre-1935, Television History: The First 75 Years. The French model shown does not appear to have entered production.) The earliest commercially made sets sold by Baird in the UK in 1928 were radios with the addition of a television device consisting of a neon tube behind a mechanically spinning disk (the disk) with a spiral of apertures that produced a red postage-stamp size image, enlarged to twice that size by a magnifying glass. The Baird Televisor was also available without the radio. The Televisor sold in 19301933 is considered the first mass-produced set, selling about a thousand units.(Pre-1935 Baird Sets: UK, Television History: The First 75 Years.)The first commercially made electronic television sets with ray tubes were manufactured by Telefunken in Germany in 1934,(Telefunken, Early Electronic TV Gallery, Early Television Foundation.)(193435 Telefunken, Television History: The First 75 Years.) followed by other makers in France (1936),(1936 French Television, Television History: The First 75 Years.) Britain (1936),(1936 Baird T5, Television History: The First 75 Years.) and America (1938).(Communicating Systems, Inc., Early Electronic TV Gallery, Early Television Foundation.)(Americas First Electronic Television Set, Television History: The First 75 Years.) The cheapest of the pre-World War II factory-made American sets, a 1938 image-only model with a 3-inch (8 cm) screen, cost US$125, the equivalent of US$1,863 in 2007. The most expensive model with a 12-inch (30 cm) screen was $445 ($6,633).(American TV Prices, Television History: The First 75 Years.)An estimated 19,000 electronic television sets were manufactured in Britain, and about 1,600 in Germany, before World War II. About 7,0008,000 electronic sets were made in the U.S.(Annual Television Set Sales in USA, Television History: The First 75 Years.) before the Production Board halted manufacture in April 1942, production resuming in August 1945.Television usage in the United States skyrocketed after War II with the lifting of the manufacturing freeze, war-related technological advances, the gradual expansion of the television networks westward, the drop in set prices caused by mass production, increased leisure time, and additional disposable income. In 1947, Motorola introduced the VT-71 television for $189.95, the first television set to be sold for under $200, finally making television affordable for millions of Americans. While only 0.5% of U.S. households had a television set in 1946, 55.7% had one in 1954, and 90% by 1962.(Number of TV Households in America, Television History: The First 75 Years.) In Britain, there were 15,000 television households in 1947, 1.4 million in 1952, and 15.1 million by 1968.For many years different countries used different technical standards. France initially adopted the German 441-line standard but later upgraded to 819 lines, which gave the highest picture definition of any analogue TV system, approximately double the resolution of the British 405-line system. However this is not without a cost, in that the cameras need to produce four times the pixel rate (thus quadrupling the bandwidth), from pixels one-quarter the size, reducing the sensitivity by an equal amount. In practice the 819-line cameras never achieved anything like the resolution that could theoretically be transmitted by the 819 line system, and for color, France reverted to the 625-line CCIR system used by most European countries.With advent of color television most Western European countries adopted PAL standard. France, Soviet Union and most Eastern European countries adopted SECAM. In North America the original NTSC 525-line standard was augmented to include color transmission with slight slowing down of frame rate.Throughout the 1960s, television sets used exclusively vacuum tube electronics. This resulted in relatively heavy and unreliable TVs. In addition, vacuum tubes were poorly-suited to color television, as it required a large amount of tubes which caused further reliability problems. Because vacuum tubes only allowed for very simple NTSC/PAL filtering, the picture quality of early color sets was rather poor. The tint control that is still found on NTSC televisions originally was meant to correct the color burst phases drifting when channels were changed. In addition, the large number of vacuum tubes required for color prevented the use of it in portable TVs.By the early 1970s, solid-state electronics appeared and quickly displaced vacuum tubes in color TVs (black and white sets generally continued to be tube-based). This allowed for significantly more reliable TVs and better picture quality. 1971 was the first year that sales of color TVs in the US exceeded B&W ones. In other countries, color was slower to arrive and did not become common in Western Europe until the 80s.In 1972, the FCC began requiring UHF tuners in all TVs sold in the United States. At this time, there were only 130 UHF stations in the country, mostly low-power ones that carried local programming. Up to this point, UHF support from TV manufacturers was sporadic. Most sets did not come factory-equipped with them, and often merely included an empty slot in the cabinet where an optional UHF tuner could be installed.During the 1970s, electronic tuners began appearing in high-end TVs in place of traditional dials, and they would gradually become standard along with remote controls. Remotes had first appeared in the 1950s with Zeniths Space Command Control, but these were mechanical devices that emitted a high-pitched audio frequency that the TV detected. The first electronic remote controls did not appear until the 1980s.1980s TV developments mainly centered around the above-mentioned features. Electronic tuners also went hand-in-hand with the rise of cable television. Analog filters, first introduced in the 70s on high-end sets, gradually became more common. Black-and-white TVs virtually disappeared from the American market except for 5-inch, battery-powered models.The first LCD TVs were introduced in 1988, small, handheld devices with a B&W screen that could not display the full NTSC resolution of 480-lines.In the 1990s, 3-line digital filters appeared on high-end TVs. In addition, video and S-video inputs began appearing to support devices like video games and VCRs.Analog television in the United States ended on June 12, 2009 in favor of terrestrial television (DTV) or digital-only broadcasting. Television inventors/pioneers Important people in the development of TV technology in the 19th or 20th centuries.* von Ardenne* Logie Baird* Gonzlez Camarena* Blumlein* Bruch (PAL television)* Archibald Campbell-Swinton* B. DuMont* Philo Taylor Farnsworth* Grabovsky* Francis Jenkins* Siegmund and David Loewe, founders of AG in 1923* Micic(Lachenbruch, David (1984), New digital receivers deliver ultimate TV. Science, Mirror Company, June 1984, p. 56.)* Earl Muntz* Gottlieb Nipkow* Perskyi* Rosing* Armand Sanabria* Sarnoff* Takayanagi* Theremin* Tihanyi* Zworykin Television museums * Paley Center for Media* Television Museum* of Broadcast Communications* Media Museum* Australia Film and Archives Museum* Museum of Television See also * of years in television* of radio* Active (European Research Project)* television works* Television* Hall of Fame* Age of Television, c19491960 in the US* of American Television* Dunlap, Orrin E. The Future of Television. New York and London: Harper Brothers, 1942.* Lohr, Lenox, Television Broadcasting. New York: McGraw Hill, 1940.* monitor timeline* television station* of experimental television stations* of the introduction of television in countries* of the introduction of color television in countries* usage of television* NTSC* PAL* SECAM* Archives* SonyReferencesFurther reading* Abramson, Albert. The History of Television, 1880 to 1941. (1987). Jefferson, NC: McFarland & Co. ISBN 0-89950-284-9.* Abramson, Albert. The History of Television, 1942 to 2000. (2003). Jefferson, NC: McFarland & Co. ISBN 0-78641-220-8.* Burns, R. W. Television: An international history of the formative years. (1998). IEE History of Technology Series, 22. London: IEE. ISBN 0-85296-914-7.* Everson, George (1949), The Story of Television, The Life of Philo T. Farnsworth New York, NY: W. W. Norton & Co,. ISBN 978-0405060427, 266 pages.* Fisher, David E. and Marshall Jon Fisher. Tube: the Invention of Television. (1996). Washington: Counterpoint. ISBN 1887178171.* Shiers, George. Early Television: A Bibliographic Guide to 1940. (1997). Garland Reference Library of Social Science. ISBN 0-82407-782-2.* Meyrowitz, Joshua(1985). No Sense of Place, Oxford University Press, New York. External links Links related to the development or history of television* History of television - Includes an anthology of early texts on seeing at a distance by electricity* Mechanical TV and Illusion Generators including a description of what mechanical TV viewing was like* Television history  inventors including a timeline* Technology Review - Who Really Invented Television?* Who Invented Television - Reconciling The Historical Origins of Electronic Video* Photos of early TV receivers* Article describing development of the television* Early television museum (extensive online presence)* Ed Reitans Color Television History* Erics Vintage Television Sets* Detailed timeline of communications media (including the TV)* The History of Australian Television* Video Active: Creating Access to Television History* A Visit to Our Studios: a television program exploring the studios at Johns Hopkins University in 1951* Archive of American Television (information and links to videotaped oral history interviews with TV legends and pioneers)* Canadian Broadcasting Corporation Archives* History of West Australian Television* MZTV Museum of Television & Archive* Television Early Patents and Inventions*Littleton, Cynthia. Happy 70th Birthday, TV Commercial broadcasts bow on July 1, 1941; Variety calls it corney, Variety, July 1, 2011. WebCitation archive.de la televisides Fernsehensde la televisindes techniques de tlvisiondella televisionevan de televisiehistoriazh:
3641086
Mina_Rosita_Vieja_disaster
The Mina Rosita Vieja disaster was the worst disaster in Mexicos coal mining history. It occurred on February 27, 1908 when a huge explosion rocked the Rosita Vieja Coal Mine near the town of Juan de Sabinas, Coahuila. The explosion led to the deaths of 200 miners in shaft No. 2.The mine boss was Harry Turner. There was a first explosion, and the next day when Mr. Turner went into the mine to lead the rescue work, a second explosion killed him.
3645749
Fred_Barratt
Fred Barratt (April 12, 1894, Annesley, Nottinghamshire  January 29, 1947, General Hospital, Nottingham) played first-class cricket for Nottinghamshire from 1914 to 1931 and represented England in five Test matches, one in the home series against South Africa in 1929 and four on the inaugural Test series against New Zealand in the 1929-30 season.From a mining background, Barratt was a right-arm fast bowler who, according to Wisden, combined swerve with his pace.() He was also a right-handed lower-order batsman whose batting was always forthright, but became suddenly quite proficient from 1928 onwards. Early careerHis debut in first-class cricket was sensational. Picked for Nottinghamshire to play against MCC in one of the set-piece season-openers at Lords in 1914, he took eight wickets for 91 runs in the first innings.() He followed that with five for 58 in his first Championship match.() And by the end of his first season he had amassed 115 first-class wickets at an average of 21.80, including 10 instances of five wickets or more in an innings and three of 10 or more in a match. Against Leicestershire at Bridge late in the season, he took eight for 75 in an innings, improving on his debut figures.()Barratt then lost the next four years of his cricket career to the World War and when it resumed in 1919, according to his obituary in Wisden, he was slow in finding his old form.() He took 58 wickets in the limited 1919 fixtures, 68 in 1920 and 91 in 1921.() Though his average across these seasons and beyond was low &ndash; he managed 16 runs per innings in 1919, but did not approach that again until the late 1920s &ndash; there were individual innings of power and brilliance. Against Sussex in 1919, he made 82 while batting at No 9, with his partners in ninth and tenth wicket partnerships contributing only 11 out of 60 runs.() And in 1921 against Hampshire, he made 79 out of a partnership of 129 in 50 minutes for the eighth wicket with Whysall that led Nottinghamshire to an unlikely victory after they had fallen to 65 for six in search of 286 to win.()()Middle yearsBetter bowling form returned in 1922, when Barratt took 109 wickets at 16.33 runs each, the best bowling average in a single season in his career.( Among the wickets were his career-best innings figures, eight for 26 against what Wisden termed a helpless Glamorgan team: the innings, which totalled just 47, lasted only 75 minutes.()() He maintained form in 1923, with 101 wickets and made the highest score of his career so far with 92 in a wonderful display of hitting against Leicestershire.()() The seasons between 1924 and 1927 saw a slight dropping off from Barratt, though he remained an important part of the Nottinghamshire side. In Wisden 1925, he was singled out for consistency.( In both 1924 and 1925, he took more than 90 wickets at an average of less than 20 runs per wicket, but in 1926, that fell to just 66 wickets at a cost of 32 runs apiece.( The recovery to 75 wickets at 21.14 in 1927 owed something to his fourth return of eight wickets in an innings, eight for 53 against Worcestershire at Trent Bridge.() Nor was the batting anything out of the ordinary: he failed to pass 50 in 1924, 1925 or 1926, and reached a highest of only 57 in 1927.()All-rounderThis fallow period in the mid 1920s made his emergence as a genuine all-rounder in the 1928 season, his benefit year, all the more surprising. In all matches, he took 114 wickets at a cost of 25.18 runs each and, unexpectedly, made 1167 runs at an average of 29.17, not far short of double the average and more than double the aggregate he had achieved in any other season before.(( Wisden had an explanation for his sudden advance: it attributed it to waiting more patiently than heretofore for the right ball to hit. It added that he gave some remarkable displays of high speed scoring which never degenerated into mere slogging.() The 1928 season saw the only two centuries of Barratts career. The first, an unbeaten 139 which remained his highest score, came in a high-scoring match on an easy pitch with short boundaries at Coventry, and set some records. Nottinghamshires total of 656 for three declared was the highest at the time for the loss of only three wickets, and four of the five batsmen used &ndash; Gunn, Whysall, Walker and Barratt &ndash; made hundreds. Barratt, unusually promoted to No 5, and Walker put on 196 in 84 minutes and Barratts 139 included seven sixes and 18 fours in what Wisden termed a remarkable display of powerful driving.()() The vast total was not a match-winner: Warwickshire batted across the rest of the second day after Nottinghamshires declaration, and then rain prevented any play on the third and final day, so that there was no decision even on first innings.Less than two weeks later, Barratt made his second century, this time hitting an undefeated 110 in the home match against Glamorgan at Trent Bridge. He reached 50 in 30 minutes and his century in 85, and Wisden said it involved some mighty hitting, including five sixes. It was not an innings without blemish: He was missed on eight occasions&mdash;five times in the long field.()()Test cricketerBarratt maintained his 1928 form into the 1929 season, when Nottinghamshire won the County Championship for the first time since 1907. He made 860 runs at an average of 22.05, and twice scored more than 90 without reaching a century. As before his runs came quickly: 94 in 80 minutes against Surrey and 90 in 75 minutes against Middlesex being noted by Wisden.() Bowling alongside Larwood and Voce in an attack superior to that of any other county, Barratt took, in all matches, 129 wickets at a cost of 21.24 runs each.(( And when Larwood was injured before the Fourth Test against the South Africans at Old Trafford, Barratt was picked to replace him in a side captained by his county captain, Carr. He took one wicket in each innings in a match that England won by an innings.() He was not picked for the final match of the series, when his place was taken by Nobby Clark of Northamptonshire.In the winter of 1929-30, MCC picked tour parties to visit the newly Test-playing West Indies and New Zealand. Both sides were a mixture of established Test players and other county standard amateurs and professionals, and some star players of the time opted out entirely. Barratt was picked for the tour to New Zealand, with some first-class matches (but not Test matches) being played in Australia as well. He had what Wisden called days of effectiveness with the ball.() They included two good matches on the Australian leg of the tour, taking nine wickets in the match against South Australia and five in an innings against Victoria.()() But although he played in all four Tests in New Zealand, he was not successful, taking only three wickets in the series, and never more than one in an innings. And on the tour as a whole, his batting was not up to his recent standards, with no scores of 50 in the 11 first-class matches he played in.( The end of the cricket careerBack in England in 1930, Barratt had what Wisden called an unsatisfactory season.() He scored 502 runs with three scores of more than 50, but his tally of wickets fell from 129 in 1929 to just 51, and their cost rose from 21 runs each to more than 31.( Wisden cited wet pitches in a wet summer as a cause, but Barratt was also, by this stage, 36 years old. The following season, 1931, underlined the decline. In 21 County Championship matches, Barratt took only 24 wickets at a cost of more than 41 runs each, and he scored only 305 runs in these games at an average of 12.70.() There was one last hurrah as a batsman: against Kent, he and Sam Staples put on 82 in half and hour, and in Barratts innings of 72 there were five sixes.()() But by his last Championship match in August, in an admittedly strong batting line-up, Barratt was batting at No 11, and failing to take a wicket.() At the end of the 1931 season, he retired from first-class cricket. References
3650549
Prague_groschen
thumb|Groschen of Venceslas II., obversethumb|Groschen of Venceslas II., reverseThe Prague groschen (, , , ) was a groschen-type silver coin that became very common throughout Medieval Europe. CoinIt is a silver coin with on the obverse the legend DEI GRATIA REX BOEMIE (By the grace of God the King of Bohemia) and on the verso GROSSI PRAGENSIS (Prague groschen). The weight of the coin varies between 3.5 and 3.7 g with a fineness of 933/1000 of silver. The groschen was subdivided into twelve parvus (small) coins with a Bohemian heraldic lion sign on the obverse.HistoryMinting of this coin started around 1300 after silver mines had been discovered in Hora during the reign of the Bohemian king Wenceslaus II. King Wenceslaus II invited the Italian lawyer of Orvieto to create a mining code Ius regale montanorum which also was partly was a reform of the coinage. This, and the high amount of silver found in Kutn hora resulted in the implementation of Prague groschen. Because of the high amount of silver used in the coin it became one of the most popular of the early Groschen-type coins in medieval Europe.In documents of the era, like the of Thorn (1411), large amounts of money often were given in more convenient  of Prague groschen, which equals to   5 dozen   gross  60.After the opening of new silver mines in Jchymov (Joachimsthal) the Thaler, in the Bohemia known as tolar, came in use.In 1547, minting of Prague groschen was discontinued by Ferdinand I.EtymologyThe inspiration came from France where groschen were used since 1266, and replaced old coins called denar. The name came from the Latin denarius grossus ().External links* History of Prask gro * Prager Groschen / sexagenas grossorum bohemicalium boni argenti  groGroschende Pragueja:praskigro
3660191
Mick_Harvey_(umpire)
Clarence Edgar (Mick) Harvey, (born 17 March 1921 at New South Wales), is a former cricketer and Australian Test cricket umpire. He was the brother of Test batsmen Merv and Harvey. Harvey made his first-class debut in 1948&ndash;49, playing in the first three matches of the season for Victoria as an opening batsman. However, he was unproductive, scoring only 91 runs at a average of 15.16, and was dropped. He moved to Queensland the following season in search of more opportunities and was selected in one match.Harvey had his best first-class season in 1950&ndash;51, scoring 490 runs at 37.69, including his maiden first-class century against a full-strength New South Wales team with several Test bowlers. However, he struggled the following season and was dropped, and did not play a single first-class match in 1952&ndash;53. Recalled the following season, he overcame a slow start to score two centuries later in the summer to end with 421 runs at 38.27 for the summer. After a poor season, Harvey was dropped late in the 1955&ndash;56 season.Harvey was dropped after two matches in 1956&ndash;57, ending his first-class career. After his playing career was over, Harvey took up umpiring, and made his first-class debut in 1974&ndash;75. He became a regular official over the next few seasons and then broke into international umpiring in 1978&ndash;79. In that summer, Harvey stood in two Day Internationals (ODIs) and one Test. The following season he made his final appearances at international level, presiding over another Test and four ODIs. His last season of top-level domestic umpiring was in 1981&ndash;82 during which he officiated in two matches. He finished his career having presided over 31 first-class and 13 A matches. Early years Micks father Horace Horry Harvey moved to Hill, New South Wales where he worked for BHP driving horse-drawn trailers.(Coleman, p. 552.) In 1914, he married Elsie May Bitmead and their first two children, daughter Rita and son Merv, were born in the mining town. The family relocated to Newcastle, a mining town and harbour in South Wales, where Clarence Edgar Harvey&mdash;always known as Mick, as he was born on Patricks Day&mdash;and Harold were born.( In 1926, the Harveys shifted to the inner-Melbourne suburb of Fitzroy, a staunchly working-class, industrial area.( During their relocation, Ray was born in Sydney. Horace secured a job at the confectionery company Life Savers (Australasia) Ltd, located next door to their house at 198 Argyle Street.( The 19th century two-storey house was owned by the firm and was used as lodgings for the workers families. It no longer exists, having been demolished to make way for a textile factory.( The two youngest sons Neil and Brian were born in Fitzroy.( The Cornish-descended Horry raised his family as strict Methodists, disallowing gambling, alcohol, tobacco and profanity in his household.( An ardent cricketer,( he encouraged his children to play sport. He himself played for the Rita Social Club after moving to Fitzroy.( As recreational facilities and grass ovals were sparse in densely populated Fitzroy, the boys took to playing cricket in a cobblestone laneway between their house.(Coleman, p. 553.) Here they played cricket with a ball, home made bat and a kerosene tin for a wicket.( They were usually joined by other local children, two of whom became elite sportsmen: Ruthven (an rules footballer) and Shillinglaw (both an Australian rules footballer and cricketer)&mdash;the group also played Australian rules football, kicking around rolled up cardboard and newspaper.( Much of the batting skill displayed by the Harvey brothers has been attributed to these games played on the unpredictable bounce of the bumpy laneway.( The surface also had a V-shaped slope inwards towards the centre of the lane, causing balls to deviate sideways after bouncing.(Coleman, p. 551.) As the laneway meant that the playing area was long and narrow, the young boys also had to learn to play the ball straight in accordance with orthodox cricket technique.( The Harveys played another form of cricket in their concreted backyard using a marble instead of a ball that sharpened their reflexes,(Coleman, p. 553.) and a miniature bat.(Harvey, p. 26.) All were right-handed batsmen with the exception of Neil.(Harvey, p. 25.)All of the children attended the nearby George Street State School and, one by one, the brothers joined the Fitzroy Cricket Club as they reached their early teens.() The club had a program whereby they gave a medal for every local school to award to the best cricketer in their ranks in that year. The successful student would then be given access to all of the clubs facilities.(Harvey, pp. 26&ndash;27.) All of the Harvey brothers were recipients were of this medal.(Harvey, p. 27.) At Fitzroy, they came under the influence of former Victorian all-rounder Arthur Liddicut and the clubs veteran captain Joe Plant.(Coleman, pp. 555&ndash;556.) The Harveys had no formal coaching,(Coleman, p. 555.) and their father, although a regular presence at the club, chose to stay in the background as their respective careers developed.(Coleman, p. 555.) Horace did not advise his sons on how to bat, allowing them to formulate their own style and technique.(Harvey, p. 29.) According to the Harvey brothers, it was their mother who was vocal and extroverted, in contrast to their reserved father.( The boys who failed to score runs were given kitchen duty, and according to them, their parents never showed favouritism.(During the winter, they played baseball for Fitzroy, often competing in matches played as raisers to the elite Australian rules football competition, the Victorian Football League.( Saturday night entertainment for the family typically consisted of dinner after the days cricket matches for Fitzroy, and Plant, Liddicut and other cricket club personnel were often invited.( Under the influence of Plant and Liddicut, the boys were taught to adopt an aggressive approach, using fast feet movement to attack bowling in particular.(Coleman, p. 556.) World War II and first-class debut A printer by trade, Harvey first played in the Fitzroy First XI in 1938&ndash;39. Mick opened the batting with Merv, and in 1942&ndash;43, when Neil broke into the First XI, the family occupied the first four batting positions for the team; Merv and Mick opened and Ray and Neil came in after them.(Harvey, pp. 30&ndash;31.) During War II, Harvey enlisted in the Australian Imperial Force at Fitzroy on 4 March 1943 and was a member of the 39th Infantry Battalion and went on to serve in Kokoda. He was discharged on 29 March 1946 with the rank of private.(() He resumed cricket with Fitzroy at the wars end and made enough runs to be selected for Victorias first three Sheffield Shield matches of the 1948&ndash;49 season.(  Playing as an opening batsman, he made 10 and 13 on debut against Queensland, and was trapped before wicket (lbw) in both innings in an eight-wicket win. In the next match against New South Wales, who boasted Australias new ball opening bowlers Lindwall and Miller, Harvey made 19 and 33 in a drawn match. In the subsequent match against South Australia, he made 4 and 12, again being trapped lbw in both innings.() The 1948&ndash;49 season was purely domestic with no touring Test team, so all of Australias international representatives were available for the whole season. Having scored only 91 runs at a average of 15.16, Harvey was dropped from the team.(() He did not play alongside Ray, who was dropped, and Merv, who had retired.()() It was Harveys last season for Fitzroy, and in 90 first-grade matches, he scored 2,601 runs at an average of 30.24.(Coleman, p. 564.) Move to Queensland At the time, Queensland were the least successful team in the Sheffield Shield, and Harvey moved north to Brisbane the following season to try and get more opportunities to play Sheffield Shield cricket.( Harvey joined the Toombul grade club,( and made his first-class debut for Queensland against Victoria late in the season, although none of his brothers played for Victoria in this match; Merv had already retired, Neil was representing Australia, and Ray had been dropped. In his only match for the summer, he scored 1 and 13 and took two catches in each innings as an opener.(() He was dropped after the match.(In 1950&ndash;51, his most prolific first-class season, he hit 490 runs at 37.69 for Queensland.( The season started with consecutive matches against a full-strength New South Wales, who had an attack including Lindwall, Miller, Alan Walker and Alan Davidson. In the first match, in Brisbane, Harvey made 40 and 19 batting at No. 7 before being dismissed by Davidson and Lindwall respectively.() The visitors won by an innings.(In the return match at the Cricket Ground, Harvey was promoted to bat at No. 3. He made 38 in the first innings before being dismissed by Walker.(() Harvey broke through for his maiden first-class century in the second innings, scoring an unbeaten 100. Queensland declared at 4/237 as soon as he reached his milestone, only to see the hosts reach the victory target of 225 with all ten wickets intact.(Harvey played against an international outfit for the first time in the following match against the touring cricket team, but made only three in his solitary innings. However, he continued to score consistently, making a half-century in each of the next three matches. From the third of these matches&mdash;against South Australia&mdash;onwards, he generally opened the batting for Queensland.( On his first innings back as an opener, he narrowly missed a century, being dismissed for 95 by Noblet. However, it was enough for the Queenslanders to take a 162-run first innings lead in a low-scoring match in which only one team surpassed 240 once, and set up an eight-wicket victory, the only time his state won a match for the season.( Harveys performance tapered away in the last two matches of the season. He made only 0 and 2 in the last match against Victoria, and 48 runs in his last four innings.(  Harvey started the 1951&ndash;52 season poorly, scoring 9 and 5 against a full-strength New South Wales team. In the following match, he made 90 in the first innings as Queensland defeated the touring West Indies by ten wickets.( Harvey was sidelined for six weeks before returning in late December against Victoria. He struggled in this match and the next against New South Wales, scoring 9, 20, 9 and 3. In the next match, he made 46 in the first innings before managing only five in the second, against South Australia. Nor did Queensland have success in these three matches. They were one wicket away from victory in the first match when time ran out, and lost the other two. Harvey was dropped for the remainder of the season, ending with 196 runs at 21.77.((Harvey was overlooked for Queensland selection for the whole 1952&ndash;53 season. He was recalled at the start of the 1953&ndash;54 campaign and made 26 and 20 in the first match against New South Wales, failing to convert his starts into big scores. He was retained despite making 15 and 0 in the next match against Victoria, but scored only 1 in the first innings of the match against South Australia starting on Christmas Day. Victoria were set 329 for victory, and having made only 62 runs in five innings for the season so far, he was the mainstay of the innings, scoring 102, but his team were all out for 245.(The century saw Harvey retained in the side and started a productive second half of the season.(( He made 2 and 58 in the next match starting on New Years Day, against New South Wales. Harvey then made 84 in the only innings of a drawn match against Victoria, before scoring 111 in an innings win against Western Australia. It was the first time in over two years that Harvey had played in a victorious Queensland side. He made only 2 in the final match of the season against South Australia to end with 421 runs at 38.27 for the summer.( Decline Harvey continued his good form at the start of the 1954&ndash;55 season, scoring 90 and 9 in the opening match against New South Wales. He then made 49 and 9 against the touring cricket team of Hutton. In the Christmas match against South Australia, Harvey failed to capitalise on his starts, making 31 and 35 as Queensland won by 34 runs. The following week, he made only 0 and 3 not out in the New Years match against New South Wales. He finished the truncated season with only 16 in the following match against Victoria, ending the summer with 242 runs at 30.25.((Harvey had a poor season in 1955&ndash;56. He scored only 37 runs in six completed innings in the first three matches. In the next match against Western Australia, he made only 8 in the first innings but scored 70 not out in the second innings as his teams run-chase petered away to a draw, and he retained his position in the team. He then made 17 and 28 in the next match against South Australia, out in the latter innings after making a start. After making 10 and 20 in the next match against New South Wales, he was dropped for the remainder of the season, having made only 190 runs at 17.27 for the season.((Recalled at the start of the 1956&ndash;57 season, Harvey made 40 and 28 in his first match of the summer against New South Wales, but after scoring only 2 and 2 not out against Western Australia in the next match, he was dropped for the final time.(Noted for his sound defence, he was a patient and dogged batsman, in contrast to the exciting styles of brothers Merv, Ray and Neil.( According to Neil, Mick had a weakness against bowling.(Harvey, p. 31.) Harvey was a rare bowler during his first-class career. He bowled only five overs in total, delivering one over in five different matches. He never took a wicket.( Altogether, he made 1,716 first-class runs (mostly as an opener) in 37 matches at an average of 27.23.( Harvey was also a regular choice for the Queensland baseball team during his career.( His daughter Harvey-Short represented Australia at softball,( before becoming a sports administrator. She is a fellow of the Council for Health, Physical Education and Recreation,() and was a founding member of Womensport Queensland in 1993, serving as the chair of the board from 2007 until 2010.() Her daughter Short plays cricket for the Queensland womens team.() Umpiring career After his retirement as a player, Harvey took up umpiring. His initial first-class match was in 1974&ndash;75, when he officiated in Queenslands home match against Victoria late in the season; at the time the host team provided both umpires. The following year, he was selected for four first-class matches, one of which was against the touring West Indies. He also officiated in his first A match, presiding over the final of Australias domestic limited-overs tournament, which Queensland hosted against Western Australia. The following two seasons were similar; Harvey stood in four first-class matches including one against a touring international team, and one List A match, both of which were quarter-finals.()()In 1978&ndash;79, Harveys appointments increased. Harvey stood in all of Queenslands five home Shield matches, as well as their match against the touring Englishmen. He stood in one List A match involving Queensland and was then rewarded with his international debut in the second ODI between Australia and England at the SCG, before presiding over the next ODI at the MCG.(( At the end of the season, Harvey was selected for the first of his two Tests. The first, played by Australia against Pakistan at the MCG in March 1979 was dramatic. During the run-chase, the Australians were stunned by a spell of 7 wickets for 1 run by Nawaz, just when they looked like winning. Sarfraz ended with 9/86&mdash;the other wicket was run out&mdash;as Australia collapsed from 3/305 to 310 all out to lose by 71 runs. Harveys partner was Bailhache.()Harveys other Test match was between Australia and the West Indies at the MCG during the Christmas-New Year period of 1979&ndash;80. It was won by the visitors by 10 wickets, with a bowling attack of Andy Roberts, Holding, Croft, and Garner proving too powerful for their hosts. Harveys colleague was Crafter.() Harvey also stood in four ODIs played during the inaugural Series Cup that season, which involved England, Australia and the West Indies. He presided in three of the round-robin matches, the third of which was between the two visiting teams at the Gabba. It was the only time that Harvey umpired a match at his adopted home ground. He later presided over the first match of the finals series, between the West Indies and England at the MCG. This was his sixth and final appointment at ODI level.(( Harvey also officiated three Shield matches, Queenslands tour match against England and one of their domestic one-dayers during the season.(( The following season, Harvey presided over four of the five home Shield matches, a tour match by India, and a domestic one-dayer, but was overlooked for an international fixture.(( Harveys final fixtures were during the 1981&ndash;82 season. He officiated in two matches hosted by Queensland in November, a Shield match and a one-dayer, both against Queensland. Altogether, he umpired 31 first-class and 13 List A matches in his career.(( He continued to umpire interstate matches at youth level until 1988 and stood in six finals the first grade of Queenslands local competition.( ) Notes  References * *External links* * Cricket Archive
3664023
Vuiteboeuf
Vuiteboeuf is a municipality in the district of Jura-Nord Vaudois in the canton of Vaud in Switzerland.HistoryVuiteboeuf is first mentioned in 1028 as Vaitibo.(GeographyVuiteboeuf has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 48.4% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 43.5% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 8.7% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 0.2% is either rivers or lakes.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office-Land Use Statistics 2009 data  accessed 25 March 2010)  Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 2.6% and transportation infrastructure made up 5.1%.  Out of the forested land, 41.7% of the total land area is heavily forested and 1.8% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 40.7% is used for growing crops and 6.3% is pastures, while 1.4% is used for orchards or vine crops.  All the water in the municipality is flowing water.(The municipality was part of the District until it was dissolved on 31 August 2006, and Vuiteboeuf became part of the new district of Jura-Nord Vaudois.(Nomenklaturen  Amtliches Gemeindeverzeichnis der Schweiz  accessed 4 April 2011)  The municipality is located at the foot of the Sainte-Croix hills.  It consists of the village of Vuiteboeuf and the hamlet of Peney.Coat of armsThe blazon of the municipal of arms is Argent, a Bar wavy Azure, in chief three Mining-wheels Sable, in base a Church of the first roofed Gules.(Flags of the World.com accessed 07-August-2011)DemographicsVuiteboeuf has a population (lcon) of .  , 19.9% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (19992009 ) the population has changed at a rate of 11.8%.  It has changed at a rate of 1.9% due to migration and at a rate of 9.9% due to births and deaths.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 07-August-2011)  Most of the population () speaks French (367 or 88.0%), with Portuguese being second most common (12 or 2.9%) and Albanian being third (9 or 2.2%).  There are 6 people who speak German, 6 people who speak Italian.(The age distribution, , in Vuiteboeuf is; 68 children or 14.3% of the population are between 0 and 9 years old and 67 teenagers or 14.1% are between 10 and 19.  Of the adult population, 66 people or 13.9% of the population are between 20 and 29 years old.  66 people or 13.9% are between 30 and 39, 79 people or 16.6% are between 40 and 49, and 55 people or 11.6% are between 50 and 59.  The senior population distribution is 36 people or 7.6% of the population are between 60 and 69 years old, 16 people or 3.4% are between 70 and 79, there are 20 people or 4.2% who are between 80 and 89, and there are 2 people or 0.4% who are 90 and older.(Canton of Vaud Statistical Office  accessed 29 April 2011)  , there were 204 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 167 married individuals, 17 widows or widowers and 29 individuals who are divorced.(STAT-TAB Datenwrfel fr Thema 40.3 - 2000   accessed 2 February 2011) the average number of residents per living room was 0.62 which is about equal to the cantonal average of 0.61 per room.(  In this case, a room is defined as space of a housing unit of at least 4 m (43 sq ft) as normal bedrooms, dining rooms, living rooms, kitchens and habitable cellars and attics.()  About 41% of the total households were owner occupied, or in other words did not pay rent (though they may have a mortgage or a rent-to-own agreement).(Urban Audit Glossary pg 17)  , there were 161 private households in the municipality, and an average of 2.5 persons per household.(  There were 48 households that consist of only one person and 15 households with five or more people.  Out of a total of 166 households that answered this question, 28.9% were households made up of just one person.  Of the rest of the households, there are 36 married couples without children, 62 married couples with children  There were 15 single parents with a child or children.(   there were 39 single family homes (or 39.0% of the total) out of a total of 100 inhabited buildings.  There were 18 multi-family buildings (18.0%), along with 31 multi-purpose buildings that were mostly used for housing (31.0%) and 12 other use buildings (commercial or industrial) that also had some housing (12.0%).(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB - Datenwrfel fr Thema 09.2 - Gebude und Wohnungen  accessed 28 January 2011)  , a total of 156 apartments (87.2% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 10 apartments (5.6%) were seasonally occupied and 13 apartments (7.3%) were empty.(  , the construction rate of new housing units was 0 new units per 1000 residents.(  The vacancy rate for the municipality, , was 0.53%.(The historical population is given in the following chart:()(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:1020 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:510TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:100 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:20 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1764 from:start till:247 text:247  bar:1850 from:start till:453 text:453  bar:1860 from:start till:510 text:510  bar:1870 from:start till:465 text:465  bar:1880 from:start till:456 text:456  bar:1888 from:start till:450 text:450  bar:1900 from:start till:387 text:387  bar:1910 from:start till:350 text:350  bar:1920 from:start till:312 text:312  bar:1930 from:start till:356 text:356  bar:1941 from:start till:282 text:282  bar:1950 from:start till:304 text:304  bar:1960 from:start till:290 text:290  bar:1970 from:start till:280 text:280  bar:1980 from:start till:228 text:228  bar:1990 from:start till:320 text:320  bar:2000 from:start till:417 text:417PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the SVP which received 33.83% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the SP (18.62%), the Green Party (10.18%) and the FDP (8.04%).  In the federal election, a total of 106 votes were cast, and the turnout was 38.4%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)Economy, Vuiteboeuf had an unemployment rate of 8.3%.  , there were 23 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 10 businesses involved in this sector.  45 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 12 businesses in this sector.  64 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 17 businesses in this sector.(  There were 205 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 41.5% of the workforce.   the total number of equivalent jobs was 106.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 17, all of which were in agriculture.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 39 of which 12 or (30.8%) were in manufacturing and 24 (61.5%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 50.  In the tertiary sector; 30 or 60.0% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 1 was in the movement and storage of goods, 3 or 6.0% were in a hotel or restaurant, 1 was the insurance or financial industry, 3 or 6.0% were in education and 1 was in health care.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011)  , there were 37 workers who commuted into the municipality and 137 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net exporter of workers, with about 3.7 workers leaving the municipality for every one entering.  About 10.8% of the workforce coming into Vuiteboeuf are coming from outside Switzerland.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 12.2% used public transportation to get to work, and 56.1% used a private car.(ReligionFrom the , 122 or 29.3% were Catholic, while 222 or 53.2% belonged to the Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population, there was 1 member of an Orthodox church, and there were 3 individuals (or about 0.72% of the population) who belonged to another Christian church.  There were 12 (or about 2.88% of the population) who were Islamic.  There were 3 individuals who were Hindu.  53 (or about 12.71% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 2 individuals (or about 0.48% of the population) did not answer the question.(EducationIn Vuiteboeuf about 138 or (33.1%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 41 or (9.8%) have completed additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 41 who completed tertiary schooling, 48.8% were Swiss men, 31.7% were Swiss women, 14.6% were non-Swiss men.(  In the 2009/2010 school year there were a total of 81 students in the Vuiteboeuf school district.  In the Vaud cantonal school system, two years of non-obligatory pre-school are provided by the political districts.(Organigramme de lcole vaudoise, anne scolaire 2009-2010  accessed 2 May 2011)  During the school year, the political district provided pre-school care for a total of 578 children of which 359 children (62.1%) received subsidized pre-school care.  The cantons school program requires students to attend for four years.  There were 47 students in the municipal primary school program.  The obligatory lower secondary school program lasts for six years and there were 34 students in those schools.(Canton of Vaud Statistical Office - Scol. obligatoire/filires de transition  accessed 2 May 2011)  , there were 33 students in Vuiteboeuf who came from another municipality, while 59 residents attended schools outside the municipality.(Referencesde:Vuiteboeufes:Vuiteboeuffr:Vuitebufit:Vuiteboeuflmo:Vuiteboeufnl:Vuiteboeufrm:Vuiteboeufvi:Vuiteboeufvo:Vuiteboeuf
